
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 The Last Man
 
 Mary W. Shelley
 
 First edition.
 Henry Colburn
 London
 1826
 
 
 
 
 VOL. I.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 I VISITED Naples in the year 1818. On the 8th of December of that year, my
 companion and I crossed the Bay, to visit the antiquities which are
 scattered on the shores of Baiae. The translucent and shining waters of the
 calm sea covered fragments of old Roman villas, which were interlaced by
 sea-weed, and received diamond tints from the chequering of the sun-beams;
 the blue and pellucid element was such as Galatea might have skimmed in her
 car of mother of pearl; or Cleopatra, more fitly than the Nile, have chosen
 as the path of her magic ship. Though it was winter, the atmosphere seemed
 more appropriate to early spring; and its genial warmth contributed to
 inspire those sensations of placid delight, which are the portion of every
 traveller, as he lingers, loath to quit the tranquil bays and radiant
 promontories of Baiae.
 
 We visited the so called Elysian Fields and Avernus: and wandered through
 various ruined temples, baths, and classic spots; at length we entered the
 gloomy cavern of the Cumaean Sibyl. Our Lazzeroni bore flaring torches,
 which shone red, and almost dusky, in the murky subterranean passages,
 whose darkness thirstily surrounding them, seemed eager to imbibe more and
 more of the element of light. We passed by a natural archway, leading to a
 second gallery, and enquired, if we could not enter there also. The guides
 pointed to the reflection of their torches on the water that paved it,
 leaving us to form our own conclusion; but adding it was a pity, for it led
 to the Sibyl's Cave. Our curiosity and enthusiasm were excited by this
 circumstance, and we insisted upon attempting the passage. As is usually
 the case in the prosecution of such enterprizes, the difficulties decreased
 on examination. We found, on each side of the humid pathway, "dry land for
 the sole of the foot."
 
 At length we arrived at a large, desert, dark cavern, which the Lazzeroni
 assured us was the Sibyl's Cave. We were sufficiently disappointed--Yet
 we examined it with care, as if its blank, rocky walls could still bear
 trace of celestial visitant. On one side was a small opening. Whither does
 this lead? we asked: can we enter here?--"Questo poi, no,"--said the
 wild looking savage, who held the torch; "you can advance but a short
 distance, and nobody visits it."
 
 "Nevertheless, I will try it," said my companion; "it may lead to the real
 cavern. Shall I go alone, or will you accompany me?"
 
 I signified my readiness to proceed, but our guides protested against such
 a measure. With great volubility, in their native Neapolitan dialect, with
 which we were not very familiar, they told us that there were spectres,
 that the roof would fall in, that it was too narrow to admit us, that there
 was a deep hole within, filled with water, and we might be drowned. My
 friend shortened the harangue, by taking the man's torch from him; and we
 proceeded alone.
 
 The passage, which at first scarcely admitted us, quickly grew narrower and
 lower; we were almost bent double; yet still we persisted in making our way
 through it. At length we entered a wider space, and the low roof
 heightened; but, as we congratulated ourselves on this change, our torch
 was extinguished by a current of air, and we were left in utter darkness.
 The guides bring with them materials for renewing the light, but we had
 none--our only resource was to return as we came. We groped round the
 widened space to find the entrance, and after a time fancied that we had
 succeeded. This proved however to be a second passage, which evidently
 ascended. It terminated like the former; though something approaching to a
 ray, we could not tell whence, shed a very doubtful twilight in the space.
 By degrees, our eyes grew somewhat accustomed to this dimness, and we
 perceived that there was no direct passage leading us further; but that it
 was possible to climb one side of the cavern to a low arch at top, which
 promised a more easy path, from whence we now discovered that this light
 proceeded. With considerable difficulty we scrambled up, and came to
 another passage with still more of illumination, and this led to another
 ascent like the former.
 
 After a succession of these, which our resolution alone permitted us to
 surmount, we arrived at a wide cavern with an arched dome-like roof. An
 aperture in the midst let in the light of heaven; but this was overgrown
 with brambles and underwood, which acted as a veil, obscuring the day, and
 giving a solemn religious hue to the apartment. It was spacious, and nearly
 circular, with a raised seat of stone, about the size of a Grecian couch,
 at one end. The only sign that life had been here, was the perfect
 snow-white skeleton of a goat, which had probably not perceived the opening
 as it grazed on the hill above, and had fallen headlong. Ages perhaps had
 elapsed since this catastrophe; and the ruin it had made above, had been
 repaired by the growth of vegetation during many hundred summers.
 
 The rest of the furniture of the cavern consisted of piles of leaves,
 fragments of bark, and a white filmy substance, resembling the inner part
 of the green hood which shelters the grain of the unripe Indian corn. We
 were fatigued by our struggles to attain this point, and seated ourselves
 on the rocky couch, while the sounds of tinkling sheep-bells, and shout of
 shepherd-boy, reached us from above.
 
 At length my friend, who had taken up some of the leaves strewed about,
 exclaimed, "This is the Sibyl's cave; these are Sibylline leaves." On
 examination, we found that all the leaves, bark, and other substances, were
 traced with written characters. What appeared to us more astonishing, was
 that these writings were expressed in various languages: some unknown to my
 companion, ancient Chaldee, and Egyptian hieroglyphics, old as the
 Pyramids. Stranger still, some were in modern dialects, English and
 Italian. We could make out little by the dim light, but they seemed to
 contain prophecies, detailed relations of events but lately passed; names,
 now well known, but of modern date; and often exclamations of exultation or
 woe, of victory or defeat, were traced on their thin scant pages. This was
 certainly the Sibyl's Cave; not indeed exactly as Virgil describes it, but
 the whole of this land had been so convulsed by earthquake and volcano,
 that the change was not wonderful, though the traces of ruin were effaced
 by time; and we probably owed the preservation of these leaves, to the
 accident which had closed the mouth of the cavern, and the swift-growing
 vegetation which had rendered its sole opening impervious to the storm. We
 made a hasty selection of such of the leaves, whose writing one at least of
 us could understand; and then, laden with our treasure, we bade adieu to
 the dim hypaethric cavern, and after much difficulty succeeded in rejoining
 our guides.
 
 During our stay at Naples, we often returned to this cave, sometimes alone,
 skimming the sun-lit sea, and each time added to our store. Since that
 period, whenever the world's circumstance has not imperiously called me
 away, or the temper of my mind impeded such study, I have been employed in
 deciphering these sacred remains. Their meaning, wondrous and eloquent, has
 often repaid my toil, soothing me in sorrow, and exciting my imagination to
 daring flights, through the immensity of nature and the mind of man. For
 awhile my labours were not solitary; but that time is gone; and, with the
 selected and matchless companion of my toils, their dearest reward is also
 lost to me--
 
   Di mie tenere frondi altro lavoro
   Credea mostrarte; e qual fero pianeta
   Ne' nvidio insieme, o mio nobil tesoro?
 
 I present the public with my latest discoveries in the slight Sibylline
 pages. Scattered and unconnected as they were, I have been obliged to add
 links, and model the work into a consistent form. But the main substance
 rests on the truths contained in these poetic rhapsodies, and the divine
 intuition which the Cumaean damsel obtained from heaven.
 
 I have often wondered at the subject of her verses, and at the English
 dress of the Latin poet. Sometimes I have thought, that, obscure and
 chaotic as they are, they owe their present form to me, their decipherer.
 As if we should give to another artist, the painted fragments which form
 the mosaic copy of Raphael's Transfiguration in St. Peter's; he would put
 them together in a form, whose mode would be fashioned by his own peculiar
 mind and talent. Doubtless the leaves of the Cumaean Sibyl have suffered
 distortion and diminution of interest and excellence in my hands. My only
 excuse for thus transforming them, is that they were unintelligible in
 their pristine condition.
 
 My labours have cheered long hours of solitude, and taken me out of a
 world, which has averted its once benignant face from me, to one glowing
 with imagination and power. Will my readers ask how I could find solace
 from the narration of misery and woeful change? This is one of the
 mysteries of our nature, which holds full sway over me, and from whose
 influence I cannot escape. I confess, that I have not been unmoved by the
 development of the tale; and that I have been depressed, nay, agonized, at
 some parts of the recital, which I have faithfully transcribed from my
 materials. Yet such is human nature, that the excitement of mind was dear
 to me, and that the imagination, painter of tempest and earthquake, or,
 worse, the stormy and ruin-fraught passions of man, softened my real
 sorrows and endless regrets, by clothing these fictitious ones in that
 ideality, which takes the mortal sting from pain.
 
 I hardly know whether this apology is necessary. For the merits of my
 adaptation and translation must decide how far I have well bestowed my time
 and imperfect powers, in giving form and substance to the frail and
 attenuated Leaves of the Sibyl.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 I AM the native of a sea-surrounded nook, a cloud-enshadowed land, which,
 when the surface of the globe, with its shoreless ocean and trackless
 continents, presents itself to my mind, appears only as an inconsiderable
 speck in the immense whole; and yet, when balanced in the scale of mental
 power, far outweighed countries of larger extent and more numerous
 population. So true it is, that man's mind alone was the creator of all
 that was good or great to man, and that Nature herself was only his first
 minister. England, seated far north in the turbid sea, now visits my dreams
 in the semblance of a vast and well-manned ship, which mastered the winds
 and rode proudly over the waves. In my boyish days she was the universe to
 me. When I stood on my native hills, and saw plain and mountain stretch out
 to the utmost limits of my vision, speckled by the dwellings of my
 countrymen, and subdued to fertility by their labours, the earth's very
 centre was fixed for me in that spot, and the rest of her orb was as a
 fable, to have forgotten which would have cost neither my imagination nor
 understanding an effort.
 
 My fortunes have been, from the beginning, an exemplification of the power
 that mutability may possess over the varied tenor of man's life. With
 regard to myself, this came almost by inheritance. My father was one of
 those men on whom nature had bestowed to prodigality the envied gifts of
 wit and imagination, and then left his bark of life to be impelled by these
 winds, without adding reason as the rudder, or judgment as the pilot for
 the voyage. His extraction was obscure; but circumstances brought him early
 into public notice, and his small paternal property was soon dissipated in
 the splendid scene of fashion and luxury in which he was an actor. During
 the short years of thoughtless youth, he was adored by the high-bred
 triflers of the day, nor least by the youthful sovereign, who escaped from
 the intrigues of party, and the arduous duties of kingly business, to find
 never-failing amusement and exhilaration of spirit in his society. My
 father's impulses, never under his own controul, perpetually led him into
 difficulties from which his ingenuity alone could extricate him; and the
 accumulating pile of debts of honour and of trade, which would have bent to
 earth any other, was supported by him with a light spirit and tameless
 hilarity; while his company was so necessary at the tables and assemblies
 of the rich, that his derelictions were considered venial, and he himself
 received with intoxicating flattery.
 
 This kind of popularity, like every other, is evanescent: and the
 difficulties of every kind with which he had to contend, increased in a
 frightful ratio compared with his small means of extricating himself. At
 such times the king, in his enthusiasm for him, would come to his relief,
 and then kindly take his friend to task; my father gave the best promises
 for amendment, but his social disposition, his craving for the usual diet
 of admiration, and more than all, the fiend of gambling, which fully
 possessed him, made his good resolutions transient, his promises vain. With
 the quick sensibility peculiar to his temperament, he perceived his power
 in the brilliant circle to be on the wane. The king married; and the
 haughty princess of Austria, who became, as queen of England, the head of
 fashion, looked with harsh eyes on his defects, and with contempt on the
 affection her royal husband entertained for him. My father felt that his
 fall was near; but so far from profiting by this last calm before the storm
 to save himself, he sought to forget anticipated evil by making still
 greater sacrifices to the deity of pleasure, deceitful and cruel arbiter of
 his destiny.
 
 The king, who was a man of excellent dispositions, but easily led, had now
 become a willing disciple of his imperious consort. He was induced to look
 with extreme disapprobation, and at last with distaste, on my father's
 imprudence and follies. It is true that his presence dissipated these
 clouds; his warm-hearted frankness, brilliant sallies, and confiding
 demeanour were irresistible: it was only when at a distance, while still
 renewed tales of his errors were poured into his royal friend's ear, that
 he lost his influence. The queen's dextrous management was employed to
 prolong these absences, and gather together accusations. At length the king
 was brought to see in him a source of perpetual disquiet, knowing that he
 should pay for the short-lived pleasure of his society by tedious homilies,
 and more painful narrations of excesses, the truth of which he could not
 disprove. The result was, that he would make one more attempt to reclaim
 him, and in case of ill success, cast him off for ever.
 
 Such a scene must have been one of deepest interest and high-wrought
 passion. A powerful king, conspicuous for a goodness which had heretofore
 made him meek, and now lofty in his admonitions, with alternate entreaty
 and reproof, besought his friend to attend to his real interests,
 resolutely to avoid those fascinations which in fact were fast deserting
 him, and to spend his great powers on a worthy field, in which he, his
 sovereign, would be his prop, his stay, and his pioneer. My father felt
 this kindness; for a moment ambitious dreams floated before him; and he
 thought that it would be well to exchange his present pursuits for nobler
 duties. With sincerity and fervour he gave the required promise: as a
 pledge of continued favour, he received from his royal master a sum of
 money to defray pressing debts, and enable him to enter under good auspices
 his new career. That very night, while yet full of gratitude and good
 resolves, this whole sum, and its amount doubled, was lost at the
 gaming-table. In his desire to repair his first losses, my father risked
 double stakes, and thus incurred a debt of honour he was wholly unable to
 pay. Ashamed to apply again to the king, he turned his back upon London,
 its false delights and clinging miseries; and, with poverty for his sole
 companion, buried himself in solitude among the hills and lakes of
 Cumberland. His wit, his bon mots, the record of his personal attractions,
 fascinating manners, and social talents, were long remembered and repeated
 from mouth to mouth. Ask where now was this favourite of fashion, this
 companion of the noble, this excelling beam, which gilt with alien
 splendour the assemblies of the courtly and the gay--you heard that he
 was under a cloud, a lost man; not one thought it belonged to him to repay
 pleasure by real services, or that his long reign of brilliant wit deserved
 a pension on retiring. The king lamented his absence; he loved to repeat
 his sayings, relate the adventures they had had together, and exalt his
 talents--but here ended his reminiscence.
 
 Meanwhile my father, forgotten, could not forget. He repined for the loss
 of what was more necessary to him than air or food--the excitements of
 pleasure, the admiration of the noble, the luxurious and polished living of
 the great. A nervous fever was the consequence; during which he was nursed
 by the daughter of a poor cottager, under whose roof he lodged. She was
 lovely, gentle, and, above all, kind to him; nor can it afford
 astonishment, that the late idol of high-bred beauty should, even in a
 fallen state, appear a being of an elevated and wondrous nature to the
 lowly cottage-girl. The attachment between them led to the ill-fated
 marriage, of which I was the offspring. Notwithstanding the tenderness and
 sweetness of my mother, her husband still deplored his degraded state.
 Unaccustomed to industry, he knew not in what way to contribute to the
 support of his increasing family. Sometimes he thought of applying to the
 king; pride and shame for a while withheld him; and, before his necessities
 became so imperious as to compel him to some kind of exertion, he died. For
 one brief interval before this catastrophe, he looked forward to the
 future, and contemplated with anguish the desolate situation in which his
 wife and children would be left. His last effort was a letter to the king,
 full of touching eloquence, and of occasional flashes of that brilliant
 spirit which was an integral part of him. He bequeathed his widow and
 orphans to the friendship of his royal master, and felt satisfied that, by
 this means, their prosperity was better assured in his death than in his
 life. This letter was enclosed to the care of a nobleman, who, he did not
 doubt, would perform the last and inexpensive office of placing it in the
 king's own hand.
 
 He died in debt, and his little property was seized immediately by his
 creditors. My mother, pennyless and burthened with two children, waited
 week after week, and month after month, in sickening expectation of a
 reply, which never came. She had no experience beyond her father's cottage;
 and the mansion of the lord of the manor was the chiefest type of grandeur
 she could conceive. During my father's life, she had been made familiar
 with the name of royalty and the courtly circle; but such things, ill
 according with her personal experience, appeared, after the loss of him who
 gave substance and reality to them, vague and fantastical. If, under any
 circumstances, she could have acquired sufficient courage to address the
 noble persons mentioned by her husband, the ill success of his own
 application caused her to banish the idea. She saw therefore no escape from
 dire penury: perpetual care, joined to sorrow for the loss of the wondrous
 being, whom she continued to contemplate with ardent admiration, hard
 labour, and naturally delicate health, at length released her from the sad
 continuity of want and misery.
 
 The condition of her orphan children was peculiarly desolate. Her own
 father had been an emigrant from another part of the country, and had died
 long since: they had no one relation to take them by the hand; they were
 outcasts, paupers, unfriended beings, to whom the most scanty pittance was
 a matter of favour, and who were treated merely as children of peasants,
 yet poorer than the poorest, who, dying, had left them, a thankless
 bequest, to the close-handed charity of the land.
 
 I, the elder of the two, was five years old when my mother died. A
 remembrance of the discourses of my parents, and the communications which
 my mother endeavoured to impress upon me concerning my father's friends, in
 slight hope that I might one day derive benefit from the knowledge, floated
 like an indistinct dream through my brain. I conceived that I was different
 and superior to my protectors and companions, but I knew not how or
 wherefore. The sense of injury, associated with the name of king and noble,
 clung to me; but I could draw no conclusions from such feelings, to serve
 as a guide to action. My first real knowledge of myself was as an
 unprotected orphan among the valleys and fells of Cumberland. I was in the
 service of a farmer; and with crook in hand, my dog at my side, I
 shepherded a numerous flock on the near uplands. I cannot say much in
 praise of such a life; and its pains far exceeded its pleasures. There was
 freedom in it, a companionship with nature, and a reckless loneliness; but
 these, romantic as they were, did not accord with the love of action and
 desire of human sympathy, characteristic of youth. Neither the care of my
 flock, nor the change of seasons, were sufficient to tame my eager spirit;
 my out-door life and unemployed time were the temptations that led me early
 into lawless habits. I associated with others friendless like myself; I
 formed them into a band, I was their chief and captain. All shepherd-boys
 alike, while our flocks were spread over the pastures, we schemed and
 executed many a mischievous prank, which drew on us the anger and revenge
 of the rustics. I was the leader and protector of my comrades, and as I
 became distinguished among them, their misdeeds were usually visited upon
 me. But while I endured punishment and pain in their defence with the
 spirit of an hero, I claimed as my reward their praise and obedience.
 
 In such a school my disposition became rugged, but firm. The appetite for
 admiration and small capacity for self-controul which I inherited from my
 father, nursed by adversity, made me daring and reckless. I was rough as
 the elements, and unlearned as the animals I tended. I often compared
 myself to them, and finding that my chief superiority consisted in power, I
 soon persuaded myself that it was in power only that I was inferior to the
 chiefest potentates of the earth. Thus untaught in refined philosophy, and
 pursued by a restless feeling of degradation from my true station in
 society, I wandered among the hills of civilized England as uncouth a
 savage as the wolf-bred founder of old Rome. I owned but one law, it was
 that of the strongest, and my greatest deed of virtue was never to submit.
 
 Yet let me a little retract from this sentence I have passed on myself. My
 mother, when dying, had, in addition to her other half-forgotten and
 misapplied lessons, committed, with solemn exhortation, her other child to
 my fraternal guardianship; and this one duty I performed to the best of my
 ability, with all the zeal and affection of which my nature was capable. My
 sister was three years younger than myself; I had nursed her as an infant,
 and when the difference of our sexes, by giving us various occupations, in
 a great measure divided us, yet she continued to be the object of my
 careful love. Orphans, in the fullest sense of the term, we were poorest
 among the poor, and despised among the unhonoured. If my daring and courage
 obtained for me a kind of respectful aversion, her youth and sex, since
 they did not excite tenderness, by proving her to be weak, were the causes
 of numberless mortifications to her; and her own disposition was not so
 constituted as to diminish the evil effects of her lowly station.
 
 She was a singular being, and, like me, inherited much of the peculiar
 disposition of our father. Her countenance was all expression; her eyes
 were not dark, but impenetrably deep; you seemed to discover space after
 space in their intellectual glance, and to feel that the soul which was
 their soul, comprehended an universe of thought in its ken. She was pale
 and fair, and her golden hair clustered on her temples, contrasting its
 rich hue with the living marble beneath. Her coarse peasant-dress, little
 consonant apparently with the refinement of feeling which her face
 expressed, yet in a strange manner accorded with it. She was like one of
 Guido's saints, with heaven in her heart and in her look, so that when you
 saw her you only thought of that within, and costume and even feature were
 secondary to the mind that beamed in her countenance.
 
 Yet though lovely and full of noble feeling, my poor Perdita (for this was
 the fanciful name my sister had received from her dying parent), was not
 altogether saintly in her disposition. Her manners were cold and repulsive.
 If she had been nurtured by those who had regarded her with affection, she
 might have been different; but unloved and neglected, she repaid want of
 kindness with distrust and silence. She was submissive to those who held
 authority over her, but a perpetual cloud dwelt on her brow; she looked as
 if she expected enmity from every one who approached her, and her actions
 were instigated by the same feeling. All the time she could command she
 spent in solitude. She would ramble to the most unfrequented places, and
 scale dangerous heights, that in those unvisited spots she might wrap
 herself in loneliness. Often she passed whole hours walking up and down the
 paths of the woods; she wove garlands of flowers and ivy, or watched the
 flickering of the shadows and glancing of the leaves; sometimes she sat
 beside a stream, and as her thoughts paused, threw flowers or pebbles into
 the waters, watching how those swam and these sank; or she would set afloat
 boats formed of bark of trees or leaves, with a feather for a sail, and
 intensely watch the navigation of her craft among the rapids and shallows
 of the brook. Meanwhile her active fancy wove a thousand combinations; she
 dreamt "of moving accidents by flood and field"--she lost herself
 delightedly in these self-created wanderings, and returned with unwilling
 spirit to the dull detail of common life. Poverty was the cloud that veiled
 her excellencies, and all that was good in her seemed about to perish from
 want of the genial dew of affection. She had not even the same advantage as
 I in the recollection of her parents; she clung to me, her brother, as her
 only friend, but her alliance with me completed the distaste that her
 protectors felt for her; and every error was magnified by them into crimes.
 If she had been bred in that sphere of life to which by inheritance the
 delicate framework of her mind and person was adapted, she would have been
 the object almost of adoration, for her virtues were as eminent as her
 defects. All the genius that ennobled the blood of her father illustrated
 hers; a generous tide flowed in her veins; artifice, envy, or meanness,
 were at the antipodes of her nature; her countenance, when enlightened by
 amiable feeling, might have belonged to a queen of nations; her eyes were
 bright; her look fearless.
 
 Although by our situation and dispositions we were almost equally cut off
 from the usual forms of social intercourse, we formed a strong contrast to
 each other. I always required the stimulants of companionship and applause.
 Perdita was all-sufficient to herself. Notwithstanding my lawless habits,
 my disposition was sociable, hers recluse. My life was spent among tangible
 realities, hers was a dream. I might be said even to love my enemies, since
 by exciting me they in a sort bestowed happiness upon me; Perdita almost
 disliked her friends, for they interfered with her visionary moods. All my
 feelings, even of exultation and triumph, were changed to bitterness, if
 unparticipated; Perdita, even in joy, fled to loneliness, and could go on
 from day to day, neither expressing her emotions, nor seeking a
 fellow-feeling in another mind. Nay, she could love and dwell with
 tenderness on the look and voice of her friend, while her demeanour
 expressed the coldest reserve. A sensation with her became a sentiment, and
 she never spoke until she had mingled her perceptions of outward objects
 with others which were the native growth of her own mind. She was like a
 fruitful soil that imbibed the airs and dews of heaven, and gave them forth
 again to light in loveliest forms of fruits and flowers; but then she was
 often dark and rugged as that soil, raked up, and new sown with unseen
 seed.
 
 She dwelt in a cottage whose trim grass-plat sloped down to the waters of
 the lake of Ulswater; a beech wood stretched up the hill behind, and a
 purling brook gently falling from the acclivity ran through poplar-shaded
 banks into the lake. I lived with a farmer whose house was built higher up
 among the hills: a dark crag rose behind it, and, exposed to the north, the
 snow lay in its crevices the summer through. Before dawn I led my flock to
 the sheep-walks, and guarded them through the day. It was a life of toil;
 for rain and cold were more frequent than sunshine; but it was my pride to
 contemn the elements. My trusty dog watched the sheep as I slipped away to
 the rendezvous of my comrades, and thence to the accomplishment of our
 schemes. At noon we met again, and we threw away in contempt our peasant
 fare, as we built our fire-place and kindled the cheering blaze destined to
 cook the game stolen from the neighbouring preserves. Then came the tale of
 hair-breadth escapes, combats with dogs, ambush and flight, as gipsey-like
 we encompassed our pot. The search after a stray lamb, or the devices by
 which we elude or endeavoured to elude punishment, filled up the hours of
 afternoon; in the evening my flock went to its fold, and I to my sister.
 
 It was seldom indeed that we escaped, to use an old-fashioned phrase, scot
 free. Our dainty fare was often exchanged for blows and imprisonment. Once,
 when thirteen years of age, I was sent for a month to the county jail. I
 came out, my morals unimproved, my hatred to my oppressors encreased
 tenfold. Bread and water did not tame my blood, nor solitary confinement
 inspire me with gentle thoughts. I was angry, impatient, miserable; my only
 happy hours were those during which I devised schemes of revenge; these
 were perfected in my forced solitude, so that during the whole of the
 following season, and I was freed early in September, I never failed to
 provide excellent and plenteous fare for myself and my comrades. This was a
 glorious winter. The sharp frost and heavy snows tamed the animals, and
 kept the country gentlemen by their firesides; we got more game than we
 could eat, and my faithful dog grew sleek upon our refuse.
 
 Thus years passed on; and years only added fresh love of freedom, and
 contempt for all that was not as wild and rude as myself. At the age of
 sixteen I had shot up in appearance to man's estate; I was tall and
 athletic; I was practised to feats of strength, and inured to the
 inclemency of the elements. My skin was embrowned by the sun; my step was
 firm with conscious power. I feared no man, and loved none. In after life I
 looked back with wonder to what I then was; how utterly worthless I should
 have become if I had pursued my lawless career. My life was like that of an
 animal, and my mind was in danger of degenerating into that which informs
 brute nature. Until now, my savage habits had done me no radical mischief;
 my physical powers had grown up and flourished under their influence, and
 my mind, undergoing the same discipline, was imbued with all the hardy
 virtues. But now my boasted independence was daily instigating me to acts
 of tyranny, and freedom was becoming licentiousness. I stood on the brink
 of manhood; passions, strong as the trees of a forest, had already taken
 root within me, and were about to shadow with their noxious overgrowth, my
 path of life.
 
 I panted for enterprises beyond my childish exploits, and formed
 distempered dreams of future action. I avoided my ancient comrades, and I
 soon lost them. They arrived at the age when they were sent to fulfil their
 destined situations in life; while I, an outcast, with none to lead or
 drive me forward, paused. The old began to point at me as an example, the
 young to wonder at me as a being distinct from themselves; I hated them,
 and began, last and worst degradation, to hate myself. I clung to my
 ferocious habits, yet half despised them; I continued my war against
 civilization, and yet entertained a wish to belong to it.
 
 I revolved again and again all that I remembered my mother to have told me
 of my father's former life; I contemplated the few relics I possessed
 belonging to him, which spoke of greater refinement than could be found
 among the mountain cottages; but nothing in all this served as a guide to
 lead me to another and pleasanter way of life. My father had been connected
 with nobles, but all I knew of such connection was subsequent neglect. The
 name of the king,--he to whom my dying father had addressed his latest
 prayers, and who had barbarously slighted them, was associated only with
 the ideas of unkindness, injustice, and consequent resentment. I was born
 for something greater than I was--and greater I would become; but
 greatness, at least to my distorted perceptions, was no necessary associate
 of goodness, and my wild thoughts were unchecked by moral considerations
 when they rioted in dreams of distinction. Thus I stood upon a pinnacle, a
 sea of evil rolled at my feet; I was about to precipitate myself into it,
 and rush like a torrent over all obstructions to the object of my wishes--
 when a stranger influence came over the current of my fortunes, and changed
 their boisterous course to what was in comparison like the gentle
 meanderings of a meadow-encircling streamlet.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 I LIVED far from the busy haunts of men, and the rumour of wars or
 political changes came worn to a mere sound, to our mountain abodes.
 England had been the scene of momentous struggles, during my early boyhood.
 In the year 2073, the last of its kings, the ancient friend of my father,
 had abdicated in compliance with the gentle force of the remonstrances of
 his subjects, and a republic was instituted. Large estates were secured to
 the dethroned monarch and his family; he received the title of Earl of
 Windsor, and Windsor Castle, an ancient royalty, with its wide demesnes
 were a part of his allotted wealth. He died soon after, leaving two
 children, a son and a daughter.
 
 The ex-queen, a princess of the house of Austria, had long impelled her
 husband to withstand the necessity of the times. She was haughty and
 fearless; she cherished a love of power, and a bitter contempt for him who
 had despoiled himself of a kingdom. For her children's sake alone she
 consented to remain, shorn of regality, a member of the English republic.
 When she became a widow, she turned all her thoughts to the educating her
 son Adrian, second Earl of Windsor, so as to accomplish her ambitious ends;
 and with his mother's milk he imbibed, and was intended to grow up in the
 steady purpose of re-acquiring his lost crown. Adrian was now fifteen years
 of age. He was addicted to study, and imbued beyond his years with learning
 and talent: report said that he had already begun to thwart his mother's
 views, and to entertain republican principles. However this might be, the
 haughty Countess entrusted none with the secrets of her family-tuition.
 Adrian was bred up in solitude, and kept apart from the natural companions
 of his age and rank. Some unknown circumstance now induced his mother to
 send him from under her immediate tutelage; and we heard that he was about
 to visit Cumberland. A thousand tales were rife, explanatory of the
 Countess of Windsor's conduct; none true probably; but each day it became
 more certain that we should have the noble scion of the late regal house of
 England among us.
 
 There was a large estate with a mansion attached to it, belonging to this
 family, at Ulswater. A large park was one of its appendages, laid out with
 great taste, and plentifully stocked with game. I had often made
 depredations on these preserves; and the neglected state of the property
 facilitated my incursions. When it was decided that the young Earl of
 Windsor should visit Cumberland, workmen arrived to put the house and
 grounds in order for his reception. The apartments were restored to their
 pristine splendour, and the park, all disrepairs restored, was guarded with
 unusual care.
 
 I was beyond measure disturbed by this intelligence. It roused all my
 dormant recollections, my suspended sentiments of injury, and gave rise to
 the new one of revenge. I could no longer attend to my occupations; all my
 plans and devices were forgotten; I seemed about to begin life anew, and
 that under no good auspices. The tug of war, I thought, was now to begin.
 He would come triumphantly to the district to which my parent had fled
 broken-hearted; he would find the ill-fated offspring, bequeathed with such
 vain confidence to his royal father, miserable paupers. That he should know
 of our existence, and treat us, near at hand, with the same contumely which
 his father had practised in distance and absence, appeared to me the
 certain consequence of all that had gone before. Thus then I should meet
 this titled stripling--the son of my father's friend. He would be hedged
 in by servants; nobles, and the sons of nobles, were his companions; all
 England rang with his name; and his coming, like a thunderstorm, was heard
 from far: while I, unlettered and unfashioned, should, if I came in contact
 with him, in the judgment of his courtly followers, bear evidence in my
 very person to the propriety of that ingratitude which had made me the
 degraded being I appeared.
 
 With my mind fully occupied by these ideas, I might be said as if
 fascinated, to haunt the destined abode of the young Earl. I watched the
 progress of the improvements, and stood by the unlading waggons, as various
 articles of luxury, brought from London, were taken forth and conveyed into
 the mansion. It was part of the Ex-Queen's plan, to surround her son with
 princely magnificence. I beheld rich carpets and silken hangings, ornaments
 of gold, richly embossed metals, emblazoned furniture, and all the
 appendages of high rank arranged, so that nothing but what was regal in
 splendour should reach the eye of one of royal descent. I looked on these;
 I turned my gaze to my own mean dress.--Whence sprung this difference?
 Whence but from ingratitude, from falsehood, from a dereliction on the part
 of the prince's father, of all noble sympathy and generous feeling.
 Doubtless, he also, whose blood received a mingling tide from his proud
 mother--he, the acknowledged focus of the kingdom's wealth and nobility,
 had been taught to repeat my father's name with disdain, and to scoff at my
 just claims to protection. I strove to think that all this grandeur was but
 more glaring infamy, and that, by planting his gold-enwoven flag beside my
 tarnished and tattered banner, he proclaimed not his superiority, but his
 debasement. Yet I envied him. His stud of beautiful horses, his arms of
 costly workmanship, the praise that attended him, the adoration, ready
 servitor, high place and high esteem,--I considered them as forcibly
 wrenched from me, and envied them all with novel and tormenting
 bitterness.
 
 To crown my vexation of spirit, Perdita, the visionary Perdita, seemed to
 awake to real life with transport, when she told me that the Earl of
 Windsor was about to arrive.
 
 "And this pleases you?" I observed, moodily.
 
 "Indeed it does, Lionel," she replied; "I quite long to see him; he is the
 descendant of our kings, the first noble of the land: every one admires and
 loves him, and they say that his rank is his least merit; he is generous,
 brave, and affable."
 
 "You have learnt a pretty lesson, Perdita," said I, "and repeat it so
 literally, that you forget the while the proofs we have of the Earl's
 virtues; his generosity to us is manifest in our plenty, his bravery in the
 protection he affords us, his affability in the notice he takes of us. His
 rank his least merit, do you say? Why, all his virtues are derived from his
 station only; because he is rich, he is called generous; because he is
 powerful, brave; because he is well served, he is affable. Let them call
 him so, let all England believe him to be thus--we know him--he is our
 enemy--our penurious, dastardly, arrogant enemy; if he were gifted with
 one particle of the virtues you call his, he would do justly by us, if it
 were only to shew, that if he must strike, it should not be a fallen foe.
 His father injured my father--his father, unassailable on his throne,
 dared despise him who only stooped beneath himself, when he deigned to
 associate with the royal ingrate. We, descendants from the one and the
 other, must be enemies also. He shall find that I can feel my injuries; he
 shall learn to dread my revenge!"
 
 A few days after he arrived. Every inhabitant of the most miserable
 cottage, went to swell the stream of population that poured forth to meet
 him: even Perdita, in spite of my late philippic, crept near the highway,
 to behold this idol of all hearts. I, driven half mad, as I met party after
 party of the country people, in their holiday best, descending the hills,
 escaped to their cloud-veiled summits, and looking on the sterile rocks
 about me, exclaimed--"They do not cry, long live the Earl!" Nor, when
 night came, accompanied by drizzling rain and cold, would I return home;
 for I knew that each cottage rang with the praises of Adrian; as I felt my
 limbs grow numb and chill, my pain served as food for my insane aversion;
 nay, I almost triumphed in it, since it seemed to afford me reason and
 excuse for my hatred of my unheeding adversary. All was attributed to him,
 for I confounded so entirely the idea of father and son, that I forgot that
 the latter might be wholly unconscious of his parent's neglect of us; and
 as I struck my aching head with my hand, I cried: "He shall hear of this! I
 will be revenged! I will not suffer like a spaniel! He shall know, beggar
 and friendless as I am, that I will not tamely submit to injury!" Each day,
 each hour added to these exaggerated wrongs. His praises were so many
 adder's stings infixed in my vulnerable breast. If I saw him at a distance,
 riding a beautiful horse, my blood boiled with rage; the air seemed
 poisoned by his presence, and my very native English was changed to a vile
 jargon, since every phrase I heard was coupled with his name and honour. I
 panted to relieve this painful heart-burning by some misdeed that should
 rouse him to a sense of my antipathy. It was the height of his offending,
 that he should occasion in me such intolerable sensations, and not deign
 himself to afford any demonstration that he was aware that I even lived to
 feel them.
 
 It soon became known that Adrian took great delight in his park and
 preserves. He never sported, but spent hours in watching the tribes of
 lovely and almost tame animals with which it was stocked, and ordered that
 greater care should be taken of them than ever. Here was an opening for my
 plans of offence, and I made use of it with all the brute impetuosity I
 derived from my active mode of life. I proposed the enterprize of poaching
 on his demesne to my few remaining comrades, who were the most determined
 and lawless of the crew; but they all shrunk from the peril; so I was left
 to achieve my revenge myself. At first my exploits were unperceived; I
 increased in daring; footsteps on the dewy grass, torn boughs, and marks of
 slaughter, at length betrayed me to the game-keepers. They kept better
 watch; I was taken, and sent to prison. I entered its gloomy walls in a fit
 of triumphant extasy: "He feels me now," I cried, "and shall, again and
 again!"--I passed but one day in confinement; in the evening I was
 liberated, as I was told, by the order of the Earl himself. This news
 precipitated me from my self-raised pinnacle of honour. He despises me, I
 thought; but he shall learn that I despise him, and hold in equal contempt
 his punishments and his clemency. On the second night after my release, I
 was again taken by the gamekeepers--again imprisoned, and again released;
 and again, such was my pertinacity, did the fourth night find me in the
 forbidden park. The gamekeepers were more enraged than their lord by my
 obstinacy. They had received orders that if I were again taken, I should be
 brought to the Earl; and his lenity made them expect a conclusion which
 they considered ill befitting my crime. One of them, who had been from the
 first the leader among those who had seized me, resolved to satisfy his own
 resentment, before he made me over to the higher powers.
 
 The late setting of the moon, and the extreme caution I was obliged to use
 in this my third expedition, consumed so much time, that something like a
 qualm of fear came over me when I perceived dark night yield to twilight. I
 crept along by the fern, on my hands and knees, seeking the shadowy coverts
 of the underwood, while the birds awoke with unwelcome song above, and the
 fresh morning wind, playing among the boughs, made me suspect a footfall at
 each turn. My heart beat quick as I approached the palings; my hand was on
 one of them, a leap would take me to the other side, when two keepers
 sprang from an ambush upon me: one knocked me down, and proceeded to
 inflict a severe horse-whipping. I started up--a knife was in my grasp; I
 made a plunge at his raised right arm, and inflicted a deep, wide wound in
 his hand. The rage and yells of the wounded man, the howling execrations of
 his comrade, which I answered with equal bitterness and fury, echoed
 through the dell; morning broke more and more, ill accordant in its
 celestial beauty with our brute and noisy contest. I and my enemy were
 still struggling, when the wounded man exclaimed, "The Earl!" I sprang out
 of the herculean hold of the keeper, panting from my exertions; I cast
 furious glances on my persecutors, and placing myself with my back to a
 tree, resolved to defend myself to the last. My garments were torn, and
 they, as well as my hands, were stained with the blood of the man I had
 wounded; one hand grasped the dead birds--my hard-earned prey, the other
 held the knife; my hair was matted; my face besmeared with the same guilty
 signs that bore witness against me on the dripping instrument I clenched;
 my whole appearance was haggard and squalid. Tall and muscular as I was in
 form, I must have looked like, what indeed I was, the merest ruffian that
 ever trod the earth.
 
 The name of the Earl startled me, and caused all the indignant blood that
 warmed my heart to rush into my cheeks; I had never seen him before; I
 figured to myself a haughty, assuming youth, who would take me to task, if
 he deigned to speak to me, with all the arrogance of superiority. My reply
 was ready; a reproach I deemed calculated to sting his very heart. He came
 up the while; and his appearance blew aside, with gentle western breath, my
 cloudy wrath: a tall, slim, fair boy, with a physiognomy expressive of the
 excess of sensibility and refinement stood before me; the morning sunbeams
 tinged with gold his silken hair, and spread light and glory over his
 beaming countenance. "How is this?" he cried. The men eagerly began their
 defence; he put them aside, saying, "Two of you at once on a mere lad--
 for shame!" He came up to me: "Verney," he cried, "Lionel Verney, do we
 meet thus for the first time? We were born to be friends to each other; and
 though ill fortune has divided us, will you not acknowledge the hereditary
 bond of friendship which I trust will hereafter unite us?"
 
 As he spoke, his earnest eyes, fixed on me, seemed to read my very soul: my
 heart, my savage revengeful heart, felt the influence of sweet benignity
 sink upon it; while his thrilling voice, like sweetest melody, awoke a mute
 echo within me, stirring to its depths the life-blood in my frame. I
 desired to reply, to acknowledge his goodness, accept his proffered
 friendship; but words, fitting words, were not afforded to the rough
 mountaineer; I would have held out my hand, but its guilty stain restrained
 me. Adrian took pity on my faltering mien: "Come with me," he said, "I have
 much to say to you; come home with me--you know who I am?"
 
 "Yes," I exclaimed, "I do believe that I now know you, and that you will
 pardon my mistakes--my crime."
 
 Adrian smiled gently; and after giving his orders to the gamekeepers, he
 came up to me; putting his arm in mine, we walked together to the mansion.
 
 It was not his rank--after all that I have said, surely it will not be
 suspected that it was Adrian's rank, that, from the first, subdued my heart
 of hearts, and laid my entire spirit prostrate before him. Nor was it I
 alone who felt thus intimately his perfections. His sensibility and
 courtesy fascinated every one. His vivacity, intelligence, and active
 spirit of benevolence, completed the conquest. Even at this early age, he
 was deep read and imbued with the spirit of high philosophy. This spirit
 gave a tone of irresistible persuasion to his intercourse with others, so
 that he seemed like an inspired musician, who struck, with unerring skill,
 the "lyre of mind," and produced thence divine harmony. In person, he
 hardly appeared of this world; his slight frame was overinformed by the
 soul that dwelt within; he was all mind; "Man but a rush against" his
 breast, and it would have conquered his strength; but the might of his
 smile would have tamed an hungry lion, or caused a legion of armed men to
 lay their weapons at his feet.
 
 I spent the day with him. At first he did not recur to the past, or indeed
 to any personal occurrences. He wished probably to inspire me with
 confidence, and give me time to gather together my scattered thoughts. He
 talked of general subjects, and gave me ideas I had never before conceived.
 We sat in his library, and he spoke of the old Greek sages, and of the
 power which they had acquired over the minds of men, through the force of
 love and wisdom only. The room was decorated with the busts of many of
 them, and he described their characters to me. As he spoke, I felt subject
 to him; and all my boasted pride and strength were subdued by the honeyed
 accents of this blue-eyed boy. The trim and paled demesne of civilization,
 which I had before regarded from my wild jungle as inaccessible, had its
 wicket opened by him; I stepped within, and felt, as I entered, that I trod
 my native soil.
 
 As evening came on, he reverted to the past. "I have a tale to relate," he
 said, "and much explanation to give concerning the past; perhaps you can
 assist me to curtail it. Do you remember your father? I had never the
 happiness of seeing him, but his name is one of my earliest recollections:
 he stands written in my mind's tablets as the type of all that was gallant,
 amiable, and fascinating in man. His wit was not more conspicuous than the
 overflowing goodness of his heart, which he poured in such full measure on
 his friends, as to leave, alas! small remnant for himself."
 
 Encouraged by this encomium, I proceeded, in answer to his inquiries, to
 relate what I remembered of my parent; and he gave an account of those
 circumstances which had brought about a neglect of my father's testamentary
 letter. When, in after times, Adrian's father, then king of England, felt
 his situation become more perilous, his line of conduct more embarrassed,
 again and again he wished for his early friend, who might stand a mound
 against the impetuous anger of his queen, a mediator between him and the
 parliament. From the time that he had quitted London, on the fatal night of
 his defeat at the gaming-table, the king had received no tidings concerning
 him; and when, after the lapse of years, he exerted himself to discover
 him, every trace was lost. With fonder regret than ever, he clung to his
 memory; and gave it in charge to his son, if ever he should meet this
 valued friend, in his name to bestow every succour, and to assure him that,
 to the last, his attachment survived separation and silence.
 
 A short time before Adrian's visit to Cumberland, the heir of the nobleman
 to whom my father had confided his last appeal to his royal master, put
 this letter, its seal unbroken, into the young Earl's hands. It had been
 found cast aside with a mass of papers of old date, and accident alone
 brought it to light. Adrian read it with deep interest; and found there
 that living spirit of genius and wit he had so often heard commemorated. He
 discovered the name of the spot whither my father had retreated, and where
 he died; he learnt the existence of his orphan children; and during the
 short interval between his arrival at Ulswater and our meeting in the park,
 he had been occupied in making inquiries concerning us, and arranging a
 variety of plans for our benefit, preliminary to his introducing himself to
 our notice.
 
 The mode in which he spoke of my father was gratifying to my vanity; the
 veil which he delicately cast over his benevolence, in alledging a duteous
 fulfilment of the king's latest will, was soothing to my pride. Other
 feelings, less ambiguous, were called into play by his conciliating manner
 and the generous warmth of his expressions, respect rarely before
 experienced, admiration, and love--he had touched my rocky heart with his
 magic power, and the stream of affection gushed forth, imperishable and
 pure. In the evening we parted; he pressed my hand: "We shall meet again;
 come to me to-morrow." I clasped that kind hand; I tried to answer; a
 fervent "God bless you!" was all my ignorance could frame of speech, and I
 darted away, oppressed by my new emotions.
 
 I could not rest. I sought the hills; a west wind swept them, and the stars
 glittered above. I ran on, careless of outward objects, but trying to
 master the struggling spirit within me by means of bodily fatigue. "This,"
 I thought, "is power! Not to be strong of limb, hard of heart, ferocious,
 and daring; but kind compassionate and soft."--Stopping short, I clasped
 my hands, and with the fervour of a new proselyte, cried, "Doubt me not,
 Adrian, I also will become wise and good!" and then quite overcome, I wept
 aloud.
 
 As this gust of passion passed from me, I felt more composed. I lay on the
 ground, and giving the reins to my thoughts, repassed in my mind my former
 life; and began, fold by fold, to unwind the many errors of my heart, and
 to discover how brutish, savage, and worthless I had hitherto been. I could
 not however at that time feel remorse, for methought I was born anew; my
 soul threw off the burthen of past sin, to commence a new career in
 innocence and love. Nothing harsh or rough remained to jar with the soft
 feelings which the transactions of the day had inspired; I was as a child
 lisping its devotions after its mother, and my plastic soul was remoulded
 by a master hand, which I neither desired nor was able to resist.
 
 This was the first commencement of my friendship with Adrian, and I must
 commemorate this day as the most fortunate of my life. I now began to be
 human. I was admitted within that sacred boundary which divides the
 intellectual and moral nature of man from that which characterizes animals.
 My best feelings were called into play to give fitting responses to the
 generosity, wisdom, and amenity of my new friend. He, with a noble goodness
 all his own, took infinite delight in bestowing to prodigality the
 treasures of his mind and fortune on the long-neglected son of his father's
 friend, the offspring of that gifted being whose excellencies and talents
 he had heard commemorated from infancy.
 
 After his abdication the late king had retreated from the sphere of
 politics, yet his domestic circle afforded him small content. The ex-queen
 had none of the virtues of domestic life, and those of courage and daring
 which she possessed were rendered null by the secession of her husband: she
 despised him, and did not care to conceal her sentiments. The king had, in
 compliance with her exactions, cast off his old friends, but he had
 acquired no new ones under her guidance. In this dearth of sympathy, he had
 recourse to his almost infant son; and the early development of talent and
 sensibility rendered Adrian no unfitting depository of his father's
 confidence. He was never weary of listening to the latter's often repeated
 accounts of old times, in which my father had played a distinguished part;
 his keen remarks were repeated to the boy, and remembered by him; his wit,
 his fascinations, his very faults were hallowed by the regret of affection;
 his loss was sincerely deplored. Even the queen's dislike of the favourite
 was ineffectual to deprive him of his son's admiration: it was bitter,
 sarcastic, contemptuous--but as she bestowed her heavy censure alike on
 his virtues as his errors, on his devoted friendship and his ill-bestowed
 loves, on his disinterestedness and his prodigality, on his pre-possessing
 grace of manner, and the facility with which he yielded to temptation, her
 double shot proved too heavy, and fell short of the mark. Nor did her angry
 dislike prevent Adrian from imaging my father, as he had said, the type of
 all that was gallant, amiable, and fascinating in man. It was not strange
 therefore, that when he heard of the existence of the offspring of this
 celebrated person, he should have formed the plan of bestowing on them all
 the advantages his rank made him rich to afford. When he found me a
 vagabond shepherd of the hills, a poacher, an unlettered savage, still his
 kindness did not fail. In addition to the opinion he entertained that his
 father was to a degree culpable of neglect towards us, and that he was
 bound to every possible reparation, he was pleased to say that under all my
 ruggedness there glimmered forth an elevation of spirit, which could be
 distinguished from mere animal courage, and that I inherited a similarity
 of countenance to my father, which gave proof that all his virtues and
 talents had not died with him. Whatever those might be which descended to
 me, my noble young friend resolved should not be lost for want of culture.
 
 Acting upon this plan in our subsequent intercourse, he led me to wish to
 participate in that cultivation which graced his own intellect. My active
 mind, when once it seized upon this new idea, fastened on it with extreme
 avidity. At first it was the great object of my ambition to rival the
 merits of my father, and render myself worthy of the friendship of Adrian.
 But curiosity soon awoke, and an earnest love of knowledge, which caused me
 to pass days and nights in reading and study. I was already well acquainted
 with what I may term the panorama of nature, the change of seasons, and the
 various appearances of heaven and earth. But I was at once startled and
 enchanted by my sudden extension of vision, when the curtain, which had
 been drawn before the intellectual world, was withdrawn, and I saw the
 universe, not only as it presented itself to my outward senses, but as it
 had appeared to the wisest among men. Poetry and its creations, philosophy
 and its researches and classifications, alike awoke the sleeping ideas in
 my mind, and gave me new ones.
 
 I felt as the sailor, who from the topmast first discovered the shore of
 America; and like him I hastened to tell my companions of my discoveries in
 unknown regions. But I was unable to excite in any breast the same craving
 appetite for knowledge that existed in mine. Even Perdita was unable to
 understand me. I had lived in what is generally called the world of
 reality, and it was awakening to a new country to find that there was a
 deeper meaning in all I saw, besides that which my eyes conveyed to me. The
 visionary Perdita beheld in all this only a new gloss upon an old reading,
 and her own was sufficiently inexhaustible to content her. She listened to
 me as she had done to the narration of my adventures, and sometimes took an
 interest in this species of information; but she did not, as I did, look on
 it as an integral part of her being, which having obtained, I could no more
 put off than the universal sense of touch.
 
 We both agreed in loving Adrian: although she not having yet escaped from
 childhood could not appreciate as I did the extent of his merits, or feel
 the same sympathy in his pursuits and opinions. I was for ever with him.
 There was a sensibility and sweetness in his disposition, that gave a
 tender and unearthly tone to our converse. Then he was gay as a lark
 carolling from its skiey tower, soaring in thought as an eagle, innocent as
 the mild-eyed dove. He could dispel the seriousness of Perdita, and take
 the sting from the torturing activity of my nature. I looked back to my
 restless desires and painful struggles with my fellow beings as to a
 troubled dream, and felt myself as much changed as if I had transmigrated
 into another form, whose fresh sensorium and mechanism of nerves had
 altered the reflection of the apparent universe in the mirror of mind. But
 it was not so; I was the same in strength, in earnest craving for sympathy,
 in my yearning for active exertion. My manly virtues did not desert me, for
 the witch Urania spared the locks of Sampson, while he reposed at her feet;
 but all was softened and humanized. Nor did Adrian instruct me only in the
 cold truths of history and philosophy. At the same time that he taught me
 by their means to subdue my own reckless and uncultured spirit, he opened
 to my view the living page of his own heart, and gave me to feel and
 understand its wondrous character.
 
 The ex-queen of England had, even during infancy, endeavoured to implant
 daring and ambitious designs in the mind of her son. She saw that he was
 endowed with genius and surpassing talent; these she cultivated for the
 sake of afterwards using them for the furtherance of her own views. She
 encouraged his craving for knowledge and his impetuous courage; she even
 tolerated his tameless love of freedom, under the hope that this would, as
 is too often the case, lead to a passion for command. She endeavoured to
 bring him up in a sense of resentment towards, and a desire to revenge
 himself upon, those who had been instrumental in bringing about his
 father's abdication. In this she did not succeed. The accounts furnished
 him, however distorted, of a great and wise nation asserting its right to
 govern itself, excited his admiration: in early days he became a republican
 from principle. Still his mother did not despair. To the love of rule and
 haughty pride of birth she added determined ambition, patience, and
 self-control. She devoted herself to the study of her son's disposition. By
 the application of praise, censure, and exhortation, she tried to seek and
 strike the fitting chords; and though the melody that followed her touch
 seemed discord to her, she built her hopes on his talents, and felt sure
 that she would at last win him. The kind of banishment he now experienced
 arose from other causes.
 
 The ex-queen had also a daughter, now twelve years of age; his fairy
 sister, Adrian was wont to call her; a lovely, animated, little thing, all
 sensibility and truth. With these, her children, the noble widow constantly
 resided at Windsor; and admitted no visitors, except her own partizans,
 travellers from her native Germany, and a few of the foreign ministers.
 Among these, and highly distinguished by her, was Prince Zaimi, ambassador
 to England from the free States of Greece; and his daughter, the young
 Princess Evadne, passed much of her time at Windsor Castle. In company with
 this sprightly and clever Greek girl, the Countess would relax from her
 usual state. Her views with regard to her own children, placed all her
 words and actions relative to them under restraint: but Evadne was a
 plaything she could in no way fear; nor were her talents and vivacity
 slight alleviations to the monotony of the Countess's life.
 
 Evadne was eighteen years of age. Although they spent much time together at
 Windsor, the extreme youth of Adrian prevented any suspicion as to the
 nature of their intercourse. But he was ardent and tender of heart beyond
 the common nature of man, and had already learnt to love, while the
 beauteous Greek smiled benignantly on the boy. It was strange to me, who,
 though older than Adrian, had never loved, to witness the whole heart's
 sacrifice of my friend. There was neither jealousy, inquietude, or mistrust
 in his sentiment; it was devotion and faith. His life was swallowed up in
 the existence of his beloved; and his heart beat only in unison with the
 pulsations that vivified hers. This was the secret law of his life--he
 loved and was beloved. The universe was to him a dwelling, to inhabit with
 his chosen one; and not either a scheme of society or an enchainment of
 events, that could impart to him either happiness or misery. What, though
 life and the system of social intercourse were a wilderness, a
 tiger-haunted jungle! Through the midst of its errors, in the depths of its
 savage recesses, there was a disentangled and flowery pathway, through
 which they might journey in safety and delight. Their track would be like
 the passage of the Red Sea, which they might traverse with unwet feet,
 though a wall of destruction were impending on either side.
 
 Alas! why must I record the hapless delusion of this matchless specimen of
 humanity? What is there in our nature that is for ever urging us on towards
 pain and misery? We are not formed for enjoyment; and, however we may be
 attuned to the reception of pleasureable emotion, disappointment is the
 never-failing pilot of our life's bark, and ruthlessly carries us on to the
 shoals. Who was better framed than this highly-gifted youth to love and be
 beloved, and to reap unalienable joy from an unblamed passion? If his heart
 had slept but a few years longer, he might have been saved; but it awoke in
 its infancy; it had power, but no knowledge; and it was ruined, even as a
 too early-blowing bud is nipt by the killing frost.
 
 I did not accuse Evadne of hypocrisy or a wish to deceive her lover; but
 the first letter that I saw of hers convinced me that she did not love him;
 it was written with elegance, and, foreigner as she was, with great command
 of language. The hand-writing itself was exquisitely beautiful; there was
 something in her very paper and its folds, which even I, who did not love,
 and was withal unskilled in such matters, could discern as being tasteful.
 There was much kindness, gratitude, and sweetness in her expression, but no
 love. Evadne was two years older than Adrian; and who, at eighteen, ever
 loved one so much their junior? I compared her placid epistles with the
 burning ones of Adrian. His soul seemed to distil itself into the words he
 wrote; and they breathed on the paper, bearing with them a portion of the
 life of love, which was his life. The very writing used to exhaust him; and
 he would weep over them, merely from the excess of emotion they awakened in
 his heart.
 
 Adrian's soul was painted in his countenance, and concealment or deceit
 were at the antipodes to the dreadless frankness of his nature. Evadne made
 it her earnest request that the tale of their loves should not be revealed
 to his mother; and after for a while contesting the point, he yielded it to
 her. A vain concession; his demeanour quickly betrayed his secret to the
 quick eyes of the ex-queen. With the same wary prudence that characterized
 her whole conduct, she concealed her discovery, but hastened to remove her
 son from the sphere of the attractive Greek. He was sent to Cumberland; but
 the plan of correspondence between the lovers, arranged by Evadne, was
 effectually hidden from her. Thus the absence of Adrian, concerted for the
 purpose of separating, united them in firmer bonds than ever. To me he
 discoursed ceaselessly of his beloved Ionian. Her country, its ancient
 annals, its late memorable struggles, were all made to partake in her glory
 and excellence. He submitted to be away from her, because she commanded
 this submission; but for her influence, he would have declared his
 attachment before all England, and resisted, with unshaken constancy, his
 mother's opposition. Evadne's feminine prudence perceived how useless any
 assertion of his resolves would be, till added years gave weight to his
 power. Perhaps there was besides a lurking dislike to bind herself in the
 face of the world to one whom she did not love--not love, at least, with
 that passionate enthusiasm which her heart told her she might one day feel
 towards another. He obeyed her injunctions, and passed a year in exile in
 Cumberland.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 HAPPY, thrice happy, were the months, and weeks, and hours of that year.
 Friendship, hand in hand with admiration, tenderness and respect, built a
 bower of delight in my heart, late rough as an untrod wild in America, as
 the homeless wind or herbless sea. Insatiate thirst for knowledge, and
 boundless affection for Adrian, combined to keep both my heart and
 understanding occupied, and I was consequently happy. What happiness is so
 true and unclouded, as the overflowing and talkative delight of young
 people. In our boat, upon my native lake, beside the streams and the pale
 bordering poplars--in valley and over hill, my crook thrown aside, a
 nobler flock to tend than silly sheep, even a flock of new-born ideas, I
 read or listened to Adrian; and his discourse, whether it concerned his
 love or his theories for the improvement of man, alike entranced me.
 Sometimes my lawless mood would return, my love of peril, my resistance to
 authority; but this was in his absence; under the mild sway of his dear
 eyes, I was obedient and good as a boy of five years old, who does his
 mother's bidding.
 
 After a residence of about a year at Ulswater, Adrian visited London, and
 came back full of plans for our benefit. You must begin life, he said: you
 are seventeen, and longer delay would render the necessary apprenticeship
 more and more irksome. He foresaw that his own life would be one of
 struggle, and I must partake his labours with him. The better to fit me for
 this task, we must now separate. He found my name a good passport to
 preferment, and he had procured for me the situation of private secretary
 to the Ambassador at Vienna, where I should enter on my career under the
 best auspices. In two years, I should return to my country, with a name
 well known and a reputation already founded.
 
 And Perdita?--Perdita was to become the pupil, friend and younger sister
 of Evadne. With his usual thoughtfulness, he had provided for her
 independence in this situation. How refuse the offers of this generous
 friend?--I did not wish to refuse them; but in my heart of hearts, I made
 a vow to devote life, knowledge, and power, all of which, in as much as
 they were of any value, he had bestowed on me--all, all my capacities and
 hopes, to him alone I would devote.
 
 Thus I promised myself, as I journied towards my destination with roused
 and ardent expectation: expectation of the fulfilment of all that in
 boyhood we promise ourselves of power and enjoyment in maturity. Methought
 the time was now arrived, when, childish occupations laid aside, I should
 enter into life. Even in the Elysian fields, Virgil describes the souls of
 the happy as eager to drink of the wave which was to restore them to this
 mortal coil. The young are seldom in Elysium, for their desires,
 outstripping possibility, leave them as poor as a moneyless debtor. We are
 told by the wisest philosophers of the dangers of the world, the deceits of
 men, and the treason of our own hearts: but not the less fearlessly does
 each put off his frail bark from the port, spread the sail, and strain his
 oar, to attain the multitudinous streams of the sea of life. How few in
 youth's prime, moor their vessels on the "golden sands," and collect the
 painted shells that strew them. But all at close of day, with riven planks
 and rent canvas make for shore, and are either wrecked ere they reach it,
 or find some wave-beaten haven, some desart strand, whereon to cast
 themselves and die unmourned.
 
 A truce to philosophy!--Life is before me, and I rush into possession.
 Hope, glory, love, and blameless ambition are my guides, and my soul knows
 no dread. What has been, though sweet, is gone; the present is good only
 because it is about to change, and the to come is all my own. Do I fear,
 that my heart palpitates? high aspirations cause the flow of my blood; my
 eyes seem to penetrate the cloudy midnight of time, and to discern within
 the depths of its darkness, the fruition of all my soul desires.
 
 Now pause!--During my journey I might dream, and with buoyant wings reach
 the summit of life's high edifice. Now that I am arrived at its base, my
 pinions are furled, the mighty stairs are before me, and step by step I
 must ascend the wondrous fane--
 
   Speak!--What door is opened?
 
 Behold me in a new capacity. A diplomatist: one among the pleasure-seeking
 society of a gay city; a youth of promise; favourite of the Ambassador. All
 was strange and admirable to the shepherd of Cumberland. With breathless
 amaze I entered on the gay scene, whose actors were
 
  --the lilies glorious as Solomon,
   Who toil not, neither do they spin.
 
 Soon, too soon, I entered the giddy whirl; forgetting my studious hours,
 and the companionship of Adrian. Passionate desire of sympathy, and ardent
 pursuit for a wished-for object still characterized me. The sight of beauty
 entranced me, and attractive manners in man or woman won my entire
 confidence. I called it rapture, when a smile made my heart beat; and I
 felt the life's blood tingle in my frame, when I approached the idol which
 for awhile I worshipped. The mere flow of animal spirits was Paradise, and
 at night's close I only desired a renewal of the intoxicating delusion. The
 dazzling light of ornamented rooms; lovely forms arrayed in splendid
 dresses; the motions of a dance, the voluptuous tones of exquisite music,
 cradled my senses in one delightful dream.
 
 And is not this in its kind happiness? I appeal to moralists and sages. I
 ask if in the calm of their measured reveries, if in the deep meditations
 which fill their hours, they feel the extasy of a youthful tyro in the
 school of pleasure? Can the calm beams of their heaven-seeking eyes equal
 the flashes of mingling passion which blind his, or does the influence of
 cold philosophy steep their soul in a joy equal to his, engaged
 
   In this dear work of youthful revelry.
 
 But in truth, neither the lonely meditations of the hermit, nor the
 tumultuous raptures of the reveller, are capable of satisfying man's heart.
 From the one we gather unquiet speculation, from the other satiety. The
 mind flags beneath the weight of thought, and droops in the heartless
 intercourse of those whose sole aim is amusement. There is no fruition in
 their vacant kindness, and sharp rocks lurk beneath the smiling ripples of
 these shallow waters.
 
 Thus I felt, when disappointment, weariness, and solitude drove me back
 upon my heart, to gather thence the joy of which it had become barren. My
 flagging spirits asked for something to speak to the affections; and not
 finding it, I drooped. Thus, notwithstanding the thoughtless delight that
 waited on its commencement, the impression I have of my life at Vienna is
 melancholy. Goethe has said, that in youth we cannot be happy unless we
 love. I did not love; but I was devoured by a restless wish to be something
 to others. I became the victim of ingratitude and cold coquetry--then I
 desponded, and imagined that my discontent gave me a right to hate the
 world. I receded to solitude; I had recourse to my books, and my desire
 again to enjoy the society of Adrian became a burning thirst.
 
 Emulation, that in its excess almost assumed the venomous properties of
 envy, gave a sting to these feelings. At this period the name and exploits
 of one of my countrymen filled the world with admiration. Relations of what
 he had done, conjectures concerning his future actions, were the
 never-failing topics of the hour. I was not angry on my own account, but I
 felt as if the praises which this idol received were leaves torn from
 laurels destined for Adrian. But I must enter into some account of this
 darling of fame--this favourite of the wonder-loving world.
 
 Lord Raymond was the sole remnant of a noble but impoverished family. From
 early youth he had considered his pedigree with complacency, and bitterly
 lamented his want of wealth. His first wish was aggrandisement; and the
 means that led towards this end were secondary considerations. Haughty, yet
 trembling to every demonstration of respect; ambitious, but too proud to
 shew his ambition; willing to achieve honour, yet a votary of pleasure,--
 he entered upon life. He was met on the threshold by some insult, real or
 imaginary; some repulse, where he least expected it; some disappointment,
 hard for his pride to bear. He writhed beneath an injury he was unable to
 revenge; and he quitted England with a vow not to return, till the good
 time should arrive, when she might feel the power of him she now despised.
 
 He became an adventurer in the Greek wars. His reckless courage and
 comprehensive genius brought him into notice. He became the darling hero of
 this rising people. His foreign birth, and he refused to throw off his
 allegiance to his native country, alone prevented him from filling the
 first offices in the state. But, though others might rank higher in title
 and ceremony, Lord Raymond held a station above and beyond all this. He led
 the Greek armies to victory; their triumphs were all his own. When he
 appeared, whole towns poured forth their population to meet him; new songs
 were adapted to their national airs, whose themes were his glory, valour,
 and munificence. A truce was concluded between the Greeks and Turks. At the
 same time, Lord Raymond, by some unlooked-for chance, became the possessor
 of an immense fortune in England, whither he returned, crowned with glory,
 to receive the meed of honour and distinction before denied to his
 pretensions. His proud heart rebelled against this change. In what was the
 despised Raymond not the same? If the acquisition of power in the shape of
 wealth caused this alteration, that power should they feel as an iron yoke.
 Power therefore was the aim of all his endeavours; aggrandizement the mark
 at which he for ever shot. In open ambition or close intrigue, his end was
 the same--to attain the first station in his own country.
 
 This account filled me with curiosity. The events that in succession
 followed his return to England, gave me keener feelings. Among his other
 advantages, Lord Raymond was supremely handsome; every one admired him; of
 women he was the idol. He was courteous, honey-tongued--an adept in
 fascinating arts. What could not this man achieve in the busy English
 world? Change succeeded to change; the entire history did not reach me; for
 Adrian had ceased to write, and Perdita was a laconic correspondent. The
 rumour went that Adrian had become--how write the fatal word--mad: that
 Lord Raymond was the favourite of the ex-queen, her daughter's destined
 husband. Nay, more, that this aspiring noble revived the claim of the house
 of Windsor to the crown, and that, on the event of Adrian's incurable
 disorder and his marriage with the sister, the brow of the ambitious
 Raymond might be encircled with the magic ring of regality.
 
 Such a tale filled the trumpet of many voiced fame; such a tale rendered my
 longer stay at Vienna, away from the friend of my youth, intolerable. Now I
 must fulfil my vow; now range myself at his side, and be his ally and
 support till death. Farewell to courtly pleasure; to politic intrigue; to
 the maze of passion and folly! All hail, England! Native England, receive
 thy child! thou art the scene of all my hopes, the mighty theatre on which
 is acted the only drama that can, heart and soul, bear me along with it in
 its development. A voice most irresistible, a power omnipotent, drew me
 thither. After an absence of two years I landed on its shores, not daring
 to make any inquiries, fearful of every remark. My first visit would be to
 my sister, who inhabited a little cottage, a part of Adrian's gift, on the
 borders of Windsor Forest. From her I should learn the truth concerning our
 protector; I should hear why she had withdrawn from the protection of the
 Princess Evadne, and be instructed as to the influence which this
 overtopping and towering Raymond exercised over the fortunes of my friend.
 
 I had never before been in the neighbourhood of Windsor; the fertility and
 beauty of the country around now struck me with admiration, which encreased
 as I approached the antique wood. The ruins of majestic oaks which had
 grown, flourished, and decayed during the progress of centuries, marked
 where the limits of the forest once reached, while the shattered palings
 and neglected underwood shewed that this part was deserted for the younger
 plantations, which owed their birth to the beginning of the nineteenth
 century, and now stood in the pride of maturity. Perdita's humble dwelling
 was situated on the skirts of the most ancient portion; before it was
 stretched Bishopgate Heath, which towards the east appeared interminable,
 and was bounded to the west by Chapel Wood and the grove of Virginia Water.
 Behind, the cottage was shadowed by the venerable fathers of the forest,
 under which the deer came to graze, and which for the most part hollow and
 decayed, formed fantastic groups that contrasted with the regular beauty of
 the younger trees. These, the offspring of a later period, stood erect and
 seemed ready to advance fearlessly into coming time; while those out worn
 stragglers, blasted and broke, clung to each other, their weak boughs
 sighing as the wind buffetted them--a weather-beaten crew.
 
 A light railing surrounded the garden of the cottage, which, low-roofed,
 seemed to submit to the majesty of nature, and cower amidst the venerable
 remains of forgotten time. Flowers, the children of the spring, adorned her
 garden and casements; in the midst of lowliness there was an air of
 elegance which spoke the graceful taste of the inmate. With a beating heart
 I entered the enclosure; as I stood at the entrance, I heard her
 voice, melodious as it had ever been, which before I saw her assured me of
 her welfare.
 
 A moment more and Perdita appeared; she stood before me in the fresh bloom
 of youthful womanhood, different from and yet the same as the mountain girl
 I had left. Her eyes could not be deeper than they were in childhood, nor
 her countenance more expressive; but the expression was changed and
 improved; intelligence sat on her brow; when she smiled her face was
 embellished by the softest sensibility, and her low, modulated voice seemed
 tuned by love. Her person was formed in the most feminine proportions; she
 was not tall, but her mountain life had given freedom to her motions, so
 that her light step scarce made her foot-fall heard as she tript across the
 hall to meet me. When we had parted, I had clasped her to my bosom with
 unrestrained warmth; we met again, and new feelings were awakened; when
 each beheld the other, childhood passed, as full grown actors on this
 changeful scene. The pause was but for a moment; the flood of association
 and natural feeling which had been checked, again rushed in full tide upon
 our hearts, and with tenderest emotion we were swiftly locked in each
 other's embrace.
 
 This burst of passionate feeling over, with calmed thoughts we sat
 together, talking of the past and present. I alluded to the coldness of her
 letters; but the few minutes we had spent together sufficiently explained
 the origin of this. New feelings had arisen within her, which she was
 unable to express in writing to one whom she had only known in childhood;
 but we saw each other again, and our intimacy was renewed as if nothing had
 intervened to check it. I detailed the incidents of my sojourn abroad, and
 then questioned her as to the changes that had taken place at home, the
 causes of Adrian's absence, and her secluded life.
 
 The tears that suffused my sister's eyes when I mentioned our friend, and
 her heightened colour seemed to vouch for the truth of the reports that had
 reached me. But their import was too terrible for me to give instant credit
 to my suspicion. Was there indeed anarchy in the sublime universe of
 Adrian's thoughts, did madness scatter the well-appointed legions, and was
 he no longer the lord of his own soul? Beloved friend, this ill world was
 no clime for your gentle spirit; you delivered up its governance to false
 humanity, which stript it of its leaves ere winter-time, and laid bare its
 quivering life to the evil ministration of roughest winds. Have those
 gentle eyes, those "channels of the soul" lost their meaning, or do they
 only in their glare disclose the horrible tale of its aberrations? Does
 that voice no longer "discourse excellent music?" Horrible, most horrible!
 I veil my eyes in terror of the change, and gushing tears bear witness to
 my sympathy for this unimaginable ruin.
 
 In obedience to my request Perdita detailed the melancholy circumstances
 that led to this event.
 
 The frank and unsuspicious mind of Adrian, gifted as it was by every
 natural grace, endowed with transcendant powers of intellect, unblemished
 by the shadow of defect (unless his dreadless independence of thought was
 to be construed into one), was devoted, even as a victim to sacrifice, to
 his love for Evadne. He entrusted to her keeping the treasures of his soul,
 his aspirations after excellence, and his plans for the improvement of
 mankind. As manhood dawned upon him, his schemes and theories, far from
 being changed by personal and prudential motives, acquired new strength
 from the powers he felt arise within him; and his love for Evadne became
 deep-rooted, as he each day became more certain that the path he pursued
 was full of difficulty, and that he must seek his reward, not in the
 applause or gratitude of his fellow creatures, hardly in the success of his
 plans, but in the approbation of his own heart, and in her love and
 sympathy, which was to lighten every toil and recompence every sacrifice.
 
 In solitude, and through many wanderings afar from the haunts of men, he
 matured his views for the reform of the English government, and the
 improvement of the people. It would have been well if he had concealed his
 sentiments, until he had come into possession of the power which would
 secure their practical development. But he was impatient of the years that
 must intervene, he was frank of heart and fearless. He gave not only a
 brief denial to his mother's schemes, but published his intention of using
 his influence to diminish the power of the aristocracy, to effect a greater
 equalization of wealth and privilege, and to introduce a perfect system of
 republican government into England. At first his mother treated his
 theories as the wild ravings of inexperience. But they were so
 systematically arranged, and his arguments so well supported, that though
 still in appearance incredulous, she began to fear him. She tried to reason
 with him, and finding him inflexible, learned to hate him.
 
 Strange to say, this feeling was infectious. His enthusiasm for good which
 did not exist; his contempt for the sacredness of authority; his ardour and
 imprudence were all at the antipodes of the usual routine of life; the
 worldly feared him; the young and inexperienced did not understand the
 lofty severity of his moral views, and disliked him as a being different
 from themselves. Evadne entered but coldly into his systems. She thought he
 did well to assert his own will, but she wished that will to have been more
 intelligible to the multitude. She had none of the spirit of a martyr, and
 did not incline to share the shame and defeat of a fallen patriot. She was
 aware of the purity of his motives, the generosity of his disposition, his
 true and ardent attachment to her; and she entertained a great affection
 for him. He repaid this spirit of kindness with the fondest gratitude, and
 made her the treasure-house of all his hopes.
 
 At this time Lord Raymond returned from Greece. No two persons could be
 more opposite than Adrian and he. With all the incongruities of his
 character, Raymond was emphatically a man of the world. His passions were
 violent; as these often obtained the mastery over him, he could not always
 square his conduct to the obvious line of self-interest, but
 self-gratification at least was the paramount object with him. He looked on
 the structure of society as but a part of the machinery which supported the
 web on which his life was traced. The earth was spread out as an highway
 for him; the heavens built up as a canopy for him.
 
 Adrian felt that he made a part of a great whole. He owned affinity not
 only with mankind, but all nature was akin to him; the mountains and sky
 were his friends; the winds of heaven and the offspring of earth his
 playmates; while he the focus only of this mighty mirror, felt his life
 mingle with the universe of existence. His soul was sympathy, and dedicated
 to the worship of beauty and excellence. Adrian and Raymond now came into
 contact, and a spirit of aversion rose between them. Adrian despised the
 narrow views of the politician, and Raymond held in supreme contempt the
 benevolent visions of the philanthropist.
 
 With the coming of Raymond was formed the storm that laid waste at one fell
 blow the gardens of delight and sheltered paths which Adrian fancied that
 he had secured to himself, as a refuge from defeat and contumely. Raymond,
 the deliverer of Greece, the graceful soldier, who bore in his mien a tinge
 of all that, peculiar to her native clime, Evadne cherished as most dear--
 Raymond was loved by Evadne. Overpowered by her new sensations, she did not
 pause to examine them, or to regulate her conduct by any sentiments except
 the tyrannical one which suddenly usurped the empire of her heart. She
 yielded to its influence, and the too natural consequence in a mind
 unattuned to soft emotions was, that the attentions of Adrian became
 distasteful to her. She grew capricious; her gentle conduct towards him was
 exchanged for asperity and repulsive coldness. When she perceived the wild
 or pathetic appeal of his expressive countenance, she would relent, and for
 a while resume her ancient kindness. But these fluctuations shook to its
 depths the soul of the sensitive youth; he no longer deemed the world
 subject to him, because he possessed Evadne's love; he felt in every nerve
 that the dire storms of the mental universe were about to attack his
 fragile being, which quivered at the expectation of its advent.
 
 Perdita, who then resided with Evadne, saw the torture that Adrian endured.
 She loved him as a kind elder brother; a relation to guide, protect, and
 instruct her, without the too frequent tyranny of parental authority. She
 adored his virtues, and with mixed contempt and indignation she saw Evadne
 pile drear sorrow on his head, for the sake of one who hardly marked her.
 In his solitary despair Adrian would often seek my sister, and in covered
 terms express his misery, while fortitude and agony divided the throne of
 his mind. Soon, alas! was one to conquer. Anger made no part of his
 emotion. With whom should he be angry? Not with Raymond, who was
 unconscious of the misery he occasioned; not with Evadne, for her his soul
 wept tears of blood--poor, mistaken girl, slave not tyrant was she, and
 amidst his own anguish he grieved for her future destiny. Once a writing of
 his fell into Perdita's hands; it was blotted with tears--well might any
 blot it with the like--
 
 "Life"--it began thus--"is not the thing romance writers describe it;
 going through the measures of a dance, and after various evolutions
 arriving at a conclusion, when the dancers may sit down and repose. While
 there is life there is action and change. We go on, each thought linked to
 the one which was its parent, each act to a previous act. No joy or sorrow
 dies barren of progeny, which for ever generated and generating, weaves the
 chain that make our life:
 
   Un dia llama a otro dia
   y ass i llama, y encadena
   llanto a llanto, y pena a pena.
 
 Truly disappointment is the guardian deity of human life; she sits
 at the threshold of unborn time, and marshals the events as they
 come forth. Once my heart sat lightly in my bosom; all the beauty of the
 world was doubly beautiful, irradiated by the sun-light shed from my own
 soul. O wherefore are love and ruin for ever joined in this our mortal
 dream? So that when we make our hearts a lair for that gently seeming
 beast, its companion enters with it, and pitilessly lays waste what might
 have been an home and a shelter."
 
 By degrees his health was shaken by his misery, and then his intellect
 yielded to the same tyranny. His manners grew wild; he was sometimes
 ferocious, sometimes absorbed in speechless melancholy. Suddenly Evadne
 quitted London for Paris; he followed, and overtook her when the vessel was
 about to sail; none knew what passed between them, but Perdita had never
 seen him since; he lived in seclusion, no one knew where, attended by such
 persons as his mother selected for that purpose.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 THE next day Lord Raymond called at Perdita's cottage, on his way to
 Windsor Castle. My sister's heightened colour and sparkling eyes half
 revealed her secret to me. He was perfectly self-possessed; he accosted us
 both with courtesy, seemed immediately to enter into our feelings, and to
 make one with us. I scanned his physiognomy, which varied as he spoke, yet
 was beautiful in every change. The usual expression of his eyes was soft,
 though at times he could make them even glare with ferocity; his complexion
 was colourless; and every trait spoke predominate self-will; his smile was
 pleasing, though disdain too often curled his lips--lips which to female
 eyes were the very throne of beauty and love. His voice, usually gentle,
 often startled you by a sharp discordant note, which shewed that his usual
 low tone was rather the work of study than nature. Thus full of
 contradictions, unbending yet haughty, gentle yet fierce, tender and again
 neglectful, he by some strange art found easy entrance to the admiration
 and affection of women; now caressing and now tyrannizing over them
 according to his mood, but in every change a despot.
 
 At the present time Raymond evidently wished to appear amiable. Wit,
 hilarity, and deep observation were mingled in his talk, rendering every
 sentence that he uttered as a flash of light. He soon conquered my latent
 distaste; I endeavoured to watch him and Perdita, and to keep in mind every
 thing I had heard to his disadvantage. But all appeared so ingenuous, and
 all was so fascinating, that I forgot everything except the pleasure his
 society afforded me. Under the idea of initiating me in the scene of
 English politics and society, of which I was soon to become a part, he
 narrated a number of anecdotes, and sketched many characters; his
 discourse, rich and varied, flowed on, pervading all my senses with
 pleasure. But for one thing he would have been completely triumphant. He
 alluded to Adrian, and spoke of him with that disparagement that the
 worldly wise always attach to enthusiasm. He perceived the cloud gathering,
 and tried to dissipate it; but the strength of my feelings would not permit
 me to pass thus lightly over this sacred subject; so I said emphatically,
 "Permit me to remark, that I am devotedly attached to the Earl of Windsor;
 he is my best friend and benefactor. I reverence his goodness, I accord
 with his opinions, and bitterly lament his present, and I trust temporary,
 illness. That illness, from its peculiarity, makes it painful to me beyond
 words to hear him mentioned, unless in terms of respect and affection."
 
 Raymond replied; but there was nothing conciliatory in his reply. I saw
 that in his heart he despised those dedicated to any but worldly idols.
 "Every man," he said, "dreams about something, love, honour, and pleasure;
 you dream of friendship, and devote yourself to a maniac; well, if that be
 your vocation, doubtless you are in the right to follow it."--
 
 Some reflection seemed to sting him, and the spasm of pain that for a
 moment convulsed his countenance, checked my indignation. "Happy are
 dreamers," he continued, "so that they be not awakened! Would I could
 dream! but 'broad and garish day' is the element in which I live; the
 dazzling glare of reality inverts the scene for me. Even the ghost of
 friendship has departed, and love"----He broke off; nor could I guess
 whether the disdain that curled his lip was directed against the passion,
 or against himself for being its slave.
 
 This account may be taken as a sample of my intercourse with Lord Raymond.
 I became intimate with him, and each day afforded me occasion to admire
 more and more his powerful and versatile talents, that together with his
 eloquence, which was graceful and witty, and his wealth now immense, caused
 him to be feared, loved, and hated beyond any other man in England.
 
 My descent, which claimed interest, if not respect, my former connection
 with Adrian, the favour of the ambassador, whose secretary I had been, and
 now my intimacy with Lord Raymond, gave me easy access to the fashionable
 and political circles of England. To my inexperience we at first appeared
 on the eve of a civil war; each party was violent, acrimonious, and
 unyielding. Parliament was divided by three factions, aristocrats,
 democrats, and royalists. After Adrian's declared predeliction to the
 republican form of government, the latter party had nearly died away,
 chiefless, guideless; but, when Lord Raymond came forward as its leader, it
 revived with redoubled force. Some were royalists from prejudice and
 ancient affection, and there were many moderately inclined who feared alike
 the capricious tyranny of the popular party, and the unbending despotism of
 the aristocrats. More than a third of the members ranged themselves under
 Raymond, and their number was perpetually encreasing. The aristocrats built
 their hopes on their preponderant wealth and influence; the reformers on
 the force of the nation itself; the debates were violent, more violent the
 discourses held by each knot of politicians as they assembled to arrange
 their measures. Opprobrious epithets were bandied about, resistance even to
 the death threatened; meetings of the populace disturbed the quiet order of
 the country; except in war, how could all this end? Even as the destructive
 flames were ready to break forth, I saw them shrink back; allayed by the
 absence of the military, by the aversion entertained by every one to any
 violence, save that of speech, and by the cordial politeness and even
 friendship of the hostile leaders when they met in private society. I was
 from a thousand motives induced to attend minutely to the course of events,
 and watch each turn with intense anxiety.
 
 I could not but perceive that Perdita loved Raymond; methought also that he
 regarded the fair daughter of Verney with admiration and tenderness. Yet I
 knew that he was urging forward his marriage with the presumptive heiress
 of the Earldom of Windsor, with keen expectation of the advantages that
 would thence accrue to him. All the ex-queen's friends were his friends; no
 week passed that he did not hold consultations with her at Windsor.
 
 I had never seen the sister of Adrian. I had heard that she was lovely,
 amiable, and fascinating. Wherefore should I see her? There are times when
 we have an indefinable sentiment of impending change for better or for
 worse, to arise from an event; and, be it for better or for worse, we fear
 the change, and shun the event. For this reason I avoided this high-born
 damsel. To me she was everything and nothing; her very name mentioned by
 another made me start and tremble; the endless discussion concerning her
 union with Lord Raymond was real agony to me. Methought that, Adrian
 withdrawn from active life, and this beauteous Idris, a victim probably to
 her mother's ambitious schemes, I ought to come forward to protect her from
 undue influence, guard her from unhappiness, and secure to her freedom of
 choice, the right of every human being. Yet how was I to do this? She
 herself would disdain my interference. Since then I must be an object of
 indifference or contempt to her, better, far better avoid her, nor expose
 myself before her and the scornful world to the chance of playing the mad
 game of a fond, foolish Icarus. One day, several months after my return to
 England, I quitted London to visit my sister. Her society was my chief
 solace and delight; and my spirits always rose at the expectation of seeing
 her. Her conversation was full of pointed remark and discernment; in her
 pleasant alcove, redolent with sweetest flowers, adorned by magnificent
 casts, antique vases, and copies of the finest pictures of Raphael,
 Correggio, and Claude, painted by herself, I fancied myself in a fairy
 retreat untainted by and inaccessible to the noisy contentions of
 politicians and the frivolous pursuits of fashion. On this occasion, my
 sister was not alone; nor could I fail to recognise her companion: it was
 Idris, the till now unseen object of my mad idolatry.
 
 In what fitting terms of wonder and delight, in what choice expression and
 soft flow of language, can I usher in the loveliest, wisest, best? How in
 poor assemblage of words convey the halo of glory that surrounded her, the
 thousand graces that waited unwearied on her. The first thing that struck
 you on beholding that charming countenance was its perfect goodness and
 frankness; candour sat upon her brow, simplicity in her eyes, heavenly
 benignity in her smile. Her tall slim figure bent gracefully as a poplar to
 the breezy west, and her gait, goddess-like, was as that of a winged angel
 new alit from heaven's high floor; the pearly fairness of her complexion
 was stained by a pure suffusion; her voice resembled the low, subdued tenor
 of a flute. It is easiest perhaps to describe by contrast. I have detailed
 the perfections of my sister; and yet she was utterly unlike Idris.
 Perdita, even where she loved, was reserved and timid; Idris was frank and
 confiding. The one recoiled to solitude, that she might there entrench
 herself from disappointment and injury; the other walked forth in open day,
 believing that none would harm her. Wordsworth has compared a beloved
 female to two fair objects in nature; but his lines always appeared to me
 rather a contrast than a similitude:
 
   A violet by a mossy stone
   Half hidden from the eye,
   Fair as a star when only one
   Is shining in the sky.
 
 Such a violet was sweet Perdita, trembling to entrust herself to the very
 air, cowering from observation, yet betrayed by her excellences; and
 repaying with a thousand graces the labour of those who sought her in her
 lonely bye-path. Idris was as the star, set in single splendour in the
 dim anadem of balmy evening; ready to enlighten and delight the subject
 world, shielded herself from every taint by her unimagined distance from
 all that was not like herself akin to heaven.
 
 I found this vision of beauty in Perdita's alcove, in earnest conversation
 with its inmate. When my sister saw me, she rose, and taking my hand, said,
 "He is here, even at our wish; this is Lionel, my brother." Idris arose
 also, and bent on me her eyes of celestial blue, and with grace peculiar
 said--"You hardly need an introduction; we have a picture, highly valued
 by my father, which declares at once your name. Verney, you will
 acknowledge this tie, and as my brother's friend, I feel that I may trust
 you."
 
 Then, with lids humid with a tear and trembling voice, she continued--
 "Dear friends, do not think it strange that now, visiting you for the first
 time, I ask your assistance, and confide my wishes and fears to you. To you
 alone do I dare speak; I have heard you commended by impartial spectators;
 you are my brother's friends, therefore you must be mine. What can I say?
 if you refuse to aid me, I am lost indeed!" She cast up her eyes, while
 wonder held her auditors mute; then, as if carried away by her feelings,
 she cried--"My brother! beloved, ill-fated Adrian! how speak of your
 misfortunes? Doubtless you have both heard the current tale; perhaps
 believe the slander; but he is not mad! Were an angel from the foot of
 God's throne to assert it, never, never would I believe it. He is wronged,
 betrayed, imprisoned--save him! Verney, you must do this; seek him out in
 whatever part of the island he is immured; find him, rescue him from his
 persecutors, restore him to himself, to me--on the wide earth I have none
 to love but only him!"
 
 Her earnest appeal, so sweetly and passionately expressed, filled me with
 wonder and sympathy; and, when she added, with thrilling voice and look,
 "Do you consent to undertake this enterprize?" I vowed, with energy and
 truth, to devote myself in life and death to the restoration and welfare of
 Adrian. We then conversed on the plan I should pursue, and discussed the
 probable means of discovering his residence. While we were in earnest
 discourse, Lord Raymond entered unannounced: I saw Perdita tremble and grow
 deadly pale, and the cheeks of Idris glow with purest blushes. He must have
 been astonished at our conclave, disturbed by it I should have thought; but
 nothing of this appeared; he saluted my companions, and addressed me with a
 cordial greeting. Idris appeared suspended for a moment, and then with
 extreme sweetness, she said, "Lord Raymond, I confide in your goodness and
 honour."
 
 Smiling haughtily, he bent his head, and replied, with emphasis, "Do you
 indeed confide, Lady Idris?"
 
 She endeavoured to read his thought, and then answered with dignity, "As
 you please. It is certainly best not to compromise oneself by any
 concealment."
 
 "Pardon me," he replied, "if I have offended. Whether you trust me or not,
 rely on my doing my utmost to further your wishes, whatever they may be."
 
 Idris smiled her thanks, and rose to take leave. Lord Raymond requested
 permission to accompany her to Windsor Castle, to which she consented, and
 they quitted the cottage together. My sister and I were left--truly like
 two fools, who fancied that they had obtained a golden treasure, till
 daylight shewed it to be lead--two silly, luckless flies, who had played
 in sunbeams and were caught in a spider's web. I leaned against the
 casement, and watched those two glorious creatures, till they disappeared
 in the forest-glades; and then I turned. Perdita had not moved; her eyes
 fixed on the ground, her cheeks pale, her very lips white, motionless and
 rigid, every feature stamped by woe, she sat. Half frightened, I would
 have taken her hand; but she shudderingly withdrew it, and strove to
 collect herself. I entreated her to speak to me: "Not now," she replied,
 "nor do you speak to me, my dear Lionel; you can say nothing, for you know
 nothing. I will see you to-morrow; in the meantime, adieu!" She rose, and
 walked from the room; but pausing at the door, and leaning against it, as
 if her over-busy thoughts had taken from her the power of supporting
 herself, she said, "Lord Raymond will probably return. Will you tell him
 that he must excuse me to-day, for I am not well. I will see him to-morrow
 if he wishes it, and you also. You had better return to London with him;
 you can there make the enquiries agreed upon, concerning the Earl of
 Windsor and visit me again to-morrow, before you proceed on your
 journey--till then, farewell!"
 
 She spoke falteringly, and concluded with a heavy sigh. I gave my assent to
 her request; and she left me. I felt as if, from the order of the
 systematic world, I had plunged into chaos, obscure, contrary,
 unintelligible. That Raymond should marry Idris was more than ever
 intolerable; yet my passion, though a giant from its birth, was too
 strange, wild, and impracticable, for me to feel at once the misery I
 perceived in Perdita. How should I act? She had not confided in me; I could
 not demand an explanation from Raymond without the hazard of betraying what
 was perhaps her most treasured secret. I would obtain the truth from her
 the following day--in the mean time--But, while I was occupied by
 multiplying reflections, Lord Raymond returned. He asked for my sister; and
 I delivered her message. After musing on it for a moment, he asked me if I
 were about to return to London, and if I would accompany him: I consented.
 He was full of thought, and remained silent during a considerable part of
 our ride; at length he said, "I must apologize to you for my abstraction;
 the truth is, Ryland's motion comes on to-night, and I am considering my
 reply."
 
 Ryland was the leader of the popular party, a hard-headed man, and in his
 way eloquent; he had obtained leave to bring in a bill making it treason to
 endeavour to change the present state of the English government and the
 standing laws of the republic. This attack was directed against Raymond and
 his machinations for the restoration of the monarchy.
 
 Raymond asked me if I would accompany him to the House that evening. I
 remembered my pursuit for intelligence concerning Adrian; and, knowing that
 my time would be fully occupied, I excused myself. "Nay," said my
 companion, "I can free you from your present impediment. You are going to
 make enquiries concerning the Earl of Windsor. I can answer them at once,
 he is at the Duke of Athol's seat at Dunkeld. On the first approach of his
 disorder, he travelled about from one place to another; until, arriving at
 that romantic seclusion he refused to quit it, and we made arrangements
 with the Duke for his continuing there."
 
 I was hurt by the careless tone with which he conveyed this information,
 and replied coldly: "I am obliged to you for your intelligence, and will
 avail myself of it."
 
 "You shall, Verney," said he, "and if you continue of the same mind, I will
 facilitate your views. But first witness, I beseech you, the result of this
 night's contest, and the triumph I am about to achieve, if I may so call
 it, while I fear that victory is to me defeat. What can I do? My dearest
 hopes appear to be near their fulfilment. The ex-queen gives me Idris;
 Adrian is totally unfitted to succeed to the earldom, and that earldom in
 my hands becomes a kingdom. By the reigning God it is true; the paltry
 earldom of Windsor shall no longer content him, who will inherit the rights
 which must for ever appertain to the person who possesses it. The Countess
 can never forget that she has been a queen, and she disdains to leave a
 diminished inheritance to her children; her power and my wit will rebuild
 the throne, and this brow will be clasped by a kingly diadem.--I can do
 this--I can marry Idris."---
 
 He stopped abruptly, his countenance darkened, and its expression changed
 again and again under the influence of internal passion. I asked, "Does
 Lady Idris love you?"
 
 "What a question," replied he laughing. "She will of course, as I shall
 her, when we are married."
 
 "You begin late," said I, ironically, "marriage is usually considered the
 grave, and not the cradle of love. So you are about to love her, but do not
 already?"
 
 "Do not catechise me, Lionel; I will do my duty by her, be assured. Love! I
 must steel my heart against that; expel it from its tower of strength,
 barricade it out: the fountain of love must cease to play, its waters be
 dried up, and all passionate thoughts attendant on it die--that is to
 say, the love which would rule me, not that which I rule. Idris is a
 gentle, pretty, sweet little girl; it is impossible not to have an
 affection for her, and I have a very sincere one; only do not speak of love
 --love, the tyrant and the tyrant-queller; love, until now my conqueror,
 now my slave; the hungry fire, the untameable beast, the fanged
 snake--no--no--I will have nothing to do with that love. Tell me,
 Lionel, do you consent that I should marry this young lady?"
 
 He bent his keen eyes upon me, and my uncontrollable heart swelled in my
 bosom. I replied in a calm voice--but how far from calm was the thought
 imaged by my still words--"Never! I can never consent that Lady Idris
 should be united to one who does not love her."
 
 "Because you love her yourself."
 
 "Your Lordship might have spared that taunt; I do not, dare not love her."
 
 "At least," he continued haughtily, "she does not love you. I would not
 marry a reigning sovereign, were I not sure that her heart was free. But,
 O, Lionel! a kingdom is a word of might, and gently sounding are the terms
 that compose the style of royalty. Were not the mightiest men of the olden
 times kings? Alexander was a king; Solomon, the wisest of men, was a king;
 Napoleon was a king; Caesar died in his attempt to become one, and
 Cromwell, the puritan and king-killer, aspired to regality. The father of
 Adrian yielded up the already broken sceptre of England; but I will rear
 the fallen plant, join its dismembered frame, and exalt it above all the
 flowers of the field.
 
 "You need not wonder that I freely discover Adrian's abode. Do not
 suppose that I am wicked or foolish enough to found my purposed
 sovereignty on a fraud, and one so easily discovered as the truth
 or falsehood of the Earl's insanity. I am just come from him. Before I
 decided on my marriage with Idris, I resolved to see him myself again, and
 to judge of the probability of his recovery.--He is irrecoverably mad."
 
 I gasped for breath--
 
 "I will not detail to you," continued Raymond, "the melancholy particulars.
 You shall see him, and judge for yourself; although I fear this visit,
 useless to him, will be insufferably painful to you. It has weighed on my
 spirits ever since. Excellent and gentle as he is even in the downfall of
 his reason, I do not worship him as you do, but I would give all my hopes
 of a crown and my right hand to boot, to see him restored to himself."
 
 His voice expressed the deepest compassion: "Thou most unaccountable
 being," I cried, "whither will thy actions tend, in all this maze of
 purpose in which thou seemest lost?"
 
 "Whither indeed? To a crown, a golden be-gemmed crown, I hope; and yet I
 dare not trust and though I dream of a crown and wake for one, ever and
 anon a busy devil whispers to me, that it is but a fool's cap that I seek,
 and that were I wise, I should trample on it, and take in its stead, that
 which is worth all the crowns of the east and presidentships of the west."
 
 "And what is that?"
 
 "If I do make it my choice, then you shall know; at present I dare not
 speak, even think of it."
 
 Again he was silent, and after a pause turned to me laughingly. When scorn
 did not inspire his mirth, when it was genuine gaiety that painted his
 features with a joyous expression, his beauty became super-eminent, divine.
 "Verney," said he, "my first act when I become King of England, will be to
 unite with the Greeks, take Constantinople, and subdue all Asia. I intend
 to be a warrior, a conqueror; Napoleon's name shall vail to mine; and
 enthusiasts, instead of visiting his rocky grave, and exalting the merits
 of the fallen, shall adore my majesty, and magnify my illustrious
 achievements."
 
 I listened to Raymond with intense interest. Could I be other than all ear,
 to one who seemed to govern the whole earth in his grasping imagination,
 and who only quailed when he attempted to rule himself. Then on his word
 and will depended my own happiness--the fate of all dear to me. I
 endeavoured to divine the concealed meaning of his words. Perdita's name
 was not mentioned; yet I could not doubt that love for her caused the
 vacillation of purpose that he exhibited. And who was so worthy of love as
 my noble-minded sister? Who deserved the hand of this self-exalted king
 more than she whose glance belonged to a queen of nations? who loved him,
 as he did her; notwithstanding that disappointment quelled her passion, and
 ambition held strong combat with his.
 
 We went together to the House in the evening. Raymond, while he knew that
 his plans and prospects were to be discussed and decided during the
 expected debate, was gay and careless. An hum, like that of ten thousand
 hives of swarming bees, stunned us as we entered the coffee-room. Knots of
 politicians were assembled with anxious brows and loud or deep voices. The
 aristocratical party, the richest and most influential men in England,
 appeared less agitated than the others, for the question was to be
 discussed without their interference. Near the fire was Ryland and his
 supporters. Ryland was a man of obscure birth and of immense wealth,
 inherited from his father, who had been a manufacturer. He had witnessed,
 when a young man, the abdication of the king, and the amalgamation of the
 two houses of Lords and Commons; he had sympathized with these popular
 encroachments, and it had been the business of his life to consolidate and
 encrease them. Since then, the influence of the landed proprietors had
 augmented; and at first Ryland was not sorry to observe the machinations of
 Lord Raymond, which drew off many of his opponent's partizans. But the
 thing was now going too far. The poorer nobility hailed the return of
 sovereignty, as an event which would restore them to their power and
 rights, now lost. The half extinct spirit of royalty roused itself in the
 minds of men; and they, willing slaves, self-constituted subjects, were
 ready to bend their necks to the yoke. Some erect and manly spirits still
 remained, pillars of state; but the word republic had grown stale to the
 vulgar ear; and many--the event would prove whether it was a majority--
 pined for the tinsel and show of royalty. Ryland was roused to resistance;
 he asserted that his sufferance alone had permitted the encrease of this
 party; but the time for indulgence was passed, and with one motion of his
 arm he would sweep away the cobwebs that blinded his countrymen.
 
 When Raymond entered the coffee-room, his presence was hailed by his
 friends almost with a shout. They gathered round him, counted their
 numbers, and detailed the reasons why they were now to receive an addition
 of such and such members, who had not yet declared themselves. Some
 trifling business of the House having been gone through, the leaders took
 their seats in the chamber; the clamour of voices continued, till Ryland
 arose to speak, and then the slightest whispered observation was audible.
 All eyes were fixed upon him as he stood--ponderous of frame, sonorous of
 voice, and with a manner which, though not graceful, was impressive. I
 turned from his marked, iron countenance to Raymond, whose face, veiled by
 a smile, would not betray his care; yet his lips quivered somewhat, and his
 hand clasped the bench on which he sat, with a convulsive strength that
 made the muscles start again.
 
 Ryland began by praising the present state of the British empire. He
 recalled past years to their memory; the miserable contentions which in the
 time of our fathers arose almost to civil war, the abdication of the late
 king, and the foundation of the republic. He described this republic;
 shewed how it gave privilege to each individual in the state, to rise to
 consequence, and even to temporary sovereignty. He compared the royal and
 republican spirit; shewed how the one tended to enslave the minds of men;
 while all the institutions of the other served to raise even the meanest
 among us to something great and good. He shewed how England had become
 powerful, and its inhabitants valiant and wise, by means of the freedom
 they enjoyed. As he spoke, every heart swelled with pride, and every cheek
 glowed with delight to remember, that each one there was English, and that
 each supported and contributed to the happy state of things now
 commemorated. Ryland's fervour increased--his eyes lighted up--his
 voice assumed the tone of passion. There was one man, he continued, who
 wished to alter all this, and bring us back to our days of impotence and
 contention:--one man, who would dare arrogate the honour which was due to
 all who claimed England as their birthplace, and set his name and style
 above the name and style of his country. I saw at this juncture that
 Raymond changed colour; his eyes were withdrawn from the orator, and cast
 on the ground; the listeners turned from one to the other; but in the
 meantime the speaker's voice filled their ears--the thunder of his
 denunciations influenced their senses. The very boldness of his language
 gave him weight; each knew that he spoke truth--a truth known, but not
 acknowledged. He tore from reality the mask with which she had been
 clothed; and the purposes of Raymond, which before had crept around,
 ensnaring by stealth, now stood a hunted stag--even at bay--as all
 perceived who watched the irrepressible changes of his countenance. Ryland
 ended by moving, that any attempt to re-erect the kingly power should be
 declared treason, and he a traitor who should endeavour to change the
 present form of government. Cheers and loud acclamations followed the close
 of his speech.
 
 After his motion had been seconded, Lord Raymond rose,--his countenance
 bland, his voice softly melodious, his manner soothing, his grace and
 sweetness came like the mild breathing of a flute, after the loud,
 organ-like voice of his adversary. He rose, he said, to speak in favour of
 the honourable member's motion, with one slight amendment subjoined. He was
 ready to go back to old times, and commemorate the contests of our fathers,
 and the monarch's abdication. Nobly and greatly, he said, had the
 illustrious and last sovereign of England sacrificed himself to the
 apparent good of his country, and divested himself of a power which could
 only be maintained by the blood of his subjects--these subjects named so
 no more, these, his friends and equals, had in gratitude conferred certain
 favours and distinctions on him and his family for ever. An ample estate
 was allotted to them, and they took the first rank among the peers of Great
 Britain. Yet it might be conjectured that they had not forgotten their
 ancient heritage; and it was hard that his heir should suffer alike with
 any other pretender, if he attempted to regain what by ancient right and
 inheritance belonged to him. He did not say that he should favour such an
 attempt; but he did say that such an attempt would be venial; and, if the
 aspirant did not go so far as to declare war, and erect a standard in the
 kingdom, his fault ought to be regarded with an indulgent eye. In his
 amendment he proposed, that an exception should be made in the bill in
 favour of any person who claimed the sovereign power in right of the earls
 of Windsor. Nor did Raymond make an end without drawing in vivid and glowing
 colours, the splendour of a kingdom, in opposition to the commercial spirit
 of republicanism. He asserted, that each individual under the English
 monarchy, was then as now, capable of attaining high rank and power--with
 one only exception, that of the function of chief magistrate; higher and
 nobler rank, than a bartering, timorous commonwealth could afford. And for
 this one exception, to what did it amount? The nature of riches and
 influence forcibly confined the list of candidates to a few of the
 wealthiest; and it was much to be feared, that the ill-humour and
 contention generated by this triennial struggle, would counterbalance its
 advantages in impartial eyes. I can ill record the flow of language and
 graceful turns of expression, the wit and easy raillery that gave vigour
 and influence to his speech. His manner, timid at first, became firm--his
 changeful face was lit up to superhuman brilliancy; his voice, various as
 music, was like that enchanting.
 
 It were useless to record the debate that followed this harangue. Party
 speeches were delivered, which clothed the question in cant, and veiled its
 simple meaning in a woven wind of words. The motion was lost; Ryland
 withdrew in rage and despair; and Raymond, gay and exulting, retired to
 dream of his future kingdom.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 IS there such a feeling as love at first sight? And if there be, in what
 does its nature differ from love founded in long observation and slow
 growth? Perhaps its effects are not so permanent; but they are, while they
 last, as violent and intense. We walk the pathless mazes of society, vacant
 of joy, till we hold this clue, leading us through that labyrinth to
 paradise. Our nature dim, like to an unlighted torch, sleeps in formless
 blank till the fire attain it; this life of life, this light to moon, and
 glory to the sun. What does it matter, whether the fire be struck from
 flint and steel, nourished with care into a flame, slowly communicated to
 the dark wick, or whether swiftly the radiant power of light and warmth
 passes from a kindred power, and shines at once the beacon and the hope. In
 the deepest fountain of my heart the pulses were stirred; around, above,
 beneath, the clinging Memory as a cloak enwrapt me. In no one moment of
 coming time did I feel as I had done in time gone by. The spirit of Idris
 hovered in the air I breathed; her eyes were ever and for ever bent on
 mine; her remembered smile blinded my faint gaze, and caused me to walk as
 one, not in eclipse, not in darkness and vacancy--but in a new and
 brilliant light, too novel, too dazzling for my human senses. On every
 leaf, on every small division of the universe, (as on the hyacinth ai is
 engraved) was imprinted the talisman of my existence--SHE LIVES! SHE IS!
 --I had not time yet to analyze my feeling, to take myself to task, and
 leash in the tameless passion; all was one idea, one feeling, one knowledge
 --it was my life!
 
 But the die was cast--Raymond would marry Idris. The merry marriage bells
 rung in my ears; I heard the nation's gratulation which followed the union;
 the ambitious noble uprose with swift eagle-flight, from the lowly ground
 to regal supremacy--and to the love of Idris. Yet, not so! She did not
 love him; she had called me her friend; she had smiled on me; to me she had
 entrusted her heart's dearest hope, the welfare of Adrian. This reflection
 thawed my congealing blood, and again the tide of life and love flowed
 impetuously onward, again to ebb as my busy thoughts changed.
 
 The debate had ended at three in the morning. My soul was in tumults; I
 traversed the streets with eager rapidity. Truly, I was mad that night--
 love--which I have named a giant from its birth, wrestled with despair!
 My heart, the field of combat, was wounded by the iron heel of the one,
 watered by the gushing tears of the other. Day, hateful to me, dawned; I
 retreated to my lodgings--I threw myself on a couch--I slept--was it
 sleep?--for thought was still alive--love and despair struggled still,
 and I writhed with unendurable pain.
 
 I awoke half stupefied; I felt a heavy oppression on me, but knew not
 wherefore; I entered, as it were, the council-chamber of my brain, and
 questioned the various ministers of thought therein assembled; too soon I
 remembered all; too soon my limbs quivered beneath the tormenting power;
 soon, too soon, I knew myself a slave!
 
 Suddenly, unannounced, Lord Raymond entered my apartment. He came in gaily,
 singing the Tyrolese song of liberty; noticed me with a gracious nod, and
 threw himself on a sopha opposite the copy of a bust of the Apollo
 Belvidere. After one or two trivial remarks, to which I sullenly replied,
 he suddenly cried, looking at the bust, "I am called like that victor! Not
 a bad idea; the head will serve for my new coinage, and be an omen to all
 dutiful subjects of my future success."
 
 He said this in his most gay, yet benevolent manner, and smiled, not
 disdainfully, but in playful mockery of himself. Then his countenance
 suddenly darkened, and in that shrill tone peculiar to himself, he cried,
 "I fought a good battle last night; higher conquest the plains of Greece
 never saw me achieve. Now I am the first man in the state, burthen of every
 ballad, and object of old women's mumbled devotions. What are your
 meditations? You, who fancy that you can read the human soul, as your
 native lake reads each crevice and folding of its surrounding hills--say
 what you think of me; king-expectant, angel or devil, which?"
 
 This ironical tone was discord to my bursting, over-boiling-heart; I was
 nettled by his insolence, and replied with bitterness; "There is a spirit,
 neither angel or devil, damned to limbo merely." I saw his cheeks become
 pale, and his lips whiten and quiver; his anger served but to enkindle
 mine, and I answered with a determined look his eyes which glared on me;
 suddenly they were withdrawn, cast down, a tear, I thought, wetted the dark
 lashes; I was softened, and with involuntary emotion added, "Not that you
 are such, my dear lord."
 
 I paused, even awed by the agitation he evinced; "Yes," he said at length,
 rising and biting his lip, as he strove to curb his passion; "Such am I!
 You do not know me, Verney; neither you, nor our audience of last night,
 nor does universal England know aught of me. I stand here, it would seem,
 an elected king; this hand is about to grasp a sceptre; these brows feel in
 each nerve the coming diadem. I appear to have strength, power, victory;
 standing as a dome-supporting column stands; and I am--a reed! I have
 ambition, and that attains its aim; my nightly dreams are realized, my
 waking hopes fulfilled; a kingdom awaits my acceptance, my enemies are
 overthrown. But here," and he struck his heart with violence, "here is the
 rebel, here the stumbling-block; this over-ruling heart, which I may drain
 of its living blood; but, while one fluttering pulsation remains, I am its
 slave."
 
 He spoke with a broken voice, then bowed his head, and, hiding his face in
 his hands, wept. I was still smarting from my own disappointment; yet this
 scene oppressed me even to terror, nor could I interrupt his access of
 passion. It subsided at length; and, throwing himself on the couch, he
 remained silent and motionless, except that his changeful features shewed a
 strong internal conflict. At last he rose, and said in his usual tone of
 voice, "The time grows on us, Verney, I must away. Let me not forget my
 chiefest errand here. Will you accompany me to Windsor to-morrow? You will
 not be dishonoured by my society, and as this is probably the last service,
 or disservice you can do me, will you grant my request?"
 
 He held out his hand with almost a bashful air. Swiftly I thought--Yes, I
 will witness the last scene of the drama. Beside which, his mien conquered
 me, and an affectionate sentiment towards him, again filled my heart--I
 bade him command me. "Aye, that I will," said he gaily, "that's my cue now;
 be with me to-morrow morning by seven; be secret and faithful; and you
 shall be groom of the stole ere long."
 
 So saying, he hastened away, vaulted on his horse, and with a gesture as if
 he gave me his hand to kiss, bade me another laughing adieu. Left to
 myself, I strove with painful intensity to divine the motive of his request
 and foresee the events of the coming day. The hours passed on unperceived;
 my head ached with thought, the nerves seemed teeming with the over full
 fraught--I clasped my burning brow, as if my fevered hand could medicine
 its pain. I was punctual to the appointed hour on the following day, and
 found Lord Raymond waiting for me. We got into his carriage, and proceeded
 towards Windsor. I had tutored myself, and was resolved by no outward sign
 to disclose my internal agitation.
 
 "What a mistake Ryland made," said Raymond, "when he thought to overpower
 me the other night. He spoke well, very well; such an harangue would have
 succeeded better addressed to me singly, than to the fools and knaves
 assembled yonder. Had I been alone, I should have listened to him with a
 wish to hear reason, but when he endeavoured to vanquish me in my own
 territory, with my own weapons, he put me on my mettle, and the event was
 such as all might have expected."
 
 I smiled incredulously, and replied: "I am of Ryland's way of thinking, and
 will, if you please, repeat all his arguments; we shall see how far you
 will be induced by them, to change the royal for the patriotic style."
 
 "The repetition would be useless," said Raymond, "since I well remember
 them, and have many others, self-suggested, which speak with unanswerable
 persuasion."
 
 He did not explain himself, nor did I make any remark on his reply. Our
 silence endured for some miles, till the country with open fields, or shady
 woods and parks, presented pleasant objects to our view. After some
 observations on the scenery and seats, Raymond said: "Philosophers have
 called man a microcosm of nature, and find a reflection in the internal
 mind for all this machinery visibly at work around us. This theory has
 often been a source of amusement to me; and many an idle hour have I spent,
 exercising my ingenuity in finding resemblances. Does not Lord Bacon say
 that, 'the falling from a discord to a concord, which maketh great
 sweetness in music, hath an agreement with the affections, which are
 re-integrated to the better after some dislikes?' What a sea is the tide of
 passion, whose fountains are in our own nature! Our virtues are the
 quick-sands, which shew themselves at calm and low water; but let the waves
 arise and the winds buffet them, and the poor devil whose hope was in their
 durability, finds them sink from under him. The fashions of the world, its
 exigencies, educations and pursuits, are winds to drive our wills, like
 clouds all one way; but let a thunderstorm arise in the shape of love,
 hate, or ambition, and the rack goes backward, stemming the opposing air in
 triumph."
 
 "Yet," replied I, "nature always presents to our eyes the appearance of a
 patient: while there is an active principle in man which is capable of
 ruling fortune, and at least of tacking against the gale, till it in some
 mode conquers it."
 
 "There is more of what is specious than true in your distinction," said my
 companion. "Did we form ourselves, choosing our dispositions, and our
 powers? I find myself, for one, as a stringed instrument with chords and
 stops--but I have no power to turn the pegs, or pitch my thoughts to a
 higher or lower key."
 
 "Other men," I observed, "may be better musicians."
 
 "I talk not of others, but myself," replied Raymond, "and I am as fair an
 example to go by as another. I cannot set my heart to a particular tune, or
 run voluntary changes on my will. We are born; we choose neither our
 parents, nor our station; we are educated by others, or by the world's
 circumstance, and this cultivation, mingling with our innate disposition,
 is the soil in which our desires, passions, and motives grow."
 
 "There is much truth in what you say," said I, "and yet no man ever acts
 upon this theory. Who, when he makes a choice, says, Thus I choose, because
 I am necessitated? Does he not on the contrary feel a freedom of will
 within him, which, though you may call it fallacious, still actuates him as
 he decides?"
 
 "Exactly so," replied Raymond, "another link of the breakless chain.
 Were I now to commit an act which would annihilate my hopes, and
 pluck the regal garment from my mortal limbs, to clothe them in ordinary
 weeds, would this, think you, be an act of free-will on my part?"
 
 As we talked thus, I perceived that we were not going the ordinary road to
 Windsor, but through Englefield Green, towards Bishopgate Heath. I began to
 divine that Idris was not the object of our journey, but that I was brought
 to witness the scene that was to decide the fate of Raymond--and of
 Perdita. Raymond had evidently vacillated during his journey, and
 irresolution was marked in every gesture as we entered Perdita's cottage. I
 watched him curiously, determined that, if this hesitation should continue,
 I would assist Perdita to overcome herself, and teach her to disdain the
 wavering love of him, who balanced between the possession of a crown, and
 of her, whose excellence and affection transcended the worth of a
 kingdom.
 
 We found her in her flower-adorned alcove; she was reading the newspaper
 report of the debate in parliament, that apparently doomed her to
 hopelessness. That heart-sinking feeling was painted in her sunk eyes and
 spiritless attitude; a cloud was on her beauty, and frequent sighs were
 tokens of her distress. This sight had an instantaneous effect on Raymond;
 his eyes beamed with tenderness, and remorse clothed his manners with
 earnestness and truth. He sat beside her; and, taking the paper from her
 hand, said, "Not a word more shall my sweet Perdita read of this contention
 of madmen and fools. I must not permit you to be acquainted with the extent
 of my delusion, lest you despise me; although, believe me, a wish to appear
 before you, not vanquished, but as a conqueror, inspired me during my wordy
 war."
 
 Perdita looked at him like one amazed; her expressive countenance shone for
 a moment with tenderness; to see him only was happiness. But a bitter
 thought swiftly shadowed her joy; she bent her eyes on the ground,
 endeavouring to master the passion of tears that threatened to overwhelm
 her. Raymond continued, "I will not act a part with you, dear girl, or
 appear other than what I am, weak and unworthy, more fit to excite your
 disdain than your love. Yet you do love me; I feel and know that you do,
 and thence I draw my most cherished hopes. If pride guided you, or even
 reason, you might well reject me. Do so; if your high heart, incapable of
 my infirmity of purpose, refuses to bend to the lowness of mine. Turn from
 me, if you will,--if you can. If your whole soul does not urge you to
 forgive me--if your entire heart does not open wide its door to admit me
 to its very centre, forsake me, never speak to me again. I, though sinning
 against you almost beyond remission, I also am proud; there must be no
 reserve in your pardon--no drawback to the gift of your affection."
 
 Perdita looked down, confused, yet pleased. My presence embarrassed her; so
 that she dared not turn to meet her lover's eye, or trust her voice to
 assure him of her affection; while a blush mantled her cheek, and her
 disconsolate air was exchanged for one expressive of deep-felt joy. Raymond
 encircled her waist with his arm, and continued, "I do not deny that I have
 balanced between you and the highest hope that mortal men can entertain;
 but I do so no longer. Take me--mould me to your will, possess my heart
 and soul to all eternity. If you refuse to contribute to my happiness, I
 quit England to-night, and will never set foot in it again.
 
 "Lionel, you hear: witness for me: persuade your sister to forgive the
 injury I have done her; persuade her to be mine."
 
 "There needs no persuasion," said the blushing Perdita, "except your own
 dear promises, and my ready heart, which whispers to me that they are
 true."
 
 That same evening we all three walked together in the forest, and, with the
 garrulity which happiness inspires, they detailed to me the history of
 their loves. It was pleasant to see the haughty Raymond and reserved
 Perdita changed through happy love into prattling, playful children, both
 losing their characteristic dignity in the fulness of mutual contentment. A
 night or two ago Lord Raymond, with a brow of care, and a heart oppressed
 with thought, bent all his energies to silence or persuade the legislators
 of England that a sceptre was not too weighty for his hand, while visions
 of dominion, war, and triumph floated before him; now, frolicsome as a
 lively boy sporting under his mother's approving eye, the hopes of his
 ambition were complete, when he pressed the small fair hand of Perdita to
 his lips; while she, radiant with delight, looked on the still pool, not
 truly admiring herself, but drinking in with rapture the reflection there
 made of the form of herself and her lover, shewn for the first time in dear
 conjunction.
 
 I rambled away from them. If the rapture of assured sympathy was theirs, I
 enjoyed that of restored hope. I looked on the regal towers of Windsor.
 High is the wall and strong the barrier that separate me from my Star of
 Beauty. But not impassible. She will not be his. A few more years dwell in
 thy native garden, sweet flower, till I by toil and time acquire a right to
 gather thee. Despair not, nor bid me despair! What must I do now? First I
 must seek Adrian, and restore him to her. Patience, gentleness, and untired
 affection, shall recall him, if it be true, as Raymond says, that he is
 mad; energy and courage shall rescue him, if he be unjustly imprisoned.
 
 After the lovers again joined me, we supped together in the alcove. Truly
 it was a fairy's supper; for though the air was perfumed by the scent of
 fruits and wine, we none of us either ate or drank--even the beauty of
 the night was unobserved; their extasy could not be increased by outward
 objects, and I was wrapt in reverie. At about midnight Raymond and I took
 leave of my sister, to return to town. He was all gaiety; scraps of songs
 fell from his lips; every thought of his mind--every object about us,
 gleamed under the sunshine of his mirth. He accused me of melancholy, of
 ill-humour and envy.
 
 "Not so," said I, "though I confess that my thoughts are not occupied as
 pleasantly as yours are. You promised to facilitate my visit to Adrian; I
 conjure you to perform your promise. I cannot linger here; I long to soothe
 --perhaps to cure the malady of my first and best friend. I shall
 immediately depart for Dunkeld."
 
 "Thou bird of night," replied Raymond, "what an eclipse do you throw across
 my bright thoughts, forcing me to call to mind that melancholy ruin, which
 stands in mental desolation, more irreparable than a fragment of a carved
 column in a weed-grown field. You dream that you can restore him? Daedalus
 never wound so inextricable an error round Minotaur, as madness has woven
 about his imprisoned reason. Nor you, nor any other Theseus, can thread the
 labyrinth, to which perhaps some unkind Ariadne has the clue."
 
 "You allude to Evadne Zaimi: but she is not in England."
 
 "And were she," said Raymond, "I would not advise her seeing him. Better to
 decay in absolute delirium, than to be the victim of the methodical
 unreason of ill-bestowed love. The long duration of his malady has probably
 erased from his mind all vestige of her; and it were well that it should
 never again be imprinted. You will find him at Dunkeld; gentle and
 tractable he wanders up the hills, and through the wood, or sits listening
 beside the waterfall. You may see him--his hair stuck with wild flowers
 --his eyes full of untraceable meaning--his voice broken--his person
 wasted to a shadow. He plucks flowers and weeds, and weaves chaplets of
 them, or sails yellow leaves and bits of bark on the stream, rejoicing in
 their safety, or weeping at their wreck. The very memory half unmans me. By
 Heaven! the first tears I have shed since boyhood rushed scalding into my
 eyes when I saw him."
 
 It needed not this last account to spur me on to visit him. I only doubted
 whether or not I should endeavour to see Idris again, before I departed.
 This doubt was decided on the following day. Early in the morning Raymond
 came to me; intelligence had arrived that Adrian was dangerously ill, and
 it appeared impossible that his failing strength should surmount the
 disorder. "To-morrow," said Raymond, "his mother and sister set out for
 Scotland to see him once again."
 
 "And I go to-day," I cried; "this very hour I will engage a sailing
 balloon; I shall be there in forty-eight hours at furthest, perhaps in
 less, if the wind is fair. Farewell, Raymond; be happy in having chosen the
 better part in life. This turn of fortune revives me. I feared madness, not
 sickness--I have a presentiment that Adrian will not die; perhaps this
 illness is a crisis, and he may recover."
 
 Everything favoured my journey. The balloon rose about half a mile from the
 earth, and with a favourable wind it hurried through the air, its feathered
 vans cleaving the unopposing atmosphere. Notwithstanding the melancholy
 object of my journey, my spirits were exhilarated by reviving hope, by the
 swift motion of the airy pinnace, and the balmy visitation of the sunny
 air. The pilot hardly moved the plumed steerage, and the slender mechanism
 of the wings, wide unfurled, gave forth a murmuring noise, soothing to the
 sense. Plain and hill, stream and corn-field, were discernible below, while
 we unimpeded sped on swift and secure, as a wild swan in his spring-tide
 flight. The machine obeyed the slightest motion of the helm; and, the wind
 blowing steadily, there was no let or obstacle to our course. Such was the
 power of man over the elements; a power long sought, and lately won; yet
 foretold in by-gone time by the prince of poets, whose verses I quoted much
 to the astonishment of my pilot, when I told him how many hundred years ago
 they had been written:--
 
   Oh! human wit, thou can'st invent much ill,
   Thou searchest strange arts: who would think by skill,
   An heavy man like a light bird should stray,
   And through the empty heavens find a way?
 
 I alighted at Perth; and, though much fatigued by a constant exposure to
 the air for many hours, I would not rest, but merely altering my mode of
 conveyance, I went by land instead of air, to Dunkeld. The sun was rising
 as I entered the opening of the hills. After the revolution of ages Birnam
 hill was again covered with a young forest, while more aged pines, planted
 at the very commencement of the nineteenth century by the then Duke of
 Athol, gave solemnity and beauty to the scene. The rising sun first tinged
 the pine tops; and my mind, rendered through my mountain education deeply
 susceptible of the graces of nature, and now on the eve of again beholding
 my beloved and perhaps dying friend, was strangely influenced by the sight
 of those distant beams: surely they were ominous, and as such I regarded
 them, good omens for Adrian, on whose life my happiness depended.
 
 Poor fellow! he lay stretched on a bed of sickness, his cheeks glowing with
 the hues of fever, his eyes half closed, his breath irregular and
 difficult. Yet it was less painful to see him thus, than to find him
 fulfilling the animal functions uninterruptedly, his mind sick the while. I
 established myself at his bedside; I never quitted it day or night. Bitter
 task was it, to behold his spirit waver between death and life: to see his
 warm cheek, and know that the very fire which burned too fiercely there,
 was consuming the vital fuel; to hear his moaning voice, which might never
 again articulate words of love and wisdom; to witness the ineffectual
 motions of his limbs, soon to be wrapt in their mortal shroud. Such for
 three days and nights appeared the consummation which fate had decreed for
 my labours, and I became haggard and spectre-like, through anxiety and
 watching. At length his eyes unclosed faintly, yet with a look of returning
 life; he became pale and weak; but the rigidity of his features was
 softened by approaching convalescence. He knew me. What a brimful cup of
 joyful agony it was, when his face first gleamed with the glance of
 recognition--when he pressed my hand, now more fevered than his own, and
 when he pronounced my name! No trace of his past insanity remained, to dash
 my joy with sorrow.
 
 This same evening his mother and sister arrived. The Countess of Windsor
 was by nature full of energetic feeling; but she had very seldom in her
 life permitted the concentrated emotions of her heart to shew themselves on
 her features. The studied immovability of her countenance; her slow,
 equable manner, and soft but unmelodious voice, were a mask, hiding her
 fiery passions, and the impatience of her disposition. She did not in the
 least resemble either of her children; her black and sparkling eye, lit up
 by pride, was totally unlike the blue lustre, and frank, benignant
 expression of either Adrian or Idris. There was something grand and
 majestic in her motions, but nothing persuasive, nothing amiable. Tall,
 thin, and strait, her face still handsome, her raven hair hardly tinged
 with grey, her forehead arched and beautiful, had not the eye-brows been
 somewhat scattered--it was impossible not to be struck by her, almost to
 fear her. Idris appeared to be the only being who could resist her mother,
 notwithstanding the extreme mildness of her character. But there was a
 fearlessness and frankness about her, which said that she would not
 encroach on another's liberty, but held her own sacred and unassailable.
 
 The Countess cast no look of kindness on my worn-out frame, though
 afterwards she thanked me coldly for my attentions. Not so Idris; her first
 glance was for her brother; she took his hand, she kissed his eye-lids, and
 hung over him with looks of compassion and love. Her eyes glistened with
 tears when she thanked me, and the grace of her expressions was enhanced,
 not diminished, by the fervour, which caused her almost to falter as she
 spoke. Her mother, all eyes and ears, soon interrupted us; and I saw, that
 she wished to dismiss me quietly, as one whose services, now that his
 relatives had arrived, were of no use to her son. I was harassed and ill,
 resolved not to give up my post, yet doubting in what way I should assert
 it; when Adrian called me, and clasping my hand, bade me not leave him. His
 mother, apparently inattentive, at once understood what was meant, and
 seeing the hold we had upon her, yielded the point to us.
 
 The days that followed were full of pain to me; so that I sometimes
 regretted that I had not yielded at once to the haughty lady, who watched
 all my motions, and turned my beloved task of nursing my friend to a work
 of pain and irritation. Never did any woman appear so entirely made of
 mind, as the Countess of Windsor. Her passions had subdued her appetites,
 even her natural wants; she slept little, and hardly ate at all; her body
 was evidently considered by her as a mere machine, whose health was
 necessary for the accomplishment of her schemes, but whose senses formed no
 part of her enjoyment. There is something fearful in one who can thus
 conquer the animal part of our nature, if the victory be not the effect of
 consummate virtue; nor was it without a mixture of this feeling, that I
 beheld the figure of the Countess awake when others slept, fasting when I,
 abstemious naturally, and rendered so by the fever that preyed on me, was
 forced to recruit myself with food. She resolved to prevent or diminish my
 opportunities of acquiring influence over her children, and circumvented my
 plans by a hard, quiet, stubborn resolution, that seemed not to belong to
 flesh and blood. War was at last tacitly acknowledged between us. We had
 many pitched battles, during which no word was spoken, hardly a look was
 interchanged, but in which each resolved not to submit to the other. The
 Countess had the advantage of position; so I was vanquished, though I would
 not yield.
 
 I became sick at heart. My countenance was painted with the hues of ill
 health and vexation. Adrian and Idris saw this; they attributed it to my
 long watching and anxiety; they urged me to rest, and take care of myself,
 while I most truly assured them, that my best medicine was their good
 wishes; those, and the assured convalescence of my friend, now daily more
 apparent. The faint rose again blushed on his cheek; his brow and lips lost
 the ashy paleness of threatened dissolution; such was the dear reward of my
 unremitting attention--and bounteous heaven added overflowing recompence,
 when it gave me also the thanks and smiles of Idris.
 
 After the lapse of a few weeks, we left Dunkeld. Idris and her mother
 returned immediately to Windsor, while Adrian and I followed by slow
 journies and frequent stoppages, occasioned by his continued weakness. As
 we traversed the various counties of fertile England, all wore an
 exhilarating appearance to my companion, who had been so long secluded by
 disease from the enjoyments of weather and scenery. We passed through busy
 towns and cultivated plains. The husbandmen were getting in their plenteous
 harvests, and the women and children, occupied by light rustic toils,
 formed groupes of happy, healthful persons, the very sight of whom carried
 cheerfulness to the heart. One evening, quitting our inn, we strolled down
 a shady lane, then up a grassy slope, till we came to an eminence, that
 commanded an extensive view of hill and dale, meandering rivers, dark
 woods, and shining villages. The sun was setting; and the clouds, straying,
 like new-shorn sheep, through the vast fields of sky, received the golden
 colour of his parting beams; the distant uplands shone out, and the busy
 hum of evening came, harmonized by distance, on our ear. Adrian, who felt
 all the fresh spirit infused by returning health, clasped his hands in
 delight, and exclaimed with transport:
 
 "O happy earth, and happy inhabitants of earth! A stately palace has God
 built for you, O man! and worthy are you of your dwelling! Behold the
 verdant carpet spread at our feet, and the azure canopy above; the fields
 of earth which generate and nurture all things, and the track of heaven,
 which contains and clasps all things. Now, at this evening hour, at the
 period of repose and refection, methinks all hearts breathe one hymn of
 love and thanksgiving, and we, like priests of old on the mountain-tops,
 give a voice to their sentiment.
 
 "Assuredly a most benignant power built up the majestic fabric we inhabit,
 and framed the laws by which it endures. If mere existence, and not
 happiness, had been the final end of our being, what need of the profuse
 luxuries which we enjoy? Why should our dwelling place be so lovely, and
 why should the instincts of nature minister pleasurable sensations? The
 very sustaining of our animal machine is made delightful; and our
 sustenance, the fruits of the field, is painted with transcendant hues,
 endued with grateful odours, and palatable to our taste. Why should this
 be, if HE were not good? We need houses to protect us from the seasons, and
 behold the materials with which we are provided; the growth of trees with
 their adornment of leaves; while rocks of stone piled above the plains
 variegate the prospect with their pleasant irregularity.
 
 "Nor are outward objects alone the receptacles of the Spirit of Good. Look
 into the mind of man, where wisdom reigns enthroned; where imagination, the
 painter, sits, with his pencil dipt in hues lovelier than those of sunset,
 adorning familiar life with glowing tints. What a noble boon, worthy the
 giver, is the imagination! it takes from reality its leaden hue: it
 envelopes all thought and sensation in a radiant veil, and with an hand of
 beauty beckons us from the sterile seas of life, to her gardens, and
 bowers, and glades of bliss. And is not love a gift of the divinity? Love,
 and her child, Hope, which can bestow wealth on poverty, strength on the
 weak, and happiness on the sorrowing.
 
 "My lot has not been fortunate. I have consorted long with grief, entered
 the gloomy labyrinth of madness, and emerged, but half alive. Yet I thank
 God that I have lived! I thank God, that I have beheld his throne, the
 heavens, and earth, his footstool. I am glad that I have seen the changes
 of his day; to behold the sun, fountain of light, and the gentle pilgrim
 moon; to have seen the fire bearing flowers of the sky, and the flowery
 stars of earth; to have witnessed the sowing and the harvest. I am glad
 that I have loved, and have experienced sympathetic joy and sorrow with my
 fellow-creatures. I am glad now to feel the current of thought flow through
 my mind, as the blood through the articulations of my frame; mere existence
 is pleasure; and I thank God that I live!
 
 "And all ye happy nurslings of mother-earth, do ye not echo my words? Ye
 who are linked by the affectionate ties of nature, companions, friends,
 lovers! fathers, who toil with joy for their offspring; women, who while
 gazing on the living forms of their children, forget the pains of
 maternity; children, who neither toil nor spin, but love and are loved!
 
 "Oh, that death and sickness were banished from our earthly home! that
 hatred, tyranny, and fear could no longer make their lair in the human
 heart! that each man might find a brother in his fellow, and a nest of
 repose amid the wide plains of his inheritance! that the source of tears
 were dry, and that lips might no longer form expressions of sorrow.
 Sleeping thus under the beneficent eye of heaven, can evil visit thee, O
 Earth, or grief cradle to their graves thy luckless children? Whisper it
 not, let the demons hear and rejoice! The choice is with us; let us will
 it, and our habitation becomes a paradise. For the will of man is
 omnipotent, blunting the arrows of death, soothing the bed of disease, and
 wiping away the tears of agony. And what is each human being worth, if he
 do not put forth his strength to aid his fellow-creatures? My soul is a
 fading spark, my nature frail as a spent wave; but I dedicate all of
 intellect and strength that remains to me, to that one work, and take upon
 me the task, as far as I am able, of bestowing blessings on my
 fellow-men!"
 
 His voice trembled, his eyes were cast up, his hands clasped, and his
 fragile person was bent, as it were, with excess of emotion. The spirit of
 life seemed to linger in his form, as a dying flame on an altar flickers on
 the embers of an accepted sacrifice.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 WHEN we arrived at Windsor, I found that Raymond and Perdita had departed
 for the continent. I took possession of my sister's cottage, and blessed
 myself that I lived within view of Windsor Castle. It was a curious fact,
 that at this period, when by the marriage of Perdita I was allied to one of
 the richest individuals in England, and was bound by the most intimate
 friendship to its chiefest noble, I experienced the greatest excess of
 poverty that I had ever known. My knowledge of the worldly principles of
 Lord Raymond, would have ever prevented me from applying to him, however
 deep my distress might have been. It was in vain that I repeated to myself
 with regard to Adrian, that his purse was open to me; that one in soul, as
 we were, our fortunes ought also to be common. I could never, while with
 him, think of his bounty as a remedy to my poverty; and I even put aside
 hastily his offers of supplies, assuring him of a falsehood, that I needed
 them not. How could I say to this generous being, "Maintain me in idleness.
 You who have dedicated your powers of mind and fortune to the benefit of
 your species, shall you so misdirect your exertions, as to support in
 uselessness the strong, healthy, and capable?"
 
 And yet I dared not request him to use his influence that I might obtain an
 honourable provision for myself--for then I should have been obliged to
 leave Windsor. I hovered for ever around the walls of its Castle, beneath
 its enshadowing thickets; my sole companions were my books and my loving
 thoughts. I studied the wisdom of the ancients, and gazed on the happy
 walls that sheltered the beloved of my soul. My mind was nevertheless idle.
 I pored over the poetry of old times; I studied the metaphysics of Plato
 and Berkeley. I read the histories of Greece and Rome, and of England's
 former periods, and I watched the movements of the lady of my heart. At
 night I could see her shadow on the walls of her apartment; by day I viewed
 her in her flower-garden, or riding in the park with her usual companions.
 Methought the charm would be broken if I were seen, but I heard the music
 of her voice and was happy. I gave to each heroine of whom I read, her
 beauty and matchless excellences--such was Antigone, when she guided the
 blind Oedipus to the grove of the Eumenides, and discharged the funeral
 rites of Polynices; such was Miranda in the unvisited cave of Prospero;
 such Haidee, on the sands of the Ionian island. I was mad with excess of
 passionate devotion; but pride, tameless as fire, invested my nature, and
 prevented me from betraying myself by word or look.
 
 In the mean time, while I thus pampered myself with rich mental repasts, a
 peasant would have disdained my scanty fare, which I sometimes robbed from
 the squirrels of the forest. I was, I own, often tempted to recur to the
 lawless feats of my boy-hood, and knock down the almost tame pheasants that
 perched upon the trees, and bent their bright eyes on me. But they were the
 property of Adrian, the nurslings of Idris; and so, although my imagination
 rendered sensual by privation, made me think that they would better become
 the spit in my kitchen, than the green leaves of the forest,
 
      Nathelesse,
   I checked my haughty will, and did not eat;
 
 but supped upon sentiment, and dreamt vainly of "such morsels sweet," as
 I might not waking attain.
 
 But, at this period, the whole scheme of my existence was about to change.
 The orphan and neglected son of Verney, was on the eve of being linked to
 the mechanism of society by a golden chain, and to enter into all the
 duties and affections of life. Miracles were to be wrought in my favour,
 the machine of social life pushed with vast effort backward. Attend, O
 reader! while I narrate this tale of wonders!
 
 One day as Adrian and Idris were riding through the forest, with their
 mother and accustomed companions, Idris, drawing her brother aside from the
 rest of the cavalcade, suddenly asked him, "What had become of his friend,
 Lionel Verney?"
 
 "Even from this spot," replied Adrian, pointing to my sister's cottage,
 "you can see his dwelling."
 
 "Indeed!" said Idris, "and why, if he be so near, does he not come to see
 us, and make one of our society?"
 
 "I often visit him," replied Adrian; "but you may easily guess the motives,
 which prevent him from coming where his presence may annoy any one among
 us."
 
 "I do guess them," said Idris, "and such as they are, I would not
 venture to combat them. Tell me, however, in what way he passes his time;
 what he is doing and thinking in his cottage retreat?"
 
 "Nay, my sweet sister," replied Adrian, "you ask me more than I can well
 answer; but if you feel interest in him, why not visit him? He will feel
 highly honoured, and thus you may repay a part of the obligation I owe him,
 and compensate for the injuries fortune has done him."
 
 "I will most readily accompany you to his abode," said the lady, "not that
 I wish that either of us should unburthen ourselves of our debt, which,
 being no less than your life, must remain unpayable ever. But let us go;
 to-morrow we will arrange to ride out together, and proceeding towards that
 part of the forest, call upon him."
 
 The next evening therefore, though the autumnal change had brought on cold
 and rain, Adrian and Idris entered my cottage. They found me Curius-like,
 feasting on sorry fruits for supper; but they brought gifts richer than the
 golden bribes of the Sabines, nor could I refuse the invaluable store of
 friendship and delight which they bestowed. Surely the glorious twins of
 Latona were not more welcome, when, in the infancy of the world, they were
 brought forth to beautify and enlighten this "sterile promontory," than
 were this angelic pair to my lowly dwelling and grateful heart. We sat like
 one family round my hearth. Our talk was on subjects, unconnected with the
 emotions that evidently occupied each; but we each divined the other's
 thought, and as our voices spoke of indifferent matters, our eyes, in mute
 language, told a thousand things no tongue could have uttered.
 
 They left me in an hour's time. They left me happy--how unspeakably
 happy. It did not require the measured sounds of human language to syllable
 the story of my extasy. Idris had visited me; Idris I should again and
 again see--my imagination did not wander beyond the completeness of this
 knowledge. I trod air; no doubt, no fear, no hope even, disturbed me; I
 clasped with my soul the fulness of contentment, satisfied, undesiring,
 beatified.
 
 For many days Adrian and Idris continued to visit me thus. In this dear
 intercourse, love, in the guise of enthusiastic friendship, infused more
 and more of his omnipotent spirit. Idris felt it. Yes, divinity of the
 world, I read your characters in her looks and gesture; I heard your
 melodious voice echoed by her--you prepared for us a soft and flowery
 path, all gentle thoughts adorned it--your name, O Love, was not spoken,
 but you stood the Genius of the Hour, veiled, and time, but no mortal hand,
 might raise the curtain. Organs of articulate sound did not proclaim the
 union of our hearts; for untoward circumstance allowed no opportunity for
 the expression that hovered on our lips. Oh my pen! haste thou to write what
 was, before the thought of what is, arrests the hand that guides thee. If I
 lift up my eyes and see the desart earth, and feel that those dear eyes
 have spent their mortal lustre, and that those beauteous lips are silent,
 their "crimson leaves" faded, for ever I am mute!
 
 But you live, my Idris, even now you move before me! There was a glade, O
 reader! a grassy opening in the wood; the retiring trees left its velvet
 expanse as a temple for love; the silver Thames bounded it on one side, and
 a willow bending down dipt in the water its Naiad hair, dishevelled by the
 wind's viewless hand. The oaks around were the home of a tribe of
 nightingales--there am I now; Idris, in youth's dear prime, is by my side
 --remember, I am just twenty-two, and seventeen summers have scarcely
 passed over the beloved of my heart. The river swollen by autumnal rains,
 deluged the low lands, and Adrian in his favourite boat is employed in the
 dangerous pastime of plucking the topmost bough from a submerged oak. Are
 you weary of life, O Adrian, that you thus play with danger?--
 
 He has obtained his prize, and he pilots his boat through the flood; our
 eyes were fixed on him fearfully, but the stream carried him away from us;
 he was forced to land far lower down, and to make a considerable circuit
 before he could join us. "He is safe!" said Idris, as he leapt on shore,
 and waved the bough over his head in token of success; "we will wait for
 him here."
 
 We were alone together; the sun had set; the song of the nightingales
 began; the evening star shone distinct in the flood of light, which was yet
 unfaded in the west. The blue eyes of my angelic girl were fixed on this
 sweet emblem of herself: "How the light palpitates," she said, "which is
 that star's life. Its vacillating effulgence seems to say that its state,
 even like ours upon earth, is wavering and inconstant; it fears, methinks,
 and it loves."
 
 "Gaze not on the star, dear, generous friend," I cried, "read not love in
 its trembling rays; look not upon distant worlds; speak not of the mere
 imagination of a sentiment. I have long been silent; long even to sickness
 have I desired to speak to you, and submit my soul, my life, my entire
 being to you. Look not on the star, dear love, or do, and let that eternal
 spark plead for me; let it be my witness and my advocate, silent as it
 shines--love is to me as light to the star; even so long as that is
 uneclipsed by annihilation, so long shall I love you."
 
 Veiled for ever to the world's callous eye must be the transport of that
 moment. Still do I feel her graceful form press against my full-fraught
 heart--still does sight, and pulse, and breath sicken and fail, at the
 remembrance of that first kiss. Slowly and silently we went to meet Adrian,
 whom we heard approaching.
 
 I entreated Adrian to return to me after he had conducted his sister home.
 And that same evening, walking among the moon-lit forest paths, I poured
 forth my whole heart, its transport and its hope, to my friend. For a
 moment he looked disturbed--"I might have foreseen this," he said, "what
 strife will now ensue! Pardon me, Lionel, nor wonder that the expectation
 of contest with my mother should jar me, when else I should delightedly
 confess that my best hopes are fulfilled, in confiding my sister to your
 protection. If you do not already know it, you will soon learn the deep
 hate my mother bears to the name Verney. I will converse with Idris; then
 all that a friend can do, I will do; to her it must belong to play the
 lover's part, if she be capable of it."
 
 While the brother and sister were still hesitating in what manner they
 could best attempt to bring their mother over to their party, she,
 suspecting our meetings, taxed her children with them; taxed her fair
 daughter with deceit, and an unbecoming attachment for one whose only merit
 was being the son of the profligate favourite of her imprudent father; and
 who was doubtless as worthless as he from whom he boasted his descent. The
 eyes of Idris flashed at this accusation; she replied, "I do not deny that
 I love Verney; prove to me that he is worthless; and I will never see him
 more."
 
 "Dear Madam," said Adrian, "let me entreat you to see him, to cultivate his
 friendship. You will wonder then, as I do, at the extent of his
 accomplishments, and the brilliancy of his talents." (Pardon me, gentle
 reader, this is not futile vanity;--not futile, since to know that Adrian
 felt thus, brings joy even now to my lone heart).
 
 "Mad and foolish boy!" exclaimed the angry lady, "you have chosen with
 dreams and theories to overthrow my schemes for your own aggrandizement;
 but you shall not do the same by those I have formed for your sister. I but
 too well understand the fascination you both labour under; since I had the
 same struggle with your father, to make him cast off the parent of this
 youth, who hid his evil propensities with the smoothness and subtlety of a
 viper. In those days how often did I hear of his attractions, his wide
 spread conquests, his wit, his refined manners. It is well when flies only
 are caught by such spiders' webs; but is it for the high-born and powerful
 to bow their necks to the flimsy yoke of these unmeaning pretensions? Were
 your sister indeed the insignificant person she deserves to be, I would
 willingly leave her to the fate, the wretched fate, of the wife of a man,
 whose very person, resembling as it does his wretched father, ought to
 remind you of the folly and vice it typifies--but remember, Lady Idris,
 it is not alone the once royal blood of England that colours your veins,
 you are a Princess of Austria, and every life-drop is akin to emperors and
 kings. Are you then a fit mate for an uneducated shepherd-boy, whose only
 inheritance is his father's tarnished name?"
 
 "I can make but one defence," replied Idris, "the same offered by my
 brother; see Lionel, converse with my shepherd-boy"---The Countess
 interrupted her indignantly--"Yours!"--she cried: and then, smoothing
 her impassioned features to a disdainful smile, she continued--"We will
 talk of this another time. All I now ask, all your mother, Idris, requests
 is, that you will not see this upstart during the interval of one month."
 
 "I dare not comply," said Idris, "it would pain him too much. I have no
 right to play with his feelings, to accept his proffered love, and then
 sting him with neglect."
 
 "This is going too far," her mother answered, with quivering lips, and eyes
 again instinct by anger.
 
 "Nay, Madam," said Adrian, "unless my sister consent never to see him
 again, it is surely an useless torment to separate them for a month."
 
 "Certainly," replied the ex-queen, with bitter scorn, "his love, and her
 love, and both their childish flutterings, are to be put in fit comparison
 with my years of hope and anxiety, with the duties of the offspring of
 kings, with the high and dignified conduct which one of her descent ought
 to pursue. But it is unworthy of me to argue and complain. Perhaps you will
 have the goodness to promise me not to marry during that interval?"
 
 This was asked only half ironically; and Idris wondered why her mother
 should extort from her a solemn vow not to do, what she had never dreamed
 of doing--but the promise was required and given.
 
 All went on cheerfully now; we met as usual, and talked without dread of
 our future plans. The Countess was so gentle, and even beyond her wont,
 amiable with her children, that they began to entertain hopes of her
 ultimate consent. She was too unlike them, too utterly alien to their
 tastes, for them to find delight in her society, or in the prospect of its
 continuance, but it gave them pleasure to see her conciliating and kind.
 Once even, Adrian ventured to propose her receiving me. She refused with a
 smile, reminding him that for the present his sister had promised to be
 patient.
 
 One day, after the lapse of nearly a month, Adrian received a letter from a
 friend in London, requesting his immediate presence for the furtherance of
 some important object. Guileless himself, Adrian feared no deceit. I rode
 with him as far as Staines: he was in high spirits; and, since I could not
 see Idris during his absence, he promised a speedy return. His gaiety,
 which was extreme, had the strange effect of awakening in me contrary
 feelings; a presentiment of evil hung over me; I loitered on my return; I
 counted the hours that must elapse before I saw Idris again. Wherefore
 should this be? What evil might not happen in the mean time? Might not her
 mother take advantage of Adrian's absence to urge her beyond her
 sufferance, perhaps to entrap her? I resolved, let what would befall, to
 see and converse with her the following day. This determination soothed me.
 To-morrow, loveliest and best, hope and joy of my life, to-morrow I will
 see thee--Fool, to dream of a moment's delay!
 
 I went to rest. At past midnight I was awaked by a violent knocking. It was
 now deep winter; it had snowed, and was still snowing; the wind whistled in
 the leafless trees, despoiling them of the white flakes as they fell; its
 drear moaning, and the continued knocking, mingled wildly with my dreams--
 at length I was wide awake; hastily dressing myself, I hurried to discover
 the cause of this disturbance, and to open my door to the unexpected
 visitor. Pale as the snow that showered about her, with clasped hands,
 Idris stood before me. "Save me!" she exclaimed, and would have sunk to the
 ground had I not supported her. In a moment however she revived, and, with
 energy, almost with violence, entreated me to saddle horses, to take her
 away, away to London--to her brother--at least to save her. I had no
 horses--she wrung her hands. "What can I do?" she cried, "I am lost--we
 are both for ever lost! But come--come with me, Lionel; here I must not
 stay,--we can get a chaise at the nearest post-house; yet perhaps we have
 time! come, O come with me to save and protect me!"
 
 When I heard her piteous demands, while with disordered dress, dishevelled
 hair, and aghast looks, she wrung her hands--the idea shot across me is
 she also mad?--"Sweet one," and I folded her to my heart, "better repose
 than wander further;--rest--my beloved, I will make a fire--you are
 chill."
 
 "Rest!" she cried, "repose! you rave, Lionel! If you delay we are lost;
 come, I pray you, unless you would cast me off for ever."
 
 That Idris, the princely born, nursling of wealth and luxury, should have
 come through the tempestuous winter-night from her regal abode, and
 standing at my lowly door, conjure me to fly with her through darkness and
 storm--was surely a dream--again her plaintive tones, the sight of her
 loveliness assured me that it was no vision. Looking timidly around, as if
 she feared to be overheard, she whispered: "I have discovered--to-morrow
 --that is, to-day--already the to-morrow is come--before dawn,
 foreigners, Austrians, my mother's hirelings, are to carry me off to
 Germany, to prison, to marriage--to anything, except you and my brother
 --take me away, or soon they will be here!"
 
 I was frightened by her vehemence, and imagined some mistake in her
 incoherent tale; but I no longer hesitated to obey her. She had come by
 herself from the Castle, three long miles, at midnight, through the heavy
 snow; we must reach Englefield Green, a mile and a half further, before we
 could obtain a chaise. She told me, that she had kept up her strength and
 courage till her arrival at my cottage, and then both failed. Now she could
 hardly walk. Supporting her as I did, still she lagged: and at the distance
 of half a mile, after many stoppages, shivering fits, and half faintings,
 she slipt from my supporting arm on the snow, and with a torrent of tears
 averred that she must be taken, for that she could not proceed. I lifted
 her up in my arms; her light form rested on my breast.--I felt no
 burthen, except the internal one of contrary and contending emotions.
 Brimming delight now invested me. Again her chill limbs touched me as a
 torpedo; and I shuddered in sympathy with her pain and fright. Her head lay
 on my shoulder, her breath waved my hair, her heart beat near mine,
 transport made me tremble, blinded me, annihilated me--till a suppressed
 groan, bursting from her lips, the chattering of her teeth, which she
 strove vainly to subdue, and all the signs of suffering she evinced,
 recalled me to the necessity of speed and succour. At last I said to her,
 "There is Englefield Green; there the inn. But, if you are seen thus
 strangely circumstanced, dear Idris, even now your enemies may learn your
 flight too soon: were it not better that I hired the chaise alone? I will
 put you in safety meanwhile, and return to you immediately."
 
 She answered that I was right, and might do with her as I pleased. I
 observed the door of a small out-house a-jar. I pushed it open; and, with
 some hay strewed about, I formed a couch for her, placing her exhausted
 frame on it, and covering her with my cloak. I feared to leave her, she
 looked so wan and faint--but in a moment she re-acquired animation, and,
 with that, fear; and again she implored me not to delay. To call up the
 people of the inn, and obtain a conveyance and horses, even though I
 harnessed them myself, was the work of many minutes; minutes, each
 freighted with the weight of ages. I caused the chaise to advance a little,
 waited till the people of the inn had retired, and then made the post-boy
 draw up the carriage to the spot where Idris, impatient, and now somewhat
 recovered, stood waiting for me. I lifted her into the chaise; I assured
 her that with our four horses we should arrive in London before five
 o'clock, the hour when she would be sought and missed. I besought her to
 calm herself; a kindly shower of tears relieved her, and by degrees she
 related her tale of fear and peril.
 
 That same night after Adrian's departure, her mother had warmly
 expostulated with her on the subject of her attachment to me. Every motive,
 every threat, every angry taunt was urged in vain. She seemed to consider
 that through me she had lost Raymond; I was the evil influence of her life;
 I was even accused of encreasing and confirming the mad and base apostacy
 of Adrian from all views of advancement and grandeur; and now this
 miserable mountaineer was to steal her daughter. Never, Idris related, did
 the angry lady deign to recur to gentleness and persuasion; if she had, the
 task of resistance would have been exquisitely painful. As it was, the
 sweet girl's generous nature was roused to defend, and ally herself with,
 my despised cause. Her mother ended with a look of contempt and covert
 triumph, which for a moment awakened the suspicions of Idris. When they
 parted for the night, the Countess said, "To-morrow I trust your tone will
 be changed: be composed; I have agitated you; go to rest; and I will send
 you a medicine I always take when unduly restless--it will give you a
 quiet night."
 
 By the time that she had with uneasy thoughts laid her fair cheek upon her
 pillow, her mother's servant brought a draught; a suspicion again crossed
 her at this novel proceeding, sufficiently alarming to determine her not to
 take the potion; but dislike of contention, and a wish to discover whether
 there was any just foundation for her conjectures, made her, she said,
 almost instinctively, and in contradiction to her usual frankness, pretend
 to swallow the medicine. Then, agitated as she had been by her mother's
 violence, and now by unaccustomed fears, she lay unable to sleep, starting
 at every sound. Soon her door opened softly, and on her springing up, she
 heard a whisper, "Not asleep yet," and the door again closed. With a
 beating heart she expected another visit, and when after an interval her
 chamber was again invaded, having first assured herself that the intruders
 were her mother and an attendant, she composed herself to feigned sleep. A
 step approached her bed, she dared not move, she strove to calm her
 palpitations, which became more violent, when she heard her mother say
 mutteringly, "Pretty simpleton, little do you think that your game is
 already at an end for ever."
 
 For a moment the poor girl fancied that her mother believed that she had
 drank poison: she was on the point of springing up; when the Countess,
 already at a distance from the bed, spoke in a low voice to her companion,
 and again Idris listened: "Hasten," said she, "there is no time to lose--
 it is long past eleven; they will be here at five; take merely the clothes
 necessary for her journey, and her jewel-casket." The servant obeyed; few
 words were spoken on either side; but those were caught at with avidity by
 the intended victim. She heard the name of her own maid mentioned;--"No,
 no," replied her mother, "she does not go with us; Lady Idris must forget
 England, and all belonging to it." And again she heard, "She will not wake
 till late to-morrow, and we shall then be at sea."----"All is ready," at
 length the woman announced. The Countess again came to her daughter's
 bedside: "In Austria at least," she said, "you will obey. In Austria, where
 obedience can be enforced, and no choice left but between an honourable
 prison and a fitting marriage."
 
 Both then withdrew; though, as she went, the Countess said, "Softly; all
 sleep; though all have not been prepared for sleep, like her. I would not
 have any one suspect, or she might be roused to resistance, and perhaps
 escape. Come with me to my room; we will remain there till the hour agreed
 upon." They went. Idris, panic-struck, but animated and strengthened even
 by her excessive fear, dressed herself hurriedly, and going down a flight
 of back-stairs, avoiding the vicinity of her mother's apartment, she
 contrived to escape from the castle by a low window, and came through snow,
 wind, and obscurity to my cottage; nor lost her courage, until she arrived,
 and, depositing her fate in my hands, gave herself up to the desperation
 and weariness that overwhelmed her.
 
 I comforted her as well as I might. Joy and exultation, were mine, to
 possess, and to save her. Yet not to excite fresh agitation in her, "per
 non turbar quel bel viso sereno," I curbed my delight. I strove to quiet
 the eager dancing of my heart; I turned from her my eyes, beaming with too
 much tenderness, and proudly, to dark night, and the inclement atmosphere,
 murmured the expressions of my transport. We reached London, methought, all
 too soon; and yet I could not regret our speedy arrival, when I witnessed
 the extasy with which my beloved girl found herself in her brother's arms,
 safe from every evil, under his unblamed protection.
 
 Adrian wrote a brief note to his mother, informing her that Idris was under
 his care and guardianship. Several days elapsed, and at last an answer
 came, dated from Cologne. "It was useless," the haughty and disappointed
 lady wrote, "for the Earl of Windsor and his sister to address again the
 injured parent, whose only expectation of tranquillity must be derived from
 oblivion of their existence. Her desires had been blasted, her schemes
 overthrown. She did not complain; in her brother's court she would find,
 not compensation for their disobedience (filial unkindness admitted of
 none), but such a state of things and mode of life, as might best reconcile
 her to her fate. Under such circumstances, she positively declined any
 communication with them."
 
 Such were the strange and incredible events, that finally brought about my
 union with the sister of my best friend, with my adored Idris. With
 simplicity and courage she set aside the prejudices and opposition which
 were obstacles to my happiness, nor scrupled to give her hand, where she
 had given her heart. To be worthy of her, to raise myself to her height
 through the exertion of talents and virtue, to repay her love with devoted,
 unwearied tenderness, were the only thanks I could offer for the matchless
 gift.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 AND now let the reader, passing over some short period of time, be
 introduced to our happy circle. Adrian, Idris and I, were established in
 Windsor Castle; Lord Raymond and my sister, inhabited a house which the
 former had built on the borders of the Great Park, near Perdita's cottage,
 as was still named the low-roofed abode, where we two, poor even in hope,
 had each received the assurance of our felicity. We had our separate
 occupations and our common amusements. Sometimes we passed whole days under
 the leafy covert of the forest with our books and music. This occurred
 during those rare days in this country, when the sun mounts his etherial
 throne in unclouded majesty, and the windless atmosphere is as a bath of
 pellucid and grateful water, wrapping the senses in tranquillity. When the
 clouds veiled the sky, and the wind scattered them there and here, rending
 their woof, and strewing its fragments through the aerial plains--then we
 rode out, and sought new spots of beauty and repose. When the frequent
 rains shut us within doors, evening recreation followed morning study,
 ushered in by music and song. Idris had a natural musical talent; and her
 voice, which had been carefully cultivated, was full and sweet. Raymond and
 I made a part of the concert, and Adrian and Perdita were devout listeners.
 Then we were as gay as summer insects, playful as children; we ever met one
 another with smiles, and read content and joy in each other's countenances.
 Our prime festivals were held in Perdita's cottage; nor were we ever weary
 of talking of the past or dreaming of the future. Jealousy and disquiet
 were unknown among us; nor did a fear or hope of change ever disturb our
 tranquillity. Others said, We might be happy--we said--We are.
 
 When any separation took place between us, it generally so happened, that
 Idris and Perdita would ramble away together, and we remained to discuss
 the affairs of nations, and the philosophy of life. The very difference of
 our dispositions gave zest to these conversations. Adrian had the
 superiority in learning and eloquence; but Raymond possessed a quick
 penetration, and a practical knowledge of life, which usually displayed
 itself in opposition to Adrian, and thus kept up the ball of discussion. At
 other times we made excursions of many days' duration, and crossed the
 country to visit any spot noted for beauty or historical association.
 Sometimes we went up to London, and entered into the amusements of the busy
 throng; sometimes our retreat was invaded by visitors from among them. This
 change made us only the more sensible to the delights of the intimate
 intercourse of our own circle, the tranquillity of our divine forest, and
 our happy evenings in the halls of our beloved Castle.
 
 The disposition of Idris was peculiarly frank, soft, and affectionate. Her
 temper was unalterably sweet; and although firm and resolute on any point
 that touched her heart, she was yielding to those she loved. The nature of
 Perdita was less perfect; but tenderness and happiness improved her temper,
 and softened her natural reserve. Her understanding was clear and
 comprehensive, her imagination vivid; she was sincere, generous, and
 reasonable. Adrian, the matchless brother of my soul, the sensitive and
 excellent Adrian, loving all, and beloved by all, yet seemed destined not
 to find the half of himself, which was to complete his happiness. He often
 left us, and wandered by himself in the woods, or sailed in his little
 skiff, his books his only companions. He was often the gayest of our party,
 at the same time that he was the only one visited by fits of despondency;
 his slender frame seemed overcharged with the weight of life, and his soul
 appeared rather to inhabit his body than unite with it. I was hardly more
 devoted to my Idris than to her brother, and she loved him as her teacher,
 her friend, the benefactor who had secured to her the fulfilment of her
 dearest wishes. Raymond, the ambitious, restless Raymond, reposed midway on
 the great high-road of life, and was content to give up all his schemes of
 sovereignty and fame, to make one of us, the flowers of the field. His
 kingdom was the heart of Perdita, his subjects her thoughts; by her he was
 loved, respected as a superior being, obeyed, waited on. No office, no
 devotion, no watching was irksome to her, as it regarded him. She would sit
 apart from us and watch him; she would weep for joy to think that he was
 hers. She erected a temple for him in the depth of her being, and each
 faculty was a priestess vowed to his service. Sometimes she might be
 wayward and capricious; but her repentance was bitter, her return entire,
 and even this inequality of temper suited him who was not formed by nature
 to float idly down the stream of life.
 
 During the first year of their marriage, Perdita presented Raymond with a
 lovely girl. It was curious to trace in this miniature model the very
 traits of its father. The same half-disdainful lips and smile of triumph,
 the same intelligent eyes, the same brow and chestnut hair; her very hands
 and taper fingers resembled his. How very dear she was to Perdita! In
 progress of time, I also became a father, and our little darlings, our
 playthings and delights, called forth a thousand new and delicious
 feelings.
 
 Years passed thus,--even years. Each month brought forth its successor,
 each year one like to that gone by; truly, our lives were a living comment
 on that beautiful sentiment of Plutarch, that "our souls have a natural
 inclination to love, being born as much to love, as to feel, to reason, to
 understand and remember." We talked of change and active pursuits, but
 still remained at Windsor, incapable of violating the charm that attached
 us to our secluded life.
 
   Pareamo aver qui tutto il ben raccolto
   Che fra mortali in piu parte si rimembra.
 
 Now also that our children gave us occupation, we found excuses for
 our idleness, in the idea of bringing them up to a more splendid
 career. At length our tranquillity was disturbed, and the course of events,
 which for five years had flowed on in hushing tranquillity, was broken by
 breakers and obstacles, that woke us from our pleasant dream.
 
 A new Lord Protector of England was to be chosen; and, at Raymond's
 request, we removed to London, to witness, and even take a part in the
 election. If Raymond had been united to Idris, this post had been his
 stepping-stone to higher dignity; and his desire for power and fame had
 been crowned with fullest measure. He had exchanged a sceptre for a lute, a
 kingdom for Perdita.
 
 Did he think of this as we journeyed up to town? I watched him, but could
 make but little of him. He was particularly gay, playing with his child,
 and turning to sport every word that was uttered. Perhaps he did this
 because he saw a cloud upon Perdita's brow. She tried to rouse herself, but
 her eyes every now and then filled with tears, and she looked wistfully on
 Raymond and her girl, as if fearful that some evil would betide them. And
 so she felt. A presentiment of ill hung over her. She leaned from the
 window looking on the forest, and the turrets of the Castle, and as these
 became hid by intervening objects, she passionately exclaimed--"Scenes of
 happiness! scenes sacred to devoted love, when shall I see you again! and
 when I see ye, shall I be still the beloved and joyous Perdita, or shall I,
 heart-broken and lost, wander among your groves, the ghost of what I
 am!"
 
 "Why, silly one," cried Raymond, "what is your little head pondering
 upon, that of a sudden you have become so sublimely dismal? Cheer up, or I
 shall make you over to Idris, and call Adrian into the carriage, who, I see
 by his gesture, sympathizes with my good spirits."
 
 Adrian was on horseback; he rode up to the carriage, and his gaiety, in
 addition to that of Raymond, dispelled my sister's melancholy. We entered
 London in the evening, and went to our several abodes near Hyde Park.
 
 The following morning Lord Raymond visited me early. "I come to you," he
 said, "only half assured that you will assist me in my project, but
 resolved to go through with it, whether you concur with me or not. Promise
 me secrecy however; for if you will not contribute to my success, at least
 you must not baffle me."
 
 "Well, I promise. And now---"
 
 "And now, my dear fellow, for what are we come to London? To be present at
 the election of a Protector, and to give our yea or nay for his shuffling
 Grace of----? or for that noisy Ryland? Do you believe, Verney, that I
 brought you to town for that? No, we will have a Protector of our own. We
 will set up a candidate, and ensure his success. We will nominate Adrian,
 and do our best to bestow on him the power to which he is entitled by his
 birth, and which he merits through his virtues.
 
 "Do not answer; I know all your objections, and will reply to them in
 order. First, Whether he will or will not consent to become a great man?
 Leave the task of persuasion on that point to me; I do not ask you to
 assist me there. Secondly, Whether he ought to exchange his employment of
 plucking blackberries, and nursing wounded partridges in the forest, for
 the command of a nation? My dear Lionel, we are married men, and find
 employment sufficient in amusing our wives, and dancing our children. But
 Adrian is alone, wifeless, childless, unoccupied. I have long observed him.
 He pines for want of some interest in life. His heart, exhausted by his
 early sufferings, reposes like a new-healed limb, and shrinks from all
 excitement. But his understanding, his charity, his virtues, want a field
 for exercise and display; and we will procure it for him. Besides, is it
 not a shame, that the genius of Adrian should fade from the earth like a
 flower in an untrod mountain-path, fruitless? Do you think Nature composed
 his surpassing machine for no purpose? Believe me, he was destined to be
 the author of infinite good to his native England. Has she not bestowed on
 him every gift in prodigality?--birth, wealth, talent, goodness? Does not
 every one love and admire him? and does he not delight singly in such
 efforts as manifest his love to all? Come, I see that you are already
 persuaded, and will second me when I propose him to-night in parliament."
 
 "You have got up all your arguments in excellent order," I replied; "and,
 if Adrian consent, they are unanswerable. One only condition I would make,
 --that you do nothing without his concurrence."
 
 "I believe you are in the right," said Raymond; "although I had thought at
 first to arrange the affair differently. Be it so. I will go instantly to
 Adrian; and, if he inclines to consent, you will not destroy my labour by
 persuading him to return, and turn squirrel again in Windsor Forest. Idris,
 you will not act the traitor towards me?"
 
 "Trust me," replied she, "I will preserve a strict neutrality."
 
 "For my part," said I, "I am too well convinced of the worth of our friend,
 and the rich harvest of benefits that all England would reap from his
 Protectorship, to deprive my countrymen of such a blessing, if he consent
 to bestow it on them."
 
 In the evening Adrian visited us.--"Do you cabal also against me," said
 he, laughing; "and will you make common cause with Raymond, in dragging a
 poor visionary from the clouds to surround him with the fire-works and
 blasts of earthly grandeur, instead of heavenly rays and airs? I thought
 you knew me better."
 
 "I do know you better," I replied "than to think that you would be happy in
 such a situation; but the good you would do to others may be an inducement,
 since the time is probably arrived when you can put your theories into
 practice, and you may bring about such reformation and change, as will
 conduce to that perfect system of government which you delight to
 portray."
 
 "You speak of an almost-forgotten dream," said Adrian, his countenance
 slightly clouding as he spoke; "the visions of my boyhood have long since
 faded in the light of reality; I know now that I am not a man fitted to
 govern nations; sufficient for me, if I keep in wholesome rule the little
 kingdom of my own mortality.
 
 "But do not you see, Lionel, the drift of our noble friend; a drift,
 perhaps, unknown to himself, but apparent to me. Lord Raymond was never
 born to be a drone in the hive, and to find content in our pastoral life.
 He thinks, that he ought to be satisfied; he imagines, that his present
 situation precludes the possibility of aggrandisement; he does not
 therefore, even in his own heart, plan change for himself. But do you not
 see, that, under the idea of exalting me, he is chalking out a new path for
 himself; a path of action from which he has long wandered?
 
 "Let us assist him. He, the noble, the warlike, the great in every quality
 that can adorn the mind and person of man; he is fitted to be the Protector
 of England. If I--that is, if we propose him, he will assuredly be
 elected, and will find, in the functions of that high office, scope for the
 towering powers of his mind. Even Perdita will rejoice. Perdita, in whom
 ambition was a covered fire until she married Raymond, which event was for
 a time the fulfilment of her hopes; Perdita will rejoice in the glory and
 advancement of her lord--and, coyly and prettily, not be discontented
 with her share. In the mean time, we, the wise of the land, will return to
 our Castle, and, Cincinnatus-like, take to our usual labours, until our
 friend shall require our presence and assistance here."
 
 The more Adrian reasoned upon this scheme, the more feasible it appeared.
 His own determination never to enter into public life was insurmountable,
 and the delicacy of his health was a sufficient argument against it. The
 next step was to induce Raymond to confess his secret wishes for dignity
 and fame. He entered while we were speaking. The way in which Adrian had
 received his project for setting him up as a candidate for the
 Protectorship, and his replies, had already awakened in his mind, the view
 of the subject which we were now discussing. His countenance and manner
 betrayed irresolution and anxiety; but the anxiety arose from a fear that
 we should not prosecute, or not succeed in our idea; and his irresolution,
 from a doubt whether we should risk a defeat. A few words from us decided
 him, and hope and joy sparkled in his eyes; the idea of embarking in a
 career, so congenial to his early habits and cherished wishes, made him as
 before energetic and bold. We discussed his chances, the merits of the
 other candidates, and the dispositions of the voters.
 
 After all we miscalculated. Raymond had lost much of his popularity, and
 was deserted by his peculiar partizans. Absence from the busy stage had
 caused him to be forgotten by the people; his former parliamentary
 supporters were principally composed of royalists, who had been willing to
 make an idol of him when he appeared as the heir of the Earldom of Windsor;
 but who were indifferent to him, when he came forward with no other
 attributes and distinctions than they conceived to be common to many among
 themselves. Still he had many friends, admirers of his transcendent
 talents; his presence in the house, his eloquence, address and imposing
 beauty, were calculated to produce an electric effect. Adrian also,
 notwithstanding his recluse habits and theories, so adverse to the spirit
 of party, had many friends, and they were easily induced to vote for a
 candidate of his selection.
 
 The Duke of----, and Mr. Ryland, Lord Raymond's old antagonist, were the
 other candidates. The Duke was supported by all the aristocrats of the
 republic, who considered him their proper representative. Ryland was the
 popular candidate; when Lord Raymond was first added to the list, his
 chance of success appeared small. We retired from the debate which had
 followed on his nomination: we, his nominators, mortified; he dispirited to
 excess. Perdita reproached us bitterly. Her expectations had been strongly
 excited; she had urged nothing against our project, on the contrary, she
 was evidently pleased by it; but its evident ill success changed the
 current of her ideas. She felt, that, once awakened, Raymond would never
 return unrepining to Windsor. His habits were unhinged; his restless mind
 roused from its sleep, ambition must now be his companion through life; and
 if he did not succeed in his present attempt, she foresaw that unhappiness
 and cureless discontent would follow. Perhaps her own disappointment added
 a sting to her thoughts and words; she did not spare us, and our own
 reflections added to our disquietude.
 
 It was necessary to follow up our nomination, and to persuade Raymond to
 present himself to the electors on the following evening. For a long time
 he was obstinate. He would embark in a balloon; he would sail for a distant
 quarter of the world, where his name and humiliation were unknown. But this
 was useless; his attempt was registered; his purpose published to the
 world; his shame could never be erased from the memories of men. It was as
 well to fail at last after a struggle, as to fly now at the beginning of
 his enterprise.
 
 From the moment that he adopted this idea, he was changed. His depression
 and anxiety fled; he became all life and activity. The smile of triumph
 shone on his countenance; determined to pursue his object to the uttermost,
 his manner and expression seem ominous of the accomplishment of his wishes.
 Not so Perdita. She was frightened by his gaiety, for she dreaded a greater
 revulsion at the end. If his appearance even inspired us with hope, it only
 rendered the state of her mind more painful. She feared to lose sight of
 him; yet she dreaded to remark any change in the temper of his mind. She
 listened eagerly to him, yet tantalized herself by giving to his words a
 meaning foreign to their true interpretation, and adverse to her hopes. She
 dared not be present at the contest; yet she remained at home a prey to
 double solicitude. She wept over her little girl; she looked, she spoke, as
 if she dreaded the occurrence of some frightful calamity. She was half mad
 from the effects of uncontrollable agitation.
 
 Lord Raymond presented himself to the house with fearless confidence and
 insinuating address. After the Duke of----and Mr. Ryland had finished
 their speeches, he commenced. Assuredly he had not conned his lesson; and
 at first he hesitated, pausing in his ideas, and in the choice of his
 expressions. By degrees he warmed; his words flowed with ease, his language
 was full of vigour, and his voice of persuasion. He reverted to his past
 life, his successes in Greece, his favour at home. Why should he lose this,
 now that added years, prudence, and the pledge which his marriage gave to
 his country, ought to encrease, rather than diminish his claims to
 confidence? He spoke of the state of England; the necessary measures to be
 taken to ensure its security, and confirm its prosperity. He drew a glowing
 picture of its present situation. As he spoke, every sound was hushed,
 every thought suspended by intense attention. His graceful elocution
 enchained the senses of his hearers. In some degree also he was fitted to
 reconcile all parties. His birth pleased the aristocracy; his being the
 candidate recommended by Adrian, a man intimately allied to the popular
 party, caused a number, who had no great reliance either on the Duke or Mr.
 Ryland, to range on his side.
 
 The contest was keen and doubtful. Neither Adrian nor myself would have
 been so anxious, if our own success had depended on our exertions; but we
 had egged our friend on to the enterprise, and it became us to ensure his
 triumph. Idris, who entertained the highest opinion of his abilities, was
 warmly interested in the event: and my poor sister, who dared not hope, and
 to whom fear was misery, was plunged into a fever of disquietude.
 
 Day after day passed while we discussed our projects for the evening, and
 each night was occupied by debates which offered no conclusion. At last the
 crisis came: the night when parliament, which had so long delayed its
 choice, must decide: as the hour of twelve passed, and the new day began,
 it was by virtue of the constitution dissolved, its power extinct.
 
 We assembled at Raymond's house, we and our partizans. At half past five
 o'clock we proceeded to the House. Idris endeavoured to calm Perdita; but
 the poor girl's agitation deprived her of all power of self-command. She
 walked up and down the room,--gazed wildly when any one entered, fancying
 that they might be the announcers of her doom. I must do justice to my
 sweet sister: it was not for herself that she was thus agonized. She alone
 knew the weight which Raymond attached to his success. Even to us he
 assumed gaiety and hope, and assumed them so well, that we did not divine
 the secret workings of his mind. Sometimes a nervous trembling, a sharp
 dissonance of voice, and momentary fits of absence revealed to Perdita the
 violence he did himself; but we, intent on our plans, observed only his
 ready laugh, his joke intruded on all occasions, the flow of his spirits
 which seemed incapable of ebb. Besides, Perdita was with him in his
 retirement; she saw the moodiness that succeeded to this forced hilarity;
 she marked his disturbed sleep, his painful irritability--once she had
 seen his tears--hers had scarce ceased to flow, since she had beheld the
 big drops which disappointed pride had caused to gather in his eye, but
 which pride was unable to dispel. What wonder then, that her feelings were
 wrought to this pitch! I thus accounted to myself for her agitation; but
 this was not all, and the sequel revealed another excuse.
 
 One moment we seized before our departure, to take leave of our beloved
 girls. I had small hope of success, and entreated Idris to watch over my
 sister. As I approached the latter, she seized my hand, and drew me into
 another apartment; she threw herself into my arms, and wept and sobbed
 bitterly and long. I tried to soothe her; I bade her hope; I asked what
 tremendous consequences would ensue even on our failure. "My brother," she
 cried, "protector of my childhood, dear, most dear Lionel, my fate hangs by
 a thread. I have you all about me now--you, the companion of my infancy;
 Adrian, as dear to me as if bound by the ties of blood; Idris, the sister
 of my heart, and her lovely offspring. This, O this may be the last time
 that you will surround me thus!"
 
 Abruptly she stopped, and then cried: "What have I said?--foolish false
 girl that I am!" She looked wildly on me, and then suddenly calming
 herself, apologized for what she called her unmeaning words, saying that
 she must indeed be insane, for, while Raymond lived, she must be happy; and
 then, though she still wept, she suffered me tranquilly to depart. Raymond
 only took her hand when he went, and looked on her expressively; she
 answered by a look of intelligence and assent.
 
 Poor girl! what she then suffered! I could never entirely forgive Raymond
 for the trials he imposed on her, occasioned as they were by a selfish
 feeling on his part. He had schemed, if he failed in his present attempt,
 without taking leave of any of us, to embark for Greece, and never again to
 revisit England. Perdita acceded to his wishes; for his contentment was the
 chief object of her life, the crown of her enjoyment; but to leave us all,
 her companions, the beloved partners of her happiest years, and in the
 interim to conceal this frightful determination, was a task that almost
 conquered her strength of mind. She had been employed in arranging for
 their departure; she had promised Raymond during this decisive evening, to
 take advantage of our absence, to go one stage of the journey, and he,
 after his defeat was ascertained, would slip away from us, and join her.
 
 Although, when I was informed of this scheme, I was bitterly offended by
 the small attention which Raymond paid to my sister's feelings, I was led
 by reflection to consider, that he acted under the force of such strong
 excitement, as to take from him the consciousness, and, consequently, the
 guilt of a fault. If he had permitted us to witness his agitation, he would
 have been more under the guidance of reason; but his struggles for the shew
 of composure, acted with such violence on his nerves, as to destroy his
 power of self-command. I am convinced that, at the worst, he would have
 returned from the seashore to take leave of us, and to make us the partners
 of his council. But the task imposed on Perdita was not the less painful.
 He had extorted from her a vow of secrecy; and her part of the drama, since
 it was to be performed alone, was the most agonizing that could be devised.
 But to return to my narrative.
 
 The debates had hitherto been long and loud; they had often been protracted
 merely for the sake of delay. But now each seemed fearful lest the fatal
 moment should pass, while the choice was yet undecided. Unwonted silence
 reigned in the house, the members spoke in whispers, and the ordinary
 business was transacted with celerity and quietness. During the first stage
 of the election, the Duke of----had been thrown out; the question
 therefore lay between Lord Raymond and Mr. Ryland. The latter had felt
 secure of victory, until the appearance of Raymond; and, since his name had
 been inserted as a candidate, he had canvassed with eagerness. He had
 appeared each evening, impatience and anger marked in his looks, scowling
 on us from the opposite side of St. Stephen's, as if his mere frown would
 cast eclipse on our hopes.
 
 Every thing in the English constitution had been regulated for the better
 preservation of peace. On the last day, two candidates only were allowed to
 remain; and to obviate, if possible, the last struggle between these, a
 bribe was offered to him who should voluntarily resign his pretensions; a
 place of great emolument and honour was given him, and his success
 facilitated at a future election. Strange to say however, no instance had
 yet occurred, where either candidate had had recourse to this expedient; in
 consequence the law had become obsolete, nor had been referred to by any of
 us in our discussions. To our extreme surprise, when it was moved that we
 should resolve ourselves into a committee for the election of the Lord
 Protector, the member who had nominated Ryland, rose and informed us that
 this candidate had resigned his pretensions. His information was at first
 received with silence; a confused murmur succeeded; and, when the chairman
 declared Lord Raymond duly chosen, it amounted to a shout of applause and
 victory. It seemed as if, far from any dread of defeat even if Mr. Ryland
 had not resigned, every voice would have been united in favour of our
 candidate. In fact, now that the idea of contest was dismissed, all hearts
 returned to their former respect and admiration of our accomplished friend.
 Each felt, that England had never seen a Protector so capable of fulfilling
 the arduous duties of that high office. One voice made of many voices,
 resounded through the chamber; it syllabled the name of Raymond.
 
 He entered. I was on one of the highest seats, and saw him walk up the
 passage to the table of the speaker. The native modesty of his disposition
 conquered the joy of his triumph. He looked round timidly; a mist seemed
 before his eyes. Adrian, who was beside me, hastened to him, and jumping
 down the benches, was at his side in a moment. His appearance re-animated
 our friend; and, when he came to speak and act, his hesitation vanished,
 and he shone out supreme in majesty and victory. The former Protector
 tendered him the oaths, and presented him with the insignia of office,
 performing the ceremonies of installation. The house then dissolved. The
 chief members of the state crowded round the new magistrate, and conducted
 him to the palace of government. Adrian suddenly vanished; and, by the time
 that Raymond's supporters were reduced to our intimate friends merely,
 returned leading Idris to congratulate her friend on his success.
 
 But where was Perdita? In securing solicitously an unobserved retreat in
 case of failure, Raymond had forgotten to arrange the mode by which she was
 to hear of his success; and she had been too much agitated to revert to
 this circumstance. When Idris entered, so far had Raymond forgotten
 himself, that he asked for my sister; one word, which told of her
 mysterious disappearance, recalled him. Adrian it is true had already gone
 to seek the fugitive, imagining that her tameless anxiety had led her to
 the purlieus of the House, and that some sinister event detained her. But
 Raymond, without explaining himself, suddenly quitted us, and in another
 moment we heard him gallop down the street, in spite of the wind and rain
 that scattered tempest over the earth. We did not know how far he had to
 go, and soon separated, supposing that in a short time he would return to
 the palace with Perdita, and that they would not be sorry to find
 themselves alone.
 
 Perdita had arrived with her child at Dartford, weeping and inconsolable.
 She directed everything to be prepared for the continuance of their
 journey, and placing her lovely sleeping charge on a bed, passed several
 hours in acute suffering. Sometimes she observed the war of elements,
 thinking that they also declared against her, and listened to the pattering
 of the rain in gloomy despair. Sometimes she hung over her child, tracing
 her resemblance to the father, and fearful lest in after life she should
 display the same passions and uncontrollable impulses, that rendered him
 unhappy. Again, with a gush of pride and delight, she marked in the
 features of her little girl, the same smile of beauty that often irradiated
 Raymond's countenance. The sight of it soothed her. She thought of the
 treasure she possessed in the affections of her lord; of his
 accomplishments, surpassing those of his contemporaries, his genius, his
 devotion to her.--Soon she thought, that all she possessed in the world,
 except him, might well be spared, nay, given with delight, a propitiatory
 offering, to secure the supreme good she retained in him. Soon she
 imagined, that fate demanded this sacrifice from her, as a mark she was
 devoted to Raymond, and that it must be made with cheerfulness. She figured
 to herself their life in the Greek isle he had selected for their retreat;
 her task of soothing him; her cares for the beauteous Clara, her rides in
 his company, her dedication of herself to his consolation. The picture then
 presented itself to her in such glowing colours, that she feared the
 reverse, and a life of magnificence and power in London; where Raymond
 would no longer be hers only, nor she the sole source of happiness to him.
 So far as she merely was concerned, she began to hope for defeat; and it
 was only on his account that her feelings vacillated, as she heard him
 gallop into the court-yard of the inn. That he should come to her alone,
 wetted by the storm, careless of every thing except speed, what else could
 it mean, than that, vanquished and solitary, they were to take their way
 from native England, the scene of shame, and hide themselves in the myrtle
 groves of the Grecian isles?
 
 In a moment she was in his arms. The knowledge of his success had become so
 much a part of himself, that he forgot that it was necessary to impart it
 to his companion. She only felt in his embrace a dear assurance that while
 he possessed her, he would not despair. "This is kind," she cried; "this is
 noble, my own beloved! O fear not disgrace or lowly fortune, while you have
 your Perdita; fear not sorrow, while our child lives and smiles. Let us go
 even where you will; the love that accompanies us will prevent our
 regrets."
 
 Locked in his embrace, she spoke thus, and cast back her head, seeking an
 assent to her words in his eyes--they were sparkling with ineffable
 delight. "Why, my little Lady Protectress," said he, playfully, "what is
 this you say? And what pretty scheme have you woven of exile and obscurity,
 while a brighter web, a gold-enwoven tissue, is that which, in truth, you
 ought to contemplate?"
 
 He kissed her brow--but the wayward girl, half sorry at his triumph,
 agitated by swift change of thought, hid her face in his bosom and wept. He
 comforted her; he instilled into her his own hopes and desires; and soon
 her countenance beamed with sympathy. How very happy were they that night!
 How full even to bursting was their sense of joy!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 HAVING seen our friend properly installed in his new office, we turned our
 eyes towards Windsor. The nearness of this place to London was such, as to
 take away the idea of painful separation, when we quitted Raymond and
 Perdita. We took leave of them in the Protectoral Palace. It was pretty
 enough to see my sister enter as it were into the spirit of the drama, and
 endeavour to fill her station with becoming dignity. Her internal pride and
 humility of manner were now more than ever at war. Her timidity was not
 artificial, but arose from that fear of not being properly appreciated,
 that slight estimation of the neglect of the world, which also
 characterized Raymond. But then Perdita thought more constantly of others
 than he; and part of her bashfulness arose from a wish to take from those
 around her a sense of inferiority; a feeling which never crossed her mind.
 From the circumstances of her birth and education, Idris would have been
 better fitted for the formulae of ceremony; but the very ease which
 accompanied such actions with her, arising from habit, rendered them
 tedious; while, with every drawback, Perdita evidently enjoyed her
 situation. She was too full of new ideas to feel much pain when we
 departed; she took an affectionate leave of us, and promised to visit us
 soon; but she did not regret the circumstances that caused our separation.
 The spirits of Raymond were unbounded; he did not know what to do with his
 new got power; his head was full of plans; he had as yet decided on none--
 but he promised himself, his friends, and the world, that the aera of his
 Protectorship should be signalized by some act of surpassing glory. Thus, we
 talked of them, and moralized, as with diminished numbers we returned to
 Windsor Castle. We felt extreme delight at our escape from political
 turmoil, and sought our solitude with redoubled zest. We did not want for
 occupation; but my eager disposition was now turned to the field of
 intellectual exertion only; and hard study I found to be an excellent
 medicine to allay a fever of spirit with which in indolence, I should
 doubtless have been assailed. Perdita had permitted us to take Clara back
 with us to Windsor; and she and my two lovely infants were perpetual
 sources of interest and amusement.
 
 The only circumstance that disturbed our peace, was the health of Adrian.
 It evidently declined, without any symptom which could lead us to suspect
 his disease, unless indeed his brightened eyes, animated look, and
 flustering cheeks, made us dread consumption; but he was without pain or
 fear. He betook himself to books with ardour, and reposed from study in the
 society he best loved, that of his sister and myself. Sometimes he went up
 to London to visit Raymond, and watch the progress of events. Clara often
 accompanied him in these excursions; partly that she might see her parents,
 partly because Adrian delighted in the prattle, and intelligent looks of
 this lovely child.
 
 Meanwhile all went on well in London. The new elections were finished;
 parliament met, and Raymond was occupied in a thousand beneficial schemes.
 Canals, aqueducts, bridges, stately buildings, and various edifices for
 public utility, were entered upon; he was continually surrounded by
 projectors and projects, which were to render England one scene of
 fertility and magnificence; the state of poverty was to be abolished; men
 were to be transported from place to place almost with the same facility as
 the Princes Houssain, Ali, and Ahmed, in the Arabian Nights. The physical
 state of man would soon not yield to the beatitude of angels; disease was
 to be banished; labour lightened of its heaviest burden. Nor did this seem
 extravagant. The arts of life, and the discoveries of science had augmented
 in a ratio which left all calculation behind; food sprung up, so to say,
 spontaneously--machines existed to supply with facility every want of the
 population. An evil direction still survived; and men were not happy, not
 because they could not, but because they would not rouse themselves to
 vanquish self-raised obstacles. Raymond was to inspire them with his
 beneficial will, and the mechanism of society, once systematised according
 to faultless rules, would never again swerve into disorder. For these hopes
 he abandoned his long-cherished ambition of being enregistered in the
 annals of nations as a successful warrior; laying aside his sword, peace
 and its enduring glories became his aim--the title he coveted was that of
 the benefactor of his country.
 
 Among other works of art in which he was engaged, he had projected the
 erection of a national gallery for statues and pictures. He possessed many
 himself, which he designed to present to the Republic; and, as the edifice
 was to be the great ornament of his Protectorship, he was very fastidious
 in his choice of the plan on which it would be built. Hundreds were brought
 to him and rejected. He sent even to Italy and Greece for drawings; but, as
 the design was to be characterized by originality as well as by perfect
 beauty, his endeavours were for a time without avail. At length a drawing
 came, with an address where communications might be sent, and no artist's
 name affixed. The design was new and elegant, but faulty; so faulty, that
 although drawn with the hand and eye of taste, it was evidently the work of
 one who was not an architect. Raymond contemplated it with delight; the
 more he gazed, the more pleased he was; and yet the errors multiplied under
 inspection. He wrote to the address given, desiring to see the draughtsman,
 that such alterations might be made, as should be suggested in a
 consultation between him and the original conceiver.
 
 A Greek came. A middle-aged man, with some intelligence of manner, but with
 so common-place a physiognomy, that Raymond could scarcely believe that he
 was the designer. He acknowledged that he was not an architect; but the
 idea of the building had struck him, though he had sent it without the
 smallest hope of its being accepted. He was a man of few words. Raymond
 questioned him; but his reserved answers soon made him turn from the man to
 the drawing. He pointed out the errors, and the alterations that he wished
 to be made; he offered the Greek a pencil that he might correct the sketch
 on the spot; this was refused by his visitor, who said that he perfectly
 understood, and would work at it at home. At length Raymond suffered him to
 depart.
 
 The next day he returned. The design had been re-drawn; but many defects
 still remained, and several of the instructions given had been
 misunderstood. "Come," said Raymond, "I yielded to you yesterday, now
 comply with my request--take the pencil."
 
 The Greek took it, but he handled it in no artist-like way; at length he
 said: "I must confess to you, my Lord, that I did not make this drawing. It
 is impossible for you to see the real designer; your instructions must pass
 through me. Condescend therefore to have patience with my ignorance, and to
 explain your wishes to me; in time I am certain that you will be
 satisfied."
 
 Raymond questioned vainly; the mysterious Greek would say no more. Would an
 architect be permitted to see the artist? This also was refused. Raymond
 repeated his instructions, and the visitor retired. Our friend resolved
 however not to be foiled in his wish. He suspected, that unaccustomed
 poverty was the cause of the mystery, and that the artist was unwilling to
 be seen in the garb and abode of want. Raymond was only the more excited by
 this consideration to discover him; impelled by the interest he took in
 obscure talent, he therefore ordered a person skilled in such matters, to
 follow the Greek the next time he came, and observe the house in which he
 should enter. His emissary obeyed, and brought the desired intelligence. He
 had traced the man to one of the most penurious streets in the metropolis.
 Raymond did not wonder, that, thus situated, the artist had shrunk from
 notice, but he did not for this alter his resolve.
 
 On the same evening, he went alone to the house named to him. Poverty,
 dirt, and squalid misery characterized its appearance. Alas! thought
 Raymond, I have much to do before England becomes a Paradise. He knocked;
 the door was opened by a string from above--the broken, wretched
 staircase was immediately before him, but no person appeared; he knocked
 again, vainly--and then, impatient of further delay, he ascended the
 dark, creaking stairs. His main wish, more particularly now that he
 witnessed the abject dwelling of the artist, was to relieve one, possessed
 of talent, but depressed by want. He pictured to himself a youth, whose
 eyes sparkled with genius, whose person was attenuated by famine. He half
 feared to displease him; but he trusted that his generous kindness would be
 administered so delicately, as not to excite repulse. What human heart is
 shut to kindness? and though poverty, in its excess, might render the
 sufferer unapt to submit to the supposed degradation of a benefit, the zeal
 of the benefactor must at last relax him into thankfulness. These thoughts
 encouraged Raymond, as he stood at the door of the highest room of the
 house. After trying vainly to enter the other apartments, he perceived just
 within the threshold of this one, a pair of small Turkish slippers; the
 door was ajar, but all was silent within. It was probable that the inmate
 was absent, but secure that he had found the right person, our adventurous
 Protector was tempted to enter, to leave a purse on the table, and silently
 depart. In pursuance of this idea, he pushed open the door gently--but
 the room was inhabited.
 
 Raymond had never visited the dwellings of want, and the scene that now
 presented itself struck him to the heart. The floor was sunk in many
 places; the walls ragged and bare--the ceiling weather-stained--a
 tattered bed stood in the corner; there were but two chairs in the room,
 and a rough broken table, on which was a light in a tin candlestick;--yet
 in the midst of such drear and heart sickening poverty, there was an air of
 order and cleanliness that surprised him. The thought was fleeting; for his
 attention was instantly drawn towards the inhabitant of this wretched
 abode. It was a female. She sat at the table; one small hand shaded her
 eyes from the candle; the other held a pencil; her looks were fixed on a
 drawing before her, which Raymond recognized as the design presented to
 him. Her whole appearance awakened his deepest interest. Her dark hair was
 braided and twined in thick knots like the head-dress of a Grecian statue;
 her garb was mean, but her attitude might have been selected as a model of
 grace. Raymond had a confused remembrance that he had seen such a form
 before; he walked across the room; she did not raise her eyes, merely
 asking in Romaic, who is there? "A friend," replied Raymond in the same
 dialect. She looked up wondering, and he saw that it was Evadne Zaimi.
 Evadne, once the idol of Adrian's affections; and who, for the sake of her
 present visitor, had disdained the noble youth, and then, neglected by him
 she loved, with crushed hopes and a stinging sense of misery, had returned
 to her native Greece. What revolution of fortune could have brought her to
 England, and housed her thus?
 
 Raymond recognized her; and his manner changed from polite beneficence to
 the warmest protestations of kindness and sympathy. The sight of her, in
 her present situation, passed like an arrow into his soul. He sat by her,
 he took her hand, and said a thousand things which breathed the deepest
 spirit of compassion and affection. Evadne did not answer; her large dark
 eyes were cast down, at length a tear glimmered on the lashes. "Thus," she
 cried, "kindness can do, what no want, no misery ever effected; I weep."
 She shed indeed many tears; her head sunk unconsciously on the shoulder of
 Raymond; he held her hand: he kissed her sunken tear-stained cheek. He told
 her, that her sufferings were now over: no one possessed the art of
 consoling like Raymond; he did not reason or declaim, but his look shone
 with sympathy; he brought pleasant images before the sufferer; his caresses
 excited no distrust, for they arose purely from the feeling which leads a
 mother to kiss her wounded child; a desire to demonstrate in every possible
 way the truth of his feelings, and the keenness of his wish to pour balm
 into the lacerated mind of the unfortunate. As Evadne regained her
 composure, his manner became even gay; he sported with the idea of her
 poverty. Something told him that it was not its real evils that lay heavily
 at her heart, but the debasement and disgrace attendant on it; as he
 talked, he divested it of these; sometimes speaking of her fortitude with
 energetic praise; then, alluding to her past state, he called her his
 Princess in disguise. He made her warm offers of service; she was too much
 occupied by more engrossing thoughts, either to accept or reject them; at
 length he left her, making a promise to repeat his visit the next day. He
 returned home, full of mingled feelings, of pain excited by Evadne's
 wretchedness, and pleasure at the prospect of relieving it. Some motive for
 which he did not account, even to himself, prevented him from relating his
 adventure to Perdita.
 
 The next day he threw such disguise over his person as a cloak afforded,
 and revisited Evadne. As he went, he bought a basket of costly fruits, such
 as were natives of her own country, and throwing over these various
 beautiful flowers, bore it himself to the miserable garret of his friend.
 "Behold," cried he, as he entered, "what bird's food I have brought for my
 sparrow on the house-top."
 
 Evadne now related the tale of her misfortunes. Her father, though of high
 rank, had in the end dissipated his fortune, and even destroyed his
 reputation and influence through a course of dissolute indulgence. His
 health was impaired beyond hope of cure; and it became his earnest wish,
 before he died, to preserve his daughter from the poverty which would be
 the portion of her orphan state. He therefore accepted for her, and
 persuaded her to accede to, a proposal of marriage, from a wealthy Greek
 merchant settled at Constantinople. She quitted her native Greece; her
 father died; by degrees she was cut off from all the companions and ties of
 her youth.
 
 The war, which about a year before the present time had broken out between
 Greece and Turkey, brought about many reverses of fortune. Her husband
 became bankrupt, and then in a tumult and threatened massacre on the part
 of the Turks, they were obliged to fly at midnight, and reached in an open
 boat an English vessel under sail, which brought them immediately to this
 island. The few jewels they had saved, supported them awhile. The whole
 strength of Evadne's mind was exerted to support the failing spirits of her
 husband. Loss of property, hopelessness as to his future prospects, the
 inoccupation to which poverty condemned him, combined to reduce him to a
 state bordering on insanity. Five months after their arrival in England, he
 committed suicide.
 
 "You will ask me," continued Evadne, "what I have done since; why I have
 not applied for succour to the rich Greeks resident here; why I have not
 returned to my native country? My answer to these questions must needs
 appear to you unsatisfactory, yet they have sufficed to lead me on, day
 after day, enduring every wretchedness, rather than by such means to seek
 relief. Shall the daughter of the noble, though prodigal Zaimi, appear a
 beggar before her compeers or inferiors--superiors she had none. Shall I
 bow my head before them, and with servile gesture sell my nobility for
 life? Had I a child, or any tie to bind me to existence, I might descend to
 this--but, as it is--the world has been to me a harsh step-mother; fain
 would I leave the abode she seems to grudge, and in the grave forget my
 pride, my struggles, my despair. The time will soon come; grief and famine
 have already sapped the foundations of my being; a very short time, and I
 shall have passed away; unstained by the crime of self-destruction, unstung
 by the memory of degradation, my spirit will throw aside the miserable
 coil, and find such recompense as fortitude and resignation may deserve.
 This may seem madness to you, yet you also have pride and resolution; do
 not then wonder that my pride is tameless, my resolution unalterable."
 
 Having thus finished her tale, and given such an account as she deemed fit,
 of the motives of her abstaining from all endeavour to obtain aid from her
 countrymen, Evadne paused; yet she seemed to have more to say, to which she
 was unable to give words. In the mean time Raymond was eloquent. His desire
 of restoring his lovely friend to her rank in society, and to her lost
 prosperity, animated him, and he poured forth with energy, all his wishes
 and intentions on that subject. But he was checked; Evadne exacted a
 promise, that he should conceal from all her friends her existence in
 England. "The relatives of the Earl of Windsor," said she haughtily,
 "doubtless think that I injured him; perhaps the Earl himself would be the
 first to acquit me, but probably I do not deserve acquittal. I acted then,
 as I ever must, from impulse. This abode of penury may at least prove the
 disinterestedness of my conduct. No matter: I do not wish to plead my cause
 before any of them, not even before your Lordship, had you not first
 discovered me. The tenor of my actions will prove that I had rather die,
 than be a mark for scorn--behold the proud Evadne in her tatters! look on
 the beggar-princess! There is aspic venom in the thought--promise me that
 my secret shall not be violated by you."
 
 Raymond promised; but then a new discussion ensued. Evadne required another
 engagement on his part, that he would not without her concurrence enter
 into any project for her benefit, nor himself offer relief. "Do not degrade
 me in my own eyes," she said; "poverty has long been my nurse; hard-visaged
 she is, but honest. If dishonour, or what I conceive to be dishonour, come
 near me, I am lost." Raymond adduced many arguments and fervent persuasions
 to overcome her feeling, but she remained unconvinced; and, agitated by the
 discussion, she wildly and passionately made a solemn vow, to fly and hide
 herself where he never could discover her, where famine would soon bring
 death to conclude her woes, if he persisted in his to her disgracing
 offers. She could support herself, she said. And then she shewed him how,
 by executing various designs and paintings, she earned a pittance for her
 support. Raymond yielded for the present. He felt assured, after he had for
 awhile humoured her self-will, that in the end friendship and reason would
 gain the day.
 
 But the feelings that actuated Evadne were rooted in the depths of her
 being, and were such in their growth as he had no means of understanding.
 Evadne loved Raymond. He was the hero of her imagination, the image carved
 by love in the unchanged texture of her heart. Seven years ago, in her
 youthful prime, she had become attached to him; he had served her country
 against the Turks; he had in her own land acquired that military glory
 peculiarly dear to the Greeks, since they were still obliged inch by inch
 to fight for their security. Yet when he returned thence, and first
 appeared in public life in England, her love did not purchase his, which
 then vacillated between Perdita and a crown. While he was yet undecided,
 she had quitted England; the news of his marriage reached her, and her
 hopes, poorly nurtured blossoms, withered and fell. The glory of life was
 gone for her; the roseate halo of love, which had imbued every object with
 its own colour, faded;--she was content to take life as it was, and to
 make the best of leaden-coloured reality. She married; and, carrying her
 restless energy of character with her into new scenes, she turned her
 thoughts to ambition, and aimed at the title and power of Princess of
 Wallachia; while her patriotic feelings were soothed by the idea of the
 good she might do her country, when her husband should be chief of this
 principality. She lived to find ambition, as unreal a delusion as love. Her
 intrigues with Russia for the furtherance of her object, excited the
 jealousy of the Porte, and the animosity of the Greek government. She was
 considered a traitor by both, the ruin of her husband followed; they
 avoided death by a timely flight, and she fell from the height of her
 desires to penury in England. Much of this tale she concealed from Raymond;
 nor did she confess, that repulse and denial, as to a criminal convicted of
 the worst of crimes, that of bringing the scythe of foreign despotism to
 cut away the new springing liberties of her country, would have followed
 her application to any among the Greeks.
 
 She knew that she was the cause of her husband's utter ruin; and she strung
 herself to bear the consequences. The reproaches which agony extorted; or
 worse, cureless, uncomplaining depression, when his mind was sunk in a
 torpor, not the less painful because it was silent and moveless. She
 reproached herself with the crime of his death; guilt and its punishments
 appeared to surround her; in vain she endeavoured to allay remorse by the
 memory of her real integrity; the rest of the world, and she among them,
 judged of her actions, by their consequences. She prayed for her husband's
 soul; she conjured the Supreme to place on her head the crime of his
 self-destruction--she vowed to live to expiate his fault.
 
 In the midst of such wretchedness as must soon have destroyed her, one
 thought only was matter of consolation. She lived in the same country,
 breathed the same air as Raymond. His name as Protector was the burthen of
 every tongue; his achievements, projects, and magnificence, the argument of
 every story. Nothing is so precious to a woman's heart as the glory and
 excellence of him she loves; thus in every horror Evadne revelled in his
 fame and prosperity. While her husband lived, this feeling was regarded by
 her as a crime, repressed, repented of. When he died, the tide of love
 resumed its ancient flow, it deluged her soul with its tumultuous waves,
 and she gave herself up a prey to its uncontrollable power.
 
 But never, O, never, should he see her in her degraded state. Never should
 he behold her fallen, as she deemed, from her pride of beauty, the
 poverty-stricken inhabitant of a garret, with a name which had become a
 reproach, and a weight of guilt on her soul. But though impenetrably veiled
 from him, his public office permitted her to become acquainted with all his
 actions, his daily course of life, even his conversation. She allowed
 herself one luxury, she saw the newspapers every day, and feasted on the
 praise and actions of the Protector. Not that this indulgence was devoid of
 accompanying grief. Perdita's name was for ever joined with his; their
 conjugal felicity was celebrated even by the authentic testimony of facts.
 They were continually together, nor could the unfortunate Evadne read the
 monosyllable that designated his name, without, at the same time, being
 presented with the image of her who was the faithful companion of all his
 labours and pleasures. They, their Excellencies, met her eyes in each line,
 mingling an evil potion that poisoned her very blood.
 
 It was in the newspaper that she saw the advertisement for the design for a
 national gallery. Combining with taste her remembrance of the edifices
 which she had seen in the east, and by an effort of genius enduing them
 with unity of design, she executed the plan which had been sent to the
 Protector. She triumphed in the idea of bestowing, unknown and forgotten as
 she was, a benefit upon him she loved; and with enthusiastic pride looked
 forward to the accomplishment of a work of hers, which, immortalized in
 stone, would go down to posterity stamped with the name of Raymond. She
 awaited with eagerness the return of her messenger from the palace; she
 listened insatiate to his account of each word, each look of the Protector;
 she felt bliss in this communication with her beloved, although he knew not
 to whom he addressed his instructions. The drawing itself became ineffably
 dear to her. He had seen it, and praised it; it was again retouched by her,
 each stroke of her pencil was as a chord of thrilling music, and bore to
 her the idea of a temple raised to celebrate the deepest and most
 unutterable emotions of her soul. These contemplations engaged her, when
 the voice of Raymond first struck her ear, a voice, once heard, never to be
 forgotten; she mastered her gush of feelings, and welcomed him with quiet
 gentleness.
 
 Pride and tenderness now struggled, and at length made a compromise
 together. She would see Raymond, since destiny had led him to her, and her
 constancy and devotion must merit his friendship. But her rights with
 regard to him, and her cherished independence, should not be injured by the
 idea of interest, or the intervention of the complicated feelings attendant
 on pecuniary obligation, and the relative situations of the benefactor, and
 benefited. Her mind was of uncommon strength; she could subdue her sensible
 wants to her mental wishes, and suffer cold, hunger and misery, rather than
 concede to fortune a contested point. Alas! that in human nature such a
 pitch of mental discipline, and disdainful negligence of nature itself,
 should not have been allied to the extreme of moral excellence! But the
 resolution that permitted her to resist the pains of privation, sprung from
 the too great energy of her passions; and the concentrated self-will of
 which this was a sign, was destined to destroy even the very idol, to
 preserve whose respect she submitted to this detail of wretchedness.
 
 Their intercourse continued. By degrees Evadne related to her friend the
 whole of her story, the stain her name had received in Greece, the weight
 of sin which had accrued to her from the death of her husband. When Raymond
 offered to clear her reputation, and demonstrate to the world her real
 patriotism, she declared that it was only through her present sufferings
 that she hoped for any relief to the stings of conscience; that, in her
 state of mind, diseased as he might think it, the necessity of occupation
 was salutary medicine; she ended by extorting a promise that for the space
 of one month he would refrain from the discussion of her interests,
 engaging after that time to yield in part to his wishes. She could not
 disguise to herself that any change would separate her from him; now she
 saw him each day. His connection with Adrian and Perdita was never
 mentioned; he was to her a meteor, a companionless star, which at its
 appointed hour rose in her hemisphere, whose appearance brought felicity,
 and which, although it set, was never eclipsed. He came each day to her
 abode of penury, and his presence transformed it to a temple redolent with
 sweets, radiant with heaven's own light; he partook of her delirium. "They
 built a wall between them and the world"--Without, a thousand harpies
 raved, remorse and misery, expecting the destined moment for their
 invasion. Within, was the peace as of innocence, reckless blindless,
 deluding joy, hope, whose still anchor rested on placid but unconstant
 water.
 
 Thus, while Raymond had been wrapt in visions of power and fame, while he
 looked forward to entire dominion over the elements and the mind of man,
 the territory of his own heart escaped his notice; and from that unthought
 of source arose the mighty torrent that overwhelmed his will, and carried
 to the oblivious sea, fame, hope, and happiness.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 IN the mean time what did Perdita?
 
 During the first months of his Protectorate, Raymond and she had been
 inseparable; each project was discussed with her, each plan approved by
 her. I never beheld any one so perfectly happy as my sweet sister. Her
 expressive eyes were two stars whose beams were love; hope and
 light-heartedness sat on her cloudless brow. She fed even to tears of joy
 on the praise and glory of her Lord; her whole existence was one sacrifice
 to him, and if in the humility of her heart she felt self-complacency, it
 arose from the reflection that she had won the distinguished hero of the
 age, and had for years preserved him, even after time had taken from love
 its usual nourishment. Her own feeling was as entire as at its birth. Five
 years had failed to destroy the dazzling unreality of passion. Most men
 ruthlessly destroy the sacred veil, with which the female heart is wont to
 adorn the idol of its affections. Not so Raymond; he was an enchanter,
 whose reign was for ever undiminished; a king whose power never was
 suspended: follow him through the details of common life, still the same
 charm of grace and majesty adorned him; nor could he be despoiled of the
 innate deification with which nature had invested him. Perdita grew in
 beauty and excellence under his eye; I no longer recognised my reserved
 abstracted sister in the fascinating and open-hearted wife of Raymond. The
 genius that enlightened her countenance, was now united to an expression of
 benevolence, which gave divine perfection to her beauty.
 
 Happiness is in its highest degree the sister of goodness. Suffering and
 amiability may exist together, and writers have loved to depict their
 conjunction; there is a human and touching harmony in the picture. But
 perfect happiness is an attribute of angels; and those who possess it,
 appear angelic. Fear has been said to be the parent of religion: even of
 that religion is it the generator, which leads its votaries to sacrifice
 human victims at its altars; but the religion which springs from happiness
 is a lovelier growth; the religion which makes the heart breathe forth
 fervent thanksgiving, and causes us to pour out the overflowings of the
 soul before the author of our being; that which is the parent of the
 imagination and the nurse of poetry; that which bestows benevolent
 intelligence on the visible mechanism of the world, and makes earth a
 temple with heaven for its cope. Such happiness, goodness, and religion
 inhabited the mind of Perdita.
 
 During the five years we had spent together, a knot of happy human beings
 at Windsor Castle, her blissful lot had been the frequent theme of my
 sister's conversation. From early habit, and natural affection, she
 selected me in preference to Adrian or Idris, to be the partner in her
 overflowings of delight; perhaps, though apparently much unlike, some
 secret point of resemblance, the offspring of consanguinity, induced this
 preference. Often at sunset, I have walked with her, in the sober,
 enshadowed forest paths, and listened with joyful sympathy. Security gave
 dignity to her passion; the certainty of a full return, left her with no
 wish unfulfilled. The birth of her daughter, embryo copy of her Raymond,
 filled up the measure of her content, and produced a sacred and
 indissoluble tie between them. Sometimes she felt proud that he had
 preferred her to the hopes of a crown. Sometimes she remembered that she
 had suffered keen anguish, when he hesitated in his choice. But this memory
 of past discontent only served to enhance her present joy. What had been
 hardly won, was now, entirely possessed, doubly dear. She would look at him
 at a distance with the same rapture, (O, far more exuberant rapture!) that
 one might feel, who after the perils of a tempest, should find himself in
 the desired port; she would hasten towards him, to feel more certain in his
 arms, the reality of her bliss. This warmth of affection, added to the
 depth of her understanding, and the brilliancy of her imagination, made her
 beyond words dear to Raymond.
 
 If a feeling of dissatisfaction ever crossed her, it arose from the idea
 that he was not perfectly happy. Desire of renown, and presumptuous
 ambition, had characterized his youth. The one he had acquired in Greece;
 the other he had sacrificed to love. His intellect found sufficient field
 for exercise in his domestic circle, whose members, all adorned by
 refinement and literature, were many of them, like himself, distinguished
 by genius. Yet active life was the genuine soil for his virtues; and he
 sometimes suffered tedium from the monotonous succession of events in our
 retirement. Pride made him recoil from complaint; and gratitude and
 affection to Perdita, generally acted as an opiate to all desire, save that
 of meriting her love. We all observed the visitation of these feelings, and
 none regretted them so much as Perdita. Her life consecrated to him, was a
 slight sacrifice to reward his choice, but was not that sufficient--Did
 he need any gratification that she was unable to bestow? This was the only
 cloud in the azure of her happiness.
 
 His passage to power had been full of pain to both. He however attained his
 wish; he filled the situation for which nature seemed to have moulded him.
 His activity was fed in wholesome measure, without either exhaustion or
 satiety; his taste and genius found worthy expression in each of the modes
 human beings have invented to encage and manifest the spirit of beauty; the
 goodness of his heart made him never weary of conducing to the well-being
 of his fellow-creatures; his magnificent spirit, and aspirations for the
 respect and love of mankind, now received fruition; true, his exaltation
 was temporary; perhaps it were better that it should be so. Habit would not
 dull his sense of the enjoyment of power; nor struggles, disappointment and
 defeat await the end of that which would expire at its maturity. He
 determined to extract and condense all of glory, power, and achievement,
 which might have resulted from a long reign, into the three years of his
 Protectorate.
 
 Raymond was eminently social. All that he now enjoyed would have been
 devoid of pleasure to him, had it been unparticipated. But in Perdita he
 possessed all that his heart could desire. Her love gave birth to sympathy;
 her intelligence made her understand him at a word; her powers of intellect
 enabled her to assist and guide him. He felt her worth. During the early
 years of their union, the inequality of her temper, and yet unsubdued
 self-will which tarnished her character, had been a slight drawback to the
 fulness of his sentiment. Now that unchanged serenity, and gentle
 compliance were added to her other qualifications, his respect equalled his
 love. Years added to the strictness of their union. They did not now guess
 at, and totter on the pathway, divining the mode to please, hoping, yet
 fearing the continuance of bliss. Five years gave a sober certainty to
 their emotions, though it did not rob them of their etherial nature. It had
 given them a child; but it had not detracted from the personal attractions
 of my sister. Timidity, which in her had almost amounted to awkwardness,
 was exchanged for a graceful decision of manner; frankness, instead of
 reserve, characterized her physiognomy; and her voice was attuned to
 thrilling softness. She was now three and twenty, in the pride of
 womanhood, fulfilling the precious duties of wife and mother, possessed of
 all her heart had ever coveted. Raymond was ten years older; to his
 previous beauty, noble mien, and commanding aspect, he now added gentlest
 benevolence, winning tenderness, graceful and unwearied attention to the
 wishes of another.
 
 The first secret that had existed between them was the visits of Raymond to
 Evadne. He had been struck by the fortitude and beauty of the ill-fated
 Greek; and, when her constant tenderness towards him unfolded itself, he
 asked with astonishment, by what act of his he had merited this passionate
 and unrequited love. She was for a while the sole object of his reveries;
 and Perdita became aware that his thoughts and time were bestowed on a
 subject unparticipated by her. My sister was by nature destitute of the
 common feelings of anxious, petulant jealousy. The treasure which she
 possessed in the affections of Raymond, was more necessary to her being,
 than the life-blood that animated her veins--more truly than Othello she
 might say,
 
   To be once in doubt,
   Is--once to be resolved.
 
 On the present occasion she did not suspect any alienation of affection; but
 she conjectured that some circumstance connected with his high place, had
 occasioned this mystery. She was startled and pained. She began to count
 the long days, and months, and years which must elapse, before he would be
 restored to a private station, and unreservedly to her. She was not content
 that, even for a time, he should practice concealment with her. She often
 repined; but her trust in the singleness of his affection was undisturbed;
 and, when they were together, unchecked by fear, she opened her heart to
 the fullest delight.
 
 Time went on. Raymond, stopping mid-way in his wild career, paused suddenly
 to think of consequences. Two results presented themselves in the view he
 took of the future. That his intercourse with Evadne should continue a
 secret to, or that finally it should be discovered by Perdita. The
 destitute condition, and highly wrought feelings of his friend prevented
 him from adverting to the possibility of exiling himself from her. In the
 first event he had bidden an eternal farewell to open-hearted converse, and
 entire sympathy with the companion of his life. The veil must be thicker
 than that invented by Turkish jealousy; the wall higher than the
 unscaleable tower of Vathek, which should conceal from her the workings of
 his heart, and hide from her view the secret of his actions. This idea was
 intolerably painful to him. Frankness and social feelings were the essence
 of Raymond's nature; without them his qualities became common-place;
 without these to spread glory over his intercourse with Perdita, his
 vaunted exchange of a throne for her love, was as weak and empty as the
 rainbow hues which vanish when the sun is down. But there was no remedy.
 Genius, devotion, and courage; the adornments of his mind, and the energies
 of his soul, all exerted to their uttermost stretch, could not roll back
 one hair's breadth the wheel of time's chariot; that which had been was
 written with the adamantine pen of reality, on the everlasting volume of
 the past; nor could agony and tears suffice to wash out one iota from the
 act fulfilled.
 
 But this was the best side of the question. What, if circumstance should
 lead Perdita to suspect, and suspecting to be resolved? The fibres of his
 frame became relaxed, and cold dew stood on his forehead, at this idea.
 Many men may scoff at his dread; but he read the future; and the peace of
 Perdita was too dear to him, her speechless agony too certain, and too
 fearful, not to unman him. His course was speedily decided upon. If the
 worst befell; if she learnt the truth, he would neither stand her
 reproaches, or the anguish of her altered looks. He would forsake her,
 England, his friends, the scenes of his youth, the hopes of coming time, he
 would seek another country, and in other scenes begin life again. Having
 resolved on this, he became calmer. He endeavoured to guide with prudence
 the steeds of destiny through the devious road which he had chosen, and
 bent all his efforts the better to conceal what he could not alter.
 
 The perfect confidence that subsisted between Perdita and him, rendered
 every communication common between them. They opened each other's letters,
 even as, until now, the inmost fold of the heart of each was disclosed to
 the other. A letter came unawares, Perdita read it. Had it contained
 confirmation, she must have been annihilated. As it was, trembling, cold,
 and pale, she sought Raymond. He was alone, examining some petitions lately
 presented. She entered silently, sat on a sofa opposite to him, and gazed
 on him with a look of such despair, that wildest shrieks and dire moans
 would have been tame exhibitions of misery, compared to the living
 incarnation of the thing itself exhibited by her.
 
 At first he did not take his eyes from the papers; when he raised them, he
 was struck by the wretchedness manifest on her altered cheek; for a moment
 he forgot his own acts and fears, and asked with consternation--"Dearest
 girl, what is the matter; what has happened?"
 
 "Nothing," she replied at first; "and yet not so," she continued, hurrying
 on in her speech; "you have secrets, Raymond; where have you been lately,
 whom have you seen, what do you conceal from me?--why am I banished from
 your confidence? Yet this is not it--I do not intend to entrap you with
 questions--one will suffice--am I completely a wretch?"
 
 With trembling hand she gave him the paper, and sat white and motionless
 looking at him while he read it. He recognised the hand-writing of Evadne,
 and the colour mounted in his cheeks. With lightning-speed he conceived the
 contents of the letter; all was now cast on one die; falsehood and artifice
 were trifles in comparison with the impending ruin. He would either
 entirely dispel Perdita's suspicions, or quit her for ever. "My dear girl,"
 he said, "I have been to blame; but you must pardon me. I was in the wrong
 to commence a system of concealment; but I did it for the sake of sparing
 you pain; and each day has rendered it more difficult for me to alter my
 plan. Besides, I was instigated by delicacy towards the unhappy writer of
 these few lines."
 
 Perdita gasped: "Well," she cried, "well, go on!"
 
 "That is all--this paper tells all. I am placed in the most difficult
 circumstances. I have done my best, though perhaps I have done wrong. My
 love for you is inviolate."
 
 Perdita shook her head doubtingly: "It cannot be," she cried, "I know that
 it is not. You would deceive me, but I will not be deceived. I have lost
 you, myself, my life!"
 
 "Do you not believe me?" said Raymond haughtily.
 
 "To believe you," she exclaimed, "I would give up all, and expire with joy,
 so that in death I could feel that you were true--but that cannot be!"
 
 "Perdita," continued Raymond, "you do not see the precipice on which you
 stand. You may believe that I did not enter on my present line of conduct
 without reluctance and pain. I knew that it was possible that your
 suspicions might be excited; but I trusted that my simple word would cause
 them to disappear. I built my hope on your confidence. Do you think that I
 will be questioned, and my replies disdainfully set aside? Do you think
 that I will be suspected, perhaps watched, cross-questioned, and
 disbelieved? I am not yet fallen so low; my honour is not yet so tarnished.
 You have loved me; I adored you. But all human sentiments come to an end.
 Let our affection expire--but let it not be exchanged for distrust and
 recrimination. Heretofore we have been friends--lovers--let us not
 become enemies, mutual spies. I cannot live the object of suspicion--you
 cannot believe me--let us part!"
 
 "Exactly so," cried Perdita, "I knew that it would come to this! Are we not
 already parted? Does not a stream, boundless as ocean, deep as vacuum, yawn
 between us?"
 
 Raymond rose, his voice was broken, his features convulsed, his manner calm
 as the earthquake-cradling atmosphere, he replied: "I am rejoiced that you
 take my decision so philosophically. Doubtless you will play the part of
 the injured wife to admiration. Sometimes you may be stung with the feeling
 that you have wronged me, but the condolence of your relatives, the pity of
 the world, the complacency which the consciousness of your own immaculate
 innocence will bestow, will be excellent balm;--me you will never see
 more!"
 
 Raymond moved towards the door. He forgot that each word he spoke was
 false. He personated his assumption of innocence even to self-deception.
 Have not actors wept, as they pourtrayed imagined passion? A more intense
 feeling of the reality of fiction possessed Raymond. He spoke with pride;
 he felt injured. Perdita looked up; she saw his angry glance; his hand was
 on the lock of the door. She started up, she threw herself on his neck, she
 gasped and sobbed; he took her hand, and leading her to the sofa, sat down
 near her. Her head fell on his shoulder, she trembled, alternate changes of
 fire and ice ran through her limbs: observing her emotion he spoke with
 softened accents:
 
 "The blow is given. I will not part from you in anger;--I owe you too
 much. I owe you six years of unalloyed happiness. But they are passed. I
 will not live the mark of suspicion, the object of jealousy. I love you too
 well. In an eternal separation only can either of us hope for dignity and
 propriety of action. We shall not then be degraded from our true
 characters. Faith and devotion have hitherto been the essence of our
 intercourse;--these lost, let us not cling to the seedless husk of life,
 the unkernelled shell. You have your child, your brother, Idris, Adrian"--
 
 "And you," cried Perdita, "the writer of that letter."
 
 Uncontrollable indignation flashed from the eyes of Raymond. He knew that
 this accusation at least was false. "Entertain this belief," he cried, "hug
 it to your heart--make it a pillow to your head, an opiate for your eyes
 --I am content. But, by the God that made me, hell is not more false than
 the word you have spoken!"
 
 Perdita was struck by the impassioned seriousness of his asseverations. She
 replied with earnestness, "I do not refuse to believe you, Raymond; on the
 contrary I promise to put implicit faith in your simple word. Only assure
 me that your love and faith towards me have never been violated; and
 suspicion, and doubt, and jealousy will at once be dispersed. We shall
 continue as we have ever done, one heart, one hope, one life."
 
 "I have already assured you of my fidelity," said Raymond with disdainful
 coldness, "triple assertions will avail nothing where one is despised. I
 will say no more; for I can add nothing to what I have already said, to
 what you before contemptuously set aside. This contention is unworthy of
 both of us; and I confess that I am weary of replying to charges at once
 unfounded and unkind."
 
 Perdita tried to read his countenance, which he angrily averted. There was
 so much of truth and nature in his resentment, that her doubts were
 dispelled. Her countenance, which for years had not expressed a feeling
 unallied to affection, became again radiant and satisfied. She found it
 however no easy task to soften and reconcile Raymond. At first he refused
 to stay to hear her. But she would not be put off; secure of his unaltered
 love, she was willing to undertake any labour, use any entreaty, to dispel
 his anger. She obtained an hearing, he sat in haughty silence, but he
 listened. She first assured him of her boundless confidence; of this he
 must be conscious, since but for that she would not seek to detain him. She
 enumerated their years of happiness; she brought before him past scenes of
 intimacy and happiness; she pictured their future life, she mentioned their
 child--tears unbidden now filled her eyes. She tried to disperse them,
 but they refused to be checked--her utterance was choaked. She had not
 wept before. Raymond could not resist these signs of distress: he felt
 perhaps somewhat ashamed of the part he acted of the injured man, he who
 was in truth the injurer. And then he devoutly loved Perdita; the bend of
 her head, her glossy ringlets, the turn of her form were to him subjects of
 deep tenderness and admiration; as she spoke, her melodious tones entered
 his soul; he soon softened towards her, comforting and caressing her, and
 endeavouring to cheat himself into the belief that he had never wronged
 her.
 
 Raymond staggered forth from this scene, as a man might do, who had been
 just put to the torture, and looked forward to when it would be again
 inflicted. He had sinned against his own honour, by affirming, swearing to,
 a direct falsehood; true this he had palmed on a woman, and it might
 therefore be deemed less base--by others--not by him;--for whom had
 he deceived?--his own trusting, devoted, affectionate Perdita, whose
 generous belief galled him doubly, when he remembered the parade of
 innocence with which it had been exacted. The mind of Raymond was not so
 rough cast, nor had been so rudely handled, in the circumstance of life, as
 to make him proof to these considerations--on the contrary, he was all
 nerve; his spirit was as a pure fire, which fades and shrinks from every
 contagion of foul atmosphere: but now the contagion had become incorporated
 with its essence, and the change was the more painful. Truth and falsehood,
 love and hate lost their eternal boundaries, heaven rushed in to mingle
 with hell; while his sensitive mind, turned to a field for such battle, was
 stung to madness. He heartily despised himself, he was angry with Perdita,
 and the idea of Evadne was attended by all that was hideous and cruel. His
 passions, always his masters, acquired fresh strength, from the long sleep
 in which love had cradled them, the clinging weight of destiny bent him
 down; he was goaded, tortured, fiercely impatient of that worst of
 miseries, the sense of remorse. This troubled state yielded by degrees, to
 sullen animosity, and depression of spirits. His dependants, even his
 equals, if in his present post he had any, were startled to find anger,
 derision, and bitterness in one, before distinguished for suavity and
 benevolence of manner. He transacted public business with distaste, and
 hastened from it to the solitude which was at once his bane and relief. He
 mounted a fiery horse, that which had borne him forward to victory in
 Greece; he fatigued himself with deadening exercise, losing the pangs of a
 troubled mind in animal sensation.
 
 He slowly recovered himself; yet, at last, as one might from the effects of
 poison, he lifted his head from above the vapours of fever and passion into
 the still atmosphere of calm reflection. He meditated on what was best to
 be done. He was first struck by the space of time that had elapsed, since
 madness, rather than any reasonable impulse, had regulated his actions. A
 month had gone by, and during that time he had not seen Evadne. Her power,
 which was linked to few of the enduring emotions of his heart, had greatly
 decayed. He was no longer her slave--no longer her lover: he would never
 see her more, and by the completeness of his return, deserve the confidence
 of Perdita.
 
 Yet, as he thus determined, fancy conjured up the miserable abode of the
 Greek girl. An abode, which from noble and lofty principle, she had refused
 to exchange for one of greater luxury. He thought of the splendour of her
 situation and appearance when he first knew her; he thought of her life at
 Constantinople, attended by every circumstance of oriental magnificence; of
 her present penury, her daily task of industry, her lorn state, her faded,
 famine-struck cheek. Compassion swelled his breast; he would see her once
 again; he would devise some plan for restoring her to society, and the
 enjoyment of her rank; their separation would then follow, as a matter of
 course.
 
 Again he thought, how during this long month, he had avoided Perdita,
 flying from her as from the stings of his own conscience. But he was awake
 now; all this should be remedied; and future devotion erase the memory of
 this only blot on the serenity of their life. He became cheerful, as he
 thought of this, and soberly and resolutely marked out the line of conduct
 he would adopt. He remembered that he had promised Perdita to be present
 this very evening (the 19th of October, anniversary of his election as
 Protector) at a festival given in his honour. Good augury should this
 festival be of the happiness of future years. First, he would look in on
 Evadne; he would not stay; but he owed her some account, some compensation
 for his long and unannounced absence; and then to Perdita, to the forgotten
 world, to the duties of society, the splendour of rank, the enjoyment of
 power.
 
 After the scene sketched in the preceding pages, Perdita had contemplated
 an entire change in the manners and conduct of Raymond. She expected
 freedom of communication, and a return to those habits of affectionate
 intercourse which had formed the delight of her life. But Raymond did not
 join her in any of her avocations. He transacted the business of the day
 apart from her; he went out, she knew not whither. The pain inflicted by
 this disappointment was tormenting and keen. She looked on it as a
 deceitful dream, and tried to throw off the consciousness of it; but like
 the shirt of Nessus, it clung to her very flesh, and ate with sharp agony
 into her vital principle. She possessed that (though such an assertion may
 appear a paradox) which belongs to few, a capacity of happiness. Her
 delicate organization and creative imagination rendered her peculiarly
 susceptible of pleasurable emotion. The overflowing warmth of her heart, by
 making love a plant of deep root and stately growth, had attuned her whole
 soul to the reception of happiness, when she found in Raymond all that
 could adorn love and satisfy her imagination. But if the sentiment on which
 the fabric of her existence was founded, became common place through
 participation, the endless succession of attentions and graceful action
 snapt by transfer, his universe of love wrested from her, happiness must
 depart, and then be exchanged for its opposite. The same peculiarities of
 character rendered her sorrows agonies; her fancy magnified them, her
 sensibility made her for ever open to their renewed impression; love
 envenomed the heart-piercing sting. There was neither submission, patience,
 nor self-abandonment in her grief; she fought with it, struggled beneath
 it, and rendered every pang more sharp by resistance. Again and again the
 idea recurred, that he loved another. She did him justice; she believed
 that he felt a tender affection for her; but give a paltry prize to him who
 in some life-pending lottery has calculated on the possession of tens of
 thousands, and it will disappoint him more than a blank. The affection and
 amity of a Raymond might be inestimable; but, beyond that affection,
 embosomed deeper than friendship, was the indivisible treasure of love.
 Take the sum in its completeness, and no arithmetic can calculate its
 price; take from it the smallest portion, give it but the name of parts,
 separate it into degrees and sections, and like the magician's coin, the
 valueless gold of the mine, is turned to vilest substance. There is a
 meaning in the eye of love; a cadence in its voice, an irradiation in its
 smile, the talisman of whose enchantments one only can possess; its spirit
 is elemental, its essence single, its divinity an unit. The very heart and
 soul of Raymond and Perdita had mingled, even as two mountain brooks that
 join in their descent, and murmuring and sparkling flow over shining
 pebbles, beside starry flowers; but let one desert its primal course, or be
 dammed up by choaking obstruction, and the other shrinks in its altered
 banks. Perdita was sensible of the failing of the tide that fed her life.
 Unable to support the slow withering of her hopes, she suddenly formed a
 plan, resolving to terminate at once the period of misery, and to bring to
 an happy conclusion the late disastrous events.
 
 The anniversary was at hand of the exaltation of Raymond to the office of
 Protector; and it was customary to celebrate this day by a splendid
 festival. A variety of feelings urged Perdita to shed double magnificence
 over the scene; yet, as she arrayed herself for the evening gala, she
 wondered herself at the pains she took, to render sumptuous the celebration
 of an event which appeared to her the beginning of her sufferings. Woe
 befall the day, she thought, woe, tears, and mourning betide the hour, that
 gave Raymond another hope than love, another wish than my devotion; and
 thrice joyful the moment when he shall be restored to me! God knows, I put
 my trust in his vows, and believe his asserted faith--but for that, I
 would not seek what I am now resolved to attain. Shall two years more be
 thus passed, each day adding to our alienation, each act being another
 stone piled on the barrier which separates us? No, my Raymond, my only
 beloved, sole possession of Perdita! This night, this splendid assembly,
 these sumptuous apartments, and this adornment of your tearful girl, are
 all united to celebrate your abdication. Once for me, you relinquished the
 prospect of a crown. That was in days of early love, when I could only hold
 out the hope, not the assurance of happiness. Now you have the experience
 of all that I can give, the heart's devotion, taintless love, and
 unhesitating subjection to you. You must choose between these and your
 protectorate. This, proud noble, is your last night! Perdita has bestowed
 on it all of magnificent and dazzling that your heart best loves--but,
 from these gorgeous rooms, from this princely attendance, from power and
 elevation, you must return with to-morrow's sun to our rural abode; for I
 would not buy an immortality of joy, by the endurance of one more week
 sister to the last.
 
 Brooding over this plan, resolved when the hour should come, to propose,
 and insist upon its accomplishment, secure of his consent, the heart of
 Perdita was lightened, or rather exalted. Her cheek was flushed by the
 expectation of struggle; her eyes sparkled with the hope of triumph. Having
 cast her fate upon a die, and feeling secure of winning, she, whom I have
 named as bearing the stamp of queen of nations on her noble brow, now rose
 superior to humanity, and seemed in calm power, to arrest with her finger,
 the wheel of destiny. She had never before looked so supremely lovely.
 
 We, the Arcadian shepherds of the tale, had intended to be present at this
 festivity, but Perdita wrote to entreat us not to come, or to absent
 ourselves from Windsor; for she (though she did not reveal her scheme to
 us) resolved the next morning to return with Raymond to our dear circle,
 there to renew a course of life in which she had found entire felicity.
 Late in the evening she entered the apartments appropriated to the
 festival. Raymond had quitted the palace the night before; he had promised
 to grace the assembly, but he had not yet returned. Still she felt sure
 that he would come at last; and the wider the breach might appear at this
 crisis, the more secure she was of closing it for ever.
 
 It was as I said, the nineteenth of October; the autumn was far advanced
 and dreary. The wind howled; the half bare trees were despoiled of the
 remainder of their summer ornament; the state of the air which induced the
 decay of vegetation, was hostile to cheerfulness or hope. Raymond had been
 exalted by the determination he had made; but with the declining day his
 spirits declined. First he was to visit Evadne, and then to hasten to the
 palace of the Protectorate. As he walked through the wretched streets in
 the neighbourhood of the luckless Greek's abode, his heart smote him for
 the whole course of his conduct towards her. First, his having entered into
 any engagement that should permit her to remain in such a state of
 degradation; and then, after a short wild dream, having left her to drear
 solitude, anxious conjecture, and bitter, still--disappointed
 expectation. What had she done the while, how supported his absence and
 neglect? Light grew dim in these close streets, and when the well known
 door was opened, the staircase was shrouded in perfect night. He groped his
 way up, he entered the garret, he found Evadne stretched speechless, almost
 lifeless on her wretched bed. He called for the people of the house, but
 could learn nothing from them, except that they knew nothing. Her story was
 plain to him, plain and distinct as the remorse and horror that darted
 their fangs into him. When she found herself forsaken by him, she lost the
 heart to pursue her usual avocations; pride forbade every application to
 him; famine was welcomed as the kind porter to the gates of death, within
 whose opening folds she should now, without sin, quickly repose. No
 creature came near her, as her strength failed.
 
 If she died, where could there be found on record a murderer, whose cruel
 act might compare with his? What fiend more wanton in his mischief, what
 damned soul more worthy of perdition! But he was not reserved for this
 agony of self-reproach. He sent for medical assistance; the hours passed,
 spun by suspense into ages; the darkness of the long autumnal night yielded
 to day, before her life was secure. He had her then removed to a more
 commodious dwelling, and hovered about her, again and again to assure
 himself that she was safe.
 
 In the midst of his greatest suspense and fear as to the event, he
 remembered the festival given in his honour, by Perdita; in his honour
 then, when misery and death were affixing indelible disgrace to his name,
 honour to him whose crimes deserved a scaffold; this was the worst mockery.
 Still Perdita would expect him; he wrote a few incoherent words on a scrap
 of paper, testifying that he was well, and bade the woman of the house take
 it to the palace, and deliver it into the hands of the wife of the Lord
 Protector. The woman, who did not know him, contemptuously asked, how he
 thought she should gain admittance, particularly on a festal night, to that
 lady's presence? Raymond gave her his ring to ensure the respect of the
 menials. Thus, while Perdita was entertaining her guests, and anxiously
 awaiting the arrival of her lord, his ring was brought her; and she was
 told that a poor woman had a note to deliver to her from its wearer.
 
 The vanity of the old gossip was raised by her commission, which, after
 all, she did not understand, since she had no suspicion, even now that
 Evadne's visitor was Lord Raymond. Perdita dreaded a fall from his horse,
 or some similar accident--till the woman's answers woke other fears. From
 a feeling of cunning blindly exercised, the officious, if not malignant
 messenger, did not speak of Evadne's illness; but she garrulously gave an
 account of Raymond's frequent visits, adding to her narration such
 circumstances, as, while they convinced Perdita of its truth, exaggerated
 the unkindness and perfidy of Raymond. Worst of all, his absence now from
 the festival, his message wholly unaccounted for, except by the disgraceful
 hints of the woman, appeared the deadliest insult. Again she looked at the
 ring, it was a small ruby, almost heart-shaped, which she had herself given
 him. She looked at the hand-writing, which she could not mistake, and
 repeated to herself the words--"Do not, I charge you, I entreat you,
 permit your guests to wonder at my absence:" the while the old crone going
 on with her talk, filled her ear with a strange medley of truth and
 falsehood. At length Perdita dismissed her.
 
 The poor girl returned to the assembly, where her presence had not been
 missed. She glided into a recess somewhat obscured, and leaning against an
 ornamental column there placed, tried to recover herself. Her faculties
 were palsied. She gazed on some flowers that stood near in a carved vase:
 that morning she had arranged them, they were rare and lovely plants; even
 now all aghast as she was, she observed their brilliant colours and starry
 shapes.--"Divine infoliations of the spirit of beauty," she exclaimed,
 "Ye droop not, neither do ye mourn; the despair that clasps my heart, has
 not spread contagion over you!--Why am I not a partner of your
 insensibility, a sharer in your calm!"
 
 She paused. "To my task," she continued mentally, "my guests must not
 perceive the reality, either as it regards him or me. I obey; they shall
 not, though I die the moment they are gone. They shall behold the antipodes
 of what is real--for I will appear to live--while I am--dead." It
 required all her self-command, to suppress the gush of tears self-pity
 caused at this idea. After many struggles, she succeeded, and turned to
 join the company.
 
 All her efforts were now directed to the dissembling her internal conflict.
 She had to play the part of a courteous hostess; to attend to all; to shine
 the focus of enjoyment and grace. She had to do this, while in deep woe she
 sighed for loneliness, and would gladly have exchanged her crowded rooms
 for dark forest depths, or a drear, night-enshadowed heath. But she became
 gay. She could not keep in the medium, nor be, as was usual with her,
 placidly content. Every one remarked her exhilaration of spirits; as all
 actions appear graceful in the eye of rank, her guests surrounded her
 applaudingly, although there was a sharpness in her laugh, and an
 abruptness in her sallies, which might have betrayed her secret to an
 attentive observer. She went on, feeling that, if she had paused for a
 moment, the checked waters of misery would have deluged her soul, that her
 wrecked hopes would raise their wailing voices, and that those who now
 echoed her mirth, and provoked her repartees, would have shrunk in fear
 from her convulsive despair. Her only consolation during the violence which
 she did herself, was to watch the motions of an illuminated clock, and
 internally count the moments which must elapse before she could be alone.
 
 At length the rooms began to thin. Mocking her own desires, she rallied her
 guests on their early departure. One by one they left her--at length she
 pressed the hand of her last visitor. "How cold and damp your hand is,"
 said her friend; "you are over fatigued, pray hasten to rest." Perdita
 smiled faintly--her guest left her; the carriage rolling down the street
 assured the final departure. Then, as if pursued by an enemy, as if wings
 had been at her feet, she flew to her own apartment, she dismissed her
 attendants, she locked the doors, she threw herself wildly on the floor,
 she bit her lips even to blood to suppress her shrieks, and lay long a prey
 to the vulture of despair, striving not to think, while multitudinous ideas
 made a home of her heart; and ideas, horrid as furies, cruel as vipers, and
 poured in with such swift succession, that they seemed to jostle and wound
 each other, while they worked her up to madness.
 
 At length she rose, more composed, not less miserable. She stood before a
 large mirror--she gazed on her reflected image; her light and graceful
 dress, the jewels that studded her hair, and encircled her beauteous arms
 and neck, her small feet shod in satin, her profuse and glossy tresses, all
 were to her clouded brow and woe-begone countenance like a gorgeous frame
 to a dark tempest-pourtraying picture. "Vase am I," she thought, "vase
 brimful of despair's direst essence. Farewell, Perdita! farewell, poor
 girl! never again will you see yourself thus; luxury and wealth are no
 longer yours; in the excess of your poverty you may envy the homeless
 beggar; most truly am I without a home! I live on a barren desart, which,
 wide and interminable, brings forth neither fruit or flower; in the midst
 is a solitary rock, to which thou, Perdita, art chained, and thou seest the
 dreary level stretch far away."
 
 She threw open her window, which looked on the palace-garden. Light and
 darkness were struggling together, and the orient was streaked by roseate
 and golden rays. One star only trembled in the depth of the kindling
 atmosphere. The morning air blowing freshly over the dewy plants, rushed
 into the heated room. "All things go on," thought Perdita, "all things
 proceed, decay, and perish! When noontide has passed, and the weary day has
 driven her team to their western stalls, the fires of heaven rise from the
 East, moving in their accustomed path, they ascend and descend the skiey
 hill. When their course is fulfilled, the dial begins to cast westward an
 uncertain shadow; the eye-lids of day are opened, and birds and flowers,
 the startled vegetation, and fresh breeze awaken; the sun at length
 appears, and in majestic procession climbs the capitol of heaven. All
 proceeds, changes and dies, except the sense of misery in my bursting
 heart.
 
 "Ay, all proceeds and changes: what wonder then, that love has journied on
 to its setting, and that the lord of my life has changed? We call the
 supernal lights fixed, yet they wander about yonder plain, and if I look
 again where I looked an hour ago, the face of the eternal heavens is
 altered. The silly moon and inconstant planets vary nightly their erratic
 dance; the sun itself, sovereign of the sky, ever and anon deserts his
 throne, and leaves his dominion to night and winter. Nature grows old, and
 shakes in her decaying limbs,--creation has become bankrupt! What wonder
 then, that eclipse and death have led to destruction the light of thy life,
 O Perdita!"
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 THUS sad and disarranged were the thoughts of my poor sister, when she
 became assured of the infidelity of Raymond. All her virtues and all her
 defects tended to make the blow incurable. Her affection for me, her
 brother, for Adrian and Idris, was subject as it were to the reigning
 passion of her heart; even her maternal tenderness borrowed half its force
 from the delight she had in tracing Raymond's features and expression in
 the infant's countenance. She had been reserved and even stern in
 childhood; but love had softened the asperities of her character, and her
 union with Raymond had caused her talents and affections to unfold
 themselves; the one betrayed, and the other lost, she in some degree
 returned to her ancient disposition. The concentrated pride of her nature,
 forgotten during her blissful dream, awoke, and with its adder's sting
 pierced her heart; her humility of spirit augmented the power of the venom;
 she had been exalted in her own estimation, while distinguished by his
 love: of what worth was she, now that he thrust her from this preferment?
 She had been proud of having won and preserved him--but another had won
 him from her, and her exultation was as cold as a water quenched ember.
 
 We, in our retirement, remained long in ignorance of her misfortune. Soon
 after the festival she had sent for her child, and then she seemed to have
 forgotten us. Adrian observed a change during a visit that he afterward
 paid them; but he could not tell its extent, or divine the cause. They
 still appeared in public together, and lived under the same roof. Raymond
 was as usual courteous, though there was, on occasions, an unbidden
 haughtiness, or painful abruptness in his manners, which startled his
 gentle friend; his brow was not clouded but disdain sat on his lips, and
 his voice was harsh. Perdita was all kindness and attention to her lord;
 but she was silent, and beyond words sad. She had grown thin and pale; and
 her eyes often filled with tears. Sometimes she looked at Raymond, as if to
 say--That it should be so! At others her countenance expressed--I will
 still do all I can to make you happy. But Adrian read with uncertain aim
 the charactery of her face, and might mistake.--Clara was always with
 her, and she seemed most at ease, when, in an obscure corner, she could sit
 holding her child's hand, silent and lonely. Still Adrian was unable to
 guess the truth; he entreated them to visit us at Windsor, and they
 promised to come during the following month.
 
 It was May before they arrived: the season had decked the forest trees with
 leaves, and its paths with a thousand flowers. We had notice of their
 intention the day before; and, early in the morning, Perdita arrived with
 her daughter. Raymond would follow soon, she said; he had been detained by
 business. According to Adrian's account, I had expected to find her sad;
 but, on the contrary, she appeared in the highest spirits: true, she had
 grown thin, her eyes were somewhat hollow, and her cheeks sunk, though
 tinged by a bright glow. She was delighted to see us; caressed our
 children, praised their growth and improvement; Clara also was pleased to
 meet again her young friend Alfred; all kinds of childish games were
 entered into, in which Perdita joined. She communicated her gaiety to us,
 and as we amused ourselves on the Castle Terrace, it appeared that a
 happier, less care-worn party could not have been assembled. "This is
 better, Mamma," said Clara, "than being in that dismal London, where you
 often cry, and never laugh as you do now."--"Silence, little foolish
 thing," replied her mother, "and remember any one that mentions London is
 sent to Coventry for an hour."
 
 Soon after, Raymond arrived. He did not join as usual in the playful spirit
 of the rest; but, entering into conversation with Adrian and myself, by
 degrees we seceded from our companions, and Idris and Perdita only remained
 with the children. Raymond talked of his new buildings; of his plan for an
 establishment for the better education of the poor; as usual Adrian and he
 entered into argument, and the time slipped away unperceived.
 
 We assembled again towards evening, and Perdita insisted on our having
 recourse to music. She wanted, she said, to give us a specimen of her new
 accomplishment; for since she had been in London, she had applied herself
 to music, and sang, without much power, but with a great deal of sweetness.
 We were not permitted by her to select any but light-hearted melodies; and
 all the Operas of Mozart were called into service, that we might choose the
 most exhilarating of his airs. Among the other transcendant attributes of
 Mozart's music, it possesses more than any other that of appearing to come
 from the heart; you enter into the passions expressed by him, and are
 transported with grief, joy, anger, or confusion, as he, our soul's master,
 chooses to inspire. For some time, the spirit of hilarity was kept up; but,
 at length, Perdita receded from the piano, for Raymond had joined in the
 trio of "Taci ingiusto core," in Don Giovanni, whose arch entreaty was
 softened by him into tenderness, and thrilled her heart with memories of
 the changed past; it was the same voice, the same tone, the self-same
 sounds and words, which often before she had received, as the homage of
 love to her--no longer was it that; and this concord of sound with its
 dissonance of expression penetrated her with regret and despair. Soon after
 Idris, who was at the harp, turned to that passionate and sorrowful air in
 Figaro, "Porgi, amor, qualche risforo," in which the deserted Countess
 laments the change of the faithless Almaviva. The soul of tender sorrow is
 breathed forth in this strain; and the sweet voice of Idris, sustained by
 the mournful chords of her instrument, added to the expression of the
 words. During the pathetic appeal with which it concludes, a stifled sob
 attracted our attention to Perdita, the cessation of the music recalled her
 to herself, she hastened out of the hall--I followed her. At first, she
 seemed to wish to shun me; and then, yielding to my earnest questioning,
 she threw herself on my neck, and wept aloud:--"Once more," she cried,
 "once more on your friendly breast, my beloved brother, can the lost
 Perdita pour forth her sorrows. I had imposed a law of silence on myself;
 and for months I have kept it. I do wrong in weeping now, and greater wrong
 in giving words to my grief. I will not speak! Be it enough for you to know
 that I am miserable--be it enough for you to know, that the painted veil
 of life is rent, that I sit for ever shrouded in darkness and gloom, that
 grief is my sister, everlasting lamentation my mate!"
 
 I endeavoured to console her; I did not question her! but I caressed her,
 assured her of my deepest affection and my intense interest in the changes
 of her fortune:--"Dear words," she cried, "expressions of love come upon
 my ear, like the remembered sounds of forgotten music, that had been dear
 to me. They are vain, I know; how very vain in their attempt to soothe or
 comfort me. Dearest Lionel, you cannot guess what I have suffered during
 these long months. I have read of mourners in ancient days, who clothed
 themselves in sackcloth, scattered dust upon their heads, ate their bread
 mingled with ashes, and took up their abode on the bleak mountain tops,
 reproaching heaven and earth aloud with their misfortunes. Why this is the
 very luxury of sorrow! thus one might go on from day to day contriving new
 extravagances, revelling in the paraphernalia of woe, wedded to all the
 appurtenances of despair. Alas! I must for ever conceal the wretchedness
 that consumes me. I must weave a veil of dazzling falsehood to hide my
 grief from vulgar eyes, smoothe my brow, and paint my lips in deceitful
 smiles--even in solitude I dare not think how lost I am, lest I become
 insane and rave."
 
 The tears and agitation of my poor sister had rendered her unfit to return
 to the circle we had left--so I persuaded her to let me drive her through
 the park; and, during the ride, I induced her to confide the tale of her
 unhappiness to me, fancying that talking of it would lighten the burthen,
 and certain that, if there were a remedy, it should be found and secured to
 her.
 
 Several weeks had elapsed since the festival of the anniversary, and she
 had been unable to calm her mind, or to subdue her thoughts to any regular
 train. Sometimes she reproached herself for taking too bitterly to heart,
 that which many would esteem an imaginary evil; but this was no subject for
 reason; and, ignorant as she was of the motives and true conduct of
 Raymond, things assumed for her even a worse appearance, than the reality
 warranted. He was seldom at the palace; never, but when he was assured that
 his public duties would prevent his remaining alone with Perdita. They
 seldom addressed each other, shunning explanation, each fearing any
 communication the other might make. Suddenly, however, the manners of
 Raymond changed; he appeared to desire to find opportunities of bringing
 about a return to kindness and intimacy with my sister. The tide of love
 towards her appeared to flow again; he could never forget, how once he had
 been devoted to her, making her the shrine and storehouse wherein to place
 every thought and every sentiment. Shame seemed to hold him back; yet he
 evidently wished to establish a renewal of confidence and affection. From
 the moment Perdita had sufficiently recovered herself to form any plan of
 action, she had laid one down, which now she prepared to follow. She
 received these tokens of returning love with gentleness; she did not shun
 his company; but she endeavoured to place a barrier in the way of familiar
 intercourse or painful discussion, which mingled pride and shame prevented
 Raymond from surmounting. He began at last to shew signs of angry
 impatience, and Perdita became aware that the system she had adopted could
 not continue; she must explain herself to him; she could not summon courage
 to speak--she wrote thus:--
 
 "Read this letter with patience, I entreat you. It will contain no
 reproaches. Reproach is indeed an idle word: for what should I reproach
 you?
 
 "Allow me in some degree to explain my feeling; without that, we shall both
 grope in the dark, mistaking one another; erring from the path which may
 conduct, one of us at least, to a more eligible mode of life than that led
 by either during the last few weeks.
 
 "I loved you--I love you--neither anger nor pride dictates these lines;
 but a feeling beyond, deeper, and more unalterable than either. My
 affections are wounded; it is impossible to heal them:--cease then the
 vain endeavour, if indeed that way your endeavours tend. Forgiveness!
 Return! Idle words are these! I forgive the pain I endure; but the trodden
 path cannot be retraced.
 
 "Common affection might have been satisfied with common usages. I believed
 that you read my heart, and knew its devotion, its unalienable fidelity
 towards you. I never loved any but you. You came the embodied image of my
 fondest dreams. The praise of men, power and high aspirations attended your
 career. Love for you invested the world for me in enchanted light; it was
 no longer the earth I trod--the earth, common mother, yielding only trite
 and stale repetition of objects and circumstances old and worn out. I lived
 in a temple glorified by intensest sense of devotion and rapture; I walked,
 a consecrated being, contemplating only your power, your excellence;
 
   For O, you stood beside me, like my youth,
   Transformed for me the real to a dream,
   Cloathing the palpable and familiar
   With golden exhalations of the dawn.
 
 'The bloom has vanished from my life'--there is no morning to this all
 investing night; no rising to the set-sun of love. In those days the
 rest of the world was nothing to me: all other men--I never
 considered nor felt what they were; nor did I look on you as one of them.
 Separated from them; exalted in my heart; sole possessor of my affections;
 single object of my hopes, the best half of myself.
 
 "Ah, Raymond, were we not happy? Did the sun shine on any, who could enjoy
 its light with purer and more intense bliss? It was not--it is not a
 common infidelity at which I repine. It is the disunion of an whole which
 may not have parts; it is the carelessness with which you have shaken off
 the mantle of election with which to me you were invested, and have become
 one among the many. Dream not to alter this. Is not love a divinity,
 because it is immortal? Did not I appear sanctified, even to myself,
 because this love had for its temple my heart? I have gazed on you as you
 slept, melted even to tears, as the idea filled my mind, that all I
 possessed lay cradled in those idolized, but mortal lineaments before me.
 Yet, even then, I have checked thick-coming fears with one thought; I would
 not fear death, for the emotions that linked us must be immortal.
 
 "And now I do not fear death. I should be well pleased to close my eyes,
 never more to open them again. And yet I fear it; even as I fear all
 things; for in any state of being linked by the chain of memory with this,
 happiness would not return--even in Paradise, I must feel that your love
 was less enduring than the mortal beatings of my fragile heart, every pulse
 of which knells audibly,
 
   The funeral note
   Of love, deep buried, without resurrection.
   No--no--me miserable; for love extinct there is no resurrection!
 
 "Yet I love you. Yet, and for ever, would I contribute all I possess to
 your welfare. On account of a tattling world; for the sake of my--of our
 child, I would remain by you, Raymond, share your fortunes, partake your
 counsel. Shall it be thus? We are no longer lovers; nor can I call myself a
 friend to any; since, lost as I am, I have no thought to spare from my own
 wretched, engrossing self. But it will please me to see you each day! to
 listen to the public voice praising you; to keep up your paternal love for
 our girl; to hear your voice; to know that I am near you, though you are no
 longer mine.
 
 "If you wish to break the chains that bind us, say the word, and it
 shall be done--I will take all the blame on myself, of harshness
 or unkindness, in the world's eye.
 
 "Yet, as I have said, I should be best pleased, at least for the present,
 to live under the same roof with you. When the fever of my young life is
 spent; when placid age shall tame the vulture that devours me, friendship
 may come, love and hope being dead. May this be true? Can my soul,
 inextricably linked to this perishable frame, become lethargic and cold,
 even as this sensitive mechanism shall lose its youthful elasticity? Then,
 with lack-lustre eyes, grey hairs, and wrinkled brow, though now the words
 sound hollow and meaningless, then, tottering on the grave's extreme edge,
 I may be--your affectionate and true friend,
 
 "PERDITA."
 
 Raymond's answer was brief. What indeed could he reply to her complaints,
 to her griefs which she jealously paled round, keeping out all thought of
 remedy. "Notwithstanding your bitter letter," he wrote, "for bitter I must
 call it, you are the chief person in my estimation, and it is your
 happiness that I would principally consult. Do that which seems best to
 you: and if you can receive gratification from one mode of life in
 preference to another, do not let me be any obstacle. I foresee that the
 plan which you mark out in your letter will not endure long; but you are
 mistress of yourself, and it is my sincere wish to contribute as far as you
 will permit me to your happiness."
 
 "Raymond has prophesied well," said Perdita, "alas, that it should be so!
 our present mode of life cannot continue long, yet I will not be the first
 to propose alteration. He beholds in me one whom he has injured even unto
 death; and I derive no hope from his kindness; no change can possibly be
 brought about even by his best intentions. As well might Cleopatra have
 worn as an ornament the vinegar which contained her dissolved pearl, as I
 be content with the love that Raymond can now offer me."
 
 I own that I did not see her misfortune with the same eyes as Perdita. At
 all events methought that the wound could be healed; and, if they remained
 together, it would be so. I endeavoured therefore to sooth and soften her
 mind; and it was not until after many endeavours that I gave up the task as
 impracticable. Perdita listened to me impatiently, and answered with some
 asperity:--"Do you think that any of your arguments are new to me? or
 that my own burning wishes and intense anguish have not suggested them all
 a thousand times, with far more eagerness and subtlety than you can put
 into them? Lionel, you cannot understand what woman's love is. In days of
 happiness I have often repeated to myself, with a grateful heart and
 exulting spirit, all that Raymond sacrificed for me. I was a poor,
 uneducated, unbefriended, mountain girl, raised from nothingness
 by him. All that I possessed of the luxuries of life came
 from him. He gave me an illustrious name and noble station; the world's
 respect reflected from his own glory: all this joined to his own undying
 love, inspired me with sensations towards him, akin to those with which we
 regard the Giver of life. I gave him love only. I devoted myself to him:
 imperfect creature that I was, I took myself to task, that I might become
 worthy of him. I watched over my hasty temper, subdued my burning
 impatience of character, schooled my self-engrossing thoughts, educating
 myself to the best perfection I might attain, that the fruit of my
 exertions might be his happiness. I took no merit to myself for this. He
 deserved it all--all labour, all devotion, all sacrifice; I would have
 toiled up a scaleless Alp, to pluck a flower that would please him. I was
 ready to quit you all, my beloved and gifted companions, and to live only
 with him, for him. I could not do otherwise, even if I had wished; for if
 we are said to have two souls, he was my better soul, to which the other
 was a perpetual slave. One only return did he owe me, even fidelity. I
 earned that; I deserved it. Because I was mountain bred, unallied to the
 noble and wealthy, shall he think to repay me by an empty name and station?
 Let him take them back; without his love they are nothing to me. Their only
 merit in my eyes was that they were his."
 
 Thus passionately Perdita ran on. When I adverted to the question of their
 entire separation, she replied: "Be it so! One day the period will arrive;
 I know it, and feel it. But in this I am a coward. This imperfect
 companionship, and our masquerade of union, are strangely dear to me. It is
 painful, I allow, destructive, impracticable. It keeps up a perpetual fever
 in my veins; it frets my immedicable wound; it is instinct with poison. Yet
 I must cling to it; perhaps it will kill me soon, and thus perform a
 thankful office."
 
 In the mean time, Raymond had remained with Adrian and Idris. He was
 naturally frank; the continued absence of Perdita and myself became
 remarkable; and Raymond soon found relief from the constraint of months, by
 an unreserved confidence with his two friends. He related to them the
 situation in which he had found Evadne. At first, from delicacy to Adrian
 he concealed her name; but it was divulged in the course of his narrative,
 and her former lover heard with the most acute agitation the history of her
 sufferings. Idris had shared Perdita's ill opinion of the Greek; but
 Raymond's account softened and interested her. Evadne's constancy,
 fortitude, even her ill-fated and ill-regulated love, were matter of
 admiration and pity; especially when, from the detail of the events of the
 nineteenth of October, it was apparent that she preferred suffering and
 death to any in her eyes degrading application for the pity and assistance
 of her lover. Her subsequent conduct did not diminish this interest. At
 first, relieved from famine and the grave, watched over by Raymond with the
 tenderest assiduity, with that feeling of repose peculiar to convalescence,
 Evadne gave herself up to rapturous gratitude and love. But reflection
 returned with health. She questioned him with regard to the motives which
 had occasioned his critical absence. She framed her enquiries with Greek
 subtlety; she formed her conclusions with the decision and firmness
 peculiar to her disposition. She could not divine, that the breach which
 she had occasioned between Raymond and Perdita was already irreparable: but
 she knew, that under the present system it would be widened each day, and
 that its result must be to destroy her lover's happiness, and to implant
 the fangs of remorse in his heart. From the moment that she perceived the
 right line of conduct, she resolved to adopt it, and to part from Raymond
 for ever. Conflicting passions, long-cherished love, and self-inflicted
 disappointment, made her regard death alone as sufficient refuge for her
 woe. But the same feelings and opinions which had before restrained her,
 acted with redoubled force; for she knew that the reflection that he had
 occasioned her death, would pursue Raymond through life, poisoning every
 enjoyment, clouding every prospect. Besides, though the violence of her
 anguish made life hateful, it had not yet produced that monotonous,
 lethargic sense of changeless misery which for the most part produces
 suicide. Her energy of character induced her still to combat with the ills
 of life; even those attendant on hopeless love presented themselves, rather
 in the shape of an adversary to be overcome, than of a victor to whom she
 must submit. Besides, she had memories of past tenderness to cherish,
 smiles, words, and even tears, to con over, which, though remembered in
 desertion and sorrow, were to be preferred to the forgetfulness of the
 grave. It was impossible to guess at the whole of her plan. Her letter to
 Raymond gave no clue for discovery; it assured him, that she was in no
 danger of wanting the means of life; she promised in it to preserve
 herself, and some future day perhaps to present herself to him in a station
 not unworthy of her. She then bade him, with the eloquence of despair and
 of unalterable love, a last farewell.
 
 All these circumstances were now related to Adrian and Idris. Raymond then
 lamented the cureless evil of his situation with Perdita. He declared,
 notwithstanding her harshness, he even called it coldness, that he loved
 her. He had been ready once with the humility of a penitent, and the duty
 of a vassal, to surrender himself to her; giving up his very soul to her
 tutelage, to become her pupil, her slave, her bondsman. She had rejected
 these advances; and the time for such exuberant submission, which must be
 founded on love and nourished by it, was now passed. Still all his wishes
 and endeavours were directed towards her peace, and his chief discomfort
 arose from the perception that he exerted himself in vain. If she were to
 continue inflexible in the line of conduct she now pursued, they must part.
 The combinations and occurrences of this senseless mode of intercourse were
 maddening to him. Yet he would not propose the separation. He was haunted
 by the fear of causing the death of one or other of the beings implicated
 in these events; and he could not persuade himself to undertake to direct
 the course of events, lest, ignorant of the land he traversed, he should
 lead those attached to the car into irremediable ruin.
 
 After a discussion on this subject, which lasted for several hours, he took
 leave of his friends, and returned to town, unwilling to meet Perdita
 before us, conscious, as we all must be, of the thoughts uppermost in the
 minds of both. Perdita prepared to follow him with her child. Idris
 endeavoured to persuade her to remain. My poor sister looked at the
 counsellor with affright. She knew that Raymond had conversed with her; had
 he instigated this request?--was this to be the prelude to their eternal
 separation?--I have said, that the defects of her character awoke and
 acquired vigour from her unnatural position. She regarded with suspicion
 the invitation of Idris; she embraced me, as if she were about to be
 deprived of my affection also: calling me her more than brother, her only
 friend, her last hope, she pathetically conjured me not to cease to love
 her; and with encreased anxiety she departed for London, the scene and
 cause of all her misery.
 
 The scenes that followed, convinced her that she had not yet fathomed the
 obscure gulph into which she had plunged. Her unhappiness assumed every day
 a new shape; every day some unexpected event seemed to close, while in fact
 it led onward, the train of calamities which now befell her.
 
 The selected passion of the soul of Raymond was ambition. Readiness of
 talent, a capacity of entering into, and leading the dispositions of men;
 earnest desire of distinction were the awakeners and nurses of his
 ambition. But other ingredients mingled with these, and prevented him from
 becoming the calculating, determined character, which alone forms a
 successful hero. He was obstinate, but not firm; benevolent in his first
 movements; harsh and reckless when provoked. Above all, he was remorseless
 and unyielding in the pursuit of any object of desire, however lawless.
 Love of pleasure, and the softer sensibilities of our nature, made a
 prominent part of his character, conquering the conqueror; holding him in
 at the moment of acquisition; sweeping away ambition's web; making him
 forget the toil of weeks, for the sake of one moment's indulgence of the
 new and actual object of his wishes. Obeying these impulses, he had become
 the husband of Perdita: egged on by them, he found himself the lover of
 Evadne. He had now lost both. He had neither the ennobling
 self-gratulation, which constancy inspires, to console him, nor the
 voluptuous sense of abandonment to a forbidden, but intoxicating passion.
 His heart was exhausted by the recent events; his enjoyment of life was
 destroyed by the resentment of Perdita, and the flight of Evadne; and the
 inflexibility of the former, set the last seal upon the annihilation of his
 hopes. As long as their disunion remained a secret, he cherished an
 expectation of re-awakening past tenderness in her bosom; now that we were
 all made acquainted with these occurrences, and that Perdita, by declaring
 her resolves to others, in a manner pledged herself to their
 accomplishment, he gave up the idea of re-union as futile, and sought only,
 since he was unable to influence her to change, to reconcile himself to the
 present state of things. He made a vow against love and its train of
 struggles, disappointment and remorse, and sought in mere sensual
 enjoyment, a remedy for the injurious inroads of passion.
 
 Debasement of character is the certain follower of such pursuits. Yet this
 consequence would not have been immediately remarkable, if Raymond had
 continued to apply himself to the execution of his plans for the public
 benefit, and the fulfilling his duties as Protector. But, extreme in all
 things, given up to immediate impressions, he entered with ardour into this
 new pursuit of pleasure, and followed up the incongruous intimacies
 occasioned by it without reflection or foresight. The council-chamber was
 deserted; the crowds which attended on him as agents to his various
 projects were neglected. Festivity, and even libertinism, became the order
 of the day.
 
 Perdita beheld with affright the encreasing disorder. For a moment she
 thought that she could stem the torrent, and that Raymond could be induced
 to hear reason from her.--Vain hope! The moment of her influence was
 passed. He listened with haughtiness, replied disdainfully; and, if in
 truth, she succeeded in awakening his conscience, the sole effect was that
 he sought an opiate for the pang in oblivious riot. With the energy natural
 to her, Perdita then endeavoured to supply his place. Their still apparent
 union permitted her to do much; but no woman could, in the end, present a
 remedy to the encreasing negligence of the Protector; who, as if seized
 with a paroxysm of insanity, trampled on all ceremony, all order, all duty,
 and gave himself up to license.
 
 Reports of these strange proceedings reached us, and we were undecided what
 method to adopt to restore our friend to himself and his country, when
 Perdita suddenly appeared among us. She detailed the progress of the
 mournful change, and entreated Adrian and myself to go up to London, and
 endeavour to remedy the encreasing evil:--"Tell him," she cried, "tell
 Lord Raymond, that my presence shall no longer annoy him. That he need not
 plunge into this destructive dissipation for the sake of disgusting me, and
 causing me to fly. This purpose is now accomplished; he will never see me
 more. But let me, it is my last entreaty, let me in the praises of his
 countrymen and the prosperity of England, find the choice of my youth
 justified."
 
 During our ride up to town, Adrian and I discussed and argued upon
 Raymond's conduct, and his falling off from the hopes of permanent
 excellence on his part, which he had before given us cause to entertain. My
 friend and I had both been educated in one school, or rather I was his
 pupil in the opinion, that steady adherence to principle was the only road
 to honour; a ceaseless observance of the laws of general utility, the only
 conscientious aim of human ambition. But though we both entertained these
 ideas, we differed in their application. Resentment added also a sting to
 my censure; and I reprobated Raymond's conduct in severe terms. Adrian was
 more benign, more considerate. He admitted that the principles that I laid
 down were the best; but he denied that they were the only ones. Quoting the
 text, there are many mansions in my father's house, he insisted that the
 modes of becoming good or great, varied as much as the dispositions of men,
 of whom it might be said, as of the leaves of the forest, there were no two
 alike.
 
 We arrived in London at about eleven at night. We conjectured,
 notwithstanding what we had heard, that we should find Raymond in St.
 Stephen's: thither we sped. The chamber was full--but there was no
 Protector; and there was an austere discontent manifest on the countenances
 of the leaders, and a whispering and busy tattle among the underlings, not
 less ominous. We hastened to the palace of the Protectorate. We found
 Raymond in his dining room with six others: the bottle was being pushed
 about merrily, and had made considerable inroads on the understanding of
 one or two. He who sat near Raymond was telling a story, which convulsed
 the rest with laughter.
 
 Raymond sat among them, though while he entered into the spirit of the
 hour, his natural dignity never forsook him. He was gay, playful,
 fascinating--but never did he overstep the modesty of nature, or the
 respect due to himself, in his wildest sallies. Yet I own, that considering
 the task which Raymond had taken on himself as Protector of England, and
 the cares to which it became him to attend, I was exceedingly provoked to
 observe the worthless fellows on whom his time was wasted, and the jovial
 if not drunken spirit which seemed on the point of robbing him of his
 better self. I stood watching the scene, while Adrian flitted like a shadow
 in among them, and, by a word and look of sobriety, endeavoured to restore
 order in the assembly. Raymond expressed himself delighted to see him,
 declaring that he should make one in the festivity of the night.
 
 This action of Adrian provoked me. I was indignant that he should sit at
 the same table with the companions of Raymond--men of abandoned
 characters, or rather without any, the refuse of high-bred luxury, the
 disgrace of their country. "Let me entreat Adrian," I cried, "not to
 comply: rather join with me in endeavouring to withdraw Lord Raymond from
 this scene, and restore him to other society."
 
 "My good fellow," said Raymond, "this is neither the time nor place for the
 delivery of a moral lecture: take my word for it that my amusements and
 society are not so bad as you imagine. We are neither hypocrites or fools
 --for the rest, 'Dost thou think because thou art virtuous, there shall be
 no more cakes and ale?'"
 
 I turned angrily away: "Verney," said Adrian, "you are very cynical: sit
 down; or if you will not, perhaps, as you are not a frequent visitor, Lord
 Raymond will humour you, and accompany us, as we had previously agreed
 upon, to parliament."
 
 Raymond looked keenly at him; he could read benignity only in his gentle
 lineaments; he turned to me, observing with scorn my moody and stern
 demeanour. "Come," said Adrian, "I have promised for you, enable me to keep
 my engagement. Come with us."--Raymond made an uneasy movement, and
 laconically replied--"I won't!"
 
 The party in the mean time had broken up. They looked at the pictures,
 strolled into the other apartments, talked of billiards, and one by one
 vanished. Raymond strode angrily up and down the room. I stood ready to
 receive and reply to his reproaches. Adrian leaned against the wall. "This
 is infinitely ridiculous," he cried, "if you were school-boys, you could
 not conduct yourselves more unreasonably."
 
 "You do not understand," said Raymond. "This is only part of a system:--a
 scheme of tyranny to which I will never submit. Because I am Protector of
 England, am I to be the only slave in its empire? My privacy invaded, my
 actions censured, my friends insulted? But I will get rid of the whole
 together.--Be you witnesses," and he took the star, insignia of office,
 from his breast, and threw it on the table. "I renounce my office, I
 abdicate my power--assume it who will!"---
 
 "Let him assume it," exclaimed Adrian, "who can pronounce himself, or whom
 the world will pronounce to be your superior. There does not exist the man
 in England with adequate presumption. Know yourself, Raymond, and your
 indignation will cease; your complacency return. A few months ago, whenever
 we prayed for the prosperity of our country, or our own, we at the same
 time prayed for the life and welfare of the Protector, as indissolubly
 linked to it. Your hours were devoted to our benefit, your ambition was to
 obtain our commendation. You decorated our towns with edifices, you
 bestowed on us useful establishments, you gifted the soil with abundant
 fertility. The powerful and unjust cowered at the steps of your
 judgment-seat, and the poor and oppressed arose like morn-awakened flowers
 under the sunshine of your protection.
 
 "Can you wonder that we are all aghast and mourn, when this appears
 changed? But, come, this splenetic fit is already passed; resume your
 functions; your partizans will hail you; your enemies be silenced; our
 love, honour, and duty will again be manifested towards you. Master
 yourself, Raymond, and the world is subject to you."
 
 "All this would be very good sense, if addressed to another," replied
 Raymond, moodily, "con the lesson yourself, and you, the first peer of the
 land, may become its sovereign. You the good, the wise, the just, may rule
 all hearts. But I perceive, too soon for my own happiness, too late for
 England's good, that I undertook a task to which I am unequal. I cannot
 rule myself. My passions are my masters; my smallest impulse my tyrant. Do
 you think that I renounced the Protectorate (and I have renounced it) in a
 fit of spleen? By the God that lives, I swear never to take up that bauble
 again; never again to burthen myself with the weight of care and misery, of
 which that is the visible sign.
 
 "Once I desired to be a king. It was in the hey-day of youth, in the pride
 of boyish folly. I knew myself when I renounced it. I renounced it to gain
 --no matter what--for that also I have lost. For many months I have
 submitted to this mock majesty--this solemn jest. I am its dupe no
 longer. I will be free.
 
 "I have lost that which adorned and dignified my life; that which linked me
 to other men. Again I am a solitary man; and I will become again, as in my
 early years, a wanderer, a soldier of fortune. My friends, for Verney, I
 feel that you are my friend, do not endeavour to shake my resolve. Perdita,
 wedded to an imagination, careless of what is behind the veil, whose
 charactery is in truth faulty and vile, Perdita has renounced me. With her
 it was pretty enough to play a sovereign's part; and, as in the recesses of
 your beloved forest we acted masques, and imagined ourselves Arcadian
 shepherds, to please the fancy of the moment--so was I content, more for
 Perdita's sake than my own, to take on me the character of one of the great
 ones of the earth; to lead her behind the scenes of grandeur, to vary her
 life with a short act of magnificence and power. This was to be the colour;
 love and confidence the substance of our existence. But we must live, and
 not act our lives; pursuing the shadow, I lost the reality--now I
 renounce both.
 
 "Adrian, I am about to return to Greece, to become again a soldier, perhaps
 a conqueror. Will you accompany me? You will behold new scenes; see a new
 people; witness the mighty struggle there going forward between
 civilization and barbarism; behold, and perhaps direct the efforts of a
 young and vigorous population, for liberty and order. Come with me. I have
 expected you. I waited for this moment; all is prepared;--will you
 accompany me?"
 
 "I will," replied Adrian. "Immediately?"
 
 "To-morrow if you will."
 
 "Reflect!" I cried.
 
 "Wherefore?" asked Raymond--"My dear fellow, I have done nothing else
 than reflect on this step the live-long summer; and be assured that Adrian
 has condensed an age of reflection into this little moment. Do not talk of
 reflection; from this moment I abjure it; this is my only happy moment
 during a long interval of time. I must go, Lionel--the Gods will it; and
 I must. Do not endeavour to deprive me of my companion, the out-cast's
 friend.
 
 "One word more concerning unkind, unjust Perdita. For a time, I thought
 that, by watching a complying moment, fostering the still warm ashes, I
 might relume in her the flame of love. It is more cold within her, than a
 fire left by gypsies in winter-time, the spent embers crowned by a pyramid
 of snow. Then, in endeavouring to do violence to my own disposition, I made
 all worse than before. Still I think, that time, and even absence, may
 restore her to me. Remember, that I love her still, that my dearest hope is
 that she will again be mine. I know, though she does not, how false the
 veil is which she has spread over the reality--do not endeavour to rend
 this deceptive covering, but by degrees withdraw it. Present her with a
 mirror, in which she may know herself; and, when she is an adept in that
 necessary but difficult science, she will wonder at her present mistake,
 and hasten to restore to me, what is by right mine, her forgiveness, her
 kind thoughts, her love."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 
 AFTER these events, it was long before we were able to attain any degree of
 composure. A moral tempest had wrecked our richly freighted vessel, and we,
 remnants of the diminished crew, were aghast at the losses and changes
 which we had undergone. Idris passionately loved her brother, and could ill
 brook an absence whose duration was uncertain; his society was dear and
 necessary to me--I had followed up my chosen literary occupations with
 delight under his tutorship and assistance; his mild philosophy, unerring
 reason, and enthusiastic friendship were the best ingredient, the exalted
 spirit of our circle; even the children bitterly regretted the loss of
 their kind playfellow. Deeper grief oppressed Perdita. In spite of
 resentment, by day and night she figured to herself the toils and dangers
 of the wanderers. Raymond absent, struggling with difficulties, lost to the
 power and rank of the Protectorate, exposed to the perils of war, became an
 object of anxious interest; not that she felt any inclination to recall
 him, if recall must imply a return to their former union. Such return she
 felt to be impossible; and while she believed it to be thus, and with
 anguish regretted that so it should be, she continued angry and impatient
 with him, who occasioned her misery. These perplexities and regrets caused
 her to bathe her pillow with nightly tears, and to reduce her in person and
 in mind to the shadow of what she had been. She sought solitude, and
 avoided us when in gaiety and unrestrained affection we met in a family
 circle. Lonely musings, interminable wanderings, and solemn music were her
 only pastimes. She neglected even her child; shutting her heart against all
 tenderness, she grew reserved towards me, her first and fast friend.
 
 I could not see her thus lost, without exerting myself to remedy the evil
 --remediless I knew, if I could not in the end bring her to reconcile
 herself to Raymond. Before he went I used every argument, every persuasion
 to induce her to stop his journey. She answered the one with a gush of
 tears--telling me that to be persuaded--life and the goods of life were
 a cheap exchange. It was not will that she wanted, but the capacity; again
 and again she declared, it were as easy to enchain the sea, to put reins on
 the wind's viewless courses, as for her to take truth for falsehood, deceit
 for honesty, heartless communion for sincere, confiding love. She answered
 my reasonings more briefly, declaring with disdain, that the reason was
 hers; and, until I could persuade her that the past could be unacted, that
 maturity could go back to the cradle, and that all that was could become as
 though it had never been, it was useless to assure her that no real change
 had taken place in her fate. And thus with stern pride she suffered him to
 go, though her very heart-strings cracked at the fulfilling of the act,
 which rent from her all that made life valuable.
 
 To change the scene for her, and even for ourselves, all unhinged by the
 cloud that had come over us, I persuaded my two remaining companions that
 it were better that we should absent ourselves for a time from Windsor. We
 visited the north of England, my native Ulswater, and lingered in scenes
 dear from a thousand associations. We lengthened our tour into Scotland,
 that we might see Loch Katrine and Loch Lomond; thence we crossed to
 Ireland, and passed several weeks in the neighbourhood of Killarney. The
 change of scene operated to a great degree as I expected; after a year's
 absence, Perdita returned in gentler and more docile mood to Windsor. The
 first sight of this place for a time unhinged her. Here every spot was
 distinct with associations now grown bitter. The forest glades, the ferny
 dells, and lawny uplands, the cultivated and cheerful country spread around
 the silver pathway of ancient Thames, all earth, air, and wave, took up one
 choral voice, inspired by memory, instinct with plaintive regret.
 
 But my essay towards bringing her to a saner view of her own situation, did
 not end here. Perdita was still to a great degree uneducated. When first
 she left her peasant life, and resided with the elegant and cultivated
 Evadne, the only accomplishment she brought to any perfection was that of
 painting, for which she had a taste almost amounting to genius. This had
 occupied her in her lonely cottage, when she quitted her Greek friend's
 protection. Her pallet and easel were now thrown aside; did she try to
 paint, thronging recollections made her hand tremble, her eyes fill with
 tears. With this occupation she gave up almost every other; and her mind
 preyed upon itself almost to madness.
 
 For my own part, since Adrian had first withdrawn me from my selvatic
 wilderness to his own paradise of order and beauty, I had been wedded to
 literature. I felt convinced that however it might have been in former
 times, in the present stage of the world, no man's faculties could be
 developed, no man's moral principle be enlarged and liberal, without an
 extensive acquaintance with books. To me they stood in the place of an
 active career, of ambition, and those palpable excitements necessary to the
 multitude. The collation of philosophical opinions, the study of historical
 facts, the acquirement of languages, were at once my recreation, and the
 serious aim of my life. I turned author myself. My productions however were
 sufficiently unpretending; they were confined to the biography of favourite
 historical characters, especially those whom I believed to have been
 traduced, or about whom clung obscurity and doubt.
 
 As my authorship increased, I acquired new sympathies and pleasures. I
 found another and a valuable link to enchain me to my fellow-creatures; my
 point of sight was extended, and the inclinations and capacities of all
 human beings became deeply interesting to me. Kings have been called the
 fathers of their people. Suddenly I became as it were the father of all
 mankind. Posterity became my heirs. My thoughts were gems to enrich the
 treasure house of man's intellectual possessions; each sentiment was a
 precious gift I bestowed on them. Let not these aspirations be attributed
 to vanity. They were not expressed in words, nor even reduced to form in my
 own mind; but they filled my soul, exalting my thoughts, raising a glow of
 enthusiasm, and led me out of the obscure path in which I before walked,
 into the bright noon-enlightened highway of mankind, making me, citizen of
 the world, a candidate for immortal honors, an eager aspirant to the praise
 and sympathy of my fellow men.
 
 No one certainly ever enjoyed the pleasures of composition more intensely
 than I. If I left the woods, the solemn music of the waving branches, and
 the majestic temple of nature, I sought the vast halls of the Castle, and
 looked over wide, fertile England, spread beneath our regal mount, and
 listened the while to inspiring strains of music. At such times solemn
 harmonies or spirit-stirring airs gave wings to my lagging thoughts,
 permitting them, methought, to penetrate the last veil of nature and her
 God, and to display the highest beauty in visible expression to the
 understandings of men. As the music went on, my ideas seemed to quit their
 mortal dwelling house; they shook their pinions and began a flight, sailing
 on the placid current of thought, filling the creation with new glory, and
 rousing sublime imagery that else had slept voiceless. Then I would hasten
 to my desk, weave the new-found web of mind in firm texture and brilliant
 colours, leaving the fashioning of the material to a calmer moment.
 
 But this account, which might as properly belong to a former period of my
 life as to the present moment, leads me far afield. It was the pleasure I
 took in literature, the discipline of mind I found arise from it, that made
 me eager to lead Perdita to the same pursuits. I began with light hand and
 gentle allurement; first exciting her curiosity, and then satisfying it in
 such a way as might occasion her, at the same time that she half forgot her
 sorrows in occupation, to find in the hours that succeeded a reaction of
 benevolence and toleration.
 
 Intellectual activity, though not directed towards books, had always been
 my sister's characteristic. It had been displayed early in life, leading
 her out to solitary musing among her native mountains, causing her to form
 innumerous combinations from common objects, giving strength to her
 perceptions, and swiftness to their arrangement. Love had come, as the rod
 of the master-prophet, to swallow up every minor propensity. Love had
 doubled all her excellencies, and placed a diadem on her genius. Was she to
 cease to love? Take the colours and odour from the rose, change the sweet
 nutriment of mother's milk to gall and poison; as easily might you wean
 Perdita from love. She grieved for the loss of Raymond with an anguish,
 that exiled all smile from her lips, and trenched sad lines on her brow of
 beauty. But each day seemed to change the nature of her suffering, and
 every succeeding hour forced her to alter (if so I may style it) the
 fashion of her soul's mourning garb. For a time music was able to satisfy
 the cravings of her mental hunger, and her melancholy thoughts renewed
 themselves in each change of key, and varied with every alteration in the
 strain. My schooling first impelled her towards books; and, if music had
 been the food of sorrow, the productions of the wise became its
 medicine. The acquisition of unknown languages was too tedious an
 occupation, for one who referred every expression to the universe within,
 and read not, as many do, for the mere sake of filling up time; but who was
 still questioning herself and her author, moulding every idea in a thousand
 ways, ardently desirous for the discovery of truth in every sentence. She
 sought to improve her understanding; mechanically her heart and
 dispositions became soft and gentle under this benign discipline. After
 awhile she discovered, that amidst all her newly acquired knowledge, her
 own character, which formerly she fancied that she thoroughly understood,
 became the first in rank among the terrae incognitae, the pathless wilds of
 a country that had no chart. Erringly and strangely she began the task of
 self-examination with self-condemnation. And then again she became aware of
 her own excellencies, and began to balance with juster scales the shades of
 good and evil. I, who longed beyond words, to restore her to the happiness
 it was still in her power to enjoy, watched with anxiety the result of
 these internal proceedings.
 
 But man is a strange animal. We cannot calculate on his forces like that of
 an engine; and, though an impulse draw with a forty-horse power at what
 appears willing to yield to one, yet in contempt of calculation the
 movement is not effected. Neither grief, philosophy, nor love could make
 Perdita think with mildness of the dereliction of Raymond. She now took
 pleasure in my society; towards Idris she felt and displayed a full and
 affectionate sense of her worth--she restored to her child in abundant
 measure her tenderness and care. But I could discover, amidst all her
 repinings, deep resentment towards Raymond, and an unfading sense of
 injury, that plucked from me my hope, when I appeared nearest to its
 fulfilment. Among other painful restrictions, she has occasioned it to
 become a law among us, never to mention Raymond's name before her. She
 refused to read any communications from Greece, desiring me only to mention
 when any arrived, and whether the wanderers were well. It was curious that
 even little Clara observed this law towards her mother. This lovely child
 was nearly eight years of age. Formerly she had been a light-hearted
 infant, fanciful, but gay and childish. After the departure of her father,
 thought became impressed on her young brow. Children, unadepts in language,
 seldom find words to express their thoughts, nor could we tell in what
 manner the late events had impressed themselves on her mind. But certainly
 she had made deep observations while she noted in silence the changes that
 passed around her. She never mentioned her father to Perdita, she appeared
 half afraid when she spoke of him to me, and though I tried to draw her out
 on the subject, and to dispel the gloom that hung about her ideas
 concerning him, I could not succeed. Yet each foreign post-day she watched
 for the arrival of letters--knew the post mark, and watched me as I read.
 I found her often poring over the article of Greek intelligence in the
 newspaper.
 
 There is no more painful sight than that of untimely care in children, and
 it was particularly observable in one whose disposition had heretofore been
 mirthful. Yet there was so much sweetness and docility about Clara, that
 your admiration was excited; and if the moods of mind are calculated to
 paint the cheek with beauty, and endow motions with grace, surely her
 contemplations must have been celestial; since every lineament was moulded
 into loveliness, and her motions were more harmonious than the elegant
 boundings of the fawns of her native forest. I sometimes expostulated with
 Perdita on the subject of her reserve; but she rejected my counsels, while
 her daughter's sensibility excited in her a tenderness still more
 passionate.
 
 After the lapse of more than a year, Adrian returned from Greece.
 
 When our exiles had first arrived, a truce was in existence between the
 Turks and Greeks; a truce that was as sleep to the mortal frame, signal of
 renewed activity on waking. With the numerous soldiers of Asia, with all of
 warlike stores, ships, and military engines, that wealth and power could
 command, the Turks at once resolved to crush an enemy, which creeping on by
 degrees, had from their stronghold in the Morea, acquired Thrace and
 Macedonia, and had led their armies even to the gates of Constantinople,
 while their extensive commercial relations gave every European nation an
 interest in their success. Greece prepared for a vigorous resistance; it
 rose to a man; and the women, sacrificing their costly ornaments, accoutred
 their sons for the war, and bade them conquer or die with the spirit of the
 Spartan mother. The talents and courage of Raymond were highly esteemed
 among the Greeks. Born at Athens, that city claimed him for her own, and by
 giving him the command of her peculiar division in the army, the
 commander-in-chief only possessed superior power. He was numbered among her
 citizens, his name was added to the list of Grecian heroes. His judgment,
 activity, and consummate bravery, justified their choice. The Earl of
 Windsor became a volunteer under his friend.
 
 "It is well," said Adrian, "to prate of war in these pleasant shades, and
 with much ill-spent oil make a show of joy, because many thousand of our
 fellow-creatures leave with pain this sweet air and natal earth. I shall
 not be suspected of being averse to the Greek cause; I know and feel its
 necessity; it is beyond every other a good cause. I have defended it with
 my sword, and was willing that my spirit should be breathed out in its
 defence; freedom is of more worth than life, and the Greeks do well to
 defend their privilege unto death. But let us not deceive ourselves. The
 Turks are men; each fibre, each limb is as feeling as our own, and every
 spasm, be it mental or bodily, is as truly felt in a Turk's heart or brain,
 as in a Greek's. The last action at which I was present was the taking of
 ----. The Turks resisted to the last, the garrison perished on the
 ramparts, and we entered by assault. Every breathing creature within the
 walls was massacred. Think you, amidst the shrieks of violated innocence
 and helpless infancy, I did not feel in every nerve the cry of a fellow
 being? They were men and women, the sufferers, before they were Mahometans,
 and when they rise turbanless from the grave, in what except their good or
 evil actions will they be the better or worse than we? Two soldiers
 contended for a girl, whose rich dress and extreme beauty excited the
 brutal appetites of these wretches, who, perhaps good men among their
 families, were changed by the fury of the moment into incarnated evils. An
 old man, with a silver beard, decrepid and bald, he might be her
 grandfather, interposed to save her; the battle axe of one of them clove
 his skull. I rushed to her defence, but rage made them blind and deaf; they
 did not distinguish my Christian garb or heed my words--words were blunt
 weapons then, for while war cried "havoc," and murder gave fit echo, how
 could I--
 
   Turn back the tide of ills, relieving wrong
   With mild accost of soothing eloquence?
 
 One of the fellows, enraged at my interference, struck me with his bayonet
 in the side, and I fell senseless.
 
 "This wound will probably shorten my life, having shattered a frame, weak
 of itself. But I am content to die. I have learnt in Greece that one man,
 more or less, is of small import, while human bodies remain to fill up the
 thinned ranks of the soldiery; and that the identity of an individual may
 be overlooked, so that the muster roll contain its full numbers. All this
 has a different effect upon Raymond. He is able to contemplate the ideal of
 war, while I am sensible only to its realities. He is a soldier, a general.
 He can influence the blood-thirsty war-dogs, while I resist their
 propensities vainly. The cause is simple. Burke has said that, 'in all
 bodies those who would lead, must also, in a considerable degree, follow.'
 --I cannot follow; for I do not sympathize in their dreams of massacre and
 glory--to follow and to lead in such a career, is the natural bent of
 Raymond's mind. He is always successful, and bids fair, at the same time
 that he acquires high name and station for himself, to secure liberty,
 probably extended empire, to the Greeks."
 
 Perdita's mind was not softened by this account. He, she thought, can be
 great and happy without me. Would that I also had a career! Would that I
 could freight some untried bark with all my hopes, energies, and desires,
 and launch it forth into the ocean of life--bound for some attainable
 point, with ambition or pleasure at the helm! But adverse winds detain me
 on shore; like Ulysses, I sit at the water's edge and weep. But my
 nerveless hands can neither fell the trees, nor smooth the planks. Under
 the influence of these melancholy thoughts, she became more than ever in
 love with sorrow. Yet Adrian's presence did some good; he at once broke
 through the law of silence observed concerning Raymond. At first she
 started from the unaccustomed sound; soon she got used to it and to love
 it, and she listened with avidity to the account of his achievements. Clara
 got rid also of her restraint; Adrian and she had been old playfellows; and
 now, as they walked or rode together, he yielded to her earnest entreaty,
 and repeated, for the hundredth time, some tale of her father's bravery,
 munificence, or justice.
 
 Each vessel in the mean time brought exhilarating tidings from Greece. The
 presence of a friend in its armies and councils made us enter into the
 details with enthusiasm; and a short letter now and then from Raymond told
 us how he was engrossed by the interests of his adopted country. The Greeks
 were strongly attached to their commercial pursuits, and would have been
 satisfied with their present acquisitions, had not the Turks roused them by
 invasion. The patriots were victorious; a spirit of conquest was instilled;
 and already they looked on Constantinople as their own. Raymond rose
 perpetually in their estimation; but one man held a superior command to him
 in their armies. He was conspicuous for his conduct and choice of position
 in a battle fought in the plains of Thrace, on the banks of the Hebrus,
 which was to decide the fate of Islam. The Mahometans were defeated, and
 driven entirely from the country west of this river. The battle was
 sanguinary, the loss of the Turks apparently irreparable; the Greeks, in
 losing one man, forgot the nameless crowd strewed upon the bloody field,
 and they ceased to value themselves on a victory, which cost them--
 Raymond.
 
 At the battle of Makri he had led the charge of cavalry, and pursued the
 fugitives even to the banks of the Hebrus. His favourite horse was found
 grazing by the margin of the tranquil river. It became a question whether
 he had fallen among the unrecognized; but no broken ornament or stained
 trapping betrayed his fate. It was suspected that the Turks, finding
 themselves possessed of so illustrious a captive, resolved to satisfy their
 cruelty rather than their avarice, and fearful of the interference of
 England, had come to the determination of concealing for ever the
 cold-blooded murder of the soldier they most hated and feared in the
 squadrons of their enemy.
 
 Raymond was not forgotten in England. His abdication of the Protectorate
 had caused an unexampled sensation; and, when his magnificent and manly
 system was contrasted with the narrow views of succeeding politicians, the
 period of his elevation was referred to with sorrow. The perpetual
 recurrence of his name, joined to most honourable testimonials, in the
 Greek gazettes, kept up the interest he had excited. He seemed the
 favourite child of fortune, and his untimely loss eclipsed the world, and
 shewed forth the remnant of mankind with diminished lustre. They clung with
 eagerness to the hope held out that he might yet be alive. Their minister
 at Constantinople was urged to make the necessary perquisitions, and should
 his existence be ascertained, to demand his release. It was to be hoped
 that their efforts would succeed, and that though now a prisoner, the sport
 of cruelty and the mark of hate, he would be rescued from danger and
 restored to the happiness, power, and honour which he deserved.
 
 The effect of this intelligence upon my sister was striking. She never for
 a moment credited the story of his death; she resolved instantly to go to
 Greece. Reasoning and persuasion were thrown away upon her; she would
 endure no hindrance, no delay. It may be advanced for a truth, that, if
 argument or entreaty can turn any one from a desperate purpose, whose
 motive and end depends on the strength of the affections only, then it is
 right so to turn them, since their docility shews, that neither the motive
 nor the end were of sufficient force to bear them through the obstacles
 attendant on their undertaking. If, on the contrary, they are proof against
 expostulation, this very steadiness is an omen of success; and it becomes
 the duty of those who love them, to assist in smoothing the obstructions in
 their path. Such sentiments actuated our little circle. Finding Perdita
 immoveable, we consulted as to the best means of furthering her purpose.
 She could not go alone to a country where she had no friends, where she
 might arrive only to hear the dreadful news, which must overwhelm her with
 grief and remorse. Adrian, whose health had always been weak, now suffered
 considerable aggravation of suffering from the effects of his wound. Idris
 could not endure to leave him in this state; nor was it right either to
 quit or take with us a young family for a journey of this description. I
 resolved at length to accompany Perdita. The separation from my Idris was
 painful--but necessity reconciled us to it in some degree: necessity and
 the hope of saving Raymond, and restoring him again to happiness and
 Perdita. No delay was to ensue. Two days after we came to our
 determination, we set out for Portsmouth, and embarked. The season was May,
 the weather stormless; we were promised a prosperous voyage. Cherishing the
 most fervent hopes, embarked on the waste ocean, we saw with delight the
 receding shore of Britain, and on the wings of desire outspeeded our well
 filled sails towards the South. The light curling waves bore us onward, and
 old ocean smiled at the freight of love and hope committed to his charge;
 it stroked gently its tempestuous plains, and the path was smoothed for us.
 Day and night the wind right aft, gave steady impulse to our keel--nor
 did rough gale, or treacherous sand, or destructive rock interpose an
 obstacle between my sister and the land which was to restore her to her
 first beloved,
 
   Her dear heart's confessor--a heart within that heart.
 
 
 
 
 VOL. II.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 DURING this voyage, when on calm evenings we conversed on deck, watching
 the glancing of the waves and the changeful appearances of the sky, I
 discovered the total revolution that the disasters of Raymond had wrought
 in the mind of my sister. Were they the same waters of love, which, lately
 cold and cutting as ice, repelling as that, now loosened from their frozen
 chains, flowed through the regions of her soul in gushing and grateful
 exuberance? She did not believe that he was dead, but she knew that he was
 in danger, and the hope of assisting in his liberation, and the idea of
 soothing by tenderness the ills that he might have undergone, elevated and
 harmonized the late jarring element of her being. I was not so sanguine as
 she as to the result of our voyage. She was not sanguine, but secure; and
 the expectation of seeing the lover she had banished, the husband, friend,
 heart's companion from whom she had long been alienated, wrapt her senses
 in delight, her mind in placidity. It was beginning life again; it was
 leaving barren sands for an abode of fertile beauty; it was a harbour after
 a tempest, an opiate after sleepless nights, a happy waking from a terrible
 dream.
 
 Little Clara accompanied us; the poor child did not well understand what
 was going forward. She heard that we were bound for Greece, that she would
 see her father, and now, for the first time, she prattled of him to her
 mother.
 
 On landing at Athens we found difficulties encrease upon us: nor could the
 storied earth or balmy atmosphere inspire us with enthusiasm or pleasure,
 while the fate of Raymond was in jeopardy. No man had ever excited so
 strong an interest in the public mind; this was apparent even among the
 phlegmatic English, from whom he had long been absent. The Athenians had
 expected their hero to return in triumph; the women had taught their
 children to lisp his name joined to thanksgiving; his manly beauty, his
 courage, his devotion to their cause, made him appear in their eyes almost
 as one of the ancient deities of the soil descended from their native
 Olympus to defend them. When they spoke of his probable death and certain
 captivity, tears streamed from their eyes; even as the women of Syria
 sorrowed for Adonis, did the wives and mothers of Greece lament our English
 Raymond--Athens was a city of mourning.
 
 All these shews of despair struck Perdita with affright. With that sanguine
 but confused expectation, which desire engendered while she was at a
 distance from reality, she had formed an image in her mind of instantaneous
 change, when she should set her foot on Grecian shores. She fancied that
 Raymond would already be free, and that her tender attentions would come to
 entirely obliterate even the memory of his mischance. But his fate was
 still uncertain; she began to fear the worst, and to feel that her soul's
 hope was cast on a chance that might prove a blank. The wife and lovely
 child of Lord Raymond became objects of intense interest in Athens. The
 gates of their abode were besieged, audible prayers were breathed for his
 restoration; all these circumstances added to the dismay and fears of
 Perdita.
 
 My exertions were unremitted: after a time I left Athens, and joined the
 army stationed at Kishan in Thrace. Bribery, threats, and intrigue, soon
 discovered the secret that Raymond was alive, a prisoner, suffering the
 most rigorous confinement and wanton cruelties. We put in movement every
 impulse of policy and money to redeem him from their hands.
 
 The impatience of my sister's disposition now returned on her, awakened by
 repentance, sharpened by remorse. The very beauty of the Grecian climate,
 during the season of spring, added torture to her sensations. The
 unexampled loveliness of the flower-clad earth--the genial sunshine and
 grateful shade--the melody of the birds--the majesty of the woods--
 the splendour of the marble ruins--the clear effulgence of the stars by
 night--the combination of all that was exciting and voluptuous in this
 transcending land, by inspiring a quicker spirit of life and an added
 sensitiveness to every articulation of her frame, only gave edge to the
 poignancy of her grief. Each long hour was counted, and "He suffers" was
 the burthen of all her thoughts. She abstained from food; she lay on the
 bare earth, and, by such mimickry of his enforced torments, endeavoured to
 hold communion with his distant pain. I remembered in one of her harshest
 moments a quotation of mine had roused her to anger and disdain. "Perdita,"
 I had said, "some day you will discover that you have done wrong in again
 casting Raymond on the thorns of life. When disappointment has sullied his
 beauty, when a soldier's hardships have bent his manly form, and loneliness
 made even triumph bitter to him, then you will repent; and regret for the
 irreparable change
 
   "will move
   In hearts all rocky now, the late remorse of love."[1]
 
 The stinging "remorse of love" now pierced her heart. She accused herself
 of his journey to Greece--his dangers--his imprisonment. She pictured
 to herself the anguish of his solitude; she remembered with what eager
 delight he had in former days made her the partner of his joyful hopes--
 with what grateful affection he received her sympathy in his cares. She
 called to mind how often he had declared that solitude was to him the
 greatest of all evils, and how death itself was to him more full of fear
 and pain when he pictured to himself a lonely grave. "My best girl," he had
 said, "relieves me from these phantasies. United to her, cherished in her
 dear heart, never again shall I know the misery of finding myself alone.
 Even if I die before you, my Perdita, treasure up my ashes till yours may
 mingle with mine. It is a foolish sentiment for one who is not a
 materialist, yet, methinks, even in that dark cell, I may feel that my
 inanimate dust mingles with yours, and thus have a companion in decay." In
 her resentful mood, these expressions had been remembered with acrimony and
 disdain; they visited her in her softened hour, taking sleep from her eyes,
 all hope of rest from her uneasy mind.
 
 Two months passed thus, when at last we obtained a promise of Raymond's
 release. Confinement and hardship had undermined his health; the Turks
 feared an accomplishment of the threats of the English government, if he
 died under their hands; they looked upon his recovery as impossible; they
 delivered him up as a dying man, willingly making over to us the rites of
 burial.
 
 He came by sea from Constantinople to Athens. The wind, favourable to him,
 blew so strongly in shore, that we were unable, as we had at first
 intended, to meet him on his watery road. The watchtower of Athens was
 besieged by inquirers, each sail eagerly looked out for; till on the first
 of May the gallant frigate bore in sight, freighted with treasure more
 invaluable than the wealth which, piloted from Mexico, the vexed Pacific
 swallowed, or that was conveyed over its tranquil bosom to enrich the crown
 of Spain. At early dawn the vessel was discovered bearing in shore; it was
 conjectured that it would cast anchor about five miles from land. The news
 spread through Athens, and the whole city poured out at the gate of the
 Piraeus, down the roads, through the vineyards, the olive woods and
 plantations of fig-trees, towards the harbour. The noisy joy of the
 populace, the gaudy colours of their dress, the tumult of carriages and
 horses, the march of soldiers intermixed, the waving of banners and sound
 of martial music added to the high excitement of the scene; while round us
 reposed in solemn majesty the relics of antient time. To our right the
 Acropolis rose high, spectatress of a thousand changes, of ancient glory,
 Turkish slavery, and the restoration of dear-bought liberty; tombs and
 cenotaphs were strewed thick around, adorned by ever renewing vegetation;
 the mighty dead hovered over their monuments, and beheld in our enthusiasm
 and congregated numbers a renewal of the scenes in which they had been the
 actors. Perdita and Clara rode in a close carriage; I attended them on
 horseback. At length we arrived at the harbour; it was agitated by the
 outward swell of the sea; the beach, as far could be discerned, was covered
 by a moving multitude, which, urged by those behind toward the sea, again
 rushed back as the heavy waves with sullen roar burst close to them. I
 applied my glass, and could discern that the frigate had already cast
 anchor, fearful of the danger of approaching nearer to a lee shore: a boat
 was lowered; with a pang I saw that Raymond was unable to descend the
 vessel's side; he was let down in a chair, and lay wrapt in cloaks at the
 bottom of the boat.
 
 I dismounted, and called to some sailors who were rowing about the harbour
 to pull up, and take me into their skiff; Perdita at the same moment
 alighted from her carriage--she seized my arm--"Take me with you," she
 cried; she was trembling and pale; Clara clung to her--"You must not," I
 said, "the sea is rough--he will soon be here--do you not see his
 boat?" The little bark to which I had beckoned had now pulled up; before I
 could stop her, Perdita, assisted by the sailors was in it--Clara
 followed her mother--a loud shout echoed from the crowd as we pulled out
 of the inner harbour; while my sister at the prow, had caught hold of one
 of the men who was using a glass, asking a thousand questions, careless of
 the spray that broke over her, deaf, sightless to all, except the little
 speck that, just visible on the top of the waves, evidently neared. We
 approached with all the speed six rowers could give; the orderly and
 picturesque dress of the soldiers on the beach, the sounds of exulting
 music, the stirring breeze and waving flags, the unchecked exclamations of
 the eager crowd, whose dark looks and foreign garb were purely eastern; the
 sight of temple-crowned rock, the white marble of the buildings glittering
 in the sun, and standing in bright relief against the dark ridge of lofty
 mountains beyond; the near roar of the sea, the splash of oars, and dash of
 spray, all steeped my soul in a delirium, unfelt, unimagined in the common
 course of common life. Trembling, I was unable to continue to look through
 the glass with which I had watched the motion of the crew, when the
 frigate's boat had first been launched. We rapidly drew near, so that at
 length the number and forms of those within could be discerned; its dark
 sides grew big, and the splash of its oars became audible: I could
 distinguish the languid form of my friend, as he half raised himself at our
 approach.
 
 Perdita's questions had ceased; she leaned on my arm, panting with emotions
 too acute for tears--our men pulled alongside the other boat. As a last
 effort, my sister mustered her strength, her firmness; she stepped from one
 boat to the other, and then with a shriek she sprang towards Raymond, knelt
 at his side, and glueing her lips to the hand she seized, her face shrouded
 by her long hair, gave herself up to tears.
 
 Raymond had somewhat raised himself at our approach, but it was with
 difficulty that he exerted himself even thus much. With sunken cheek and
 hollow eyes, pale and gaunt, how could I recognize the beloved of Perdita?
 I continued awe-struck and mute--he looked smilingly on the poor girl;
 the smile was his. A day of sun-shine falling on a dark valley, displays
 its before hidden characteristics; and now this smile, the same with which
 he first spoke love to Perdita, with which he had welcomed the
 protectorate, playing on his altered countenance, made me in my heart's
 core feel that this was Raymond.
 
 He stretched out to me his other hand; I discerned the trace of manacles on
 his bared wrist. I heard my sister's sobs, and thought, happy are women who
 can weep, and in a passionate caress disburthen the oppression of their
 feelings; shame and habitual restraint hold back a man. I would have given
 worlds to have acted as in days of boyhood, have strained him to my breast,
 pressed his hand to my lips, and wept over him; my swelling heart choked
 me; the natural current would not be checked; the big rebellious tears
 gathered in my eyes; I turned aside, and they dropped in the sea--they
 came fast and faster;--yet I could hardly be ashamed, for I saw that the
 rough sailors were not unmoved, and Raymond's eyes alone were dry from
 among our crew. He lay in that blessed calm which convalescence always
 induces, enjoying in secure tranquillity his liberty and re-union with her
 whom he adored. Perdita at length subdued her burst of passion, and rose,
 --she looked round for Clara; the child frightened, not recognizing her
 father, and neglected by us, had crept to the other end of the boat; she
 came at her mother's call. Perdita presented her to Raymond; her first
 words were: "Beloved, embrace our child!"
 
 "Come hither, sweet one," said her father, "do you not know me?" she
 knew his voice, and cast herself in his arms with half bashful but
 uncontrollable emotion.
 
 Perceiving the weakness of Raymond, I was afraid of ill consequences from
 the pressure of the crowd on his landing. But they were awed as I had been,
 at the change of his appearance. The music died away, the shouts abruptly
 ended; the soldiers had cleared a space in which a carriage was drawn up.
 He was placed in it; Perdita and Clara entered with him, and his escort
 closed round it; a hollow murmur, akin to the roaring of the near waves,
 went through the multitude; they fell back as the carriage advanced, and
 fearful of injuring him they had come to welcome, by loud testimonies of
 joy, they satisfied themselves with bending in a low salaam as the carriage
 passed; it went slowly along the road of the Piraeus; passed by antique
 temple and heroic tomb, beneath the craggy rock of the citadel. The sound
 of the waves was left behind; that of the multitude continued at intervals,
 supressed and hoarse; and though, in the city, the houses, churches, and
 public buildings were decorated with tapestry and banners--though the
 soldiery lined the streets, and the inhabitants in thousands were assembled
 to give him hail, the same solemn silence prevailed, the soldiery presented
 arms, the banners vailed, many a white hand waved a streamer, and vainly
 sought to discern the hero in the vehicle, which, closed and encompassed by
 the city guards, drew him to the palace allotted for his abode.
 
 Raymond was weak and exhausted, yet the interest he perceived to be excited
 on his account, filled him with proud pleasure. He was nearly killed with
 kindness. It is true, the populace retained themselves; but there arose a
 perpetual hum and bustle from the throng round the palace, which added to
 the noise of fireworks, the frequent explosion of arms, the tramp to and
 fro of horsemen and carriages, to which effervescence he was the focus,
 retarded his recovery. So we retired awhile to Eleusis, and here rest and
 tender care added each day to the strength of our invalid. The zealous
 attention of Perdita claimed the first rank in the causes which induced his
 rapid recovery; but the second was surely the delight he felt in the
 affection and good will of the Greeks. We are said to love much those whom
 we greatly benefit. Raymond had fought and conquered for the Athenians; he
 had suffered, on their account, peril, imprisonment, and hardship; their
 gratitude affected him deeply, and he inly vowed to unite his fate for ever
 to that of a people so enthusiastically devoted to him.
 
 Social feeling and sympathy constituted a marked feature in my disposition.
 In early youth, the living drama acted around me, drew me heart and soul
 into its vortex. I was now conscious of a change. I loved, I hoped, I
 enjoyed; but there was something besides this. I was inquisitive as to the
 internal principles of action of those around me: anxious to read their
 thoughts justly, and for ever occupied in divining their inmost mind. All
 events, at the same time that they deeply interested me, arranged
 themselves in pictures before me. I gave the right place to every personage
 in the groupe, the just balance to every sentiment. This undercurrent of
 thought, often soothed me amidst distress, and even agony. It gave ideality
 to that, from which, taken in naked truth, the soul would have revolted: it
 bestowed pictorial colours on misery and disease, and not unfrequently
 relieved me from despair in deplorable changes. This faculty, or instinct,
 was now rouzed. I watched the re-awakened devotion of my sister; Clara's
 timid, but concentrated admiration of her father, and Raymond's appetite
 for renown, and sensitiveness to the demonstrations of affection of the
 Athenians. Attentively perusing this animated volume, I was the less
 surprised at the tale I read on the new-turned page.
 
 The Turkish army were at this time besieging Rodosto; and the Greeks,
 hastening their preparations, and sending each day reinforcements, were on
 the eve of forcing the enemy to battle. Each people looked on the coming
 struggle as that which would be to a great degree decisive; as, in case of
 victory, the next step would be the siege of Constantinople by the Greeks.
 Raymond, being somewhat recovered, prepared to re-assume his command in the
 army.
 
 Perdita did not oppose herself to his determination. She only stipulated to
 be permitted to accompany him. She had set down no rule of conduct for
 herself; but for her life she could not have opposed his slightest wish, or
 do other than acquiesce cheerfully in all his projects. One word, in truth,
 had alarmed her more than battles or sieges, during which she trusted
 Raymond's high command would exempt him from danger. That word, as yet it
 was not more to her, was PLAGUE. This enemy to the human race had begun
 early in June to raise its serpent-head on the shores of the Nile; parts of
 Asia, not usually subject to this evil, were infected. It was in
 Constantinople; but as each year that city experienced a like visitation,
 small attention was paid to those accounts which declared more people to
 have died there already, than usually made up the accustomed prey of the
 whole of the hotter months. However it might be, neither plague nor war
 could prevent Perdita from following her lord, or induce her to utter one
 objection to the plans which he proposed. To be near him, to be loved by
 him, to feel him again her own, was the limit of her desires. The object of
 her life was to do him pleasure: it had been so before, but with a
 difference. In past times, without thought or foresight she had made him
 happy, being so herself, and in any question of choice, consulted her own
 wishes, as being one with his. Now she sedulously put herself out of the
 question, sacrificing even her anxiety for his health and welfare to her
 resolve not to oppose any of his desires. Love of the Greek people,
 appetite for glory, and hatred of the barbarian government under which he
 had suffered even to the approach of death, stimulated him. He wished to
 repay the kindness of the Athenians, to keep alive the splendid
 associations connected with his name, and to eradicate from Europe a power
 which, while every other nation advanced in civilization, stood still, a
 monument of antique barbarism. Having effected the reunion of Raymond and
 Perdita, I was eager to return to England; but his earnest request, added
 to awakening curiosity, and an indefinable anxiety to behold the
 catastrophe, now apparently at hand, in the long drawn history of Grecian
 and Turkish warfare, induced me to consent to prolong until the autumn, the
 period of my residence in Greece.
 
 As soon as the health of Raymond was sufficiently re-established, he
 prepared to join the Grecian camp, hear Kishan, a town of some importance,
 situated to the east of the Hebrus; in which Perdita and Clara were to
 remain until the event of the expected battle. We quitted Athens on the 2nd
 of June. Raymond had recovered from the gaunt and pallid looks of fever. If
 I no longer saw the fresh glow of youth on his matured countenance, if care
 had besieged his brow, "And dug deep trenches in his beauty's field," if
 his hair, slightly mingled with grey, and his look, considerate even in its
 eagerness, gave signs of added years and past sufferings, yet there was
 something irresistibly affecting in the sight of one, lately snatched from
 the grave, renewing his career, untamed by sickness or disaster. The
 Athenians saw in him, not as heretofore, the heroic boy or desperate man,
 who was ready to die for them; but the prudent commander, who for their
 sakes was careful of his life, and could make his own warrior-propensities
 second to the scheme of conduct policy might point out.
 
 All Athens accompanied us for several miles. When he had landed a month
 ago, the noisy populace had been hushed by sorrow and fear; but this was a
 festival day to all. The air resounded with their shouts; their picturesque
 costume, and the gay colours of which it was composed, flaunted in the
 sunshine; their eager gestures and rapid utterance accorded with their wild
 appearance. Raymond was the theme of every tongue, the hope of each wife,
 mother or betrothed bride, whose husband, child, or lover, making a part of
 the Greek army, were to be conducted to victory by him.
 
 Notwithstanding the hazardous object of our journey, it was full of
 romantic interest, as we passed through the vallies, and over the hills, of
 this divine country. Raymond was inspirited by the intense sensations of
 recovered health; he felt that in being general of the Athenians, he filled
 a post worthy of his ambition; and, in his hope of the conquest of
 Constantinople, he counted on an event which would be as a landmark in the
 waste of ages, an exploit unequalled in the annals of man; when a city of
 grand historic association, the beauty of whose site was the wonder of the
 world, which for many hundred years had been the strong hold of the
 Moslems, should be rescued from slavery and barbarism, and restored to a
 people illustrious for genius, civilization, and a spirit of liberty.
 Perdita rested on his restored society, on his love, his hopes and fame,
 even as a Sybarite on a luxurious couch; every thought was transport, each
 emotion bathed as it were in a congenial and balmy element.
 
 We arrived at Kishan on the 7th of July. The weather during our journey had
 been serene. Each day, before dawn, we left our night's encampment, and
 watched the shadows as they retreated from hill and valley, and the golden
 splendour of the sun's approach. The accompanying soldiers received, with
 national vivacity, enthusiastic pleasure from the sight of beautiful
 nature. The uprising of the star of day was hailed by triumphant strains,
 while the birds, heard by snatches, filled up the intervals of the music.
 At noon, we pitched our tents in some shady valley, or embowering wood
 among the mountains, while a stream prattling over pebbles induced grateful
 sleep. Our evening march, more calm, was yet more delightful than the
 morning restlessness of spirit. If the band played, involuntarily they
 chose airs of moderated passion; the farewell of love, or lament at
 absence, was followed and closed by some solemn hymn, which harmonized with
 the tranquil loveliness of evening, and elevated the soul to grand and
 religious thought. Often all sounds were suspended, that we might listen to
 the nightingale, while the fire-flies danced in bright measure, and the
 soft cooing of the aziolo spoke of fair weather to the travellers. Did we
 pass a valley? Soft shades encompassed us, and rocks tinged with beauteous
 hues. If we traversed a mountain, Greece, a living map, was spread beneath,
 her renowned pinnacles cleaving the ether; her rivers threading in silver
 line the fertile land. Afraid almost to breathe, we English travellers
 surveyed with extasy this splendid landscape, so different from the sober
 hues and melancholy graces of our native scenery. When we quitted
 Macedonia, the fertile but low plains of Thrace afforded fewer beauties;
 yet our journey continued to be interesting. An advanced guard gave
 information of our approach, and the country people were quickly in motion
 to do honour to Lord Raymond. The villages were decorated by triumphal
 arches of greenery by day, and lamps by night; tapestry waved from the
 windows, the ground was strewed with flowers, and the name of Raymond,
 joined to that of Greece, was echoed in the Evive of the peasant crowd.
 
 When we arrived at Kishan, we learnt, that on hearing of the advance of
 Lord Raymond and his detachment, the Turkish army had retreated from
 Rodosto; but meeting with a reinforcement, they had re-trod their steps. In
 the meantime, Argyropylo, the Greek commander-in-chief, had advanced, so as
 to be between the Turks and Rodosto; a battle, it was said, was inevitable.
 Perdita and her child were to remain at Kishan. Raymond asked me, if I
 would not continue with them. "Now by the fells of Cumberland," I cried,
 "by all of the vagabond and poacher that appertains to me, I will stand at
 your side, draw my sword in the Greek cause, and be hailed as a victor
 along with you!"
 
 All the plain, from Kishan to Rodosto, a distance of sixteen leagues, was
 alive with troops, or with the camp-followers, all in motion at the
 approach of a battle. The small garrisons were drawn from the various towns
 and fortresses, and went to swell the main army. We met baggage waggons,
 and many females of high and low rank returning to Fairy or Kishan, there
 to wait the issue of the expected day. When we arrived at Rodosto, we found
 that the field had been taken, and the scheme of the battle arranged. The
 sound of firing, early on the following morning, informed us that advanced
 posts of the armies were engaged. Regiment after regiment advanced, their
 colours flying and bands playing. They planted the cannon on the tumuli,
 sole elevations in this level country, and formed themselves into column
 and hollow square; while the pioneers threw up small mounds for their
 protection.
 
 These then were the preparations for a battle, nay, the battle itself; far
 different from any thing the imagination had pictured. We read of centre
 and wing in Greek and Roman history; we fancy a spot, plain as a table, and
 soldiers small as chessmen; and drawn forth, so that the most ignorant of
 the game can discover science and order in the disposition of the forces.
 When I came to the reality, and saw regiments file off to the left far out
 of sight, fields intervening between the battalions, but a few troops
 sufficiently near me to observe their motions, I gave up all idea of
 understanding, even of seeing a battle, but attaching myself to Raymond
 attended with intense interest to his actions. He shewed himself collected,
 gallant and imperial; his commands were prompt, his intuition of the events
 of the day to me miraculous. In the mean time the cannon roared; the music
 lifted up its enlivening voice at intervals; and we on the highest of the
 mounds I mentioned, too far off to observe the fallen sheaves which death
 gathered into his storehouse, beheld the regiments, now lost in smoke, now
 banners and staves peering above the cloud, while shout and clamour drowned
 every sound.
 
 Early in the day, Argyropylo was wounded dangerously, and Raymond assumed
 the command of the whole army. He made few remarks, till, on observing
 through his glass the sequel of an order he had given, his face, clouded
 for awhile with doubt, became radiant. "The day is ours," he cried, "the
 Turks fly from the bayonet." And then swiftly he dispatched his
 aides-de-camp to command the horse to fall on the routed enemy. The defeat
 became total; the cannon ceased to roar; the infantry rallied, and horse
 pursued the flying Turks along the dreary plain; the staff of Raymond was
 dispersed in various directions, to make observations, and bear commands.
 Even I was dispatched to a distant part of the field.
 
 The ground on which the battle was fought, was a level plain--so level,
 that from the tumuli you saw the waving line of mountains on the
 wide-stretched horizon; yet the intervening space was unvaried by the least
 irregularity, save such undulations as resembled the waves of the sea. The
 whole of this part of Thrace had been so long a scene of contest, that it
 had remained uncultivated, and presented a dreary, barren appearance. The
 order I had received, was to make an observation of the direction which a
 detachment of the enemy might have taken, from a northern tumulus; the
 whole Turkish army, followed by the Greek, had poured eastward; none but
 the dead remained in the direction of my side. From the top of the mound, I
 looked far round--all was silent and deserted.
 
 The last beams of the nearly sunken sun shot up from behind the far summit
 of Mount Athos; the sea of Marmora still glittered beneath its rays, while
 the Asiatic coast beyond was half hid in a haze of low cloud. Many a
 casque, and bayonet, and sword, fallen from unnerved arms, reflected the
 departing ray; they lay scattered far and near. From the east, a band of
 ravens, old inhabitants of the Turkish cemeteries, came sailing along
 towards their harvest; the sun disappeared. This hour, melancholy yet
 sweet, has always seemed to me the time when we are most naturally led to
 commune with higher powers; our mortal sternness departs, and gentle
 complacency invests the soul. But now, in the midst of the dying and the
 dead, how could a thought of heaven or a sensation of tranquillity possess
 one of the murderers? During the busy day, my mind had yielded itself a
 willing slave to the state of things presented to it by its fellow-beings;
 historical association, hatred of the foe, and military enthusiasm had held
 dominion over me. Now, I looked on the evening star, as softly and calmly
 it hung pendulous in the orange hues of sunset. I turned to the
 corse-strewn earth; and felt ashamed of my species. So perhaps were the
 placid skies; for they quickly veiled themselves in mist, and in this
 change assisted the swift disappearance of twilight usual in the south;
 heavy masses of cloud floated up from the south east, and red and turbid
 lightning shot from their dark edges; the rushing wind disturbed the
 garments of the dead, and was chilled as it passed over their icy forms.
 Darkness gathered round; the objects about me became indistinct, I
 descended from my station, and with difficulty guided my horse, so as to
 avoid the slain.
 
 Suddenly I heard a piercing shriek; a form seemed to rise from the earth;
 it flew swiftly towards me, sinking to the ground again as it drew near.
 All this passed so suddenly, that I with difficulty reined in my horse, so
 that it should not trample on the prostrate being. The dress of this person
 was that of a soldier, but the bared neck and arms, and the continued
 shrieks discovered a female thus disguised. I dismounted to her aid, while
 she, with heavy groans, and her hand placed on her side, resisted my
 attempt to lead her on. In the hurry of the moment I forgot that I was in
 Greece, and in my native accents endeavoured to soothe the sufferer. With
 wild and terrific exclamations did the lost, dying Evadne (for it was she)
 recognize the language of her lover; pain and fever from her wound had
 deranged her intellects, while her piteous cries and feeble efforts to
 escape, penetrated me with compassion. In wild delirium she called upon the
 name of Raymond; she exclaimed that I was keeping him from her, while the
 Turks with fearful instruments of torture were about to take his life. Then
 again she sadly lamented her hard fate; that a woman, with a woman's heart
 and sensibility, should be driven by hopeless love and vacant hopes to take
 up the trade of arms, and suffer beyond the endurance of man privation,
 labour, and pain--the while her dry, hot hand pressed mine, and her brow
 and lips burned with consuming fire.
 
 As her strength grew less, I lifted her from the ground; her emaciated form
 hung over my arm, her sunken cheek rested on my breast; in a sepulchral
 voice she murmured:--"This is the end of love!--Yet not the end!"--
 and frenzy lent her strength as she cast her arm up to heaven: "there is
 the end! there we meet again. Many living deaths have I borne for thee, O
 Raymond, and now I expire, thy victim!--By my death I purchase thee--
 lo! the instruments of war, fire, the plague are my servitors. I dared, I
 conquered them all, till now! I have sold myself to death, with the sole
 condition that thou shouldst follow me--Fire, and war, and plague, unite
 for thy destruction--O my Raymond, there is no safety for thee!"
 
 With an heavy heart I listened to the changes of her delirium; I made her a
 bed of cloaks; her violence decreased and a clammy dew stood on her brow as
 the paleness of death succeeded to the crimson of fever, I placed her on
 the cloaks. She continued to rave of her speedy meeting with her beloved in
 the grave, of his death nigh at hand; sometimes she solemnly declared that
 he was summoned; sometimes she bewailed his hard destiny. Her voice grew
 feebler, her speech interrupted; a few convulsive movements, and her
 muscles relaxed, the limbs fell, no more to be sustained, one deep sigh,
 and life was gone.
 
 I bore her from the near neighbourhood of the dead; wrapt in cloaks, I
 placed her beneath a tree. Once more I looked on her altered face; the last
 time I saw her she was eighteen; beautiful as poet's vision, splendid as a
 Sultana of the East--Twelve years had past; twelve years of change,
 sorrow and hardship; her brilliant complexion had become worn and dark, her
 limbs had lost the roundness of youth and womanhood; her eyes had sunk
 deep,
 
     Crushed and o'erworn,
   The hours had drained her blood, and filled her brow
   With lines and wrinkles.
 
 With shuddering horror I veiled this monument of human passion and human
 misery; I heaped over her all of flags and heavy accoutrements I could
 find, to guard her from birds and beasts of prey, until I could bestow on
 her a fitting grave. Sadly and slowly I stemmed my course from among the
 heaps of slain, and, guided by the twinkling lights of the town, at length
 reached Rodosto.
 
 [1] Lord Byron's Fourth Canto of Childe Harolde.
 [2] Shakspeare's Sonnets.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 ON my arrival, I found that an order had already gone forth for the army to
 proceed immediately towards Constantinople; and the troops which had
 suffered least in the battle were already on their way. The town was full
 of tumult. The wound, and consequent inability of Argyropylo, caused
 Raymond to be the first in command. He rode through the town, visiting the
 wounded, and giving such orders as were necessary for the siege he
 meditated. Early in the morning the whole army was in motion. In the hurry
 I could hardly find an opportunity to bestow the last offices on Evadne.
 Attended only by my servant, I dug a deep grave for her at the foot of the
 tree, and without disturbing her warrior shroud, I placed her in it,
 heaping stones upon the grave. The dazzling sun and glare of daylight,
 deprived the scene of solemnity; from Evadne's low tomb, I joined Raymond
 and his staff, now on their way to the Golden City.
 
 Constantinople was invested, trenches dug, and advances made. The whole
 Greek fleet blockaded it by sea; on land from the river Kyat Kbanah, near
 the Sweet Waters, to the Tower of Marmora, on the shores of the Propontis,
 along the whole line of the ancient walls, the trenches of the siege were
 drawn. We already possessed Pera; the Golden Horn itself, the city,
 bastioned by the sea, and the ivy-mantled walls of the Greek emperors was
 all of Europe that the Mahometans could call theirs. Our army looked on her
 as certain prey. They counted the garrison; it was impossible that it
 should be relieved; each sally was a victory; for, even when the Turks were
 triumphant, the loss of men they sustained was an irreparable injury. I rode
 one morning with Raymond to the lofty mound, not far from the Top Kapou,
 (Cannon-gate), on which Mahmoud planted his standard, and first saw the
 city. Still the same lofty domes and minarets towered above the verdurous
 walls, where Constantine had died, and the Turk had entered the city. The
 plain around was interspersed with cemeteries, Turk, Greek, and Armenian,
 with their growth of cypress trees; and other woods of more cheerful
 aspect, diversified the scene. Among them the Greek army was encamped, and
 their squadrons moved to and fro--now in regular march, now in swift
 career.
 
 Raymond's eyes were fixed on the city. "I have counted the hours of her
 life," said he; "one month, and she falls. Remain with me till then; wait
 till you see the cross on St. Sophia; and then return to your peaceful
 glades."
 
 "You then," I asked, "still remain in Greece?"
 
 "Assuredly," replied Raymond. "Yet Lionel, when I say this,
 believe me I look back with regret to our tranquil life at Windsor.
 I am but half a soldier; I love the renown, but not the trade of war.
 Before the battle of Rodosto I was full of hope and spirit; to
 conquer there, and afterwards to take Constantinople, was the
 hope, the bourne, the fulfilment of my ambition. This enthusiasm is now
 spent, I know not why; I seem to myself to be entering a darksome gulph;
 the ardent spirit of the army is irksome to me, the rapture of triumph
 null."
 
 He paused, and was lost in thought. His serious mien recalled, by some
 association, the half-forgotten Evadne to my mind, and I seized this
 opportunity to make enquiries from him concerning her strange lot. I asked
 him, if he had ever seen among the troops any one resembling her; if since
 he had returned to Greece he had heard of her?
 
 He started at her name,--he looked uneasily on me. "Even so," he cried,
 "I knew you would speak of her. Long, long I had forgotten her. Since our
 encampment here, she daily, hourly visits my thoughts. When I am addressed,
 her name is the sound I expect: in every communication, I imagine that she
 will form a part. At length you have broken the spell; tell me what you
 know of her."
 
 I related my meeting with her; the story of her death was told and re-told.
 With painful earnestness he questioned me concerning her prophecies with
 regard to him. I treated them as the ravings of a maniac. "No, no," he
 said, "do not deceive yourself,--me you cannot. She has said nothing but
 what I knew before--though this is confirmation. Fire, the sword, and
 plague! They may all be found in yonder city; on my head alone may they
 fall!"
 
 From this day Raymond's melancholy increased. He secluded himself as much
 as the duties of his station permitted. When in company, sadness would in
 spite of every effort steal over his features, and he sat absent and mute
 among the busy crowd that thronged about him. Perdita rejoined him, and
 before her he forced himself to appear cheerful, for she, even as a mirror,
 changed as he changed, and if he were silent and anxious, she solicitously
 inquired concerning, and endeavoured to remove the cause of his
 seriousness. She resided at the palace of Sweet Waters, a summer seraglio
 of the Sultan; the beauty of the surrounding scenery, undefiled by war, and
 the freshness of the river, made this spot doubly delightful. Raymond felt
 no relief, received no pleasure from any show of heaven or earth. He often
 left Perdita, to wander in the grounds alone; or in a light shallop he
 floated idly on the pure waters, musing deeply. Sometimes I joined him; at
 such times his countenance was invariably solemn, his air dejected. He
 seemed relieved on seeing me, and would talk with some degree of interest
 on the affairs of the day. There was evidently something behind all this;
 yet, when he appeared about to speak of that which was nearest his heart,
 he would abruptly turn away, and with a sigh endeavour to deliver the
 painful idea to the winds.
 
 It had often occurred, that, when, as I said, Raymond quitted Perdita's
 drawing-room, Clara came up to me, and gently drawing me aside, said, "Papa
 is gone; shall we go to him? I dare say he will be glad to see you." And,
 as accident permitted, I complied with or refused her request. One evening
 a numerous assembly of Greek chieftains were gathered together in the
 palace. The intriguing Palli, the accomplished Karazza, the warlike
 Ypsilanti, were among the principal. They talked of the events of the day;
 the skirmish at noon; the diminished numbers of the Infidels; their defeat
 and flight: they contemplated, after a short interval of time, the capture
 of the Golden City. They endeavoured to picture forth what would then
 happen, and spoke in lofty terms of the prosperity of Greece, when
 Constantinople should become its capital. The conversation then reverted to
 Asiatic intelligence, and the ravages the plague made in its chief cities;
 conjectures were hazarded as to the progress that disease might have made
 in the besieged city.
 
 Raymond had joined in the former part of the discussion. In lively terms he
 demonstrated the extremities to which Constantinople was reduced; the
 wasted and haggard, though ferocious appearance of the troops; famine and
 pestilence was at work for them, he observed, and the infidels would soon
 be obliged to take refuge in their only hope--submission. Suddenly in the
 midst of his harangue he broke off, as if stung by some painful thought; he
 rose uneasily, and I perceived him at length quit the hall, and through the
 long corridor seek the open air. He did not return; and soon Clara crept
 round to me, making the accustomed invitation. I consented to her request,
 and taking her little hand, followed Raymond. We found him just about to
 embark in his boat, and he readily agreed to receive us as companions.
 After the heats of the day, the cooling land-breeze ruffled the river, and
 filled our little sail. The city looked dark to the south, while numerous
 lights along the near shores, and the beautiful aspect of the banks
 reposing in placid night, the waters keenly reflecting the heavenly lights,
 gave to this beauteous river a dower of loveliness that might have
 characterized a retreat in Paradise. Our single boatman attended to the
 sail; Raymond steered; Clara sat at his feet, clasping his knees with her
 arms, and laying her head on them. Raymond began the conversation somewhat
 abruptly.
 
 "This, my friend, is probably the last time we shall have an opportunity of
 conversing freely; my plans are now in full operation, and my time will
 become more and more occupied. Besides, I wish at once to tell you my
 wishes and expectations, and then never again to revert to so painful a
 subject. First, I must thank you, Lionel, for having remained here at my
 request. Vanity first prompted me to ask you: vanity, I call it; yet even
 in this I see the hand of fate--your presence will soon be necessary; you
 will become the last resource of Perdita, her protector and consoler. You
 will take her back to Windsor."--
 
 "Not without you," I said. "You do not mean to separate again?"
 
 "Do not deceive yourself," replied Raymond, "the separation at hand is one
 over which I have no control; most near at hand is it; the days are already
 counted. May I trust you? For many days I have longed to disclose the
 mysterious presentiments that weigh on me, although I fear that you will
 ridicule them. Yet do not, my gentle friend; for, all childish and unwise
 as they are, they have become a part of me, and I dare not expect to shake
 them off.
 
 "Yet how can I expect you to sympathize with me? You are of this world; I
 am not. You hold forth your hand; it is even as a part of yourself; and you
 do not yet divide the feeling of identity from the mortal form that shapes
 forth Lionel. How then can you understand me? Earth is to me a tomb, the
 firmament a vault, shrouding mere corruption. Time is no more, for I have
 stepped within the threshold of eternity; each man I meet appears a corse,
 which will soon be deserted of its animating spark, on the eve of decay and
 corruption.
 
   Cada piedra un piramide levanta,
   y cada flor costruye un monumento,
   cada edificio es un sepulcro altivo,
   cada soldado un esqueleto vivo."[1]
 
 His accent was mournful,--he sighed deeply. "A few months ago," he
 continued, "I was thought to be dying; but life was strong within me. My
 affections were human; hope and love were the day-stars of my life. Now--
 they dream that the brows of the conqueror of the infidel faith are about
 to be encircled by triumphant laurel; they talk of honourable reward, of
 title, power, and wealth--all I ask of Greece is a grave. Let them raise
 a mound above my lifeless body, which may stand even when the dome of St.
 Sophia has fallen.
 
 "Wherefore do I feel thus? At Rodosto I was full of hope; but when first I
 saw Constantinople, that feeling, with every other joyful one, departed.
 The last words of Evadne were the seal upon the warrant of my death. Yet I
 do not pretend to account for my mood by any particular event. All I can
 say is, that it is so. The plague I am told is in Constantinople, perhaps I
 have imbibed its effluvia--perhaps disease is the real cause of my
 prognostications. It matters little why or wherefore I am affected, no
 power can avert the stroke, and the shadow of Fate's uplifted hand already
 darkens me.
 
 "To you, Lionel, I entrust your sister and her child. Never mention to her
 the fatal name of Evadne. She would doubly sorrow over the strange link
 that enchains me to her, making my spirit obey her dying voice, following
 her, as it is about to do, to the unknown country."
 
 I listened to him with wonder; but that his sad demeanour and solemn
 utterance assured me of the truth and intensity of his feelings, I should
 with light derision have attempted to dissipate his fears. Whatever I was
 about to reply, was interrupted by the powerful emotions of Clara. Raymond
 had spoken, thoughtless of her presence, and she, poor child, heard with
 terror and faith the prophecy of his death. Her father was moved by her
 violent grief; he took her in his arms and soothed her, but his very
 soothings were solemn and fearful. "Weep not, sweet child," said he, "the
 coming death of one you have hardly known. I may die, but in death I can
 never forget or desert my own Clara. In after sorrow or joy, believe that
 you father's spirit is near, to save or sympathize with you. Be proud of
 me, and cherish your infant remembrance of me. Thus, sweetest, I shall not
 appear to die. One thing you must promise,--not to speak to any one but
 your uncle, of the conversation you have just overheard. When I am gone,
 you will console your mother, and tell her that death was only bitter
 because it divided me from her; that my last thoughts will be spent on her.
 But while I live, promise not to betray me; promise, my child."
 
 With faltering accents Clara promised, while she still clung to her father
 in a transport of sorrow. Soon we returned to shore, and I endeavoured to
 obviate the impression made on the child's mind, by treating Raymond's
 fears lightly. We heard no more of them; for, as he had said, the siege,
 now drawing to a conclusion, became paramount in interest, engaging all his
 time and attention.
 
 The empire of the Mahometans in Europe was at its close. The Greek fleet
 blockading every port of Stamboul, prevented the arrival of succour from
 Asia; all egress on the side towards land had become impracticable, except
 to such desperate sallies, as reduced the numbers of the enemy without
 making any impression on our lines. The garrison was now so much
 diminished, that it was evident that the city could easily have been
 carried by storm; but both humanity and policy dictated a slower mode of
 proceeding. We could hardly doubt that, if pursued to the utmost, its
 palaces, its temples and store of wealth would be destroyed in the fury of
 contending triumph and defeat. Already the defenceless citizens had
 suffered through the barbarity of the Janisaries; and, in time of storm,
 tumult and massacre, beauty, infancy and decrepitude, would have alike been
 sacrificed to the brutal ferocity of the soldiers. Famine and blockade were
 certain means of conquest; and on these we founded our hopes of victory.
 
 Each day the soldiers of the garrison assaulted our advanced posts, and
 impeded the accomplishment of our works. Fire-boats were launched from the
 various ports, while our troops sometimes recoiled from the devoted courage
 of men who did not seek to live, but to sell their lives dearly. These
 contests were aggravated by the season: they took place during summer, when
 the southern Asiatic wind came laden with intolerable heat, when the
 streams were dried up in their shallow beds, and the vast basin of the sea
 appeared to glow under the unmitigated rays of the solsticial sun. Nor did
 night refresh the earth. Dew was denied; herbage and flowers there were
 none; the very trees drooped; and summer assumed the blighted appearance of
 winter, as it went forth in silence and flame to abridge the means of
 sustenance to man. In vain did the eye strive to find the wreck of some
 northern cloud in the stainless empyrean, which might bring hope of change
 and moisture to the oppressive and windless atmosphere. All was serene,
 burning, annihilating. We the besiegers were in the comparison little
 affected by these evils. The woods around afforded us shade,--the river
 secured to us a constant supply of water; nay, detachments were employed in
 furnishing the army with ice, which had been laid up on Haemus, and Athos,
 and the mountains of Macedonia, while cooling fruits and wholesome food
 renovated the strength of the labourers, and made us bear with less
 impatience the weight of the unrefreshing air. But in the city things wore
 a different face. The sun's rays were refracted from the pavement and
 buildings--the stoppage of the public fountains--the bad quality of the
 food, and scarcity even of that, produced a state of suffering, which was
 aggravated by the scourge of disease; while the garrison arrogated every
 superfluity to themselves, adding by waste and riot to the necessary evils
 of the time. Still they would not capitulate.
 
 Suddenly the system of warfare was changed. We experienced no more
 assaults; and by night and day we continued our labours unimpeded. Stranger
 still, when the troops advanced near the city, the walls were vacant, and
 no cannon was pointed against the intruders. When these circumstances were
 reported to Raymond, he caused minute observations to be made as to what
 was doing within the walls, and when his scouts returned, reporting only
 the continued silence and desolation of the city, he commanded the army to
 be drawn out before the gates. No one appeared on the walls; the very
 portals, though locked and barred, seemed unguarded; above, the many domes
 and glittering crescents pierced heaven; while the old walls, survivors of
 ages, with ivy-crowned tower and weed-tangled buttress, stood as rocks in
 an uninhabited waste. From within the city neither shout nor cry, nor aught
 except the casual howling of a dog, broke the noon-day stillness. Even our
 soldiers were awed to silence; the music paused; the clang of arms was
 hushed. Each man asked his fellow in whispers, the meaning of this sudden
 peace; while Raymond from an height endeavoured, by means of glasses, to
 discover and observe the stratagem of the enemy. No form could be discerned
 on the terraces of the houses; in the higher parts of the town no moving
 shadow bespoke the presence of any living being: the very trees waved not,
 and mocked the stability of architecture with like immovability.
 
 The tramp of horses, distinctly heard in the silence, was at length
 discerned. It was a troop sent by Karazza, the Admiral; they bore
 dispatches to the Lord General. The contents of these papers were
 important. The night before, the watch, on board one of the smaller vessels
 anchored near the seraglio wall, was roused by a slight splashing as of
 muffled oars; the alarm was given: twelve small boats, each containing
 three Janizaries, were descried endeavouring to make their way through the
 fleet to the opposite shore of Scutari. When they found themselves
 discovered they discharged their muskets, and some came to the front to
 cover the others, whose crews, exerting all their strength, endeavoured to
 escape with their light barks from among the dark hulls that environed
 them. They were in the end all sunk, and, with the exception of two or
 three prisoners, the crews drowned. Little could be got from the survivors;
 but their cautious answers caused it to be surmised that several
 expeditions had preceded this last, and that several Turks of rank and
 importance had been conveyed to Asia. The men disdainfully repelled the
 idea of having deserted the defence of their city; and one, the youngest
 among them, in answer to the taunt of a sailor, exclaimed, "Take it,
 Christian dogs! take the palaces, the gardens, the mosques, the abode of
 our fathers--take plague with them; pestilence is the enemy we fly; if
 she be your friend, hug her to your bosoms. The curse of Allah is on
 Stamboul, share ye her fate."
 
 Such was the account sent by Karazza to Raymond: but a tale full of
 monstrous exaggerations, though founded on this, was spread by the
 accompanying troop among our soldiers. A murmur arose, the city was the
 prey of pestilence; already had a mighty power subjugated the inhabitants;
 Death had become lord of Constantinople.
 
 I have heard a picture described, wherein all the inhabitants of earth were
 drawn out in fear to stand the encounter of Death. The feeble and decrepid
 fled; the warriors retreated, though they threatened even in flight. Wolves
 and lions, and various monsters of the desert roared against him; while the
 grim Unreality hovered shaking his spectral dart, a solitary but invincible
 assailant. Even so was it with the army of Greece. I am convinced, that had
 the myriad troops of Asia come from over the Propontis, and stood defenders
 of the Golden City, each and every Greek would have marched against the
 overwhelming numbers, and have devoted himself with patriotic fury for his
 country. But here no hedge of bayonets opposed itself, no death-dealing
 artillery, no formidable array of brave soldiers--the unguarded walls
 afforded easy entrance--the vacant palaces luxurious dwellings; but above
 the dome of St. Sophia the superstitious Greek saw Pestilence, and shrunk
 in trepidation from her influence.
 
 Raymond was actuated by far other feelings. He descended the hill with a
 face beaming with triumph, and pointing with his sword to the gates,
 commanded his troops to--down with those barricades--the only obstacles
 now to completest victory. The soldiers answered his cheerful words with
 aghast and awe-struck looks; instinctively they drew back, and Raymond rode
 in the front of the lines:--"By my sword I swear," he cried, "that no
 ambush or stratagem endangers you. The enemy is already vanquished; the
 pleasant places, the noble dwellings and spoil of the city are already
 yours; force the gate; enter and possess the seats of your ancestors, your
 own inheritance!"
 
 An universal shudder and fearful whispering passed through the lines; not a
 soldier moved. "Cowards!" exclaimed their general, exasperated, "give me an
 hatchet! I alone will enter! I will plant your standard; and when you see
 it wave from yon highest minaret, you may gain courage, and rally round
 it!"
 
 One of the officers now came forward: "General," he said, "we neither fear
 the courage, nor arms, the open attack, nor secret ambush of the Moslems.
 We are ready to expose our breasts, exposed ten thousand times before, to
 the balls and scymetars of the infidels, and to fall gloriously for Greece.
 But we will not die in heaps, like dogs poisoned in summer-time, by the
 pestilential air of that city--we dare not go against the Plague!"
 
 A multitude of men are feeble and inert, without a voice, a leader; give
 them that, and they regain the strength belonging to their numbers. Shouts
 from a thousand voices now rent the air--the cry of applause became
 universal. Raymond saw the danger; he was willing to save his troops from
 the crime of disobedience; for he knew, that contention once begun between
 the commander and his army, each act and word added to the weakness of the
 former, and bestowed power on the latter. He gave orders for the retreat to
 be sounded, and the regiments repaired in good order to the camp.
 
 I hastened to carry the intelligence of these strange proceedings to
 Perdita; and we were soon joined by Raymond. He looked gloomy and
 perturbed. My sister was struck by my narrative: "How beyond the
 imagination of man," she exclaimed, "are the decrees of heaven, wondrous
 and inexplicable!"
 
 "Foolish girl," cried Raymond angrily, "are you like my valiant soldiers,
 panic-struck? What is there inexplicable, pray, tell me, in so very natural
 an occurrence? Does not the plague rage each year in Stamboul? What wonder,
 that this year, when as we are told, its virulence is unexampled in Asia,
 that it should have occasioned double havoc in that city? What wonder then,
 in time of siege, want, extreme heat, and drought, that it should make
 unaccustomed ravages? Less wonder far is it, that the garrison, despairing
 of being able to hold out longer, should take advantage of the negligence
 of our fleet to escape at once from siege and capture. It is not pestilence
 --by the God that lives! it is not either plague or impending danger that
 makes us, like birds in harvest-time, terrified by a scarecrow, abstain
 from the ready prey--it is base superstition--And thus the aim of the
 valiant is made the shuttlecock of fools; the worthy ambition of the
 high-souled, the plaything of these tamed hares! But yet Stamboul shall be
 ours! By my past labours, by torture and imprisonment suffered for them, by
 my victories, by my sword, I swear--by my hopes of fame, by my former
 deserts now awaiting their reward, I deeply vow, with these hands to plant
 the cross on yonder mosque!"
 
 "Dearest Raymond!" interrupted Perdita, in a supplicating accent.
 
 He had been walking to and fro in the marble hall of the seraglio; his very
 lips were pale with rage, while, quivering, they shaped his angry words--
 his eyes shot fire--his gestures seemed restrained by their very
 vehemence. "Perdita," he continued, impatiently, "I know what you would
 say; I know that you love me, that you are good and gentle; but this is no
 woman's work--nor can a female heart guess at the hurricane which tears
 me!"
 
 He seemed half afraid of his own violence, and suddenly quitted the hall: a
 look from Perdita shewed me her distress, and I followed him. He was pacing
 the garden: his passions were in a state of inconceivable turbulence. "Am I
 for ever," he cried, "to be the sport of fortune! Must man, the
 heaven-climber, be for ever the victim of the crawling reptiles of his
 species! Were I as you, Lionel, looking forward to many years of life, to a
 succession of love-enlightened days, to refined enjoyments and
 fresh-springing hopes, I might yield, and breaking my General's staff, seek
 repose in the glades of Windsor. But I am about to die!--nay, interrupt
 me not--soon I shall die. From the many-peopled earth, from the
 sympathies of man, from the loved resorts of my youth, from the kindness of
 my friends, from the affection of my only beloved Perdita, I am about to be
 removed. Such is the will of fate! Such the decree of the High Ruler from
 whom there is no appeal: to whom I submit. But to lose all--to lose with
 life and love, glory also! It shall not be!
 
 "I, and in a few brief years, all you,--this panic-struck army, and all
 the population of fair Greece, will no longer be. But other generations
 will arise, and ever and for ever will continue, to be made happier by our
 present acts, to be glorified by our valour. The prayer of my youth was to
 be one among those who render the pages of earth's history splendid; who
 exalt the race of man, and make this little globe a dwelling of the mighty.
 Alas, for Raymond! the prayer of his youth is wasted--the hopes of his
 manhood are null!
 
 "From my dungeon in yonder city I cried, soon I will be thy lord! When
 Evadne pronounced my death, I thought that the title of Victor of
 Constantinople would be written on my tomb, and I subdued all mortal fear.
 I stand before its vanquished walls, and dare not call myself a conqueror.
 So shall it not be! Did not Alexander leap from the walls of the city of
 the Oxydracae, to shew his coward troops the way to victory, encountering
 alone the swords of its defenders? Even so will I brave the plague--and
 though no man follow, I will plant the Grecian standard on the height of
 St. Sophia."
 
 Reason came unavailing to such high-wrought feelings. In vain I shewed him,
 that when winter came, the cold would dissipate the pestilential air, and
 restore courage to the Greeks. "Talk not of other season than this!" he
 cried. "I have lived my last winter, and the date of this year, 2092, will
 be carved upon my tomb. Already do I see," he continued, looking up
 mournfully, "the bourne and precipitate edge of my existence, over which I
 plunge into the gloomy mystery of the life to come. I am prepared, so that
 I leave behind a trail of light so radiant, that my worst enemies cannot
 cloud it. I owe this to Greece, to you, to my surviving Perdita, and to
 myself, the victim of ambition."
 
 We were interrupted by an attendant, who announced, that the staff of
 Raymond was assembled in the council-chamber. He requested me in the
 meantime to ride through the camp, and to observe and report to him the
 dispositions of the soldiers; he then left me. I had been excited to the
 utmost by the proceedings of the day, and now more than ever by the
 passionate language of Raymond. Alas! for human reason! He accused the
 Greeks of superstition: what name did he give to the faith he lent to the
 predictions of Evadne? I passed from the palace of Sweet Waters to the
 plain on which the encampment lay, and found its inhabitants in commotion.
 The arrival of several with fresh stories of marvels, from the fleet; the
 exaggerations bestowed on what was already known; tales of old prophecies,
 of fearful histories of whole regions which had been laid waste during the
 present year by pestilence, alarmed and occupied the troops. Discipline was
 lost; the army disbanded itself. Each individual, before a part of a great
 whole moving only in unison with others, now became resolved into the unit
 nature had made him, and thought of himself only. They stole off at first
 by ones and twos, then in larger companies, until, unimpeded by the
 officers, whole battalions sought the road that led to Macedonia.
 
 About midnight I returned to the palace and sought Raymond; he was alone,
 and apparently composed; such composure, at least, was his as is inspired
 by a resolve to adhere to a certain line of conduct. He heard my account of
 the self-dissolution of the army with calmness, and then said, "You know,
 Verney, my fixed determination not to quit this place, until in the light
 of day Stamboul is confessedly ours. If the men I have about me shrink from
 following me, others, more courageous, are to be found. Go you before break
 of day, bear these dispatches to Karazza, add to them your own entreaties
 that he send me his marines and naval force; if I can get but one regiment
 to second me, the rest would follow of course. Let him send me this
 regiment. I shall expect your return by to-morrow noon."
 
 Methought this was but a poor expedient; but I assured him of my obedience
 and zeal. I quitted him to take a few hours rest. With the breaking of
 morning I was accoutred for my ride. I lingered awhile, desirous of taking
 leave of Perdita, and from my window observed the approach of the sun. The
 golden splendour arose, and weary nature awoke to suffer yet another day of
 heat and thirsty decay. No flowers lifted up their dew-laden cups to meet
 the dawn; the dry grass had withered on the plains; the burning fields of
 air were vacant of birds; the cicale alone, children of the sun, began
 their shrill and deafening song among the cypresses and olives. I saw
 Raymond's coal-black charger brought to the palace gate; a small company of
 officers arrived soon after; care and fear was painted on each cheek, and
 in each eye, unrefreshed by sleep. I found Raymond and Perdita together. He
 was watching the rising sun, while with one arm he encircled his beloved's
 waist; she looked on him, the sun of her life, with earnest gaze of mingled
 anxiety and tenderness. Raymond started angrily when he saw me. "Here
 still?" he cried. "Is this your promised zeal?"
 
 "Pardon me," I said, "but even as you speak, I am gone."
 
 "Nay, pardon me," he replied; "I have no right to command or reproach; but
 my life hangs on your departure and speedy return. Farewell!"
 
 His voice had recovered its bland tone, but a dark cloud still hung on his
 features. I would have delayed; I wished to recommend watchfulness to
 Perdita, but his presence restrained me. I had no pretence for my
 hesitation; and on his repeating his farewell, I clasped his outstretched
 hand; it was cold and clammy. "Take care of yourself, my dear Lord," I
 said.
 
 "Nay," said Perdita, "that task shall be mine. Return speedily,
 Lionel." With an air of absence he was playing with her auburn locks, while
 she leaned on him; twice I turned back, only to look again on this
 matchless pair. At last, with slow and heavy steps, I had paced out of the
 hall, and sprung upon my horse. At that moment Clara flew towards me;
 clasping my knee she cried, "Make haste back, uncle! Dear uncle, I have
 such fearful dreams; I dare not tell my mother. Do not be long away!" I
 assured her of my impatience to return, and then, with a small escort rode
 along the plain towards the tower of Marmora.
 
 I fulfilled my commission; I saw Karazza. He was somewhat surprised; he
 would see, he said, what could be done; but it required time; and Raymond
 had ordered me to return by noon. It was impossible to effect any thing in
 so short a time. I must stay till the next day; or come back, after having
 reported the present state of things to the general. My choice was easily
 made. A restlessness, a fear of what was about to betide, a doubt as to
 Raymond's purposes, urged me to return without delay to his quarters.
 Quitting the Seven Towers, I rode eastward towards the Sweet Waters. I took
 a circuitous path, principally for the sake of going to the top of the
 mount before mentioned, which commanded a view of the city. I had my glass
 with me. The city basked under the noon-day sun, and the venerable walls
 formed its picturesque boundary. Immediately before me was the Top Kapou,
 the gate near which Mahomet had made the breach by which he entered the
 city. Trees gigantic and aged grew near; before the gate I discerned a
 crowd of moving human figures--with intense curiosity I lifted my glass
 to my eye. I saw Lord Raymond on his charger; a small company of officers
 had gathered about him; and behind was a promiscuous concourse of soldiers
 and subalterns, their discipline lost, their arms thrown aside; no music
 sounded, no banners streamed. The only flag among them was one which
 Raymond carried; he pointed with it to the gate of the city. The circle
 round him fell back. With angry gestures he leapt from his horse, and
 seizing a hatchet that hung from his saddle-bow, went with the apparent
 intention of battering down the opposing gate. A few men came to aid him;
 their numbers increased; under their united blows the obstacle was
 vanquished, gate, portcullis, and fence were demolished; and the wide
 sun-lit way, leading to the heart of the city, now lay open before them.
 The men shrank back; they seemed afraid of what they had already done, and
 stood as if they expected some Mighty Phantom to stalk in offended majesty
 from the opening. Raymond sprung lightly on his horse, grasped the
 standard, and with words which I could not hear (but his gestures, being
 their fit accompaniment, were marked by passionate energy,) he seemed to
 adjure their assistance and companionship; even as he spoke, the crowd
 receded from him. Indignation now transported him; his words I guessed were
 fraught with disdain--then turning from his coward followers, he
 addressed himself to enter the city alone. His very horse seemed to back
 from the fatal entrance; his dog, his faithful dog, lay moaning and
 supplicating in his path--in a moment more, he had plunged the rowels
 into the sides of the stung animal, who bounded forward, and he, the
 gateway passed, was galloping up the broad and desart street.
 
 Until this moment my soul had been in my eyes only. I had gazed with
 wonder, mixed with fear and enthusiasm. The latter feeling now
 predominated. I forgot the distance between us: "I will go with thee,
 Raymond!" I cried; but, my eye removed from the glass, I could scarce
 discern the pigmy forms of the crowd, which about a mile from me surrounded
 the gate; the form of Raymond was lost. Stung with impatience, I urged my
 horse with force of spur and loosened reins down the acclivity, that,
 before danger could arrive, I might be at the side of my noble, godlike
 friend. A number of buildings and trees intervened, when I had reached the
 plain, hiding the city from my view. But at that moment a crash was heard.
 Thunderlike it reverberated through the sky, while the air was darkened. A
 moment more and the old walls again met my sight, while over them hovered a
 murky cloud; fragments of buildings whirled above, half seen in smoke,
 while flames burst out beneath, and continued explosions filled the air
 with terrific thunders. Flying from the mass of falling ruin which leapt
 over the high walls, and shook the ivy towers, a crowd of soldiers made for
 the road by which I came; I was surrounded, hemmed in by them, unable to
 get forward. My impatience rose to its utmost; I stretched out my hands to
 the men; I conjured them to turn back and save their General, the conqueror
 of Stamboul, the liberator of Greece; tears, aye tears, in warm flow gushed
 from my eyes--I would not believe in his destruction; yet every mass that
 darkened the air seemed to bear with it a portion of the martyred Raymond.
 Horrible sights were shaped to me in the turbid cloud that hovered over the
 city; and my only relief was derived from the struggles I made to approach
 the gate. Yet when I effected my purpose, all I could discern within the
 precincts of the massive walls was a city of fire: the open way through
 which Raymond had ridden was enveloped in smoke and flame. After an
 interval the explosions ceased, but the flames still shot up from various
 quarters; the dome of St. Sophia had disappeared. Strange to say (the
 result perhaps of the concussion of air occasioned by the blowing up of the
 city) huge, white thunder clouds lifted themselves up from the southern
 horizon, and gathered over-head; they were the first blots on the blue
 expanse that I had seen for months, and amidst this havoc and despair they
 inspired pleasure. The vault above became obscured, lightning flashed from
 the heavy masses, followed instantaneously by crashing thunder; then the
 big rain fell. The flames of the city bent beneath it; and the smoke and
 dust arising from the ruins was dissipated.
 
 I no sooner perceived an abatement of the flames than, hurried on by an
 irresistible impulse, I endeavoured to penetrate the town. I could only do
 this on foot, as the mass of ruin was impracticable for a horse. I had
 never entered the city before, and its ways were unknown to me. The streets
 were blocked up, the ruins smoking; I climbed up one heap, only to view
 others in succession; and nothing told me where the centre of the town
 might be, or towards what point Raymond might have directed his course. The
 rain ceased; the clouds sunk behind the horizon; it was now evening, and
 the sun descended swiftly the western sky. I scrambled on, until I came to
 a street, whose wooden houses, half-burnt, had been cooled by the rain, and
 were fortunately uninjured by the gunpowder. Up this I hurried--until now
 I had not seen a vestige of man. Yet none of the defaced human forms which
 I distinguished, could be Raymond; so I turned my eyes away, while my heart
 sickened within me. I came to an open space--a mountain of ruin in the
 midst, announced that some large mosque had occupied the space--and here,
 scattered about, I saw various articles of luxury and wealth, singed,
 destroyed--but shewing what they had been in their ruin--jewels,
 strings of pearls, embroidered robes, rich furs, glittering tapestries, and
 oriental ornaments, seemed to have been collected here in a pile destined
 for destruction; but the rain had stopped the havoc midway.
 
 Hours passed, while in this scene of ruin I sought for Raymond.
 Insurmountable heaps sometimes opposed themselves; the still burning fires
 scorched me. The sun set; the atmosphere grew dim--and the evening star
 no longer shone companionless. The glare of flames attested the progress of
 destruction, while, during mingled light and obscurity, the piles around me
 took gigantic proportions and weird shapes. For a moment I could yield to
 the creative power of the imagination, and for a moment was soothed by the
 sublime fictions it presented to me. The beatings of my human heart drew me
 back to blank reality. Where, in this wilderness of death, art thou, O
 Raymond--ornament of England, deliverer of Greece, "hero of unwritten
 story," where in this burning chaos are thy dear relics strewed? I called
 aloud for him--through the darkness of night, over the scorching ruins of
 fallen Constantinople, his name was heard; no voice replied--echo even
 was mute.
 
 I was overcome by weariness; the solitude depressed my spirits. The sultry
 air impregnated with dust, the heat and smoke of burning palaces, palsied
 my limbs. Hunger suddenly came acutely upon me. The excitement which had
 hitherto sustained me was lost; as a building, whose props are loosened,
 and whose foundations rock, totters and falls, so when enthusiasm and hope
 deserted me, did my strength fail. I sat on the sole remaining step of an
 edifice, which even in its downfall, was huge and magnificent; a few broken
 walls, not dislodged by gunpowder, stood in fantastic groupes, and a flame
 glimmered at intervals on the summit of the pile. For a time hunger and
 sleep contended, till the constellations reeled before my eyes and then
 were lost. I strove to rise, but my heavy lids closed, my limbs
 over-wearied, claimed repose--I rested my head on the stone, I yielded to
 the grateful sensation of utter forgetfulness; and in that scene of
 desolation, on that night of despair--I slept.
 
 [1] Calderon de la Barca.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 THE stars still shone brightly when I awoke, and Taurus high in the
 southern heaven shewed that it was midnight. I awoke from disturbed dreams.
 Methought I had been invited to Timon's last feast; I came with keen
 appetite, the covers were removed, the hot water sent up its unsatisfying
 steams, while I fled before the anger of the host, who assumed the form of
 Raymond; while to my diseased fancy, the vessels hurled by him after me,
 were surcharged with fetid vapour, and my friend's shape, altered by a
 thousand distortions, expanded into a gigantic phantom, bearing on its brow
 the sign of pestilence. The growing shadow rose and rose, filling, and then
 seeming to endeavour to burst beyond, the adamantine vault that bent over,
 sustaining and enclosing the world. The night-mare became torture; with a
 strong effort I threw off sleep, and recalled reason to her wonted
 functions. My first thought was Perdita; to her I must return; her I must
 support, drawing such food from despair as might best sustain her wounded
 heart; recalling her from the wild excesses of grief, by the austere laws
 of duty, and the soft tenderness of regret.
 
 The position of the stars was my only guide. I turned from the awful ruin
 of the Golden City, and, after great exertion, succeeded in extricating
 myself from its enclosure. I met a company of soldiers outside the walls; I
 borrowed a horse from one of them, and hastened to my sister. The
 appearance of the plain was changed during this short interval; the
 encampment was broken up; the relics of the disbanded army met in small
 companies here and there; each face was clouded; every gesture spoke
 astonishment and dismay.
 
 With an heavy heart I entered the palace, and stood fearful to advance, to
 speak, to look. In the midst of the hall was Perdita; she sat on the marble
 pavement, her head fallen on her bosom, her hair dishevelled, her fingers
 twined busily one within the other; she was pale as marble, and every
 feature was contracted by agony. She perceived me, and looked up
 enquiringly; her half glance of hope was misery; the words died before I
 could articulate them; I felt a ghastly smile wrinkle my lips. She
 understood my gesture; again her head fell; again her fingers worked
 restlessly. At last I recovered speech, but my voice terrified her; the
 hapless girl had understood my look, and for worlds she would not that the
 tale of her heavy misery should have been shaped out and confirmed by hard,
 irrevocable words. Nay, she seemed to wish to distract my thoughts from the
 subject: she rose from the floor: "Hush!" she said, whisperingly; "after
 much weeping, Clara sleeps; we must not disturb her." She seated herself
 then on the same ottoman where I had left her in the morning resting on the
 beating heart of her Raymond; I dared not approach her, but sat at a
 distant corner, watching her starting and nervous gestures. At length, in
 an abrupt manner she asked, "Where is he?"
 
 "O, fear not," she continued, "fear not that I should entertain hope! Yet
 tell me, have you found him? To have him once more in my arms, to see him,
 however changed, is all I desire. Though Constantinople be heaped above him
 as a tomb, yet I must find him--then cover us with the city's weight,
 with a mountain piled above--I care not, so that one grave hold Raymond
 and his Perdita." Then weeping, she clung to me: "Take me to him," she
 cried, "unkind Lionel, why do you keep me here? Of myself I cannot find him
 --but you know where he lies--lead me thither."
 
 At first these agonizing plaints filled me with intolerable compassion. But
 soon I endeavoured to extract patience for her from the ideas she
 suggested. I related my adventures of the night, my endeavours to find our
 lost one, and my disappointment. Turning her thoughts this way, I gave them
 an object which rescued them from insanity. With apparent calmness she
 discussed with me the probable spot where he might be found, and planned
 the means we should use for that purpose. Then hearing of my fatigue and
 abstinence, she herself brought me food. I seized the favourable moment,
 and endeavoured to awaken in her something beyond the killing torpor of
 grief. As I spoke, my subject carried me away; deep admiration; grief, the
 offspring of truest affection, the overflowing of a heart bursting with
 sympathy for all that had been great and sublime in the career of my
 friend, inspired me as I poured forth the praises of Raymond.
 
 "Alas, for us," I cried, "who have lost this latest honour of the world!
 Beloved Raymond! He is gone to the nations of the dead; he has become one
 of those, who render the dark abode of the obscure grave illustrious by
 dwelling there. He has journied on the road that leads to it, and joined
 the mighty of soul who went before him. When the world was in its infancy
 death must have been terrible, and man left his friends and kindred to
 dwell, a solitary stranger, in an unknown country. But now, he who dies
 finds many companions gone before to prepare for his reception. The great
 of past ages people it, the exalted hero of our own days is counted among
 its inhabitants, while life becomes doubly 'the desart and the solitude.'
 
 "What a noble creature was Raymond, the first among the men of our time. By
 the grandeur of his conceptions, the graceful daring of his actions, by his
 wit and beauty, he won and ruled the minds of all. Of one only fault he
 might have been accused; but his death has cancelled that. I have heard him
 called inconstant of purpose--when he deserted, for the sake of love, the
 hope of sovereignty, and when he abdicated the protectorship of England,
 men blamed his infirmity of purpose. Now his death has crowned his life,
 and to the end of time it will be remembered, that he devoted himself, a
 willing victim, to the glory of Greece. Such was his choice: he expected to
 die. He foresaw that he should leave this cheerful earth, the lightsome
 sky, and thy love, Perdita; yet he neither hesitated or turned back, going
 right onward to his mark of fame. While the earth lasts, his actions will
 be recorded with praise. Grecian maidens will in devotion strew flowers on
 his tomb, and make the air around it resonant with patriotic hymns, in
 which his name will find high record."
 
 I saw the features of Perdita soften; the sternness of grief yielded to
 tenderness--I continued:--"Thus to honour him, is the sacred duty of
 his survivors. To make his name even as an holy spot of ground, enclosing
 it from all hostile attacks by our praise, shedding on it the blossoms of
 love and regret, guarding it from decay, and bequeathing it untainted to
 posterity. Such is the duty of his friends. A dearer one belongs to you,
 Perdita, mother of his child. Do you remember in her infancy, with what
 transport you beheld Clara, recognizing in her the united being of yourself
 and Raymond; joying to view in this living temple a manifestation of your
 eternal loves. Even such is she still. You say that you have lost Raymond.
 O, no!--yet he lives with you and in you there. From him she sprung,
 flesh of his flesh, bone of his bone--and not, as heretofore, are you
 content to trace in her downy cheek and delicate limbs, an affinity to
 Raymond, but in her enthusiastic affections, in the sweet qualities of her
 mind, you may still find him living, the good, the great, the beloved. Be
 it your care to foster this similarity--be it your care to render her
 worthy of him, so that, when she glory in her origin, she take not shame
 for what she is."
 
 I could perceive that, when I recalled my sister's thoughts to her duties
 in life, she did not listen with the same patience as before. She appeared
 to suspect a plan of consolation on my part, from which she, cherishing her
 new-born grief, revolted. "You talk of the future," she said, "while the
 present is all to me. Let me find the earthly dwelling of my beloved; let
 us rescue that from common dust, so that in times to come men may point to
 the sacred tomb, and name it his--then to other thoughts, and a new
 course of life, or what else fate, in her cruel tyranny, may have marked
 out for me."
 
 After a short repose I prepared to leave her, that I might endeavour to
 accomplish her wish. In the mean time we were joined by Clara, whose pallid
 cheek and scared look shewed the deep impression grief had made on her
 young mind. She seemed to be full of something to which she could not give
 words; but, seizing an opportunity afforded by Perdita's absence, she
 preferred to me an earnest prayer, that I would take her within view of the
 gate at which her father had entered Constantinople. She promised to commit
 no extravagance, to be docile, and immediately to return. I could not
 refuse; for Clara was not an ordinary child; her sensibility and
 intelligence seemed already to have endowed her with the rights of
 womanhood. With her therefore, before me on my horse, attended only by the
 servant who was to re-conduct her, we rode to the Top Kapou. We found a
 party of soldiers gathered round it. They were listening. "They are human
 cries," said one: "More like the howling of a dog," replied another; and
 again they bent to catch the sound of regular distant moans, which issued
 from the precincts of the ruined city. "That, Clara," I said, "is the gate,
 that the street which yestermorn your father rode up." Whatever Clara's
 intention had been in asking to be brought hither, it was balked by the
 presence of the soldiers. With earnest gaze she looked on the labyrinth of
 smoking piles which had been a city, and then expressed her readiness to
 return home. At this moment a melancholy howl struck on our ears; it was
 repeated; "Hark!" cried Clara, "he is there; that is Florio, my father's
 dog." It seemed to me impossible that she could recognise the sound, but
 she persisted in her assertion till she gained credit with the crowd about.
 At least it would be a benevolent action to rescue the sufferer, whether
 human or brute, from the desolation of the town; so, sending Clara back to
 her home, I again entered Constantinople. Encouraged by the impunity
 attendant on my former visit, several soldiers who had made a part of
 Raymond's body guard, who had loved him, and sincerely mourned his loss,
 accompanied me.
 
 It is impossible to conjecture the strange enchainment of events which
 restored the lifeless form of my friend to our hands. In that part of the
 town where the fire had most raged the night before, and which now lay
 quenched, black and cold, the dying dog of Raymond crouched beside the
 mutilated form of its lord. At such a time sorrow has no voice; affliction,
 tamed by it is very vehemence, is mute. The poor animal recognised me,
 licked my hand, crept close to its lord, and died. He had been evidently
 thrown from his horse by some falling ruin, which had crushed his head, and
 defaced his whole person. I bent over the body, and took in my hand the
 edge of his cloak, less altered in appearance than the human frame it
 clothed. I pressed it to my lips, while the rough soldiers gathered around,
 mourning over this worthiest prey of death, as if regret and endless
 lamentation could re-illumine the extinguished spark, or call to its
 shattered prison-house of flesh the liberated spirit. Yesterday those limbs
 were worth an universe; they then enshrined a transcendant power, whose
 intents, words, and actions were worthy to be recorded in letters of gold;
 now the superstition of affection alone could give value to the shattered
 mechanism, which, incapable and clod-like, no more resembled Raymond, than
 the fallen rain is like the former mansion of cloud in which it climbed the
 highest skies, and gilded by the sun, attracted all eyes, and satiated the
 sense by its excess of beauty.
 
 Such as he had now become, such as was his terrene vesture, defaced and
 spoiled, we wrapt it in our cloaks, and lifting the burthen in our arms,
 bore it from this city of the dead. The question arose as to where we
 should deposit him. In our road to the palace, we passed through the Greek
 cemetery; here on a tablet of black marble I caused him to be laid; the
 cypresses waved high above, their death-like gloom accorded with his state
 of nothingness. We cut branches of the funereal trees and placed them over
 him, and on these again his sword. I left a guard to protect this treasure
 of dust; and ordered perpetual torches to be burned around.
 
 When I returned to Perdita, I found that she had already been informed of
 the success of my undertaking. He, her beloved, the sole and eternal object
 of her passionate tenderness, was restored her. Such was the maniac
 language of her enthusiasm. What though those limbs moved not, and those
 lips could no more frame modulated accents of wisdom and love! What though
 like a weed flung from the fruitless sea, he lay the prey of corruption--
 still that was the form she had caressed, those the lips that meeting hers,
 had drank the spirit of love from the commingling breath; that was the
 earthly mechanism of dissoluble clay she had called her own. True, she
 looked forward to another life; true, the burning spirit of love seemed to
 her unextinguishable throughout eternity. Yet at this time, with human
 fondness, she clung to all that her human senses permitted her to see and
 feel to be a part of Raymond.
 
 Pale as marble, clear and beaming as that, she heard my tale, and enquired
 concerning the spot where he had been deposited. Her features had lost the
 distortion of grief; her eyes were brightened, her very person seemed
 dilated; while the excessive whiteness and even transparency of her skin,
 and something hollow in her voice, bore witness that not tranquillity, but
 excess of excitement, occasioned the treacherous calm that settled on her
 countenance. I asked her where he should be buried. She replied, "At
 Athens; even at the Athens which he loved. Without the town, on the
 acclivity of Hymettus, there is a rocky recess which he pointed out to me
 as the spot where he would wish to repose."
 
 My own desire certainly was that he should not be removed from the spot
 where he now lay. But her wish was of course to be complied with; and I
 entreated her to prepare without delay for our departure.
 
 Behold now the melancholy train cross the flats of Thrace, and wind through
 the defiles, and over the mountains of Macedonia, coast the clear waves of
 the Peneus, cross the Larissean plain, pass the straits of Thermopylae, and
 ascending in succession Oeta and Parnassus, descend to the fertile plain of
 Athens. Women bear with resignation these long drawn ills, but to a man's
 impatient spirit, the slow motion of our cavalcade, the melancholy repose
 we took at noon, the perpetual presence of the pall, gorgeous though it
 was, that wrapt the rifled casket which had contained Raymond, the
 monotonous recurrence of day and night, unvaried by hope or change, all the
 circumstances of our march were intolerable. Perdita, shut up in herself,
 spoke little. Her carriage was closed; and, when we rested, she sat leaning
 her pale cheek on her white cold hand, with eyes fixed on the ground,
 indulging thoughts which refused communication or sympathy.
 
 We descended from Parnassus, emerging from its many folds, and passed
 through Livadia on our road to Attica. Perdita would not enter Athens; but
 reposing at Marathon on the night of our arrival, conducted me on the
 following day, to the spot selected by her as the treasure house of
 Raymond's dear remains. It was in a recess near the head of the ravine to
 the south of Hymettus. The chasm, deep, black, and hoary, swept from the
 summit to the base; in the fissures of the rock myrtle underwood grew and
 wild thyme, the food of many nations of bees; enormous crags protruded into
 the cleft, some beetling over, others rising perpendicularly from it. At
 the foot of this sublime chasm, a fertile laughing valley reached from sea
 to sea, and beyond was spread the blue Aegean, sprinkled with islands, the
 light waves glancing beneath the sun. Close to the spot on which we stood,
 was a solitary rock, high and conical, which, divided on every side from
 the mountain, seemed a nature-hewn pyramid; with little labour this block
 was reduced to a perfect shape; the narrow cell was scooped out beneath in
 which Raymond was placed, and a short inscription, carved in the living
 stone, recorded the name of its tenant, the cause and aera of his death.
 
 Every thing was accomplished with speed under my directions. I agreed to
 leave the finishing and guardianship of the tomb to the head of the
 religious establishment at Athens, and by the end of October prepared for
 my return to England. I mentioned this to Perdita. It was painful to appear
 to drag her from the last scene that spoke of her lost one; but to linger
 here was vain, and my very soul was sick with its yearning to rejoin my
 Idris and her babes. In reply, my sister requested me to accompany her the
 following evening to the tomb of Raymond. Some days had passed since I had
 visited the spot. The path to it had been enlarged, and steps hewn in the
 rock led us less circuitously than before, to the spot itself; the platform
 on which the pyramid stood was enlarged, and looking towards the south, in
 a recess overshadowed by the straggling branches of a wild fig-tree, I saw
 foundations dug, and props and rafters fixed, evidently the commencement of
 a cottage; standing on its unfinished threshold, the tomb was at our
 right-hand, the whole ravine, and plain, and azure sea immediately before
 us; the dark rocks received a glow from the descending sun, which glanced
 along the cultivated valley, and dyed in purple and orange the placid
 waves; we sat on a rocky elevation, and I gazed with rapture on the
 beauteous panorama of living and changeful colours, which varied and
 enhanced the graces of earth and ocean.
 
 "Did I not do right," said Perdita, "in having my loved one conveyed
 hither? Hereafter this will be the cynosure of Greece. In such a spot death
 loses half its terrors, and even the inanimate dust appears to partake of
 the spirit of beauty which hallows this region. Lionel, he sleeps there;
 that is the grave of Raymond, he whom in my youth I first loved; whom my
 heart accompanied in days of separation and anger; to whom I am now joined
 for ever. Never--mark me--never will I leave this spot. Methinks his
 spirit remains here as well as that dust, which, uncommunicable though it
 be, is more precious in its nothingness than aught else widowed earth
 clasps to her sorrowing bosom. The myrtle bushes, the thyme, the little
 cyclamen, which peep from the fissures of the rock, all the produce of the
 place, bear affinity to him; the light that invests the hills participates
 in his essence, and sky and mountains, sea and valley, are imbued by the
 presence of his spirit. I will live and die here!
 
 "Go you to England, Lionel; return to sweet Idris and dearest Adrian;
 return, and let my orphan girl be as a child of your own in your house.
 Look on me as dead; and truly if death be a mere change of state, I am
 dead. This is another world, from that which late I inhabited, from that
 which is now your home. Here I hold communion only with the has been, and
 to come. Go you to England, and leave me where alone I can consent to drag
 out the miserable days which I must still live."
 
 A shower of tears terminated her sad harangue. I had expected some
 extravagant proposition, and remained silent awhile, collecting my thoughts
 that I might the better combat her fanciful scheme. "You cherish dreary
 thoughts, my dear Perdita," I said, "nor do I wonder that for a time your
 better reason should be influenced by passionate grief and a disturbed
 imagination. Even I am in love with this last home of Raymond's;
 nevertheless we must quit it."
 
 "I expected this," cried Perdita; "I supposed that you would treat me as a
 mad, foolish girl. But do not deceive yourself; this cottage is built by my
 order; and here I shall remain, until the hour arrives when I may share his
 happier dwelling."
 
 "My dearest girl!"
 
 "And what is there so strange in my design? I might have deceived you; I
 might have talked of remaining here only a few months; in your anxiety to
 reach Windsor you would have left me, and without reproach or contention, I
 might have pursued my plan. But I disdained the artifice; or rather in my
 wretchedness it was my only consolation to pour out my heart to you, my
 brother, my only friend. You will not dispute with me? You know how wilful
 your poor, misery-stricken sister is. Take my girl with you; wean her from
 sights and thoughts of sorrow; let infantine hilarity revisit her heart,
 and animate her eyes; so could it never be, were she near me; it is far
 better for all of you that you should never see me again. For myself, I
 will not voluntarily seek death, that is, I will not, while I can command
 myself; and I can here. But drag me from this country; and my power of self
 control vanishes, nor can I answer for the violence my agony of grief may
 lead me to commit."
 
 "You clothe your meaning, Perdita," I replied, "in powerful words, yet that
 meaning is selfish and unworthy of you. You have often agreed with me that
 there is but one solution to the intricate riddle of life; to improve
 ourselves, and contribute to the happiness of others: and now, in the very
 prime of life, you desert your principles, and shut yourself up in useless
 solitude. Will you think of Raymond less at Windsor, the scene of your
 early happiness? Will you commune less with his departed spirit, while you
 watch over and cultivate the rare excellence of his child? You have been
 sadly visited; nor do I wonder that a feeling akin to insanity should drive
 you to bitter and unreasonable imaginings. But a home of love awaits you in
 your native England. My tenderness and affection must soothe you; the
 society of Raymond's friends will be of more solace than these dreary
 speculations. We will all make it our first care, our dearest task, to
 contribute to your happiness."
 
 Perdita shook her head; "If it could be so," she replied, "I were much in
 the wrong to disdain your offers. But it is not a matter of choice; I can
 live here only. I am a part of this scene; each and all its properties are
 a part of me. This is no sudden fancy; I live by it. The knowledge that I
 am here, rises with me in the morning, and enables me to endure the light;
 it is mingled with my food, which else were poison; it walks, it sleeps
 with me, for ever it accompanies me. Here I may even cease to repine, and
 may add my tardy consent to the decree which has taken him from me. He
 would rather have died such a death, which will be recorded in history to
 endless time, than have lived to old age unknown, unhonoured. Nor can I
 desire better, than, having been the chosen and beloved of his heart, here,
 in youth's prime, before added years can tarnish the best feelings of my
 nature, to watch his tomb, and speedily rejoin him in his blessed repose.
 
 "So much, my dearest Lionel, I have said, wishing to persuade you that I do
 right. If you are unconvinced, I can add nothing further by way of
 argument, and I can only declare my fixed resolve. I stay here; force only
 can remove me. Be it so; drag me away--I return; confine me, imprison me,
 still I escape, and come here. Or would my brother rather devote the
 heart-broken Perdita to the straw and chains of a maniac, than suffer her
 to rest in peace beneath the shadow of His society, in this my own selected
 and beloved recess?"--
 
 All this appeared to me, I own, methodized madness. I imagined, that it was
 my imperative duty to take her from scenes that thus forcibly reminded her
 of her loss. Nor did I doubt, that in the tranquillity of our family circle
 at Windsor, she would recover some degree of composure, and in the end, of
 happiness. My affection for Clara also led me to oppose these fond dreams
 of cherished grief; her sensibility had already been too much excited; her
 infant heedlessness too soon exchanged for deep and anxious thought. The
 strange and romantic scheme of her mother, might confirm and perpetuate the
 painful view of life, which had intruded itself thus early on her
 contemplation.
 
 On returning home, the captain of the steam packet with whom I had agreed
 to sail, came to tell me, that accidental circumstances hastened his
 departure, and that, if I went with him, I must come on board at five on
 the following morning. I hastily gave my consent to this arrangement, and
 as hastily formed a plan through which Perdita should be forced to become
 my companion. I believe that most people in my situation would have acted
 in the same manner. Yet this consideration does not, or rather did not in
 after time, diminish the reproaches of my conscience. At the moment, I felt
 convinced that I was acting for the best, and that all I did was right and
 even necessary.
 
 I sat with Perdita and soothed her, by my seeming assent to her wild
 scheme. She received my concurrence with pleasure, and a thousand times
 over thanked her deceiving, deceitful brother. As night came on, her
 spirits, enlivened by my unexpected concession, regained an almost
 forgotten vivacity. I pretended to be alarmed by the feverish glow in her
 cheek; I entreated her to take a composing draught; I poured out the
 medicine, which she took docilely from me. I watched her as she drank it.
 Falsehood and artifice are in themselves so hateful, that, though I still
 thought I did right, a feeling of shame and guilt came painfully upon me. I
 left her, and soon heard that she slept soundly under the influence of the
 opiate I had administered. She was carried thus unconscious on board; the
 anchor weighed, and the wind being favourable, we stood far out to sea;
 with all the canvas spread, and the power of the engine to assist, we
 scudded swiftly and steadily through the chafed element.
 
 It was late in the day before Perdita awoke, and a longer time elapsed
 before recovering from the torpor occasioned by the laudanum, she perceived
 her change of situation. She started wildly from her couch, and flew to the
 cabin window. The blue and troubled sea sped past the vessel, and was
 spread shoreless around: the sky was covered by a rack, which in its swift
 motion shewed how speedily she was borne away. The creaking of the masts,
 the clang of the wheels, the tramp above, all persuaded her that she was
 already far from the shores of Greece.--"Where are we?" she cried, "where
 are we going?"--
 
 The attendant whom I had stationed to watch her, replied, "to England."--
 
 
 "And my brother?"--
 
 "Is on deck, Madam."
 
 "Unkind! unkind!" exclaimed the poor victim, as with a deep sigh she looked
 on the waste of waters. Then without further remark, she threw herself on
 her couch, and closing her eyes remained motionless; so that but for the
 deep sighs that burst from her, it would have seemed that she slept.
 
 As soon as I heard that she had spoken, I sent Clara to her, that the sight
 of the lovely innocent might inspire gentle and affectionate thoughts. But
 neither the presence of her child, nor a subsequent visit from me, could
 rouse my sister. She looked on Clara with a countenance of woful meaning,
 but she did not speak. When I appeared, she turned away, and in reply to my
 enquiries, only said, "You know not what you have done!"--I trusted that
 this sullenness betokened merely the struggle between disappointment and
 natural affection, and that in a few days she would be reconciled to her
 fate.
 
 When night came on, she begged that Clara might sleep in a separate cabin.
 Her servant, however, remained with her. About midnight she spoke to the
 latter, saying that she had had a bad dream, and bade her go to her
 daughter, and bring word whether she rested quietly. The woman obeyed.
 
 The breeze, that had flagged since sunset, now rose again. I was on deck,
 enjoying our swift progress. The quiet was disturbed only by the rush of
 waters as they divided before the steady keel, the murmur of the moveless
 and full sails, the wind whistling in the shrouds, and the regular motion
 of the engine. The sea was gently agitated, now shewing a white crest, and
 now resuming an uniform hue; the clouds had disappeared; and dark ether
 clipt the broad ocean, in which the constellations vainly sought their
 accustomed mirror. Our rate could not have been less than eight knots.
 
 Suddenly I heard a splash in the sea. The sailors on watch rushed to the
 side of the vessel, with the cry--some one gone overboard. "It is not
 from deck," said the man at the helm, "something has been thrown from the
 aft cabin." A call for the boat to be lowered was echoed from the deck. I
 rushed into my sister's cabin; it was empty.
 
 With sails abaft, the engine stopt, the vessel remained unwillingly
 stationary, until, after an hour's search, my poor Perdita was brought on
 board. But no care could re-animate her, no medicine cause her dear eyes to
 open, and the blood to flow again from her pulseless heart. One clenched
 hand contained a slip of paper, on which was written, "To Athens." To
 ensure her removal thither, and prevent the irrecoverable loss of her body
 in the wide sea, she had had the precaution to fasten a long shawl round
 her waist, and again to the staunchions of the cabin window. She had
 drifted somewhat under the keel of the vessel, and her being out of sight
 occasioned the delay in finding her. And thus the ill-starred girl died a
 victim to my senseless rashness. Thus, in early day, she left us for the
 company of the dead, and preferred to share the rocky grave of Raymond,
 before the animated scene this cheerful earth afforded, and the society of
 loving friends. Thus in her twenty-ninth year she died; having enjoyed some
 few years of the happiness of paradise, and sustaining a reverse to which
 her impatient spirit and affectionate disposition were unable to submit. As
 I marked the placid expression that had settled on her countenance in
 death, I felt, in spite of the pangs of remorse, in spite of heart-rending
 regret, that it was better to die so, than to drag on long, miserable years
 of repining and inconsolable grief. Stress of weather drove us up the
 Adriatic Gulph; and, our vessel being hardly fitted to weather a storm, we
 took refuge in the port of Ancona. Here I met Georgio Palli, the
 vice-admiral of the Greek fleet, a former friend and warm partizan of
 Raymond. I committed the remains of my lost Perdita to his care, for the
 purpose of having them transported to Hymettus, and placed in the cell her
 Raymond already occupied beneath the pyramid. This was all accomplished
 even as I wished. She reposed beside her beloved, and the tomb above was
 inscribed with the united names of Raymond and Perdita.
 
 I then came to a resolution of pursuing our journey to England overland. My
 own heart was racked by regrets and remorse. The apprehension, that Raymond
 had departed for ever, that his name, blended eternally with the past, must
 be erased from every anticipation of the future, had come slowly upon me. I
 had always admired his talents; his noble aspirations; his grand
 conceptions of the glory and majesty of his ambition: his utter want of
 mean passions; his fortitude and daring. In Greece I had learnt to love
 him; his very waywardness, and self-abandonment to the impulses of
 superstition, attached me to him doubly; it might be weakness, but it was
 the antipodes of all that was grovelling and selfish. To these pangs were
 added the loss of Perdita, lost through my own accursed self-will and
 conceit. This dear one, my sole relation; whose progress I had marked from
 tender childhood through the varied path of life, and seen her throughout
 conspicuous for integrity, devotion, and true affection; for all that
 constitutes the peculiar graces of the female character, and beheld her at
 last the victim of too much loving, too constant an attachment to the
 perishable and lost, she, in her pride of beauty and life, had thrown aside
 the pleasant perception of the apparent world for the unreality of the
 grave, and had left poor Clara quite an orphan. I concealed from this
 beloved child that her mother's death was voluntary, and tried every means
 to awaken cheerfulness in her sorrow-stricken spirit.
 
 One of my first acts for the recovery even of my own composure, was to bid
 farewell to the sea. Its hateful splash renewed again and again to my sense
 the death of my sister; its roar was a dirge; in every dark hull that was
 tossed on its inconstant bosom, I imaged a bier, that would convey to death
 all who trusted to its treacherous smiles. Farewell to the sea! Come, my
 Clara, sit beside me in this aerial bark; quickly and gently it cleaves the
 azure serene, and with soft undulation glides upon the current of the air;
 or, if storm shake its fragile mechanism, the green earth is below; we can
 descend, and take shelter on the stable continent. Here aloft, the
 companions of the swift-winged birds, we skim through the unresisting
 element, fleetly and fearlessly. The light boat heaves not, nor is opposed
 by death-bearing waves; the ether opens before the prow, and the shadow of
 the globe that upholds it, shelters us from the noon-day sun. Beneath are
 the plains of Italy, or the vast undulations of the wave-like Apennines:
 fertility reposes in their many folds, and woods crown the summits. The
 free and happy peasant, unshackled by the Austrian, bears the double
 harvest to the garner; and the refined citizens rear without dread the long
 blighted tree of knowledge in this garden of the world. We were lifted
 above the Alpine peaks, and from their deep and brawling ravines entered
 the plain of fair France, and after an airy journey of six days, we landed
 at Dieppe, furled the feathered wings, and closed the silken globe of our
 little pinnace. A heavy rain made this mode of travelling now incommodious;
 so we embarked in a steam-packet, and after a short passage landed at
 Portsmouth.
 
 A strange story was rife here. A few days before, a tempest-struck vessel
 had appeared off the town: the hull was parched-looking and cracked, the
 sails rent, and bent in a careless, unseamanlike manner, the shrouds
 tangled and broken. She drifted towards the harbour, and was stranded on
 the sands at the entrance. In the morning the custom-house officers,
 together with a crowd of idlers, visited her. One only of the crew appeared
 to have arrived with her. He had got to shore, and had walked a few paces
 towards the town, and then, vanquished by malady and approaching death, had
 fallen on the inhospitable beach. He was found stiff, his hands clenched,
 and pressed against his breast. His skin, nearly black, his matted hair and
 bristly beard, were signs of a long protracted misery. It was whispered
 that he had died of the plague. No one ventured on board the vessel, and
 strange sights were averred to be seen at night, walking the deck, and
 hanging on the masts and shrouds. She soon went to pieces; I was shewn
 where she had been, and saw her disjoined timbers tossed on the waves. The
 body of the man who had landed, had been buried deep in the sands; and none
 could tell more, than that the vessel was American built, and that several
 months before the Fortunatas had sailed from Philadelphia, of which no
 tidings were afterwards received.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 I RETURNED to my family estate in the autumn of the year 2092. My heart had
 long been with them; and I felt sick with the hope and delight of seeing
 them again. The district which contained them appeared the abode of every
 kindly spirit. Happiness, love and peace, walked the forest paths, and
 tempered the atmosphere. After all the agitation and sorrow I had endured
 in Greece, I sought Windsor, as the storm-driven bird does the nest in
 which it may fold its wings in tranquillity.
 
 How unwise had the wanderers been, who had deserted its shelter, entangled
 themselves in the web of society, and entered on what men of the world call
 "life,"--that labyrinth of evil, that scheme of mutual torture. To live,
 according to this sense of the word, we must not only observe and learn, we
 must also feel; we must not be mere spectators of action, we must act; we
 must not describe, but be subjects of description. Deep sorrow must have
 been the inmate of our bosoms; fraud must have lain in wait for us; the
 artful must have deceived us; sickening doubt and false hope must have
 chequered our days; hilarity and joy, that lap the soul in ecstasy, must at
 times have possessed us. Who that knows what "life" is, would pine for this
 feverish species of existence? I have lived. I have spent days and nights
 of festivity; I have joined in ambitious hopes, and exulted in victory:
 now,--shut the door on the world, and build high the wall that is to
 separate me from the troubled scene enacted within its precincts. Let us
 live for each other and for happiness; let us seek peace in our dear home,
 near the inland murmur of streams, and the gracious waving of trees, the
 beauteous vesture of earth, and sublime pageantry of the skies. Let us
 leave "life," that we may live.
 
 Idris was well content with this resolve of mine. Her native sprightliness
 needed no undue excitement, and her placid heart reposed contented on my
 love, the well-being of her children, and the beauty of surrounding nature.
 Her pride and blameless ambition was to create smiles in all around her,
 and to shed repose on the fragile existence of her brother. In spite of her
 tender nursing, the health of Adrian perceptibly declined. Walking, riding,
 the common occupations of life, overcame him: he felt no pain, but seemed
 to tremble for ever on the verge of annihilation. Yet, as he had lived on
 for months nearly in the same state, he did not inspire us with any
 immediate fear; and, though he talked of death as an event most familiar to
 his thoughts, he did not cease to exert himself to render others happy, or
 to cultivate his own astonishing powers of mind. Winter passed away; and
 spring, led by the months, awakened life in all nature. The forest was
 dressed in green; the young calves frisked on the new-sprung grass; the
 wind-winged shadows of light clouds sped over the green cornfields; the
 hermit cuckoo repeated his monotonous all-hail to the season; the
 nightingale, bird of love and minion of the evening star, filled the woods
 with song; while Venus lingered in the warm sunset, and the young green of
 the trees lay in gentle relief along the clear horizon.
 
 Delight awoke in every heart, delight and exultation; for there was peace
 through all the world; the temple of Universal Janus was shut, and man died
 not that year by the hand of man.
 
 "Let this last but twelve months," said Adrian; "and earth will become a
 Paradise. The energies of man were before directed to the destruction of
 his species: they now aim at its liberation and preservation. Man cannot
 repose, and his restless aspirations will now bring forth good instead of
 evil. The favoured countries of the south will throw off the iron yoke of
 servitude; poverty will quit us, and with that, sickness. What may not the
 forces, never before united, of liberty and peace achieve in this dwelling
 of man?"
 
 "Dreaming, for ever dreaming, Windsor!" said Ryland, the old adversary of
 Raymond, and candidate for the Protectorate at the ensuing election. "Be
 assured that earth is not, nor ever can be heaven, while the seeds of hell
 are natives of her soil. When the seasons have become equal, when the air
 breeds no disorders, when its surface is no longer liable to blights and
 droughts, then sickness will cease; when men's passions are dead, poverty
 will depart. When love is no longer akin to hate, then brotherhood will
 exist: we are very far from that state at present."
 
 "Not so far as you may suppose," observed a little old astronomer, by name
 Merrival, "the poles precede slowly, but securely; in an hundred thousand
 years--"
 
 "We shall all be underground," said Ryland.
 
 "The pole of the earth will coincide with the pole of the ecliptic,"
 continued the astronomer, "an universal spring will be produced, and earth
 become a paradise."
 
 "And we shall of course enjoy the benefit of the change," said Ryland,
 contemptuously.
 
 "We have strange news here," I observed. I had the newspaper in my hand,
 and, as usual, had turned to the intelligence from Greece. "It seems that
 the total destruction of Constantinople, and the supposition that winter
 had purified the air of the fallen city, gave the Greeks courage to visit
 its site, and begin to rebuild it. But they tell us that the curse of God
 is on the place, for every one who has ventured within the walls has been
 tainted by the plague; that this disease has spread in Thrace and
 Macedonia; and now, fearing the virulence of infection during the coming
 heats, a cordon has been drawn on the frontiers of Thessaly, and a strict
 quarantine exacted." This intelligence brought us back from the prospect of
 paradise, held out after the lapse of an hundred thousand years, to the
 pain and misery at present existent upon earth. We talked of the ravages
 made last year by pestilence in every quarter of the world; and of the
 dreadful consequences of a second visitation. We discussed the best means
 of preventing infection, and of preserving health and activity in a large
 city thus afflicted--London, for instance. Merrival did not join in this
 conversation; drawing near Idris, he proceeded to assure her that the
 joyful prospect of an earthly paradise after an hundred thousand years, was
 clouded to him by the knowledge that in a certain period of time after, an
 earthly hell or purgatory, would occur, when the ecliptic and equator would
 be at right angles.[1] Our party at length broke up; "We are all dreaming
 this morning," said Ryland, "it is as wise to discuss the probability of a
 visitation of the plague in our well-governed metropolis, as to calculate
 the centuries which must escape before we can grow pine-apples here in the
 open air."
 
 But, though it seemed absurd to calculate upon the arrival of the plague in
 London, I could not reflect without extreme pain on the desolation this
 evil would cause in Greece. The English for the most part talked of Thrace
 and Macedonia, as they would of a lunar territory, which, unknown to them,
 presented no distinct idea or interest to the minds. I had trod the soil.
 The faces of many of the inhabitants were familiar to me; in the towns,
 plains, hills, and defiles of these countries, I had enjoyed unspeakable
 delight, as I journied through them the year before. Some romantic village,
 some cottage, or elegant abode there situated, inhabited by the lovely and
 the good, rose before my mental sight, and the question haunted me, is the
 plague there also?--That same invincible monster, which hovered over and
 devoured Constantinople--that fiend more cruel than tempest, less tame
 than fire, is, alas, unchained in that beautiful country--these
 reflections would not allow me to rest.
 
 The political state of England became agitated as the time drew near when
 the new Protector was to be elected. This event excited the more interest,
 since it was the current report, that if the popular candidate (Ryland)
 should be chosen, the question of the abolition of hereditary rank, and
 other feudal relics, would come under the consideration of parliament. Not
 a word had been spoken during the present session on any of these topics.
 Every thing would depend upon the choice of a Protector, and the elections
 of the ensuing year. Yet this very silence was awful, shewing the deep
 weight attributed to the question; the fear of either party to hazard an
 ill-timed attack, and the expectation of a furious contention when it
 should begin.
 
 But although St. Stephen's did not echo with the voice which filled each
 heart, the newspapers teemed with nothing else; and in private companies
 the conversation however remotely begun, soon verged towards this central
 point, while voices were lowered and chairs drawn closer. The nobles did
 not hesitate to express their fear; the other party endeavoured to treat
 the matter lightly. "Shame on the country," said Ryland, "to lay so much
 stress upon words and frippery; it is a question of nothing; of the new
 painting of carriage-pannels and the embroidery of footmen's coats."
 
 Yet could England indeed doff her lordly trappings, and be content with the
 democratic style of America? Were the pride of ancestry, the patrician
 spirit, the gentle courtesies and refined pursuits, splendid attributes of
 rank, to be erased among us? We were told that this would not be the case;
 that we were by nature a poetical people, a nation easily duped by words,
 ready to array clouds in splendour, and bestow honour on the dust. This
 spirit we could never lose; and it was to diffuse this concentrated spirit
 of birth, that the new law was to be brought forward. We were assured that,
 when the name and title of Englishman was the sole patent of nobility, we
 should all be noble; that when no man born under English sway, felt another
 his superior in rank, courtesy and refinement would become the birth-right
 of all our countrymen. Let not England be so far disgraced, as to have it
 imagined that it can be without nobles, nature's true nobility, who bear
 their patent in their mien, who are from their cradle elevated above the
 rest of their species, because they are better than the rest. Among a race
 of independent, and generous, and well educated men, in a country where the
 imagination is empress of men's minds, there needs be no fear that we
 should want a perpetual succession of the high-born and lordly. That party,
 however, could hardly yet be considered a minority in the kingdom, who
 extolled the ornament of the column, "the Corinthian capital of polished
 society;" they appealed to prejudices without number, to old attachments
 and young hopes; to the expectation of thousands who might one day become
 peers; they set up as a scarecrow, the spectre of all that was sordid,
 mechanic and base in the commercial republics.
 
 The plague had come to Athens. Hundreds of English residents returned to
 their own country. Raymond's beloved Athenians, the free, the noble people
 of the divinest town in Greece, fell like ripe corn before the merciless
 sickle of the adversary. Its pleasant places were deserted; its temples and
 palaces were converted into tombs; its energies, bent before towards the
 highest objects of human ambition, were now forced to converge to one
 point, the guarding against the innumerous arrows of the plague.
 
 At any other time this disaster would have excited extreme compassion among
 us; but it was now passed over, while each mind was engaged by the coming
 controversy. It was not so with me; and the question of rank and right
 dwindled to insignificance in my eyes, when I pictured the scene of
 suffering Athens. I heard of the death of only sons; of wives and husbands
 most devoted; of the rending of ties twisted with the heart's fibres, of
 friend losing friend, and young mothers mourning for their first born; and
 these moving incidents were grouped and painted in my mind by the knowledge
 of the persons, by my esteem and affection for the sufferers. It was the
 admirers, friends, fellow soldiers of Raymond, families that had welcomed
 Perdita to Greece, and lamented with her the loss of her lord, that were
 swept away, and went to dwell with them in the undistinguishing tomb.
 
 The plague at Athens had been preceded and caused by the contagion from the
 East; and the scene of havoc and death continued to be acted there, on a
 scale of fearful magnitude. A hope that the visitation of the present year
 would prove the last, kept up the spirits of the merchants connected with
 these countries; but the inhabitants were driven to despair, or to a
 resignation which, arising from fanaticism, assumed the same dark hue.
 America had also received the taint; and, were it yellow fever or plague,
 the epidemic was gifted with a virulence before unfelt. The devastation was
 not confined to the towns, but spread throughout the country; the hunter
 died in the woods, the peasant in the corn-fields, and the fisher on his
 native waters.
 
 A strange story was brought to us from the East, to which little credit
 would have been given, had not the fact been attested by a multitude of
 witnesses, in various parts of the world. On the twenty-first of June, it
 was said that an hour before noon, a black sun arose: an orb, the size of
 that luminary, but dark, defined, whose beams were shadows, ascended from
 the west; in about an hour it had reached the meridian, and eclipsed the
 bright parent of day. Night fell upon every country, night, sudden,
 rayless, entire. The stars came out, shedding their ineffectual glimmerings
 on the light-widowed earth. But soon the dim orb passed from over the sun,
 and lingered down the eastern heaven. As it descended, its dusky rays
 crossed the brilliant ones of the sun, and deadened or distorted them. The
 shadows of things assumed strange and ghastly shapes. The wild animals in
 the woods took fright at the unknown shapes figured on the ground. They
 fled they knew not whither; and the citizens were filled with greater
 dread, at the convulsion which "shook lions into civil streets;"--birds,
 strong-winged eagles, suddenly blinded, fell in the market-places, while
 owls and bats shewed themselves welcoming the early night. Gradually the
 object of fear sank beneath the horizon, and to the last shot up shadowy
 beams into the otherwise radiant air. Such was the tale sent us from Asia,
 from the eastern extremity of Europe, and from Africa as far west as the
 Golden Coast. Whether this story were true or not, the effects were certain.
 Through Asia, from the banks of the Nile to the shores of the Caspian, from
 the Hellespont even to the sea of Oman, a sudden panic was driven. The men
 filled the mosques; the women, veiled, hastened to the tombs, and carried
 offerings to the dead, thus to preserve the living. The plague was
 forgotten, in this new fear which the black sun had spread; and, though the
 dead multiplied, and the streets of Ispahan, of Pekin, and of Delhi were
 strewed with pestilence-struck corpses, men passed on, gazing on the
 ominous sky, regardless of the death beneath their feet. The christians
 sought their churches,--christian maidens, even at the feast of roses,
 clad in white, with shining veils, sought, in long procession, the places
 consecrated to their religion, filling the air with their hymns; while,
 ever and anon, from the lips of some poor mourner in the crowd, a voice of
 wailing burst, and the rest looked up, fancying they could discern the
 sweeping wings of angels, who passed over the earth, lamenting the
 disasters about to fall on man.
 
 In the sunny clime of Persia, in the crowded cities of China, amidst the
 aromatic groves of Cashmere, and along the southern shores of the
 Mediterranean, such scenes had place. Even in Greece the tale of the sun of
 darkness encreased the fears and despair of the dying multitude. We, in our
 cloudy isle, were far removed from danger, and the only circumstance that
 brought these disasters at all home to us, was the daily arrival of vessels
 from the east, crowded with emigrants, mostly English; for the Moslems,
 though the fear of death was spread keenly among them, still clung
 together; that, if they were to die (and if they were, death would as
 readily meet them on the homeless sea, or in far England, as in Persia,)--
 if they were to die, their bones might rest in earth made sacred by the
 relics of true believers. Mecca had never before been so crowded with
 pilgrims; yet the Arabs neglected to pillage the caravans, but, humble and
 weaponless, they joined the procession, praying Mahomet to avert plague
 from their tents and deserts.
 
 I cannot describe the rapturous delight with which I turned from political
 brawls at home, and the physical evils of distant countries, to my own dear
 home, to the selected abode of goodness and love; to peace, and the
 interchange of every sacred sympathy. Had I never quitted Windsor, these
 emotions would not have been so intense; but I had in Greece been the prey
 of fear and deplorable change; in Greece, after a period of anxiety and
 sorrow, I had seen depart two, whose very names were the symbol of
 greatness and virtue. But such miseries could never intrude upon the
 domestic circle left to me, while, secluded in our beloved forest, we
 passed our lives in tranquillity. Some small change indeed the progress of
 years brought here; and time, as it is wont, stamped the traces of
 mortality on our pleasures and expectations. Idris, the most affectionate
 wife, sister and friend, was a tender and loving mother. The feeling was
 not with her as with many, a pastime; it was a passion. We had had three
 children; one, the second in age, died while I was in Greece. This had
 dashed the triumphant and rapturous emotions of maternity with grief and
 fear. Before this event, the little beings, sprung from herself, the young
 heirs of her transient life, seemed to have a sure lease of existence; now
 she dreaded that the pitiless destroyer might snatch her remaining
 darlings, as it had snatched their brother. The least illness caused throes
 of terror; she was miserable if she were at all absent from them; her
 treasure of happiness she had garnered in their fragile being, and kept
 forever on the watch, lest the insidious thief should as before steal these
 valued gems. She had fortunately small cause for fear. Alfred, now nine
 years old, was an upright, manly little fellow, with radiant brow, soft
 eyes, and gentle, though independent disposition. Our youngest was yet in
 infancy; but his downy cheek was sprinkled with the roses of health, and
 his unwearied vivacity filled our halls with innocent laughter.
 
 Clara had passed the age which, from its mute ignorance, was the source of
 the fears of Idris. Clara was dear to her, to all. There was so much
 intelligence combined with innocence, sensibility with forbearance, and
 seriousness with perfect good-humour, a beauty so transcendant, united to
 such endearing simplicity, that she hung like a pearl in the shrine of our
 possessions, a treasure of wonder and excellence.
 
 At the beginning of winter our Alfred, now nine years of age, first went to
 school at Eton. This appeared to him the primary step towards manhood, and
 he was proportionably pleased. Community of study and amusement developed
 the best parts of his character, his steady perseverance, generosity, and
 well-governed firmness. What deep and sacred emotions are excited in a
 father's bosom, when he first becomes convinced that his love for his child
 is not a mere instinct, but worthily bestowed, and that others, less akin,
 participate his approbation! It was supreme happiness to Idris and myself,
 to find that the frankness which Alfred's open brow indicated, the
 intelligence of his eyes, the tempered sensibility of his tones, were not
 delusions, but indications of talents and virtues, which would "grow with
 his growth, and strengthen with his strength." At this period, the
 termination of an animal's love for its offspring,--the true affection of
 the human parent commences. We no longer look on this dearest part of
 ourselves, as a tender plant which we must cherish, or a plaything for an
 idle hour. We build now on his intellectual faculties, we establish our
 hopes on his moral propensities. His weakness still imparts anxiety to this
 feeling, his ignorance prevents entire intimacy; but we begin to respect
 the future man, and to endeavour to secure his esteem, even as if he were
 our equal. What can a parent have more at heart than the good opinion of
 his child? In all our transactions with him our honour must be inviolate,
 the integrity of our relations untainted: fate and circumstance may, when
 he arrives at maturity, separate us for ever--but, as his aegis in
 danger, his consolation in hardship, let the ardent youth for ever bear
 with him through the rough path of life, love and honour for his parents.
 
 We had lived so long in the vicinity of Eton, that its population of young
 folks was well known to us. Many of them had been Alfred's playmates,
 before they became his school-fellows. We now watched this youthful
 congregation with redoubled interest. We marked the difference of character
 among the boys, and endeavoured to read the future man in the stripling.
 There is nothing more lovely, to which the heart more yearns than a
 free-spirited boy, gentle, brave, and generous. Several of the Etonians had
 these characteristics; all were distinguished by a sense of honour, and
 spirit of enterprize; in some, as they verged towards manhood, this
 degenerated into presumption; but the younger ones, lads a little older
 than our own, were conspicuous for their gallant and sweet dispositions.
 
 Here were the future governors of England; the men, who, when our ardour
 was cold, and our projects completed or destroyed for ever, when, our drama
 acted, we doffed the garb of the hour, and assumed the uniform of age, or
 of more equalizing death; here were the beings who were to carry on the
 vast machine of society; here were the lovers, husbands, fathers; here the
 landlord, the politician, the soldier; some fancied that they were even now
 ready to appear on the stage, eager to make one among the dramatis personae
 of active life. It was not long since I was like one of these beardless
 aspirants; when my boy shall have obtained the place I now hold, I shall
 have tottered into a grey-headed, wrinkled old man. Strange system! riddle
 of the Sphynx, most awe-striking! that thus man remains, while we the
 individuals pass away. Such is, to borrow the words of an eloquent and
 philosophic writer, "the mode of existence decreed to a permanent body
 composed of transitory parts; wherein, by the disposition of a stupendous
 wisdom, moulding together the great mysterious incorporation of the human
 race, the whole, at one time, is never old, or middle-aged, or young, but,
 in a condition of unchangeable constancy, moves on through the varied
 tenour of perpetual decay, fall, renovation, and progression."[2]
 
 Willingly do I give place to thee, dear Alfred! advance, offspring of
 tender love, child of our hopes; advance a soldier on the road to which I
 have been the pioneer! I will make way for thee. I have already put off the
 carelessness of childhood, the unlined brow, and springy gait of early
 years, that they may adorn thee. Advance; and I will despoil myself still
 further for thy advantage. Time shall rob me of the graces of maturity,
 shall take the fire from my eyes, and agility from my limbs, shall steal
 the better part of life, eager expectation and passionate love, and shower
 them in double portion on thy dear head. Advance! avail thyself of the
 gift, thou and thy comrades; and in the drama you are about to act, do not
 disgrace those who taught you to enter on the stage, and to pronounce
 becomingly the parts assigned to you! May your progress be uninterrupted
 and secure; born during the spring-tide of the hopes of man, may you lead
 up the summer to which no winter may succeed!
 
 [1] See an ingenious Essay, entitled, "The Mythological Astronomy of the
 Ancients Demonstrated," by Mackey, a shoemaker, of Norwich printed in 1822.
 [2] Burke's Reflections on the French Revolution.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 SOME disorder had surely crept into the course of the elements, destroying
 their benignant influence. The wind, prince of air, raged through his
 kingdom, lashing the sea into fury, and subduing the rebel earth into some
 sort of obedience.
 
   The God sends down his angry plagues from high,
   Famine and pestilence in heaps they die.
   Again in vengeance of his wrath he falls
   On their great hosts, and breaks their tottering walls;
   Arrests their navies on the ocean's plain,
   And whelms their strength with mountains of the main.
 
 Their deadly power shook the flourishing countries of the south, and
 during winter, even, we, in our northern retreat, began to quake under
 their ill effects.
 
 That fable is unjust, which gives the superiority to the sun over the wind.
 Who has not seen the lightsome earth, the balmy atmosphere, and basking
 nature become dark, cold and ungenial, when the sleeping wind has awoke in
 the east? Or, when the dun clouds thickly veil the sky, while exhaustless
 stores of rain are poured down, until, the dank earth refusing to imbibe
 the superabundant moisture, it lies in pools on the surface; when the torch
 of day seems like a meteor, to be quenched; who has not seen the
 cloud-stirring north arise, the streaked blue appear, and soon an opening
 made in the vapours in the eye of the wind, through which the bright azure
 shines? The clouds become thin; an arch is formed for ever rising upwards,
 till, the universal cope being unveiled, the sun pours forth its rays,
 re-animated and fed by the breeze.
 
 Then mighty art thou, O wind, to be throned above all other vicegerents of
 nature's power; whether thou comest destroying from the east, or pregnant
 with elementary life from the west; thee the clouds obey; the sun is
 subservient to thee; the shoreless ocean is thy slave! Thou sweepest over
 the earth, and oaks, the growth of centuries, submit to thy viewless axe;
 the snow-drift is scattered on the pinnacles of the Alps, the avalanche
 thunders down their vallies. Thou holdest the keys of the frost, and canst
 first chain and then set free the streams; under thy gentle governance the
 buds and leaves are born, they flourish nursed by thee.
 
 Why dost thou howl thus, O wind? By day and by night for four long months
 thy roarings have not ceased--the shores of the sea are strewn with
 wrecks, its keel-welcoming surface has become impassable, the earth has
 shed her beauty in obedience to thy command; the frail balloon dares no
 longer sail on the agitated air; thy ministers, the clouds, deluge the land
 with rain; rivers forsake their banks; the wild torrent tears up the
 mountain path; plain and wood, and verdant dell are despoiled of their
 loveliness; our very cities are wasted by thee. Alas, what will become of
 us? It seems as if the giant waves of ocean, and vast arms of the sea, were
 about to wrench the deep-rooted island from its centre; and cast it, a ruin
 and a wreck, upon the fields of the Atlantic.
 
 What are we, the inhabitants of this globe, least among the many that
 people infinite space? Our minds embrace infinity; the visible mechanism of
 our being is subject to merest accident. Day by day we are forced to
 believe this. He whom a scratch has disorganized, he who disappears from
 apparent life under the influence of the hostile agency at work around us,
 had the same powers as I--I also am subject to the same laws. In the face
 of all this we call ourselves lords of the creation, wielders of the
 elements, masters of life and death, and we allege in excuse of this
 arrogance, that though the individual is destroyed, man continues for
 ever.
 
 Thus, losing our identity, that of which we are chiefly conscious, we glory
 in the continuity of our species, and learn to regard death without terror.
 But when any whole nation becomes the victim of the destructive powers of
 exterior agents, then indeed man shrinks into insignificance, he feels his
 tenure of life insecure, his inheritance on earth cut off.
 
 I remember, after having witnessed the destructive effects of a fire, I
 could not even behold a small one in a stove, without a sensation of fear.
 The mounting flames had curled round the building, as it fell, and was
 destroyed. They insinuated themselves into the substances about them, and
 the impediments to their progress yielded at their touch. Could we take
 integral parts of this power, and not be subject to its operation? Could we
 domesticate a cub of this wild beast, and not fear its growth and
 maturity?
 
 Thus we began to feel, with regard to many-visaged death let loose on the
 chosen districts of our fair habitation, and above all, with regard to the
 plague. We feared the coming summer. Nations, bordering on the already
 infected countries, began to enter upon serious plans for the better
 keeping out of the enemy. We, a commercial people, were obliged to bring
 such schemes under consideration; and the question of contagion became
 matter of earnest disquisition.
 
 That the plague was not what is commonly called contagious, like the
 scarlet fever, or extinct small-pox, was proved. It was called an epidemic.
 But the grand question was still unsettled of how this epidemic was
 generated and increased. If infection depended upon the air, the air was
 subject to infection. As for instance, a typhus fever has been brought by
 ships to one sea-port town; yet the very people who brought it there, were
 incapable of communicating it in a town more fortunately situated. But how
 are we to judge of airs, and pronounce--in such a city plague will die
 unproductive; in such another, nature has provided for it a plentiful
 harvest? In the same way, individuals may escape ninety-nine times, and
 receive the death-blow at the hundredth; because bodies are sometimes in a
 state to reject the infection of malady, and at others, thirsty to imbibe
 it. These reflections made our legislators pause, before they could decide
 on the laws to be put in force. The evil was so wide-spreading, so violent
 and immedicable, that no care, no prevention could be judged superfluous,
 which even added a chance to our escape.
 
 These were questions of prudence; there was no immediate necessity for an
 earnest caution. England was still secure. France, Germany, Italy and
 Spain, were interposed, walls yet without a breach, between us and the
 plague. Our vessels truly were the sport of winds and waves, even as
 Gulliver was the toy of the Brobdignagians; but we on our stable abode
 could not be hurt in life or limb by these eruptions of nature. We could
 not fear--we did not. Yet a feeling of awe, a breathless sentiment of
 wonder, a painful sense of the degradation of humanity, was introduced into
 every heart. Nature, our mother, and our friend, had turned on us a brow of
 menace. She shewed us plainly, that, though she permitted us to assign her
 laws and subdue her apparent powers, yet, if she put forth but a finger, we
 must quake. She could take our globe, fringed with mountains, girded by the
 atmosphere, containing the condition of our being, and all that man's mind
 could invent or his force achieve; she could take the ball in her hand, and
 cast it into space, where life would be drunk up, and man and all his
 efforts for ever annihilated.
 
 These speculations were rife among us; yet not the less we proceeded in our
 daily occupations, and our plans, whose accomplishment demanded the lapse
 of many years. No voice was heard telling us to hold! When foreign
 distresses came to be felt by us through the channels of commerce, we set
 ourselves to apply remedies. Subscriptions were made for the emigrants, and
 merchants bankrupt by the failure of trade. The English spirit awoke to its
 full activity, and, as it had ever done, set itself to resist the evil, and
 to stand in the breach which diseased nature had suffered chaos and death
 to make in the bounds and banks which had hitherto kept them out.
 
 At the commencement of summer, we began to feel, that the mischief which
 had taken place in distant countries was greater than we had at first
 suspected. Quito was destroyed by an earthquake. Mexico laid waste by the
 united effects of storm, pestilence and famine. Crowds of emigrants
 inundated the west of Europe; and our island had become the refuge of
 thousands. In the mean time Ryland had been chosen Protector. He had sought
 this office with eagerness, under the idea of turning his whole forces to
 the suppression of the privileged orders of our community. His measures
 were thwarted, and his schemes interrupted by this new state of things.
 Many of the foreigners were utterly destitute; and their increasing numbers
 at length forbade a recourse to the usual modes of relief. Trade was
 stopped by the failure of the interchange of cargoes usual between us, and
 America, India, Egypt and Greece. A sudden break was made in the routine of
 our lives. In vain our Protector and his partizans sought to conceal this
 truth; in vain, day after day, he appointed a period for the discussion of
 the new laws concerning hereditary rank and privilege; in vain he
 endeavoured to represent the evil as partial and temporary. These disasters
 came home to so many bosoms, and, through the various channels of commerce,
 were carried so entirely into every class and division of the community,
 that of necessity they became the first question in the state, the chief
 subjects to which we must turn our attention.
 
 Can it be true, each asked the other with wonder and dismay, that whole
 countries are laid waste, whole nations annihilated, by these disorders in
 nature? The vast cities of America, the fertile plains of Hindostan, the
 crowded abodes of the Chinese, are menaced with utter ruin. Where late the
 busy multitudes assembled for pleasure or profit, now only the sound of
 wailing and misery is heard. The air is empoisoned, and each human being
 inhales death, even while in youth and health, their hopes are in the
 flower. We called to mind the plague of 1348, when it was calculated that a
 third of mankind had been destroyed. As yet western Europe was uninfected;
 would it always be so?
 
 O, yes, it would--Countrymen, fear not! In the still uncultivated wilds
 of America, what wonder that among its other giant destroyers, Plague
 should be numbered! It is of old a native of the East, sister of the
 tornado, the earthquake, and the simoon. Child of the sun, and nursling of
 the tropics, it would expire in these climes. It drinks the dark blood of
 the inhabitant of the south, but it never feasts on the pale-faced Celt. If
 perchance some stricken Asiatic come among us, plague dies with him,
 uncommunicated and innoxious. Let us weep for our brethren, though we can
 never experience their reverse. Let us lament over and assist the children
 of the garden of the earth. Late we envied their abodes, their spicy
 groves, fertile plains, and abundant loveliness. But in this mortal life
 extremes are always matched; the thorn grows with the rose, the poison tree
 and the cinnamon mingle their boughs. Persia, with its cloth of gold,
 marble halls, and infinite wealth, is now a tomb. The tent of the Arab is
 fallen in the sands, and his horse spurns the ground unbridled and
 unsaddled. The voice of lamentation fills the valley of Cashmere; its dells
 and woods, its cool fountains, and gardens of roses, are polluted by the
 dead; in Circassia and Georgia the spirit of beauty weeps over the ruin of
 its favourite temple--the form of woman.
 
 Our own distresses, though they were occasioned by the fictitious
 reciprocity of commerce, encreased in due proportion. Bankers, merchants,
 and manufacturers, whose trade depended on exports and interchange of
 wealth, became bankrupt. Such things, when they happen singly, affect only
 the immediate parties; but the prosperity of the nation was now shaken by
 frequent and extensive losses. Families, bred in opulence and luxury, were
 reduced to beggary. The very state of peace in which we gloried was
 injurious; there were no means of employing the idle, or of sending any
 overplus of population out of the country. Even the source of colonies was
 dried up, for in New Holland, Van Diemen's Land, and the Cape of Good Hope,
 plague raged. O, for some medicinal vial to purge unwholesome nature, and
 bring back the earth to its accustomed health!
 
 Ryland was a man of strong intellects and quick and sound decision in the
 usual course of things, but he stood aghast at the multitude of evils that
 gathered round us. Must he tax the landed interest to assist our commercial
 population? To do this, he must gain the favour of the chief land-holders,
 the nobility of the country; and these were his vowed enemies--he must
 conciliate them by abandoning his favourite scheme of equalization; he must
 confirm them in their manorial rights; he must sell his cherished plans for
 the permanent good of his country, for temporary relief. He must aim no
 more at the dear object of his ambition; throwing his arms aside, he must
 for present ends give up the ultimate object of his endeavours. He came to
 Windsor to consult with us. Every day added to his difficulties; the
 arrival of fresh vessels with emigrants, the total cessation of commerce,
 the starving multitude that thronged around the palace of the Protectorate,
 were circumstances not to be tampered with. The blow was struck; the
 aristocracy obtained all they wished, and they subscribed to a
 twelvemonths' bill, which levied twenty per cent on all the rent-rolls of
 the country. Calm was now restored to the metropolis, and to the populous
 cities, before driven to desperation; and we returned to the consideration
 of distant calamities, wondering if the future would bring any alleviation
 to their excess. It was August; so there could be small hope of relief
 during the heats. On the contrary, the disease gained virulence, while
 starvation did its accustomed work. Thousands died unlamented; for beside
 the yet warm corpse the mourner was stretched, made mute by death.
 
 On the eighteenth of this month news arrived in London that the plague was
 in France and Italy. These tidings were at first whispered about town; but
 no one dared express aloud the soul-quailing intelligence. When any one met
 a friend in the street, he only cried as he hurried on, "You know!"--
 while the other, with an ejaculation of fear and horror, would answer,--
 "What will become of us?" At length it was mentioned in the newspapers. The
 paragraph was inserted in an obscure part: "We regret to state that there
 can be no longer a doubt of the plague having been introduced at Leghorn,
 Genoa, and Marseilles." No word of comment followed; each reader made his
 own fearful one. We were as a man who hears that his house is burning, and
 yet hurries through the streets, borne along by a lurking hope of a
 mistake, till he turns the corner, and sees his sheltering roof enveloped
 in a flame. Before it had been a rumour; but now in words uneraseable, in
 definite and undeniable print, the knowledge went forth. Its obscurity of
 situation rendered it the more conspicuous: the diminutive letters grew
 gigantic to the bewildered eye of fear: they seemed graven with a pen of
 iron, impressed by fire, woven in the clouds, stamped on the very front of
 the universe.
 
 The English, whether travellers or residents, came pouring in one great
 revulsive stream, back on their own country; and with them crowds of
 Italians and Spaniards. Our little island was filled even to bursting. At
 first an unusual quantity of specie made its appearance with the emigrants;
 but these people had no means of receiving back into their hands what they
 spent among us. With the advance of summer, and the increase of the
 distemper, rents were unpaid, and their remittances failed them. It was
 impossible to see these crowds of wretched, perishing creatures, late
 nurslings of luxury, and not stretch out a hand to save them. As at the
 conclusion of the eighteenth century, the English unlocked their hospitable
 store, for the relief of those driven from their homes by political
 revolution; so now they were not backward in affording aid to the victims
 of a more wide-spreading calamity. We had many foreign friends whom we
 eagerly sought out, and relieved from dreadful penury. Our Castle became an
 asylum for the unhappy. A little population occupied its halls. The revenue
 of its possessor, which had always found a mode of expenditure congenial to
 his generous nature, was now attended to more parsimoniously, that it might
 embrace a wider portion of utility. It was not however money, except
 partially, but the necessaries of life, that became scarce. It was
 difficult to find an immediate remedy. The usual one of imports was
 entirely cut off. In this emergency, to feed the very people to whom we had
 given refuge, we were obliged to yield to the plough and the mattock our
 pleasure-grounds and parks. Live stock diminished sensibly in the country,
 from the effects of the great demand in the market. Even the poor deer, our
 antlered proteges, were obliged to fall for the sake of worthier
 pensioners. The labour necessary to bring the lands to this sort of
 culture, employed and fed the offcasts of the diminished manufactories.
 
 Adrian did not rest only with the exertions he could make with regard to
 his own possessions. He addressed himself to the wealthy of the land; he
 made proposals in parliament little adapted to please the rich; but his
 earnest pleadings and benevolent eloquence were irresistible. To give up
 their pleasure-grounds to the agriculturist, to diminish sensibly the
 number of horses kept for the purposes of luxury throughout the country,
 were means obvious, but unpleasing. Yet, to the honour of the English be it
 recorded, that, although natural disinclination made them delay awhile, yet
 when the misery of their fellow-creatures became glaring, an enthusiastic
 generosity inspired their decrees. The most luxurious were often the first
 to part with their indulgencies. As is common in communities, a fashion was
 set. The high-born ladies of the country would have deemed themselves
 disgraced if they had now enjoyed, what they before called a necessary, the
 ease of a carriage. Chairs, as in olden time, and Indian palanquins were
 introduced for the infirm; but else it was nothing singular to see females
 of rank going on foot to places of fashionable resort. It was more common,
 for all who possessed landed property to secede to their estates, attended
 by whole troops of the indigent, to cut down their woods to erect temporary
 dwellings, and to portion out their parks, parterres and flower-gardens, to
 necessitous families. Many of these, of high rank in their own countries,
 now, with hoe in hand, turned up the soil. It was found necessary at last
 to check the spirit of sacrifice, and to remind those whose generosity
 proceeded to lavish waste, that, until the present state of things became
 permanent, of which there was no likelihood, it was wrong to carry change
 so far as to make a reaction difficult. Experience demonstrated that in a
 year or two pestilence would cease; it were well that in the mean time we
 should not have destroyed our fine breeds of horses, or have utterly
 changed the face of the ornamented portion of the country.
 
 It may be imagined that things were in a bad state indeed, before this
 spirit of benevolence could have struck such deep roots. The infection had
 now spread in the southern provinces of France. But that country had so
 many resources in the way of agriculture, that the rush of population from
 one part of it to another, and its increase through foreign emigration, was
 less felt than with us. The panic struck appeared of more injury, than
 disease and its natural concomitants.
 
 Winter was hailed, a general and never-failing physician. The embrowning
 woods, and swollen rivers, the evening mists, and morning frosts, were
 welcomed with gratitude. The effects of purifying cold were immediately
 felt; and the lists of mortality abroad were curtailed each week. Many of
 our visitors left us: those whose homes were far in the south, fled
 delightedly from our northern winter, and sought their native land, secure
 of plenty even after their fearful visitation. We breathed again. What the
 coming summer would bring, we knew not; but the present months were our
 own, and our hopes of a cessation of pestilence were high.
 
 [1] Elton's translation of Hesiod's Works.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 I HAVE lingered thus long on the extreme bank, the wasting shoal that
 stretched into the stream of life, dallying with the shadow of death. Thus
 long, I have cradled my heart in retrospection of past happiness, when hope
 was. Why not for ever thus? I am not immortal; and the thread of my history
 might be spun out to the limits of my existence. But the same sentiment
 that first led me to pourtray scenes replete with tender recollections, now
 bids me hurry on. The same yearning of this warm, panting heart, that has
 made me in written words record my vagabond youth, my serene manhood, and
 the passions of my soul, makes me now recoil from further delay. I must
 complete my work.
 
 Here then I stand, as I said, beside the fleet waters of the flowing years,
 and now away! Spread the sail, and strain with oar, hurrying by dark
 impending crags, adown steep rapids, even to the sea of desolation I have
 reached. Yet one moment, one brief interval before I put from shore--
 once, once again let me fancy myself as I was in 2094 in my abode at
 Windsor, let me close my eyes, and imagine that the immeasurable boughs of
 its oaks still shadow me, its castle walls anear. Let fancy pourtray the
 joyous scene of the twentieth of June, such as even now my aching heart
 recalls it.
 
 Circumstances had called me to London; here I heard talk that symptoms
 of the plague had occurred in hospitals of that city. I returned to
 Windsor; my brow was clouded, my heart heavy; I entered the Little
 Park, as was my custom, at the Frogmore gate, on my way to the
 Castle. A great part of these grounds had been given to cultivation,
 and strips of potatoe-land and corn were scattered here and there.
 The rooks cawed loudly in the trees above; mixed with their hoarse
 cries I heard a lively strain of music. It was Alfred's birthday.
 The young people, the Etonians, and children of the neighbouring gentry,
 held a mock fair, to which all the country people were invited. The
 park was speckled by tents, whose flaunting colours and gaudy flags, waving
 in the sunshine, added to the gaiety of the scene. On a platform erected
 beneath the terrace, a number of the younger part of the assembly were
 dancing. I leaned against a tree to observe them. The band played the wild
 eastern air of Weber introduced in Abon Hassan; its volatile notes gave
 wings to the feet of the dancers, while the lookers-on unconsciously beat
 time. At first the tripping measure lifted my spirit with it, and for a
 moment my eyes gladly followed the mazes of the dance. The revulsion of
 thought passed like keen steel to my heart. Ye are all going to die, I
 thought; already your tomb is built up around you. Awhile, because you are
 gifted with agility and strength, you fancy that you live: but frail is the
 "bower of flesh" that encaskets life; dissoluble the silver cord than binds
 you to it. The joyous soul, charioted from pleasure to pleasure by the
 graceful mechanism of well-formed limbs, will suddenly feel the axle-tree
 give way, and spring and wheel dissolve in dust. Not one of you, O! fated
 crowd, can escape--not one! not my own ones! not my Idris and her babes!
 Horror and misery! Already the gay dance vanished, the green sward was
 strewn with corpses, the blue air above became fetid with deathly
 exhalations. Shriek, ye clarions! ye loud trumpets, howl! Pile dirge on
 dirge; rouse the funereal chords; let the air ring with dire wailing; let
 wild discord rush on the wings of the wind! Already I hear it, while
 guardian angels, attendant on humanity, their task achieved, hasten away,
 and their departure is announced by melancholy strains; faces all unseemly
 with weeping, forced open my lids; faster and faster many groups of these
 woe-begone countenances thronged around, exhibiting every variety of
 wretchedness--well known faces mingled with the distorted creations of
 fancy. Ashy pale, Raymond and Perdita sat apart, looking on with sad
 smiles. Adrian's countenance flitted across, tainted by death--Idris,
 with eyes languidly closed and livid lips, was about to slide into the wide
 grave. The confusion grew--their looks of sorrow changed to mockery; they
 nodded their heads in time to the music, whose clang became maddening.
 
 I felt that this was insanity--I sprang forward to throw it off; I rushed
 into the midst of the crowd. Idris saw me: with light step she advanced; as
 I folded her in my arms, feeling, as I did, that I thus enclosed what was
 to me a world, yet frail as the waterdrop which the noon-day sun will drink
 from the water lily's cup; tears filled my eyes, unwont to be thus
 moistened. The joyful welcome of my boys, the soft gratulation of Clara,
 the pressure of Adrian's hand, contributed to unman me. I felt that they
 were near, that they were safe, yet methought this was all deceit;--the
 earth reeled, the firm-enrooted trees moved--dizziness came over me--I
 sank to the ground.
 
 My beloved friends were alarmed--nay, they expressed their alarm so
 anxiously, that I dared not pronounce the word plague, that hovered on my
 lips, lest they should construe my perturbed looks into a symptom, and see
 infection in my languor. I had scarcely recovered, and with feigned
 hilarity had brought back smiles into my little circle, when we saw Ryland
 approach.
 
 Ryland had something the appearance of a farmer; of a man whose muscles and
 full grown stature had been developed under the influence of vigorous
 exercise and exposure to the elements. This was to a great degree the case:
 for, though a large landed proprietor, yet, being a projector, and of an
 ardent and industrious disposition, he had on his own estate given himself
 up to agricultural labours. When he went as ambassador to the Northern
 States of America, he, for some time, planned his entire migration; and
 went so far as to make several journies far westward on that immense
 continent, for the purpose of choosing the site of his new abode. Ambition
 turned his thoughts from these designs--ambition, which labouring through
 various lets and hindrances, had now led him to the summit of his hopes, in
 making him Lord Protector of England.
 
 His countenance was rough but intelligent--his ample brow and quick grey
 eyes seemed to look out, over his own plans, and the opposition of his
 enemies. His voice was stentorian: his hand stretched out in debate, seemed
 by its gigantic and muscular form, to warn his hearers that words were not
 his only weapons. Few people had discovered some cowardice and much
 infirmity of purpose under this imposing exterior. No man could crush a
 "butterfly on the wheel" with better effect; no man better cover a speedy
 retreat from a powerful adversary. This had been the secret of his
 secession at the time of Lord Raymond's election. In the unsteady glance of
 his eye, in his extreme desire to learn the opinions of all, in the
 feebleness of his hand-writing, these qualities might be obscurely traced,
 but they were not generally known. He was now our Lord Protector. He had
 canvassed eagerly for this post. His protectorate was to be distinguished
 by every kind of innovation on the aristocracy. This his selected task was
 exchanged for the far different one of encountering the ruin caused by the
 convulsions of physical nature. He was incapable of meeting these evils by
 any comprehensive system; he had resorted to expedient after expedient, and
 could never be induced to put a remedy in force, till it came too late to
 be of use.
 
 Certainly the Ryland that advanced towards us now, bore small resemblance
 to the powerful, ironical, seemingly fearless canvasser for the first rank
 among Englishmen. Our native oak, as his partisans called him, was visited
 truly by a nipping winter. He scarcely appeared half his usual height; his
 joints were unknit, his limbs would not support him; his face was
 contracted, his eye wandering; debility of purpose and dastard fear were
 expressed in every gesture.
 
 In answer to our eager questions, one word alone fell, as it were
 involuntarily, from his convulsed lips: The Plague.--"Where?"--"Every
 where--we must fly--all fly--but whither? No man can tell--there is
 no refuge on earth, it comes on us like a thousand packs of wolves--we
 must all fly--where shall you go? Where can any of us go?"
 
 These words were syllabled trembling by the iron man. Adrian replied,
 "Whither indeed would you fly? We must all remain; and do our best to help
 our suffering fellow-creatures."
 
 "Help!" said Ryland, "there is no help!--great God, who talks of help!
 All the world has the plague!"
 
 "Then to avoid it, we must quit the world," observed Adrian, with a
 gentle smile.
 
 Ryland groaned; cold drops stood on his brow. It was useless to oppose his
 paroxysm of terror: but we soothed and encouraged him, so that after an
 interval he was better able to explain to us the ground of his alarm. It
 had come sufficiently home to him. One of his servants, while waiting on
 him, had suddenly fallen down dead. The physician declared that he died of
 the plague. We endeavoured to calm him--but our own hearts were not calm.
 I saw the eye of Idris wander from me to her children, with an anxious
 appeal to my judgment. Adrian was absorbed in meditation. For myself, I own
 that Ryland's words rang in my ears; all the world was infected;--in what
 uncontaminated seclusion could I save my beloved treasures, until the
 shadow of death had passed from over the earth? We sunk into silence: a
 silence that drank in the doleful accounts and prognostications of our
 guest. We had receded from the crowd; and ascending the steps of the
 terrace, sought the Castle. Our change of cheer struck those nearest to us;
 and, by means of Ryland's servants, the report soon spread that he had fled
 from the plague in London. The sprightly parties broke up--they assembled
 in whispering groups. The spirit of gaiety was eclipsed; the music ceased;
 the young people left their occupations and gathered together. The
 lightness of heart which had dressed them in masquerade habits, had
 decorated their tents, and assembled them in fantastic groups, appeared a
 sin against, and a provocative to, the awful destiny that had laid its
 palsying hand upon hope and life. The merriment of the hour was an unholy
 mockery of the sorrows of man. The foreigners whom we had among us, who had
 fled from the plague in their own country, now saw their last asylum
 invaded; and, fear making them garrulous, they described to eager listeners
 the miseries they had beheld in cities visited by the calamity, and gave
 fearful accounts of the insidious and irremediable nature of the disease.
 
 We had entered the Castle. Idris stood at a window that over-looked the
 park; her maternal eyes sought her own children among the young crowd. An
 Italian lad had got an audience about him, and with animated gestures was
 describing some scene of horror. Alfred stood immoveable before him, his
 whole attention absorbed. Little Evelyn had endeavoured to draw Clara away
 to play with him; but the Italian's tale arrested her, she crept near, her
 lustrous eyes fixed on the speaker. Either watching the crowd in the park,
 or occupied by painful reflection, we were all silent; Ryland stood by
 himself in an embrasure of the window; Adrian paced the hall, revolving
 some new and overpowering idea--suddenly he stopped and said: "I have
 long expected this; could we in reason expect that this island should be
 exempt from the universal visitation? The evil is come home to us, and we
 must not shrink from our fate. What are your plans, my Lord Protector, for
 the benefit of our country?"
 
 "For heaven's love! Windsor," cried Ryland, "do not mock me with that
 title. Death and disease level all men. I neither pretend to protect nor
 govern an hospital--such will England quickly become."
 
 "Do you then intend, now in time of peril, to recede from your duties?"
 
 "Duties! speak rationally, my Lord!--when I am a plague-spotted corpse,
 where will my duties be? Every man for himself! the devil take the
 protectorship, say I, if it expose me to danger!"
 
 "Faint-hearted man!" cried Adrian indignantly--"Your countrymen put their
 trust in you, and you betray them!"
 
 "I betray them!" said Ryland, "the plague betrays me. Faint-hearted! It is
 well, shut up in your castle, out of danger, to boast yourself out of fear.
 Take the Protectorship who will; before God I renounce it!"
 
 "And before God," replied his opponent, fervently, "do I receive it! No one
 will canvass for this honour now--none envy my danger or labours. Deposit
 your powers in my hands. Long have I fought with death, and much" (he
 stretched out his thin hand) "much have I suffered in the struggle. It is
 not by flying, but by facing the enemy, that we can conquer. If my last
 combat is now about to be fought, and I am to be worsted--so let it be!"
 
 "But come, Ryland, recollect yourself! Men have hitherto thought you
 magnanimous and wise, will you cast aside these titles? Consider the panic
 your departure will occasion. Return to London. I will go with you.
 Encourage the people by your presence. I will incur all the danger. Shame!
 shame! if the first magistrate of England be foremost to renounce his
 duties."
 
 Meanwhile among our guests in the park, all thoughts of festivity had
 faded. As summer-flies are scattered by rain, so did this congregation,
 late noisy and happy, in sadness and melancholy murmurs break up, dwindling
 away apace. With the set sun and the deepening twilight the park became
 nearly empty. Adrian and Ryland were still in earnest discussion. We had
 prepared a banquet for our guests in the lower hall of the castle; and
 thither Idris and I repaired to receive and entertain the few that
 remained. There is nothing more melancholy than a merry-meeting thus turned
 to sorrow: the gala dresses--the decorations, gay as they might otherwise
 be, receive a solemn and funereal appearance. If such change be painful
 from lighter causes, it weighed with intolerable heaviness from the
 knowledge that the earth's desolator had at last, even as an arch-fiend,
 lightly over-leaped the boundaries our precautions raised, and at once
 enthroned himself in the full and beating heart of our country. Idris sat
 at the top of the half-empty hall. Pale and tearful, she almost forgot her
 duties as hostess; her eyes were fixed on her children. Alfred's serious
 air shewed that he still revolved the tragic story related by the Italian
 boy. Evelyn was the only mirthful creature present: he sat on Clara's lap;
 and, making matter of glee from his own fancies, laughed aloud. The vaulted
 roof echoed again his infant tone. The poor mother who had brooded long
 over, and suppressed the expression of her anguish, now burst into tears,
 and folding her babe in her arms, hurried from the hall. Clara and Alfred
 followed. While the rest of the company, in confused murmur, which grew
 louder and louder, gave voice to their many fears.
 
 The younger part gathered round me to ask my advice; and those who had
 friends in London were anxious beyond the rest, to ascertain the present
 extent of disease in the metropolis. I encouraged them with such thoughts
 of cheer as presented themselves. I told them exceedingly few deaths had
 yet been occasioned by pestilence, and gave them hopes, as we were the last
 visited, so the calamity might have lost its most venomous power before it
 had reached us. The cleanliness, habits of order, and the manner in which
 our cities were built, were all in our favour. As it was an epidemic, its
 chief force was derived from pernicious qualities in the air, and it would
 probably do little harm where this was naturally salubrious. At first, I
 had spoken only to those nearest me; but the whole assembly gathered about
 me, and I found that I was listened to by all. "My friends," I said, "our
 risk is common; our precautions and exertions shall be common also. If
 manly courage and resistance can save us, we will be saved. We will fight
 the enemy to the last. Plague shall not find us a ready prey; we will
 dispute every inch of ground; and, by methodical and inflexible laws, pile
 invincible barriers to the progress of our foe. Perhaps in no part of the
 world has she met with so systematic and determined an opposition. Perhaps
 no country is naturally so well protected against our invader; nor has
 nature anywhere been so well assisted by the hand of man. We will not
 despair. We are neither cowards nor fatalists; but, believing that God has
 placed the means for our preservation in our own hands, we will use those
 means to our utmost. Remember that cleanliness, sobriety, and even
 good-humour and benevolence, are our best medicines."
 
 There was little I could add to this general exhortation; for the plague,
 though in London, was not among us. I dismissed the guests therefore; and
 they went thoughtful, more than sad, to await the events in store for
 them.
 
 I now sought Adrian, anxious to hear the result of his discussion with
 Ryland. He had in part prevailed; the Lord Protector consented to return to
 London for a few weeks; during which time things should be so arranged, as
 to occasion less consternation at his departure. Adrian and Idris were
 together. The sadness with which the former had first heard that the plague
 was in London had vanished; the energy of his purpose informed his body
 with strength, the solemn joy of enthusiasm and self-devotion illuminated
 his countenance; and the weakness of his physical nature seemed to pass
 from him, as the cloud of humanity did, in the ancient fable, from the
 divine lover of Semele. He was endeavouring to encourage his sister, and to
 bring her to look on his intent in a less tragic light than she was
 prepared to do; and with passionate eloquence he unfolded his designs to
 her.
 
 "Let me, at the first word," he said, "relieve your mind from all fear on
 my account. I will not task myself beyond my powers, nor will I needlessly
 seek danger. I feel that I know what ought to be done, and as my presence
 is necessary for the accomplishment of my plans, I will take especial care
 to preserve my life.
 
 "I am now going to undertake an office fitted for me. I cannot intrigue, or
 work a tortuous path through the labyrinth of men's vices and passions; but
 I can bring patience, and sympathy, and such aid as art affords, to the bed
 of disease; I can raise from earth the miserable orphan, and awaken to new
 hopes the shut heart of the mourner. I can enchain the plague in limits,
 and set a term to the misery it would occasion; courage, forbearance, and
 watchfulness, are the forces I bring towards this great work.
 
 "O, I shall be something now! From my birth I have aspired like the eagle
 --but, unlike the eagle, my wings have failed, and my vision has been
 blinded. Disappointment and sickness have hitherto held dominion over me;
 twin born with me, my would, was for ever enchained by the shall not, of
 these my tyrants. A shepherd-boy that tends a silly flock on the mountains,
 was more in the scale of society than I. Congratulate me then that I have
 found fitting scope for my powers. I have often thought of offering my
 services to the pestilence-stricken towns of France and Italy; but fear of
 paining you, and expectation of this catastrophe, withheld me. To England
 and to Englishmen I dedicate myself. If I can save one of her mighty
 spirits from the deadly shaft; if I can ward disease from one of her
 smiling cottages, I shall not have lived in vain."
 
 Strange ambition this! Yet such was Adrian. He appeared given up to
 contemplation, averse to excitement, a lowly student, a man of visions--
 but afford him worthy theme, and--
 
   Like to the lark at break of day arising,
   From sullen earth, sings hymns at heaven's gate.[1]
 
 so did he spring up from listlessness and unproductive thought, to the
 highest pitch of virtuous action.
 
 With him went enthusiasm, the high-wrought resolve, the eye that without
 blenching could look at death. With us remained sorrow, anxiety, and
 unendurable expectation of evil. The man, says Lord Bacon, who hath wife
 and children, has given hostages to fortune. Vain was all philosophical
 reasoning--vain all fortitude--vain, vain, a reliance on probable good.
 I might heap high the scale with logic, courage, and resignation--but let
 one fear for Idris and our children enter the opposite one, and,
 over-weighed, it kicked the beam.
 
 The plague was in London! Fools that we were not long ago to have foreseen
 this. We wept over the ruin of the boundless continents of the east, and
 the desolation of the western world; while we fancied that the little
 channel between our island and the rest of the earth was to preserve us
 alive among the dead. It were no mighty leap methinks from Calais to Dover.
 The eye easily discerns the sister land; they were united once; and the
 little path that runs between looks in a map but as a trodden footway
 through high grass. Yet this small interval was to save us: the sea was to
 rise a wall of adamant--without, disease and misery--within, a shelter
 from evil, a nook of the garden of paradise--a particle of celestial
 soil, which no evil could invade--truly we were wise in our generation,
 to imagine all these things!
 
 But we are awake now. The plague is in London; the air of England is
 tainted, and her sons and daughters strew the unwholesome earth. And now,
 the sea, late our defence, seems our prison bound; hemmed in by its gulphs,
 we shall die like the famished inhabitants of a besieged town. Other
 nations have a fellowship in death; but we, shut out from all
 neighbourhood, must bury our own dead, and little England become a wide,
 wide tomb.
 
 This feeling of universal misery assumed concentration and shape, when I
 looked on my wife and children; and the thought of danger to them possessed
 my whole being with fear. How could I save them? I revolved a thousand and
 a thousand plans. They should not die--first I would be gathered to
 nothingness, ere infection should come anear these idols of my soul. I
 would walk barefoot through the world, to find an uninfected spot; I would
 build my home on some wave-tossed plank, drifted about on the barren,
 shoreless ocean. I would betake me with them to some wild beast's den,
 where a tyger's cubs, which I would slay, had been reared in health. I
 would seek the mountain eagle's eirie, and live years suspended in some
 inaccessible recess of a sea-bounding cliff--no labour too great, no
 scheme too wild, if it promised life to them. O! ye heart-strings of mine,
 could ye be torn asunder, and my soul not spend itself in tears of blood
 for sorrow!
 
 Idris, after the first shock, regained a portion of fortitude. She
 studiously shut out all prospect of the future, and cradled her heart in
 present blessings. She never for a moment lost sight of her children. But
 while they in health sported about her, she could cherish contentment and
 hope. A strange and wild restlessness came over me--the more intolerable,
 because I was forced to conceal it. My fears for Adrian were ceaseless;
 August had come; and the symptoms of plague encreased rapidly in London. It
 was deserted by all who possessed the power of removing; and he, the
 brother of my soul, was exposed to the perils from which all but slaves
 enchained by circumstance fled. He remained to combat the fiend--his side
 unguarded, his toils unshared--infection might even reach him, and he die
 unattended and alone. By day and night these thoughts pursued me. I
 resolved to visit London, to see him; to quiet these agonizing throes by
 the sweet medicine of hope, or the opiate of despair.
 
 It was not until I arrived at Brentford, that I perceived much change in
 the face of the country. The better sort of houses were shut up; the busy
 trade of the town palsied; there was an air of anxiety among the few
 passengers I met, and they looked wonderingly at my carriage--the first
 they had seen pass towards London, since pestilence sat on its high places,
 and possessed its busy streets. I met several funerals; they were slenderly
 attended by mourners, and were regarded by the spectators as omens of
 direst import. Some gazed on these processions with wild eagerness--
 others fled timidly--some wept aloud.
 
 Adrian's chief endeavour, after the immediate succour of the sick, had been
 to disguise the symptoms and progress of the plague from the inhabitants of
 London. He knew that fear and melancholy forebodings were powerful
 assistants to disease; that desponding and brooding care rendered the
 physical nature of man peculiarly susceptible of infection. No unseemly
 sights were therefore discernible: the shops were in general open, the
 concourse of passengers in some degree kept up. But although the appearance
 of an infected town was avoided, to me, who had not beheld it since the
 commencement of the visitation, London appeared sufficiently changed. There
 were no carriages, and grass had sprung high in the streets; the houses had
 a desolate look; most of the shutters were closed; and there was a ghast
 and frightened stare in the persons I met, very different from the usual
 business-like demeanour of the Londoners. My solitary carriage attracted
 notice, as it rattled along towards the Protectoral Palace--and the
 fashionable streets leading to it wore a still more dreary and deserted
 appearance. I found Adrian's anti-chamber crowded--it was his hour for
 giving audience. I was unwilling to disturb his labours, and waited,
 watching the ingress and egress of the petitioners. They consisted of
 people of the middling and lower classes of society, whose means of
 subsistence failed with the cessation of trade, and of the busy spirit of
 money-making in all its branches, peculiar to our country. There was an air
 of anxiety, sometimes of terror in the new-comers, strongly contrasted with
 the resigned and even satisfied mien of those who had had audience. I could
 read the influence of my friend in their quickened motions and cheerful
 faces. Two o'clock struck, after which none were admitted; those who had
 been disappointed went sullenly or sorrowfully away, while I entered the
 audience-chamber.
 
 I was struck by the improvement that appeared in the health of Adrian. He
 was no longer bent to the ground, like an over-nursed flower of spring,
 that, shooting up beyond its strength, is weighed down even by its own
 coronal of blossoms. His eyes were bright, his countenance composed, an air
 of concentrated energy was diffused over his whole person, much unlike its
 former languor. He sat at a table with several secretaries, who were
 arranging petitions, or registering the notes made during that day's
 audience. Two or three petitioners were still in attendance. I admired his
 justice and patience. Those who possessed a power of living out of London,
 he advised immediately to quit it, affording them the means of so doing.
 Others, whose trade was beneficial to the city, or who possessed no other
 refuge, he provided with advice for better avoiding the epidemic; relieving
 overloaded families, supplying the gaps made in others by death. Order,
 comfort, and even health, rose under his influence, as from the touch of a
 magician's wand.
 
 "I am glad you are come," he said to me, when we were at last alone; "I can
 only spare a few minutes, and must tell you much in that time. The plague
 is now in progress--it is useless closing one's eyes to the fact--the
 deaths encrease each week. What will come I cannot guess. As yet, thank
 God, I am equal to the government of the town; and I look only to the
 present. Ryland, whom I have so long detained, has stipulated that I shall
 suffer him to depart before the end of this month. The deputy appointed by
 parliament is dead; another therefore must be named; I have advanced my
 claim, and I believe that I shall have no competitor. To-night the question
 is to be decided, as there is a call of the house for the purpose. You must
 nominate me, Lionel; Ryland, for shame, cannot shew himself; but you, my
 friend, will do me this service?
 
 How lovely is devotion! Here was a youth, royally sprung, bred in
 luxury, by nature averse to the usual struggles of a public life,
 and now, in time of danger, at a period when to live was the
 utmost scope of the ambitious, he, the beloved and heroic Adrian, made, in
 sweet simplicity, an offer to sacrifice himself for the public good. The
 very idea was generous and noble,--but, beyond this, his unpretending
 manner, his entire want of the assumption of a virtue, rendered his act ten
 times more touching. I would have withstood his request; but I had seen the
 good he diffused; I felt that his resolves were not to be shaken, so, with
 an heavy heart, I consented to do as he asked. He grasped my hand
 affectionately:--"Thank you," he said, "you have relieved me from a
 painful dilemma, and are, as you ever were, the best of my friends.
 Farewell--I must now leave you for a few hours. Go you and converse with
 Ryland. Although he deserts his post in London, he may be of the greatest
 service in the north of England, by receiving and assisting travellers, and
 contributing to supply the metropolis with food. Awaken him, I entreat you,
 to some sense of duty."
 
 Adrian left me, as I afterwards learnt, upon his daily task of visiting the
 hospitals, and inspecting the crowded parts of London. I found Ryland much
 altered, even from what he had been when he visited Windsor. Perpetual fear
 had jaundiced his complexion, and shrivelled his whole person. I told him
 of the business of the evening, and a smile relaxed the contracted muscles.
 He desired to go; each day he expected to be infected by pestilence, each
 day he was unable to resist the gentle violence of Adrian's detention. The
 moment Adrian should be legally elected his deputy, he would escape to
 safety. Under this impression he listened to all I said; and, elevated
 almost to joy by the near prospect of his departure, he entered into a
 discussion concerning the plans he should adopt in his own county,
 forgetting, for the moment, his cherished resolution of shutting himself up
 from all communication in the mansion and grounds of his estate.
 
 In the evening, Adrian and I proceeded to Westminster. As we went he
 reminded me of what I was to say and do, yet, strange to say, I entered the
 chamber without having once reflected on my purpose. Adrian remained in the
 coffee-room, while I, in compliance with his desire, took my seat in St.
 Stephen's. There reigned unusual silence in the chamber. I had not visited
 it since Raymond's protectorate; a period conspicuous for a numerous
 attendance of members, for the eloquence of the speakers, and the warmth of
 the debate. The benches were very empty, those by custom occupied by the
 hereditary members were vacant; the city members were there--the members
 for the commercial towns, few landed proprietors, and not many of those who
 entered parliament for the sake of a career. The first subject that
 occupied the attention of the house was an address from the Lord Protector,
 praying them to appoint a deputy during a necessary absence on his part.
 
 A silence prevailed, till one of the members coming to me, whispered that
 the Earl of Windsor had sent him word that I was to move his election, in
 the absence of the person who had been first chosen for this office. Now
 for the first time I saw the full extent of my task, and I was overwhelmed
 by what I had brought on myself. Ryland had deserted his post through fear
 of the plague: from the same fear Adrian had no competitor. And I, the
 nearest kinsman of the Earl of Windsor, was to propose his election. I was
 to thrust this selected and matchless friend into the post of danger--
 impossible! the die was cast--I would offer myself as candidate.
 
 The few members who were present, had come more for the sake of terminating
 the business by securing a legal attendance, than under the idea of a
 debate. I had risen mechanically--my knees trembled; irresolution hung on
 my voice, as I uttered a few words on the necessity of choosing a person
 adequate to the dangerous task in hand. But, when the idea of presenting
 myself in the room of my friend intruded, the load of doubt and pain was
 taken from off me. My words flowed spontaneously--my utterance was firm
 and quick. I adverted to what Adrian had already done--I promised the
 same vigilance in furthering all his views. I drew a touching picture of
 his vacillating health; I boasted of my own strength. I prayed them to save
 even from himself this scion of the noblest family in England. My alliance
 with him was the pledge of my sincerity, my union with his sister, my
 children, his presumptive heirs, were the hostages of my truth.
 
 This unexpected turn in the debate was quickly communicated to Adrian. He
 hurried in, and witnessed the termination of my impassioned harangue. I did
 not see him: my soul was in my words,--my eyes could not perceive that
 which was; while a vision of Adrian's form, tainted by pestilence, and
 sinking in death, floated before them. He seized my hand, as I concluded--
 "Unkind!" he cried, "you have betrayed me!" then, springing forwards, with
 the air of one who had a right to command, he claimed the place of deputy
 as his own. He had bought it, he said, with danger, and paid for it with
 toil. His ambition rested there; and, after an interval devoted to the
 interests of his country, was I to step in, and reap the profit? Let them
 remember what London had been when he arrived: the panic that prevailed
 brought famine, while every moral and legal tie was loosened. He had
 restored order--this had been a work which required perseverance,
 patience, and energy; and he had neither slept nor waked but for the good
 of his country.--Would they dare wrong him thus? Would they wrest his
 hard-earned reward from him, to bestow it on one, who, never having mingled
 in public life, would come a tyro to the craft, in which he was an adept.
 He demanded the place of deputy as his right. Ryland had shewn that he
 preferred him. Never before had he, who was born even to the inheritance of
 the throne of England, never had he asked favour or honour from those now
 his equals, but who might have been his subjects. Would they refuse him?
 Could they thrust back from the path of distinction and laudable ambition,
 the heir of their ancient kings, and heap another disappointment on a
 fallen house.
 
 No one had ever before heard Adrian allude to the rights of his ancestors.
 None had ever before suspected, that power, or the suffrage of the many,
 could in any manner become dear to him. He had begun his speech with
 vehemence; he ended with unassuming gentleness, making his appeal with the
 same humility, as if he had asked to be the first in wealth, honour, and
 power among Englishmen, and not, as was the truth, to be the foremost in
 the ranks of loathsome toils and inevitable death. A murmur of approbation
 rose after his speech. "Oh, do not listen to him," I cried, "he speaks
 false--false to himself,"--I was interrupted: and, silence being restored,
 we were ordered, as was the custom, to retire during the decision of the
 house. I fancied that they hesitated, and that there was some hope for
 me--I was mistaken--hardly had we quitted the chamber, before Adrian was
 recalled, and installed in his office of Lord Deputy to the Protector.
 
 We returned together to the palace. "Why, Lionel," said Adrian, "what did
 you intend? you could not hope to conquer, and yet you gave me the pain of
 a triumph over my dearest friend."
 
 "This is mockery," I replied, "you devote yourself,--you, the adored
 brother of Idris, the being, of all the world contains, dearest to our
 hearts--you devote yourself to an early death. I would have prevented
 this; my death would be a small evil--or rather I should not die; while
 you cannot hope to escape."
 
 "As to the likelihood of escaping," said Adrian, "ten years hence the
 cold stars may shine on the graves of all of us; but as to my peculiar
 liability to infection, I could easily prove, both logically and
 physically, that in the midst of contagion I have a better chance
 of life than you.
 
 "This is my post: I was born for this--to rule England in anarchy, to
 save her in danger--to devote myself for her. The blood of my forefathers
 cries aloud in my veins, and bids me be first among my countrymen. Or, if
 this mode of speech offend you, let me say, that my mother, the proud
 queen, instilled early into me a love of distinction, and all that, if the
 weakness of my physical nature and my peculiar opinions had not prevented
 such a design, might have made me long since struggle for the lost
 inheritance of my race. But now my mother, or, if you will, my mother's
 lessons, awaken within me. I cannot lead on to battle; I cannot, through
 intrigue and faithlessness rear again the throne upon the wreck of English
 public spirit. But I can be the first to support and guard my country, now
 that terrific disasters and ruin have laid strong hands upon her.
 
 "That country and my beloved sister are all I have. I will protect the
 first--the latter I commit to your charge. If I survive, and she be lost,
 I were far better dead. Preserve her--for her own sake I know that you
 will--if you require any other spur, think that, in preserving her, you
 preserve me. Her faultless nature, one sum of perfections, is wrapt up in
 her affections--if they were hurt, she would droop like an unwatered
 floweret, and the slightest injury they receive is a nipping frost to her.
 Already she fears for us. She fears for the children she adores, and for
 you, the father of these, her lover, husband, protector; and you must be
 near her to support and encourage her. Return to Windsor then, my brother;
 for such you are by every tie--fill the double place my absence imposes
 on you, and let me, in all my sufferings here, turn my eyes towards that
 dear seclusion, and say--There is peace."
 
 [1] Shakespeare's Sonnets.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 I DID proceed to Windsor, but not with the intention of remaining there. I
 went but to obtain the consent of Idris, and then to return and take my
 station beside my unequalled friend; to share his labours, and save him, if
 so it must be, at the expence of my life. Yet I dreaded to witness the
 anguish which my resolve might excite in Idris. I had vowed to my own heart
 never to shadow her countenance even with transient grief, and should I
 prove recreant at the hour of greatest need? I had begun my journey with
 anxious haste; now I desired to draw it out through the course of days and
 months. I longed to avoid the necessity of action; I strove to escape from
 thought--vainly--futurity, like a dark image in a phantasmagoria, came
 nearer and more near, till it clasped the whole earth in its shadow.
 
 A slight circumstance induced me to alter my usual route, and to return
 home by Egham and Bishopgate. I alighted at Perdita's ancient abode, her
 cottage; and, sending forward the carriage, determined to walk across the
 park to the castle. This spot, dedicated to sweetest recollections, the
 deserted house and neglected garden were well adapted to nurse my
 melancholy. In our happiest days, Perdita had adorned her cottage with
 every aid art might bring, to that which nature had selected to favour. In
 the same spirit of exaggeration she had, on the event of her separation
 from Raymond, caused it to be entirely neglected. It was now in ruin: the
 deer had climbed the broken palings, and reposed among the flowers; grass
 grew on the threshold, and the swinging lattice creaking to the wind, gave
 signal of utter desertion. The sky was blue above, and the air impregnated
 with fragrance by the rare flowers that grew among the weeds. The trees
 moved overhead, awakening nature's favourite melody--but the melancholy
 appearance of the choaked paths, and weed-grown flower-beds, dimmed even
 this gay summer scene. The time when in proud and happy security we
 assembled at this cottage, was gone--soon the present hours would join
 those past, and shadows of future ones rose dark and menacing from the womb
 of time, their cradle and their bier. For the first time in my life I
 envied the sleep of the dead, and thought with pleasure of one's bed under
 the sod, where grief and fear have no power. I passed through the gap of
 the broken paling--I felt, while I disdained, the choaking tears--I
 rushed into the depths of the forest. O death and change, rulers of our
 life, where are ye, that I may grapple with you! What was there in our
 tranquillity, that excited your envy--in our happiness, that ye should
 destroy it? We were happy, loving, and beloved; the horn of Amalthea
 contained no blessing unshowered upon us, but, alas!
 
   la fortuna
   deidad barbara importuna,
   oy cadaver y ayer flor,
   no permanece jamas![1]
 
 As I wandered on thus ruminating, a number of country people passed me.
 They seemed full of careful thought, and a few words of their conversation
 that reached me, induced me to approach and make further enquiries. A party
 of people flying from London, as was frequent in those days, had come up
 the Thames in a boat. No one at Windsor would afford them shelter; so,
 going a little further up, they remained all night in a deserted hut near
 Bolter's lock. They pursued their way the following morning, leaving one of
 their company behind them, sick of the plague. This circumstance once
 spread abroad, none dared approach within half a mile of the infected
 neighbourhood, and the deserted wretch was left to fight with disease and
 death in solitude, as he best might. I was urged by compassion to hasten to
 the hut, for the purpose of ascertaining his situation, and administering
 to his wants.
 
 As I advanced I met knots of country-people talking earnestly of this
 event: distant as they were from the apprehended contagion, fear was
 impressed on every countenance. I passed by a group of these terrorists, in
 a lane in the direct road to the hut. One of them stopped me, and,
 conjecturing that I was ignorant of the circumstance, told me not to go on,
 for that an infected person lay but at a short distance.
 
 "I know it," I replied, "and I am going to see in what condition the poor
 fellow is."
 
 A murmur of surprise and horror ran through the assembly. I continued:--
 "This poor wretch is deserted, dying, succourless; in these unhappy times,
 God knows how soon any or all of us may be in like want. I am going to do,
 as I would be done by."
 
 "But you will never be able to return to the Castle--Lady Idris--his
 children--" in confused speech were the words that struck my ear.
 
 "Do you not know, my friends," I said, "that the Earl himself, now Lord
 Protector, visits daily, not only those probably infected by this disease,
 but the hospitals and pest houses, going near, and even touching the sick?
 yet he was never in better health. You labour under an entire mistake as to
 the nature of the plague; but do not fear, I do not ask any of you to
 accompany me, nor to believe me, until I return safe and sound from my
 patient."
 
 So I left them, and hurried on. I soon arrived at the hut: the door was
 ajar. I entered, and one glance assured me that its former inhabitant was
 no more--he lay on a heap of straw, cold and stiff; while a pernicious
 effluvia filled the room, and various stains and marks served to shew the
 virulence of the disorder.
 
 I had never before beheld one killed by pestilence. While every mind was
 full of dismay at its effects, a craving for excitement had led us to
 peruse De Foe's account, and the masterly delineations of the author of
 Arthur Mervyn. The pictures drawn in these books were so vivid, that we
 seemed to have experienced the results depicted by them. But cold were the
 sensations excited by words, burning though they were, and describing the
 death and misery of thousands, compared to what I felt in looking on the
 corpse of this unhappy stranger. This indeed was the plague. I raised his
 rigid limbs, I marked the distortion of his face, and the stony eyes lost
 to perception. As I was thus occupied, chill horror congealed my blood,
 making my flesh quiver and my hair to stand on end. Half insanely I spoke
 to the dead. So the plague killed you, I muttered. How came this? Was the
 coming painful? You look as if the enemy had tortured, before he murdered
 you. And now I leapt up precipitately, and escaped from the hut, before
 nature could revoke her laws, and inorganic words be breathed in answer
 from the lips of the departed.
 
 On returning through the lane, I saw at a distance the same assemblage of
 persons which I had left. They hurried away, as soon as they saw me; my
 agitated mien added to their fear of coming near one who had entered within
 the verge of contagion.
 
 At a distance from facts one draws conclusions which appear infallible,
 which yet when put to the test of reality, vanish like unreal dreams. I had
 ridiculed the fears of my countrymen, when they related to others; now that
 they came home to myself, I paused. The Rubicon, I felt, was passed; and it
 behoved me well to reflect what I should do on this hither side of disease
 and danger. According to the vulgar superstition, my dress, my person, the
 air I breathed, bore in it mortal danger to myself and others. Should I
 return to the Castle, to my wife and children, with this taint upon me? Not
 surely if I were infected; but I felt certain that I was not--a few hours
 would determine the question--I would spend these in the forest, in
 reflection on what was to come, and what my future actions were to be. In
 the feeling communicated to me by the sight of one struck by the plague, I
 forgot the events that had excited me so strongly in London; new and more
 painful prospects, by degrees were cleared of the mist which had hitherto
 veiled them. The question was no longer whether I should share Adrian's
 toils and danger; but in what manner I could, in Windsor and the
 neighbourhood, imitate the prudence and zeal which, under his government,
 produced order and plenty in London, and how, now pestilence had spread
 more widely, I could secure the health of my own family.
 
 I spread the whole earth out as a map before me. On no one spot of its
 surface could I put my finger and say, here is safety. In the south, the
 disease, virulent and immedicable, had nearly annihilated the race of man;
 storm and inundation, poisonous winds and blights, filled up the measure of
 suffering. In the north it was worse--the lesser population gradually
 declined, and famine and plague kept watch on the survivors, who, helpless
 and feeble, were ready to fall an easy prey into their hands.
 
 I contracted my view to England. The overgrown metropolis, the great heart
 of mighty Britain, was pulseless. Commerce had ceased. All resort for
 ambition or pleasure was cut off--the streets were grass-grown--the
 houses empty--the few, that from necessity remained, seemed already
 branded with the taint of inevitable pestilence. In the larger
 manufacturing towns the same tragedy was acted on a smaller, yet more
 disastrous scale. There was no Adrian to superintend and direct, while
 whole flocks of the poor were struck and killed. Yet we were not all to die.
 No truly, though thinned, the race of man would continue, and the great
 plague would, in after years, become matter of history and wonder.
 Doubtless this visitation was for extent unexampled--more need that we
 should work hard to dispute its progress; ere this men have gone out in
 sport, and slain their thousands and tens of thousands; but now man had
 become a creature of price; the life of one of them was of more worth than
 the so called treasures of kings. Look at his thought-endued countenance,
 his graceful limbs, his majestic brow, his wondrous mechanism--the type
 and model of this best work of God is not to be cast aside as a broken
 vessel--he shall be preserved, and his children and his children's
 children carry down the name and form of man to latest time.
 
 Above all I must guard those entrusted by nature and fate to my especial
 care. And surely, if among all my fellow-creatures I were to select those
 who might stand forth examples of the greatness and goodness of man, I
 could choose no other than those allied to me by the most sacred ties. Some
 from among the family of man must survive, and these should be among the
 survivors; that should be my task--to accomplish it my own life were a
 small sacrifice. There then in that castle--in Windsor Castle,
 birth-place of Idris and my babes, should be the haven and retreat for the
 wrecked bark of human society. Its forest should be our world--its garden
 afford us food; within its walls I would establish the shaken throne of
 health. I was an outcast and a vagabond, when Adrian gently threw over me
 the silver net of love and civilization, and linked me inextricably to
 human charities and human excellence. I was one, who, though an aspirant
 after good, and an ardent lover of wisdom, was yet unenrolled in any list
 of worth, when Idris, the princely born, who was herself the
 personification of all that was divine in woman, she who walked the earth
 like a poet's dream, as a carved goddess endued with sense, or pictured
 saint stepping from the canvas--she, the most worthy, chose me, and gave
 me herself--a priceless gift.
 
 During several hours I continued thus to meditate, till hunger and fatigue
 brought me back to the passing hour, then marked by long shadows cast from
 the descending sun. I had wandered towards Bracknel, far to the west of
 Windsor. The feeling of perfect health which I enjoyed, assured me that I
 was free from contagion. I remembered that Idris had been kept in ignorance
 of my proceedings. She might have heard of my return from London, and my
 visit to Bolter's Lock, which, connected with my continued absence, might
 tend greatly to alarm her. I returned to Windsor by the Long Walk, and
 passing through the town towards the Castle, I found it in a state of
 agitation and disturbance.
 
 "It is too late to be ambitious," says Sir Thomas Browne. "We cannot hope
 to live so long in our names as some have done in their persons; one face
 of Janus holds no proportion to the other." Upon this text many fanatics
 arose, who prophesied that the end of time was come. The spirit of
 superstition had birth, from the wreck of our hopes, and antics wild and
 dangerous were played on the great theatre, while the remaining particle of
 futurity dwindled into a point in the eyes of the prognosticators.
 Weak-spirited women died of fear as they listened to their denunciations;
 men of robust form and seeming strength fell into idiotcy and madness,
 racked by the dread of coming eternity. A man of this kind was now pouring
 forth his eloquent despair among the inhabitants of Windsor. The scene of
 the morning, and my visit to the dead, which had been spread abroad, had
 alarmed the country-people, so they had become fit instruments to be played
 upon by a maniac.
 
 The poor wretch had lost his young wife and lovely infant by the plague. He
 was a mechanic; and, rendered unable to attend to the occupation which
 supplied his necessities, famine was added to his other miseries. He left
 the chamber which contained his wife and child--wife and child no more,
 but "dead earth upon the earth"--wild with hunger, watching and grief,
 his diseased fancy made him believe himself sent by heaven to preach the
 end of time to the world. He entered the churches, and foretold to the
 congregations their speedy removal to the vaults below. He appeared like
 the forgotten spirit of the time in the theatres, and bade the spectators
 go home and die. He had been seized and confined; he had escaped and
 wandered from London among the neighbouring towns, and, with frantic
 gestures and thrilling words, he unveiled to each their hidden fears, and
 gave voice to the soundless thought they dared not syllable. He stood under
 the arcade of the town-hall of Windsor, and from this elevation harangued a
 trembling crowd.
 
 "Hear, O ye inhabitants of the earth," he cried, "hear thou, all seeing,
 but most pitiless Heaven! hear thou too, O tempest-tossed heart, which
 breathes out these words, yet faints beneath their meaning! Death is among
 us! The earth is beautiful and flower-bedecked, but she is our grave! The
 clouds of heaven weep for us--the pageantry of the stars is but our
 funeral torchlight. Grey headed men, ye hoped for yet a few years in your
 long-known abode--but the lease is up, you must remove--children, ye
 will never reach maturity, even now the small grave is dug for ye--
 mothers, clasp them in your arms, one death embraces you!"
 
 Shuddering, he stretched out his hands, his eyes cast up, seemed bursting
 from their sockets, while he appeared to follow shapes, to us invisible, in
 the yielding air--"There they are," he cried, "the dead! They rise in
 their shrouds, and pass in silent procession towards the far land of their
 doom--their bloodless lips move not--their shadowy limbs are void of
 motion, while still they glide onwards. We come," he exclaimed, springing
 forwards, "for what should we wait? Haste, my friends, apparel yourselves
 in the court-dress of death. Pestilence will usher you to his presence. Why
 thus long? they, the good, the wise, and the beloved, are gone before.
 Mothers, kiss you last--husbands, protectors no more, lead on the
 partners of your death! Come, O come! while the dear ones are yet in sight,
 for soon they will pass away, and we never never shall join them more."
 
 From such ravings as these, he would suddenly become collected, and with
 unexaggerated but terrific words, paint the horrors of the time; describe
 with minute detail, the effects of the plague on the human frame, and tell
 heart-breaking tales of the snapping of dear affinities--the gasping
 horror of despair over the death-bed of the last beloved--so that groans
 and even shrieks burst from the crowd. One man in particular stood in
 front, his eyes fixt on the prophet, his mouth open, his limbs rigid, while
 his face changed to various colours, yellow, blue, and green, through
 intense fear. The maniac caught his glance, and turned his eye on him--
 one has heard of the gaze of the rattle-snake, which allures the trembling
 victim till he falls within his jaws. The maniac became composed; his
 person rose higher; authority beamed from his countenance. He looked on the
 peasant, who began to tremble, while he still gazed; his knees knocked
 together; his teeth chattered. He at last fell down in convulsions. "That
 man has the plague," said the maniac calmly. A shriek burst from the lips
 of the poor wretch; and then sudden motionlessness came over him; it was
 manifest to all that he was dead.
 
 Cries of horror filled the place--every one endeavoured to effect his
 escape--in a few minutes the market place was cleared--the corpse lay
 on the ground; and the maniac, subdued and exhausted, sat beside it,
 leaning his gaunt cheek upon his thin hand. Soon some people, deputed by
 the magistrates, came to remove the body; the unfortunate being saw a
 jailor in each--he fled precipitately, while I passed onwards to the
 Castle.
 
 Death, cruel and relentless, had entered these beloved walls. An old
 servant, who had nursed Idris in infancy, and who lived with us more on the
 footing of a revered relative than a domestic, had gone a few days before
 to visit a daughter, married, and settled in the neighbourhood of London.
 On the night of her return she sickened of the plague. From the haughty and
 unbending nature of the Countess of Windsor, Idris had few tender filial
 associations with her. This good woman had stood in the place of a mother,
 and her very deficiencies of education and knowledge, by rendering her
 humble and defenceless, endeared her to us--she was the especial
 favourite of the children. I found my poor girl, there is no exaggeration
 in the expression, wild with grief and dread. She hung over the patient in
 agony, which was not mitigated when her thoughts wandered towards her
 babes, for whom she feared infection. My arrival was like the newly
 discovered lamp of a lighthouse to sailors, who are weathering some
 dangerous point. She deposited her appalling doubts in my hands; she relied
 on my judgment, and was comforted by my participation in her sorrow. Soon
 our poor nurse expired; and the anguish of suspense was changed to deep
 regret, which though at first more painful, yet yielded with greater
 readiness to my consolations. Sleep, the sovereign balm, at length steeped
 her tearful eyes in forgetfulness.
 
 She slept; and quiet prevailed in the Castle, whose inhabitants were hushed
 to repose. I was awake, and during the long hours of dead night, my busy
 thoughts worked in my brain, like ten thousand mill-wheels, rapid, acute,
 untameable. All slept--all England slept; and from my window, commanding
 a wide prospect of the star-illumined country, I saw the land stretched out
 in placid rest. I was awake, alive, while the brother of death possessed my
 race. What, if the more potent of these fraternal deities should obtain
 dominion over it? The silence of midnight, to speak truly, though
 apparently a paradox, rung in my ears. The solitude became intolerable--I
 placed my hand on the beating heart of Idris, I bent my head to catch the
 sound of her breath, to assure myself that she still existed--for a
 moment I doubted whether I should not awake her; so effeminate an horror
 ran through my frame.--Great God! would it one day be thus? One day all
 extinct, save myself, should I walk the earth alone? Were these warning
 voices, whose inarticulate and oracular sense forced belief upon me?
 
   Yet I would not call them
   Voices of warning, that announce to us
   Only the inevitable. As the sun,
   Ere it is risen, sometimes paints its image
   In the atmosphere--so often do the spirits
   Of great events stride on before the events,
   And in to-day already walks to-morrow.[2]
 
 [1] Calderon de la Barca.
 [2] Coleridge's Translation of Schiller's Wallenstein.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 AFTER a long interval, I am again impelled by the restless spirit within me
 to continue my narration; but I must alter the mode which I have hitherto
 adopted. The details contained in the foregoing pages, apparently trivial,
 yet each slightest one weighing like lead in the depressed scale of human
 afflictions; this tedious dwelling on the sorrows of others, while my own
 were only in apprehension; this slowly laying bare of my soul's wounds:
 this journal of death; this long drawn and tortuous path, leading to the
 ocean of countless tears, awakens me again to keen grief. I had used this
 history as an opiate; while it described my beloved friends, fresh with
 life and glowing with hope, active assistants on the scene, I was soothed;
 there will be a more melancholy pleasure in painting the end of all. But
 the intermediate steps, the climbing the wall, raised up between what was
 and is, while I still looked back nor saw the concealed desert beyond, is a
 labour past my strength. Time and experience have placed me on an height
 from which I can comprehend the past as a whole; and in this way I must
 describe it, bringing forward the leading incidents, and disposing light
 and shade so as to form a picture in whose very darkness there will be
 harmony.
 
 It would be needless to narrate those disastrous occurrences, for which a
 parallel might be found in any slighter visitation of our gigantic
 calamity. Does the reader wish to hear of the pest-houses, where death is
 the comforter--of the mournful passage of the death-cart--of the
 insensibility of the worthless, and the anguish of the loving heart--of
 harrowing shrieks and silence dire--of the variety of disease, desertion,
 famine, despair, and death? There are many books which can feed the
 appetite craving for these things; let them turn to the accounts of
 Boccaccio, De Foe, and Browne. The vast annihilation that has swallowed all
 things--the voiceless solitude of the once busy earth--the lonely state
 of singleness which hems me in, has deprived even such details of their
 stinging reality, and mellowing the lurid tints of past anguish with poetic
 hues, I am able to escape from the mosaic of circumstance, by perceiving
 and reflecting back the grouping and combined colouring of the past.
 
 I had returned from London possessed by the idea, with the intimate feeling
 that it was my first duty to secure, as well as I was able, the well-being
 of my family, and then to return and take my post beside Adrian. The events
 that immediately followed on my arrival at Windsor changed this view of
 things. The plague was not in London alone, it was every where--it came
 on us, as Ryland had said, like a thousand packs of wolves, howling through
 the winter night, gaunt and fierce. When once disease was introduced into
 the rural districts, its effects appeared more horrible, more exigent, and
 more difficult to cure, than in towns. There was a companionship in
 suffering there, and, the neighbours keeping constant watch on each other,
 and inspired by the active benevolence of Adrian, succour was afforded, and
 the path of destruction smoothed. But in the country, among the scattered
 farm-houses, in lone cottages, in fields, and barns, tragedies were acted
 harrowing to the soul, unseen, unheard, unnoticed. Medical aid was less
 easily procured, food was more difficult to obtain, and human beings,
 unwithheld by shame, for they were unbeheld of their fellows, ventured on
 deeds of greater wickedness, or gave way more readily to their abject
 fears.
 
 Deeds of heroism also occurred, whose very mention swells the heart and
 brings tears into the eyes. Such is human nature, that beauty and deformity
 are often closely linked. In reading history we are chiefly struck by the
 generosity and self-devotion that follow close on the heels of crime,
 veiling with supernal flowers the stain of blood. Such acts were not
 wanting to adorn the grim train that waited on the progress of the plague.
 
 The inhabitants of Berkshire and Bucks had been long aware that the plague
 was in London, in Liverpool, Bristol, Manchester, York, in short, in all
 the more populous towns of England. They were not however the less
 astonished and dismayed when it appeared among themselves. They were
 impatient and angry in the midst of terror. They would do something to
 throw off the clinging evil, and, while in action, they fancied that a
 remedy was applied. The inhabitants of the smaller towns left their houses,
 pitched tents in the fields, wandering separate from each other careless of
 hunger or the sky's inclemency, while they imagined that they avoided the
 death-dealing disease. The farmers and cottagers, on the contrary, struck
 with the fear of solitude, and madly desirous of medical assistance,
 flocked into the towns.
 
 But winter was coming, and with winter, hope. In August, the plague had
 appeared in the country of England, and during September it made its
 ravages. Towards the end of October it dwindled away, and was in some
 degree replaced by a typhus, of hardly less virulence. The autumn was warm
 and rainy: the infirm and sickly died off--happier they: many young
 people flushed with health and prosperity, made pale by wasting malady,
 became the inhabitants of the grave. The crop had failed, the bad corn, and
 want of foreign wines, added vigour to disease. Before Christmas half
 England was under water. The storms of the last winter were renewed; but
 the diminished shipping of this year caused us to feel less the tempests of
 the sea. The flood and storms did more harm to continental Europe than to
 us--giving, as it were, the last blow to the calamities which destroyed
 it. In Italy the rivers were unwatched by the diminished peasantry; and,
 like wild beasts from their lair when the hunters and dogs are afar, did
 Tiber, Arno, and Po, rush upon and destroy the fertility of the plains.
 Whole villages were carried away. Rome, and Florence, and Pisa were
 overflowed, and their marble palaces, late mirrored in tranquil streams,
 had their foundations shaken by their winter-gifted power. In Germany and
 Russia the injury was still more momentous.
 
 But frost would come at last, and with it a renewal of our lease of earth.
 Frost would blunt the arrows of pestilence, and enchain the furious
 elements; and the land would in spring throw off her garment of snow,
 released from her menace of destruction. It was not until February that the
 desired signs of winter appeared. For three days the snow fell, ice stopped
 the current of the rivers, and the birds flew out from crackling branches
 of the frost-whitened trees. On the fourth morning all vanished. A
 south-west wind brought up rain--the sun came out, and mocking the usual
 laws of nature, seemed even at this early season to burn with solsticial
 force. It was no consolation, that with the first winds of March the lanes
 were filled with violets, the fruit trees covered with blossoms, that the
 corn sprung up, and the leaves came out, forced by the unseasonable heat.
 We feared the balmy air--we feared the cloudless sky, the flower-covered
 earth, and delightful woods, for we looked on the fabric of the universe no
 longer as our dwelling, but our tomb, and the fragrant land smelled to the
 apprehension of fear like a wide church-yard.
 
   Pisando la tierra dura
   de continuo el hombre esta
   y cada passo que da
   es sobre su sepultura.[1]
 
 Yet notwithstanding these disadvantages winter was breathing time; and we
 exerted ourselves to make the best of it. Plague might not revive with the
 summer; but if it did, it should find us prepared. It is a part of man's
 nature to adapt itself through habit even to pain and sorrow. Pestilence
 had become a part of our future, our existence; it was to be guarded
 against, like the flooding of rivers, the encroachments of ocean, or the
 inclemency of the sky. After long suffering and bitter experience, some
 panacea might be discovered; as it was, all that received infection died--
 all however were not infected; and it became our part to fix deep the
 foundations, and raise high the barrier between contagion and the sane; to
 introduce such order as would conduce to the well-being of the survivors,
 and as would preserve hope and some portion of happiness to those who were
 spectators of the still renewed tragedy. Adrian had introduced systematic
 modes of proceeding in the metropolis, which, while they were unable to
 stop the progress of death, yet prevented other evils, vice and folly, from
 rendering the awful fate of the hour still more tremendous. I wished to
 imitate his example, but men are used to
 
  --move all together, if they move at all,[2]
 
 and I could find no means of leading the inhabitants of scattered
 towns and villages, who forgot my words as soon as they heard them
 not, and veered with every baffling wind, that might arise from an
 apparent change of circumstance.
 
 I adopted another plan. Those writers who have imagined a reign of peace
 and happiness on earth, have generally described a rural country, where
 each small township was directed by the elders and wise men. This was the
 key of my design. Each village, however small, usually contains a leader,
 one among themselves whom they venerate, whose advice they seek in
 difficulty, and whose good opinion they chiefly value. I was immediately
 drawn to make this observation by occurrences that presented themselves to
 my personal experience.
 
 In the village of Little Marlow an old woman ruled the community. She had
 lived for some years in an alms-house, and on fine Sundays her threshold
 was constantly beset by a crowd, seeking her advice and listening to her
 admonitions. She had been a soldier's wife, and had seen the world;
 infirmity, induced by fevers caught in unwholesome quarters, had come on
 her before its time, and she seldom moved from her little cot. The plague
 entered the village; and, while fright and grief deprived the inhabitants
 of the little wisdom they possessed, old Martha stepped forward and said--
 "Before now I have been in a town where there was the plague."--"And you
 escaped?"--"No, but I recovered."--After this Martha was seated more
 firmly than ever on the regal seat, elevated by reverence and love. She
 entered the cottages of the sick; she relieved their wants with her own
 hand; she betrayed no fear, and inspired all who saw her with some portion
 of her own native courage. She attended the markets--she insisted upon
 being supplied with food for those who were too poor to purchase it. She
 shewed them how the well-being of each included the prosperity of all. She
 would not permit the gardens to be neglected, nor the very flowers in the
 cottage lattices to droop from want of care. Hope, she said, was better
 than a doctor's prescription, and every thing that could sustain and
 enliven the spirits, of more worth than drugs and mixtures.
 
 It was the sight of Little Marlow, and my conversations with Martha, that
 led me to the plan I formed. I had before visited the manor houses and
 gentlemen's seats, and often found the inhabitants actuated by the purest
 benevolence, ready to lend their utmost aid for the welfare of their
 tenants. But this was not enough. The intimate sympathy generated by
 similar hopes and fears, similar experience and pursuits, was wanting here.
 The poor perceived that the rich possessed other means of preservation than
 those which could be partaken of by themselves, seclusion, and, as far as
 circumstances permitted, freedom from care. They could not place reliance
 on them, but turned with tenfold dependence to the succour and advice of
 their equals. I resolved therefore to go from village to village, seeking
 out the rustic archon of the place, and by systematizing their exertions,
 and enlightening their views, encrease both their power and their use among
 their fellow-cottagers. Many changes also now occurred in these spontaneous
 regal elections: depositions and abdications were frequent, while, in the
 place of the old and prudent, the ardent youth would step forward, eager
 for action, regardless of danger. Often too, the voice to which all
 listened was suddenly silenced, the helping hand cold, the sympathetic eye
 closed, and the villagers feared still more the death that had selected a
 choice victim, shivering in dust the heart that had beat for them, reducing
 to incommunicable annihilation the mind for ever occupied with projects for
 their welfare.
 
 Whoever labours for man must often find ingratitude, watered by vice and
 folly, spring from the grain which he has sown. Death, which had in our
 younger days walked the earth like "a thief that comes in the night," now,
 rising from his subterranean vault, girt with power, with dark banner
 floating, came a conqueror. Many saw, seated above his vice-regal throne, a
 supreme Providence, who directed his shafts, and guided his progress, and
 they bowed their heads in resignation, or at least in obedience. Others
 perceived only a passing casualty; they endeavoured to exchange terror for
 heedlessness, and plunged into licentiousness, to avoid the agonizing
 throes of worst apprehension. Thus, while the wise, the good, and the
 prudent were occupied by the labours of benevolence, the truce of winter
 produced other effects among the young, the thoughtless, and the vicious.
 During the colder months there was a general rush to London in search of
 amusement--the ties of public opinion were loosened; many were rich,
 heretofore poor--many had lost father and mother, the guardians of their
 morals, their mentors and restraints. It would have been useless to have
 opposed these impulses by barriers, which would only have driven those
 actuated by them to more pernicious indulgencies. The theatres were open
 and thronged; dance and midnight festival were frequented--in many of
 these decorum was violated, and the evils, which hitherto adhered to an
 advanced state of civilization, were doubled. The student left his books,
 the artist his study: the occupations of life were gone, but the amusements
 remained; enjoyment might be protracted to the verge of the grave. All
 factitious colouring disappeared--death rose like night, and, protected
 by its murky shadows the blush of modesty, the reserve of pride, the
 decorum of prudery were frequently thrown aside as useless veils. This was
 not universal. Among better natures, anguish and dread, the fear of eternal
 separation, and the awful wonder produced by unprecedented calamity, drew
 closer the ties of kindred and friendship. Philosophers opposed their
 principles, as barriers to the inundation of profligacy or despair, and the
 only ramparts to protect the invaded territory of human life; the
 religious, hoping now for their reward, clung fast to their creeds, as the
 rafts and planks which over the tempest-vexed sea of suffering, would bear
 them in safety to the harbour of the Unknown Continent. The loving heart,
 obliged to contract its view, bestowed its overflow of affection in triple
 portion on the few that remained. Yet, even among these, the present, as an
 unalienable possession, became all of time to which they dared commit the
 precious freight of their hopes.
 
 The experience of immemorial time had taught us formerly to count our
 enjoyments by years, and extend our prospect of life through a lengthened
 period of progression and decay; the long road threaded a vast labyrinth,
 and the Valley of the Shadow of Death, in which it terminated, was hid by
 intervening objects. But an earthquake had changed the scene--under our
 very feet the earth yawned--deep and precipitous the gulph below opened
 to receive us, while the hours charioted us towards the chasm. But it was
 winter now, and months must elapse before we are hurled from our security.
 We became ephemera, to whom the interval between the rising and setting sun
 was as a long drawn year of common time. We should never see our children
 ripen into maturity, nor behold their downy cheeks roughen, their blithe
 hearts subdued by passion or care; but we had them now--they lived, and
 we lived--what more could we desire? With such schooling did my poor
 Idris try to hush thronging fears, and in some measure succeeded. It was
 not as in summer-time, when each hour might bring the dreaded fate--until
 summer, we felt sure; and this certainty, short lived as it must be, yet
 for awhile satisfied her maternal tenderness. I know not how to express or
 communicate the sense of concentrated, intense, though evanescent
 transport, that imparadized us in the present hour. Our joys were dearer
 because we saw their end; they were keener because we felt, to its fullest
 extent, their value; they were purer because their essence was sympathy--
 as a meteor is brighter than a star, did the felicity of this winter
 contain in itself the extracted delights of a long, long life.
 
 How lovely is spring! As we looked from Windsor Terrace on the sixteen
 fertile counties spread beneath, speckled by happy cottages and wealthier
 towns, all looked as in former years, heart-cheering and fair. The land was
 ploughed, the slender blades of wheat broke through the dark soil, the
 fruit trees were covered with buds, the husbandman was abroad in the
 fields, the milk-maid tripped home with well-filled pails, the swallows and
 martins struck the sunny pools with their long, pointed wings, the new
 dropped lambs reposed on the young grass, the tender growth of leaves--
 
   Lifts its sweet head into the air, and feeds
   A silent space with ever sprouting green.[3]
 
 Man himself seemed to regenerate, and feel the frost of winter yield to
 an elastic and warm renewal of life--reason told us that care and sorrow
 would grow with the opening year--but how to believe the ominous voice
 breathed up with pestiferous vapours from fear's dim cavern, while nature,
 laughing and scattering from her green lap flowers, and fruits, and
 sparkling waters, invited us to join the gay masque of young life she
 led upon the scene?
 
 Where was the plague? "Here--every where!" one voice of horror and dismay
 exclaimed, when in the pleasant days of a sunny May the Destroyer of man
 brooded again over the earth, forcing the spirit to leave its organic
 chrysalis, and to enter upon an untried life. With one mighty sweep of its
 potent weapon, all caution, all care, all prudence were levelled low: death
 sat at the tables of the great, stretched itself on the cottager's pallet,
 seized the dastard who fled, quelled the brave man who resisted:
 despondency entered every heart, sorrow dimmed every eye.
 
 Sights of woe now became familiar to me, and were I to tell all of anguish
 and pain that I witnessed, of the despairing moans of age, and the more
 terrible smiles of infancy in the bosom of horror, my reader, his limbs
 quivering and his hair on end, would wonder how I did not, seized with
 sudden frenzy, dash myself from some precipice, and so close my eyes for
 ever on the sad end of the world. But the powers of love, poetry, and
 creative fancy will dwell even beside the sick of the plague, with the
 squalid, and with the dying. A feeling of devotion, of duty, of a high and
 steady purpose, elevated me; a strange joy filled my heart. In the midst of
 saddest grief I seemed to tread air, while the spirit of good shed round me
 an ambrosial atmosphere, which blunted the sting of sympathy, and purified
 the air of sighs. If my wearied soul flagged in its career, I thought of my
 loved home, of the casket that contained my treasures, of the kiss of love
 and the filial caress, while my eyes were moistened by purest dew, and my
 heart was at once softened and refreshed by thrilling tenderness.
 
 Maternal affection had not rendered Idris selfish; at the beginning of our
 calamity she had, with thoughtless enthusiasm, devoted herself to the care
 of the sick and helpless. I checked her; and she submitted to my rule. I
 told her how the fear of her danger palsied my exertions, how the knowledge
 of her safety strung my nerves to endurance. I shewed her the dangers which
 her children incurred during her absence; and she at length agreed not to
 go beyond the inclosure of the forest. Indeed, within the walls of the
 Castle we had a colony of the unhappy, deserted by their relatives, and in
 themselves helpless, sufficient to occupy her time and attention, while
 ceaseless anxiety for my welfare and the health of her children, however
 she strove to curb or conceal it, absorbed all her thoughts, and undermined
 the vital principle. After watching over and providing for their safety,
 her second care was to hide from me her anguish and tears. Each night I
 returned to the Castle, and found there repose and love awaiting me. Often
 I waited beside the bed of death till midnight, and through the obscurity
 of rainy, cloudy nights rode many miles, sustained by one circumstance
 only, the safety and sheltered repose of those I loved. If some scene of
 tremendous agony shook my frame and fevered my brow, I would lay my head on
 the lap of Idris, and the tumultuous pulses subsided into a temperate flow
 --her smile could raise me from hopelessness, her embrace bathe my
 sorrowing heart in calm peace. Summer advanced, and, crowned with the sun's
 potent rays, plague shot her unerring shafts over the earth. The nations
 beneath their influence bowed their heads, and died. The corn that sprung
 up in plenty, lay in autumn rotting on the ground, while the melancholy
 wretch who had gone out to gather bread for his children, lay stiff and
 plague-struck in the furrow. The green woods waved their boughs
 majestically, while the dying were spread beneath their shade, answering
 the solemn melody with inharmonious cries. The painted birds flitted
 through the shades; the careless deer reposed unhurt upon the fern--the
 oxen and the horses strayed from their unguarded stables, and grazed among
 the wheat, for death fell on man alone.
 
 With summer and mortality grew our fears. My poor love and I looked at each
 other, and our babes.--"We will save them, Idris," I said, "I will save
 them. Years hence we shall recount to them our fears, then passed away with
 their occasion. Though they only should remain on the earth, still they
 shall live, nor shall their cheeks become pale nor their sweet voices
 languish." Our eldest in some degree understood the scenes passing around,
 and at times, he with serious looks questioned me concerning the reason of
 so vast a desolation. But he was only ten years old; and the hilarity of
 youth soon chased unreasonable care from his brow. Evelyn, a laughing
 cherub, a gamesome infant, without idea of pain or sorrow, would, shaking
 back his light curls from his eyes, make the halls re-echo with his
 merriment, and in a thousand artless ways attract our attention to his
 play. Clara, our lovely gentle Clara, was our stay, our solace, our
 delight. She made it her task to attend the sick, comfort the sorrowing,
 assist the aged, and partake the sports and awaken the gaiety of the young.
 She flitted through the rooms, like a good spirit, dispatched from the
 celestial kingdom, to illumine our dark hour with alien splendour.
 Gratitude and praise marked where her footsteps had been. Yet, when she
 stood in unassuming simplicity before us, playing with our children, or
 with girlish assiduity performing little kind offices for Idris, one
 wondered in what fair lineament of her pure loveliness, in what soft tone
 of her thrilling voice, so much of heroism, sagacity and active goodness
 resided.
 
 The summer passed tediously, for we trusted that winter would at least
 check the disease. That it would vanish altogether was an hope too dear--
 too heartfelt, to be expressed. When such a thought was heedlessly uttered,
 the hearers, with a gush of tears and passionate sobs, bore witness how
 deep their fears were, how small their hopes. For my own part, my exertions
 for the public good permitted me to observe more closely than most others,
 the virulence and extensive ravages of our sightless enemy. A short month
 has destroyed a village, and where in May the first person sickened, in
 June the paths were deformed by unburied corpses--the houses tenantless,
 no smoke arising from the chimneys; and the housewife's clock marked only
 the hour when death had been triumphant. From such scenes I have sometimes
 saved a deserted infant--sometimes led a young and grieving mother from
 the lifeless image of her first born, or drawn the sturdy labourer from
 childish weeping over his extinct family.
 
 July is gone. August must pass, and by the middle of September we may hope.
 Each day was eagerly counted; and the inhabitants of towns, desirous to
 leap this dangerous interval, plunged into dissipation, and strove, by
 riot, and what they wished to imagine to be pleasure, to banish thought and
 opiate despair. None but Adrian could have tamed the motley population of
 London, which, like a troop of unbitted steeds rushing to their pastures,
 had thrown aside all minor fears, through the operation of the fear
 paramount. Even Adrian was obliged in part to yield, that he might be able,
 if not to guide, at least to set bounds to the license of the times. The
 theatres were kept open; every place of public resort was frequented;
 though he endeavoured so to modify them, as might best quiet the agitation
 of the spectators, and at the same time prevent a reaction of misery when
 the excitement was over. Tragedies deep and dire were the chief favourites.
 Comedy brought with it too great a contrast to the inner despair: when such
 were attempted, it was not unfrequent for a comedian, in the midst of the
 laughter occasioned by his disporportioned buffoonery, to find a word or
 thought in his part that jarred with his own sense of wretchedness, and
 burst from mimic merriment into sobs and tears, while the spectators,
 seized with irresistible sympathy, wept, and the pantomimic revelry was
 changed to a real exhibition of tragic passion.
 
 It was not in my nature to derive consolation from such scenes; from
 theatres, whose buffoon laughter and discordant mirth awakened distempered
 sympathy, or where fictitious tears and wailings mocked the heart-felt
 grief within; from festival or crowded meeting, where hilarity sprung from
 the worst feelings of our nature, or such enthralment of the better ones,
 as impressed it with garish and false varnish; from assemblies of mourners
 in the guise of revellers. Once however I witnessed a scene of singular
 interest at one of the theatres, where nature overpowered art, as an
 overflowing cataract will tear away the puny manufacture of a mock cascade,
 which had before been fed by a small portion of its waters.
 
 I had come to London to see Adrian. He was not at the palace; and, though
 the attendants did not know whither he had gone, they did not expect him
 till late at night. It was between six and seven o'clock, a fine summer
 afternoon, and I spent my leisure hours in a ramble through the empty
 streets of London; now turning to avoid an approaching funeral, now urged
 by curiosity to observe the state of a particular spot; my wanderings were
 instinct with pain, for silence and desertion characterized every place I
 visited, and the few beings I met were so pale and woe-begone, so marked
 with care and depressed by fear, that weary of encountering only signs of
 misery, I began to retread my steps towards home.
 
 I was now in Holborn, and passed by a public house filled with uproarious
 companions, whose songs, laughter, and shouts were more sorrowful than the
 pale looks and silence of the mourner. Such an one was near, hovering round
 this house. The sorry plight of her dress displayed her poverty, she was
 ghastly pale, and continued approaching, first the window and then the door
 of the house, as if fearful, yet longing to enter. A sudden burst of song
 and merriment seemed to sting her to the heart; she murmured, "Can he have
 the heart?" and then mustering her courage, she stepped within the
 threshold. The landlady met her in the passage; the poor creature asked,
 "Is my husband here? Can I see George?"
 
 "See him," cried the woman, "yes, if you go to him; last night he was taken
 with the plague, and we sent him to the hospital."
 
 The unfortunate inquirer staggered against a wall, a faint cry escaped her
 --"O! were you cruel enough," she exclaimed, "to send him there?"
 
 The landlady meanwhile hurried away; but a more compassionate bar-maid gave
 her a detailed account, the sum of which was, that her husband had been
 taken ill, after a night of riot, and sent by his boon companions with all
 expedition to St. Bartholomew's Hospital. I had watched this scene, for
 there was a gentleness about the poor woman that interested me; she now
 tottered away from the door, walking as well as she could down Holborn
 Hill; but her strength soon failed her; she leaned against a wall, and her
 head sunk on her bosom, while her pallid cheek became still more white. I
 went up to her and offered my services. She hardly looked up--"You can do
 me no good," she replied; "I must go to the hospital; if I do not die
 before I get there."
 
 There were still a few hackney-coaches accustomed to stand about the
 streets, more truly from habit than for use. I put her in one of these, and
 entered with her that I might secure her entrance into the hospital. Our
 way was short, and she said little; except interrupted ejaculations of
 reproach that he had left her, exclamations on the unkindness of some of
 his friends, and hope that she would find him alive. There was a simple,
 natural earnestness about her that interested me in her fate, especially
 when she assured me that her husband was the best of men,--had been so,
 till want of business during these unhappy times had thrown him into bad
 company. "He could not bear to come home," she said, "only to see our
 children die. A man cannot have the patience a mother has, with her own
 flesh and blood."
 
 We were set down at St. Bartholomew's, and entered the wretched precincts
 of the house of disease. The poor creature clung closer to me, as she saw
 with what heartless haste they bore the dead from the wards, and took them
 into a room, whose half-opened door displayed a number of corpses, horrible
 to behold by one unaccustomed to such scenes. We were directed to the ward
 where her husband had been first taken, and still was, the nurse said, if
 alive. My companion looked eagerly from one bed to the other, till at the
 end of the ward she espied, on a wretched bed, a squalid, haggard creature,
 writhing under the torture of disease. She rushed towards him, she embraced
 him, blessing God for his preservation.
 
 The enthusiasm that inspired her with this strange joy, blinded her to the
 horrors about her; but they were intolerably agonizing to me. The ward was
 filled with an effluvia that caused my heart to heave with painful qualms.
 The dead were carried out, and the sick brought in, with like indifference;
 some were screaming with pain, others laughing from the influence of more
 terrible delirium; some were attended by weeping, despairing relations,
 others called aloud with thrilling tenderness or reproach on the friends
 who had deserted them, while the nurses went from bed to bed, incarnate
 images of despair, neglect, and death. I gave gold to my luckless
 companion; I recommended her to the care of the attendants; I then hastened
 away; while the tormentor, the imagination, busied itself in picturing my
 own loved ones, stretched on such beds, attended thus. The country afforded
 no such mass of horrors; solitary wretches died in the open fields; and I
 have found a survivor in a vacant village, contending at once with famine
 and disease; but the assembly of pestilence, the banqueting hall of death,
 was spread only in London.
 
 I rambled on, oppressed, distracted by painful emotions--suddenly I found
 myself before Drury Lane Theatre. The play was Macbeth--the first actor
 of the age was there to exert his powers to drug with irreflection the
 auditors; such a medicine I yearned for, so I entered. The theatre was
 tolerably well filled. Shakspeare, whose popularity was established by the
 approval of four centuries, had not lost his influence even at this dread
 period; but was still "Ut magus," the wizard to rule our hearts and govern
 our imaginations. I came in during the interval between the third and
 fourth act. I looked round on the audience; the females were mostly of the
 lower classes, but the men were of all ranks, come hither to forget awhile
 the protracted scenes of wretchedness, which awaited them at their
 miserable homes. The curtain drew up, and the stage presented the scene of
 the witches' cave. The wildness and supernatural machinery of Macbeth, was
 a pledge that it could contain little directly connected with our present
 circumstances. Great pains had been taken in the scenery to give the
 semblance of reality to the impossible. The extreme darkness of the stage,
 whose only light was received from the fire under the cauldron, joined to a
 kind of mist that floated about it, rendered the unearthly shapes of the
 witches obscure and shadowy. It was not three decrepid old hags that bent
 over their pot throwing in the grim ingredients of the magic charm, but
 forms frightful, unreal, and fanciful. The entrance of Hecate, and the wild
 music that followed, took us out of this world. The cavern shape the stage
 assumed, the beetling rocks, the glare of the fire, the misty shades that
 crossed the scene at times, the music in harmony with all witch-like
 fancies, permitted the imagination to revel, without fear of contradiction,
 or reproof from reason or the heart. The entrance of Macbeth did not
 destroy the illusion, for he was actuated by the same feelings that
 inspired us, and while the work of magic proceeded we sympathized in his
 wonder and his daring, and gave ourselves up with our whole souls to the
 influence of scenic delusion. I felt the beneficial result of such
 excitement, in a renewal of those pleasing flights of fancy to which I had
 long been a stranger. The effect of this scene of incantation communicated
 a portion of its power to that which followed. We forgot that Malcolm and
 Macduff were mere human beings, acted upon by such simple passions as
 warmed our own breasts. By slow degrees however we were drawn to the real
 interest of the scene. A shudder like the swift passing of an electric
 shock ran through the house, when Rosse exclaimed, in answer to "Stands
 Scotland where it did?"
 
   Alas, poor country;
   Almost afraid to know itself! It cannot
   Be called our mother, but our grave: where nothing,
   But who knows nothing, is once seen to smile;
   Where sighs, and groans, and shrieks that rent the air,
   Are made, not marked; where violent sorrow seems
   A modern extasy: the dead man's knell
   Is there scarce asked, for who; and good men's lives
   Expire before the flowers in their caps,
   Dying, or ere they sicken.
 
 Each word struck the sense, as our life's passing bell; we feared to look
 at each other, but bent our gaze on the stage, as if our eyes could fall
 innocuous on that alone. The person who played the part of Rosse, suddenly
 became aware of the dangerous ground he trod. He was an inferior actor, but
 truth now made him excellent; as he went on to announce to Macduff the
 slaughter of his family, he was afraid to speak, trembling from
 apprehension of a burst of grief from the audience, not from his
 fellow-mime. Each word was drawn out with difficulty; real anguish painted
 his features; his eyes were now lifted in sudden horror, now fixed in dread
 upon the ground. This shew of terror encreased ours, we gasped with him,
 each neck was stretched out, each face changed with the actor's changes--
 at length while Macduff, who, attending to his part, was unobservant of the
 high wrought sympathy of the house, cried with well acted passion:
 
   All my pretty ones?
   Did you say all?--O hell kite! All?
   What! all my pretty chickens, and their dam,
   At one fell swoop!
 
 A pang of tameless grief wrenched every heart, a burst of despair was
 echoed from every lip.--I had entered into the universal feeling--I
 had been absorbed by the terrors of Rosse--I re-echoed the cry of Macduff,
 and then rushed out as from an hell of torture, to find calm in the free
 air and silent street.
 
 Free the air was not, or the street silent. Oh, how I longed then for the
 dear soothings of maternal Nature, as my wounded heart was still further
 stung by the roar of heartless merriment from the public-house, by the
 sight of the drunkard reeling home, having lost the memory of what he would
 find there in oblivious debauch, and by the more appalling salutations of
 those melancholy beings to whom the name of home was a mockery. I ran on at
 my utmost speed until I found myself I knew not how, close to Westminster
 Abbey, and was attracted by the deep and swelling tone of the organ. I
 entered with soothing awe the lighted chancel, and listened to the solemn
 religious chaunt, which spoke peace and hope to the unhappy. The notes,
 freighted with man's dearest prayers, re-echoed through the dim aisles, and
 the bleeding of the soul's wounds was staunched by heavenly balm. In spite
 of the misery I deprecated, and could not understand; in spite of the cold
 hearths of wide London, and the corpse-strewn fields of my native land; in
 spite of all the variety of agonizing emotions I had that evening
 experienced, I thought that in reply to our melodious adjurations, the
 Creator looked down in compassion and promise of relief; the awful peal of
 the heaven-winged music seemed fitting voice wherewith to commune with the
 Supreme; calm was produced by its sound, and by the sight of many other
 human creatures offering up prayers and submission with me. A sentiment
 approaching happiness followed the total resignation of one's being to the
 guardianship of the world's ruler. Alas! with the failing of this solemn
 strain, the elevated spirit sank again to earth. Suddenly one of the
 choristers died--he was lifted from his desk, the vaults below were
 hastily opened--he was consigned with a few muttered prayers to the
 darksome cavern, abode of thousands who had gone before--now wide yawning
 to receive even all who fulfilled the funeral rites. In vain I would then
 have turned from this scene, to darkened aisle or lofty dome, echoing with
 melodious praise. In the open air alone I found relief; among nature's
 beauteous works, her God reassumed his attribute of benevolence, and again
 I could trust that he who built up the mountains, planted the forests, and
 poured out the rivers, would erect another state for lost humanity, where
 we might awaken again to our affections, our happiness, and our faith.
 
 Fortunately for me those circumstances were of rare occurrence that obliged
 me to visit London, and my duties were confined to the rural district which
 our lofty castle overlooked; and here labour stood in the place of pastime,
 to occupy such of the country people as were sufficiently exempt from
 sorrow or disease. My endeavours were directed towards urging them to their
 usual attention to their crops, and to the acting as if pestilence did not
 exist. The mower's scythe was at times heard; yet the joyless haymakers
 after they had listlessly turned the grass, forgot to cart it; the
 shepherd, when he had sheared his sheep, would let the wool lie to be
 scattered by the winds, deeming it useless to provide clothing for another
 winter. At times however the spirit of life was awakened by these
 employments; the sun, the refreshing breeze, the sweet smell of the hay,
 the rustling leaves and prattling rivulets brought repose to the agitated
 bosom, and bestowed a feeling akin to happiness on the apprehensive. Nor,
 strange to say, was the time without its pleasures. Young couples, who had
 loved long and hopelessly, suddenly found every impediment removed, and
 wealth pour in from the death of relatives. The very danger drew them
 closer. The immediate peril urged them to seize the immediate opportunity;
 wildly and passionately they sought to know what delights existence
 afforded, before they yielded to death, and
 
   Snatching their pleasures with rough strife
   Thorough the iron gates of life,[4]
 
 they defied the conquering pestilence to destroy what had been, or to
 erase even from their death-bed thoughts the sentiment of happiness
 which had been theirs.
 
 One instance of this kind came immediately under our notice, where a
 high-born girl had in early youth given her heart to one of meaner
 extraction. He was a schoolfellow and friend of her brother's, and usually
 spent a part of the holidays at the mansion of the duke her father. They
 had played together as children, been the confidants of each other's little
 secrets, mutual aids and consolers in difficulty and sorrow. Love had crept
 in, noiseless, terrorless at first, till each felt their life bound up in
 the other, and at the same time knew that they must part. Their extreme
 youth, and the purity of their attachment, made them yield with less
 resistance to the tyranny of circumstances. The father of the fair Juliet
 separated them; but not until the young lover had promised to remain absent
 only till he had rendered himself worthy of her, and she had vowed to
 preserve her virgin heart, his treasure, till he returned to claim and
 possess it.
 
 Plague came, threatening to destroy at once the aim of the ambitious and
 the hopes of love. Long the Duke of L----derided the idea that there
 could be danger while he pursued his plans of cautious seclusion; and he so
 far succeeded, that it was not till this second summer, that the destroyer,
 at one fell stroke, overthrew his precautions, his security, and his life.
 Poor Juliet saw one by one, father, mother, brothers, and sisters, sicken
 and die. Most of the servants fled on the first appearance of disease,
 those who remained were infected mortally; no neighbour or rustic ventured
 within the verge of contagion. By a strange fatality Juliet alone escaped,
 and she to the last waited on her relatives, and smoothed the pillow of
 death. The moment at length came, when the last blow was given to the last
 of the house: the youthful survivor of her race sat alone among the dead.
 There was no living being near to soothe her, or withdraw her from this
 hideous company. With the declining heat of a September night, a whirlwind
 of storm, thunder, and hail, rattled round the house, and with ghastly
 harmony sung the dirge of her family. She sat upon the ground absorbed in
 wordless despair, when through the gusty wind and bickering rain she
 thought she heard her name called. Whose could that familiar voice be? Not
 one of her relations, for they lay glaring on her with stony eyes. Again
 her name was syllabled, and she shuddered as she asked herself, am I
 becoming mad, or am I dying, that I hear the voices of the departed? A
 second thought passed, swift as an arrow, into her brain; she rushed to the
 window; and a flash of lightning shewed to her the expected vision, her
 lover in the shrubbery beneath; joy lent her strength to descend the
 stairs, to open the door, and then she fainted in his supporting arms.
 
 A thousand times she reproached herself, as with a crime, that she should
 revive to happiness with him. The natural clinging of the human mind to
 life and joy was in its full energy in her young heart; she gave herself
 impetuously up to the enchantment: they were married; and in their radiant
 features I saw incarnate, for the last time, the spirit of love, of
 rapturous sympathy, which once had been the life of the world.
 
 I envied them, but felt how impossible it was to imbibe the same feeling,
 now that years had multiplied my ties in the world. Above all, the anxious
 mother, my own beloved and drooping Idris, claimed my earnest care; I could
 not reproach the anxiety that never for a moment slept in her heart, but I
 exerted myself to distract her attention from too keen an observation of
 the truth of things, of the near and nearer approaches of disease, misery,
 and death, of the wild look of our attendants as intelligence of another
 and yet another death reached us; for to the last something new occurred
 that seemed to transcend in horror all that had gone before. Wretched
 beings crawled to die under our succouring roof; the inhabitants of the
 Castle decreased daily, while the survivors huddled together in fear, and,
 as in a famine-struck boat, the sport of the wild, interminable waves, each
 looked in the other's face, to guess on whom the death-lot would next fall.
 All this I endeavoured to veil, so that it might least impress my Idris;
 yet, as I have said, my courage survived even despair: I might be
 vanquished, but I would not yield.
 
 One day, it was the ninth of September, seemed devoted to every disaster,
 to every harrowing incident. Early in the day, I heard of the arrival of
 the aged grandmother of one of our servants at the Castle. This old woman
 had reached her hundredth year; her skin was shrivelled, her form was bent
 and lost in extreme decrepitude; but as still from year to year she
 continued in existence, out-living many younger and stronger, she began to
 feel as if she were to live for ever. The plague came, and the inhabitants
 of her village died. Clinging, with the dastard feeling of the aged, to the
 remnant of her spent life, she had, on hearing that the pestilence had come
 into her neighbourhood, barred her door, and closed her casement, refusing
 to communicate with any. She would wander out at night to get food, and
 returned home, pleased that she had met no one, that she was in no danger
 from the plague. As the earth became more desolate, her difficulty in
 acquiring sustenance increased; at first, her son, who lived near, had
 humoured her by placing articles of food in her way: at last he died. But,
 even though threatened by famine, her fear of the plague was paramount; and
 her greatest care was to avoid her fellow creatures. She grew weaker each
 day, and each day she had further to go. The night before, she had reached
 Datchet; and, prowling about, had found a baker's shop open and deserted.
 Laden with spoil, she hastened to return, and lost her way. The night was
 windless, hot, and cloudy; her load became too heavy for her; and one by
 one she threw away her loaves, still endeavouring to get along, though her
 hobbling fell into lameness, and her weakness at last into inability to
 move.
 
 She lay down among the tall corn, and fell asleep. Deep in midnight, she
 was awaked by a rustling near her; she would have started up, but her stiff
 joints refused to obey her will. A low moan close to her ear followed, and
 the rustling increased; she heard a smothered voice breathe out, Water,
 Water! several times; and then again a sigh heaved from the heart of the
 sufferer. The old woman shuddered, she contrived at length to sit upright;
 but her teeth chattered, and her knees knocked together--close, very
 close, lay a half-naked figure, just discernible in the gloom, and the cry
 for water and the stifled moan were again uttered. Her motions at length
 attracted the attention of her unknown companion; her hand was seized with
 a convulsive violence that made the grasp feel like iron, the fingers like
 the keen teeth of a trap.--"At last you are come!" were the words given
 forth--but this exertion was the last effort of the dying--the joints
 relaxed, the figure fell prostrate, one low moan, the last, marked the
 moment of death. Morning broke; and the old woman saw the corpse, marked
 with the fatal disease, close to her; her wrist was livid with the hold
 loosened by death. She felt struck by the plague; her aged frame was unable
 to bear her away with sufficient speed; and now, believing herself
 infected, she no longer dreaded the association of others; but, as swiftly
 as she might, came to her grand-daughter, at Windsor Castle, there to
 lament and die. The sight was horrible; still she clung to life, and
 lamented her mischance with cries and hideous groans; while the swift
 advance of the disease shewed, what proved to be the fact, that she could
 not survive many hours.
 
 While I was directing that the necessary care should be taken of her, Clara
 came in; she was trembling and pale; and, when I anxiously asked her the
 cause of her agitation, she threw herself into my arms weeping and
 exclaiming--"Uncle, dearest uncle, do not hate me for ever! I must tell
 you, for you must know, that Evelyn, poor little Evelyn"--her voice was
 choked by sobs. The fear of so mighty a calamity as the loss of our adored
 infant made the current of my blood pause with chilly horror; but the
 remembrance of the mother restored my presence of mind. I sought the little
 bed of my darling; he was oppressed by fever; but I trusted, I fondly and
 fearfully trusted, that there were no symptoms of the plague. He was not
 three years old, and his illness appeared only one of those attacks
 incident to infancy. I watched him long--his heavy half-closed lids, his
 burning cheeks and restless twining of his small fingers--the fever was
 violent, the torpor complete--enough, without the greater fear of
 pestilence, to awaken alarm. Idris must not see him in this state. Clara,
 though only twelve years old, was rendered, through extreme sensibility, so
 prudent and careful, that I felt secure in entrusting the charge of him to
 her, and it was my task to prevent Idris from observing their absence. I
 administered the fitting remedies, and left my sweet niece to watch beside
 him, and bring me notice of any change she should observe.
 
 I then went to Idris, contriving in my way, plausible excuses for remaining
 all day in the Castle, and endeavouring to disperse the traces of care from
 my brow. Fortunately she was not alone. I found Merrival, the astronomer,
 with her. He was far too long sighted in his view of humanity to heed the
 casualties of the day, and lived in the midst of contagion unconscious of
 its existence. This poor man, learned as La Place, guileless and
 unforeseeing as a child, had often been on the point of starvation, he, his
 pale wife and numerous offspring, while he neither felt hunger, nor
 observed distress. His astronomical theories absorbed him; calculations
 were scrawled with coal on the bare walls of his garret: a hard-earned
 guinea, or an article of dress, was exchanged for a book without remorse;
 he neither heard his children cry, nor observed his companion's emaciated
 form, and the excess of calamity was merely to him as the occurrence of a
 cloudy night, when he would have given his right hand to observe a
 celestial phenomenon. His wife was one of those wondrous beings, to be
 found only among women, with affections not to be diminished by misfortune.
 Her mind was divided between boundless admiration for her husband, and
 tender anxiety for her children--she waited on him, worked for them, and
 never complained, though care rendered her life one long-drawn, melancholy
 dream.
 
 He had introduced himself to Adrian, by a request he made to observe some
 planetary motions from his glass. His poverty was easily detected and
 relieved. He often thanked us for the books we lent him, and for the use of
 our instruments, but never spoke of his altered abode or change of
 circumstances. His wife assured us, that he had not observed any
 difference, except in the absence of the children from his study, and to
 her infinite surprise he complained of this unaccustomed quiet.
 
 He came now to announce to us the completion of his Essay on the
 Pericyclical Motions of the Earth's Axis, and the precession of the
 equinoctial points. If an old Roman of the period of the Republic had
 returned to life, and talked of the impending election of some
 laurel-crowned consul, or of the last battle with Mithridates, his ideas
 would not have been more alien to the times, than the conversation of
 Merrival. Man, no longer with an appetite for sympathy, clothed his
 thoughts in visible signs; nor were there any readers left: while each one,
 having thrown away his sword with opposing shield alone, awaited the
 plague, Merrival talked of the state of mankind six thousand years hence.
 He might with equal interest to us, have added a commentary, to describe
 the unknown and unimaginable lineaments of the creatures, who would then
 occupy the vacated dwelling of mankind. We had not the heart to undeceive
 the poor old man; and at the moment I came in, he was reading parts of his
 book to Idris, asking what answer could be given to this or that position.
 
 Idris could not refrain from a smile, as she listened; she had already
 gathered from him that his family was alive and in health; though not apt
 to forget the precipice of time on which she stood, yet I could perceive
 that she was amused for a moment, by the contrast between the contracted
 view we had so long taken of human life, and the seven league strides with
 which Merrival paced a coming eternity. I was glad to see her smile,
 because it assured me of her total ignorance of her infant's danger: but I
 shuddered to think of the revulsion that would be occasioned by a discovery
 of the truth. While Merrival was talking, Clara softly opened a door behind
 Idris, and beckoned me to come with a gesture and look of grief. A mirror
 betrayed the sign to Idris--she started up. To suspect evil, to perceive
 that, Alfred being with us, the danger must regard her youngest darling, to
 fly across the long chambers into his apartment, was the work but of a
 moment. There she beheld her Evelyn lying fever-stricken and motionless. I
 followed her, and strove to inspire more hope than I could myself
 entertain; but she shook her head mournfully. Anguish deprived her of
 presence of mind; she gave up to me and Clara the physician's and nurse's
 parts; she sat by the bed, holding one little burning hand, and, with
 glazed eyes fixed on her babe, passed the long day in one unvaried agony.
 It was not the plague that visited our little boy so roughly; but she could
 not listen to my assurances; apprehension deprived her of judgment and
 reflection; every slight convulsion of her child's features shook her frame
 --if he moved, she dreaded the instant crisis; if he remained still, she
 saw death in his torpor, and the cloud on her brow darkened.
 
 The poor little thing's fever encreased towards night. The sensation is
 most dreary, to use no stronger term, with which one looks forward to
 passing the long hours of night beside a sick bed, especially if the
 patient be an infant, who cannot explain its pain, and whose flickering
 life resembles the wasting flame of the watch-light,
 
   Whose narrow fire
   Is shaken by the wind, and on whose edge
   Devouring darkness hovers.[5]
 
 With eagerness one turns toward the east, with angry impatience
 one marks the unchequered darkness; the crowing of a cock, that
 sound of glee during day-time, comes wailing and untuneable--the creaking
 of rafters, and slight stir of invisible insect is heard and felt as the
 signal and type of desolation. Clara, overcome by weariness, had seated
 herself at the foot of her cousin's bed, and in spite of her efforts
 slumber weighed down her lids; twice or thrice she shook it off; but at
 length she was conquered and slept. Idris sat at the bedside, holding
 Evelyn's hand; we were afraid to speak to each other; I watched the stars
 --I hung over my child--I felt his little pulse--I drew near the
 mother--again I receded. At the turn of morning a gentle sigh from the
 patient attracted me, the burning spot on his cheek faded--his pulse beat
 softly and regularly--torpor yielded to sleep. For a long time I dared
 not hope; but when his unobstructed breathing and the moisture that
 suffused his forehead, were tokens no longer to be mistaken of the
 departure of mortal malady, I ventured to whisper the news of the change to
 Idris, and at length succeeded in persuading her that I spoke truth.
 
 But neither this assurance, nor the speedy convalescence of our child could
 restore her, even to the portion of peace she before enjoyed. Her fear had
 been too deep, too absorbing, too entire, to be changed to security. She
 felt as if during her past calm she had dreamed, but was now awake; she
 was
 
   As one
   In some lone watch-tower on the deep, awakened
   From soothing visions of the home he loves,
   Trembling to hear the wrathful billows roar;[6]
 
 as one who has been cradled by a storm, and awakes to find the
 vessel sinking. Before, she had been visited by pangs of fear--now, she
 never enjoyed an interval of hope. No smile of the heart ever irradiated
 her fair countenance; sometimes she forced one, and then gushing tears
 would flow, and the sea of grief close above these wrecks of past
 happiness. Still while I was near her, she could not be in utter despair--
 she fully confided herself to me--she did not seem to fear my death, or
 revert to its possibility; to my guardianship she consigned the full
 freight of her anxieties, reposing on my love, as a wind-nipped fawn by the
 side of a doe, as a wounded nestling under its mother's wing, as a tiny,
 shattered boat, quivering still, beneath some protecting willow-tree. While
 I, not proudly as in days of joy, yet tenderly, and with glad consciousness
 of the comfort I afforded, drew my trembling girl close to my heart, and
 tried to ward every painful thought or rough circumstance from her
 sensitive nature.
 
 One other incident occurred at the end of this summer. The Countess of
 Windsor, Ex-Queen of England, returned from Germany. She had at the
 beginning of the season quitted the vacant city of Vienna; and, unable to
 tame her haughty mind to anything like submission, she had delayed at
 Hamburgh, and, when at last she came to London, many weeks elapsed before
 she gave Adrian notice of her arrival. In spite of her coldness and long
 absence, he welcomed her with sensibility, displaying such affection as
 sought to heal the wounds of pride and sorrow, and was repulsed only by her
 total apparent want of sympathy. Idris heard of her mother's return with
 pleasure. Her own maternal feelings were so ardent, that she imagined her
 parent must now, in this waste world, have lost pride and harshness, and
 would receive with delight her filial attentions. The first check to her
 duteous demonstrations was a formal intimation from the fallen majesty of
 England, that I was in no manner to be intruded upon her. She consented,
 she said, to forgive her daughter, and acknowledge her grandchildren;
 larger concessions must not be expected.
 
 To me this proceeding appeared (if so light a term may be permitted)
 extremely whimsical. Now that the race of man had lost in fact all
 distinction of rank, this pride was doubly fatuitous; now that we felt a
 kindred, fraternal nature with all who bore the stamp of humanity, this
 angry reminiscence of times for ever gone, was worse than foolish. Idris
 was too much taken up by her own dreadful fears, to be angry, hardly
 grieved; for she judged that insensibility must be the source of this
 continued rancour. This was not altogether the fact: but predominant
 self-will assumed the arms and masque of callous feeling; and the haughty
 lady disdained to exhibit any token of the struggle she endured; while the
 slave of pride, she fancied that she sacrificed her happiness to immutable
 principle.
 
 False was all this--false all but the affections of our nature, and the
 links of sympathy with pleasure or pain. There was but one good and one
 evil in the world--life and death. The pomp of rank, the assumption of
 power, the possessions of wealth vanished like morning mist. One living
 beggar had become of more worth than a national peerage of dead lords--
 alas the day!--than of dead heroes, patriots, or men of genius. There was
 much of degradation in this: for even vice and virtue had lost their
 attributes--life--life--the continuation of our animal mechanism--
 was the Alpha and Omega of the desires, the prayers, the prostrate ambition
 of human race.
 
 [1] Calderon de la Barca.
 [2] Wordsworth.
 [3] Keats.
 [4] Andrew Marvell.
 [5] The Cenci
 [6] The Brides' Tragedy, by T. L. Beddoes, Esq.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 HALF England was desolate, when October came, and the equinoctial winds
 swept over the earth, chilling the ardours of the unhealthy season. The
 summer, which was uncommonly hot, had been protracted into the beginning of
 this month, when on the eighteenth a sudden change was brought about from
 summer temperature to winter frost. Pestilence then made a pause in her
 death-dealing career. Gasping, not daring to name our hopes, yet full even
 to the brim with intense expectation, we stood, as a ship-wrecked sailor
 stands on a barren rock islanded by the ocean, watching a distant vessel,
 fancying that now it nears, and then again that it is bearing from sight.
 This promise of a renewed lease of life turned rugged natures to melting
 tenderness, and by contrast filled the soft with harsh and unnatural
 sentiments. When it seemed destined that all were to die, we were reckless
 of the how and when--now that the virulence of the disease was mitigated,
 and it appeared willing to spare some, each was eager to be among the
 elect, and clung to life with dastard tenacity. Instances of desertion
 became more frequent; and even murders, which made the hearer sick with
 horror, where the fear of contagion had armed those nearest in blood
 against each other. But these smaller and separate tragedies were about to
 yield to a mightier interest--and, while we were promised calm from
 infectious influences, a tempest arose wilder than the winds, a tempest
 bred by the passions of man, nourished by his most violent impulses,
 unexampled and dire.
 
 A number of people from North America, the relics of that populous
 continent, had set sail for the East with mad desire of change, leaving
 their native plains for lands not less afflicted than their own. Several
 hundreds landed in Ireland, about the first of November, and took
 possession of such vacant habitations as they could find; seizing upon the
 superabundant food, and the stray cattle. As they exhausted the produce of
 one spot, they went on to another. At length they began to interfere with
 the inhabitants, and strong in their concentrated numbers, ejected the
 natives from their dwellings, and robbed them of their winter store. A few
 events of this kind roused the fiery nature of the Irish; and they attacked
 the invaders. Some were destroyed; the major part escaped by quick and well
 ordered movements; and danger made them careful. Their numbers ably
 arranged; the very deaths among them concealed; moving on in good order,
 and apparently given up to enjoyment, they excited the envy of the Irish.
 The Americans permitted a few to join their band, and presently the
 recruits outnumbered the strangers--nor did they join with them, nor
 imitate the admirable order which, preserved by the Trans-Atlantic chiefs,
 rendered them at once secure and formidable. The Irish followed their track
 in disorganized multitudes; each day encreasing; each day becoming more
 lawless. The Americans were eager to escape from the spirit they had
 roused, and, reaching the eastern shores of the island, embarked for
 England. Their incursion would hardly have been felt had they come alone;
 but the Irish, collected in unnatural numbers, began to feel the inroads of
 famine, and they followed in the wake of the Americans for England also.
 The crossing of the sea could not arrest their progress. The harbours of
 the desolate sea-ports of the west of Ireland were filled with vessels of
 all sizes, from the man of war to the small fishers' boat, which lay
 sailorless, and rotting on the lazy deep. The emigrants embarked by
 hundreds, and unfurling their sails with rude hands, made strange havoc of
 buoy and cordage. Those who modestly betook themselves to the smaller
 craft, for the most part achieved their watery journey in safety. Some, in
 the true spirit of reckless enterprise, went on board a ship of an hundred
 and twenty guns; the vast hull drifted with the tide out of the bay, and
 after many hours its crew of landsmen contrived to spread a great part of
 her enormous canvass--the wind took it, and while a thousand mistakes of
 the helmsman made her present her head now to one point, and now to
 another, the vast fields of canvass that formed her sails flapped with a
 sound like that of a huge cataract; or such as a sea-like forest may give
 forth when buffeted by an equinoctial north-wind. The port-holes were open,
 and with every sea, which as she lurched, washed her decks, they received
 whole tons of water. The difficulties were increased by a fresh breeze
 which began to blow, whistling among the shrowds, dashing the sails this
 way and that, and rending them with horrid split, and such whir as may have
 visited the dreams of Milton, when he imagined the winnowing of the
 arch-fiend's van-like wings, which encreased the uproar of wild chaos.
 These sounds were mingled with the roaring of the sea, the splash of the
 chafed billows round the vessel's sides, and the gurgling up of the water
 in the hold. The crew, many of whom had never seen the sea before, felt
 indeed as if heaven and earth came ruining together, as the vessel dipped
 her bows in the waves, or rose high upon them. Their yells were drowned in
 the clamour of elements, and the thunder rivings of their unwieldy
 habitation--they discovered at last that the water gained on them, and
 they betook themselves to their pumps; they might as well have laboured to
 empty the ocean by bucketfuls. As the sun went down, the gale encreased;
 the ship seemed to feel her danger, she was now completely water-logged,
 and presented other indications of settling before she went down. The bay
 was crowded with vessels, whose crews, for the most part, were observing
 the uncouth sportings of this huge unwieldy machine--they saw her
 gradually sink; the waters now rising above her lower decks--they could
 hardly wink before she had utterly disappeared, nor could the place where
 the sea had closed over her be at all discerned. Some few of her crew were
 saved, but the greater part clinging to her cordage and masts went down
 with her, to rise only when death loosened their hold.
 
 This event caused many of those who were about to sail, to put foot again
 on firm land, ready to encounter any evil rather than to rush into the
 yawning jaws of the pitiless ocean. But these were few, in comparison to
 the numbers who actually crossed. Many went up as high as Belfast to ensure
 a shorter passage, and then journeying south through Scotland, they were
 joined by the poorer natives of that country, and all poured with one
 consent into England.
 
 Such incursions struck the English with affright, in all those towns where
 there was still sufficient population to feel the change. There was room
 enough indeed in our hapless country for twice the number of invaders; but
 their lawless spirit instigated them to violence; they took a delight in
 thrusting the possessors from their houses; in seizing on some mansion of
 luxury, where the noble dwellers secluded themselves in fear of the plague;
 in forcing these of either sex to become their servants and purveyors;
 till, the ruin complete in one place, they removed their locust visitation
 to another. When unopposed they spread their ravages wide; in cases of
 danger they clustered, and by dint of numbers overthrew their weak and
 despairing foes. They came from the east and the north, and directed their
 course without apparent motive, but unanimously towards our unhappy
 metropolis.
 
 Communication had been to a great degree cut off through the paralyzing
 effects of pestilence, so that the van of our invaders had proceeded as far
 as Manchester and Derby, before we received notice of their arrival. They
 swept the country like a conquering army, burning--laying waste--
 murdering. The lower and vagabond English joined with them. Some few of the
 Lords Lieutenant who remained, endeavoured to collect the militia--but
 the ranks were vacant, panic seized on all, and the opposition that was
 made only served to increase the audacity and cruelty of the enemy. They
 talked of taking London, conquering England--calling to mind the long
 detail of injuries which had for many years been forgotten. Such vaunts
 displayed their weakness, rather than their strength--yet still they
 might do extreme mischief, which, ending in their destruction, would render
 them at last objects of compassion and remorse.
 
 We were now taught how, in the beginning of the world, mankind clothed
 their enemies in impossible attributes--and how details proceeding from
 mouth to mouth, might, like Virgil's ever-growing Rumour, reach the heavens
 with her brow, and clasp Hesperus and Lucifer with her outstretched hands.
 Gorgon and Centaur, dragon and iron-hoofed lion, vast sea-monster and
 gigantic hydra, were but types of the strange and appalling accounts
 brought to London concerning our invaders. Their landing was long unknown,
 but having now advanced within an hundred miles of London, the country
 people flying before them arrived in successive troops, each exaggerating
 the numbers, fury, and cruelty of the assailants. Tumult filled the before
 quiet streets--women and children deserted their homes, escaping they
 knew not whither--fathers, husbands, and sons, stood trembling, not for
 themselves, but for their loved and defenceless relations. As the country
 people poured into London, the citizens fled southwards--they climbed the
 higher edifices of the town, fancying that they could discern the smoke and
 flames the enemy spread around them. As Windsor lay, to a great degree, in
 the line of march from the west, I removed my family to London, assigning
 the Tower for their sojourn, and joining Adrian, acted as his Lieutenant in
 the coming struggle.
 
 We employed only two days in our preparations, and made good use of them.
 Artillery and arms were collected; the remnants of such regiments, as could
 be brought through many losses into any show of muster, were put under
 arms, with that appearance of military discipline which might encourage our
 own party, and seem most formidable to the disorganized multitude of our
 enemies. Even music was not wanting: banners floated in the air, and the
 shrill fife and loud trumpet breathed forth sounds of encouragement and
 victory. A practised ear might trace an undue faltering in the step of the
 soldiers; but this was not occasioned so much by fear of the adversary, as
 by disease, by sorrow, and by fatal prognostications, which often weighed
 most potently on the brave, and quelled the manly heart to abject
 subjection.
 
 Adrian led the troops. He was full of care. It was small relief to him that
 our discipline should gain us success in such a conflict; while plague
 still hovered to equalize the conqueror and the conquered, it was not
 victory that he desired, but bloodless peace. As we advanced, we were met
 by bands of peasantry, whose almost naked condition, whose despair and
 horror, told at once the fierce nature of the coming enemy. The senseless
 spirit of conquest and thirst of spoil blinded them, while with insane fury
 they deluged the country in ruin. The sight of the military restored hope
 to those who fled, and revenge took place of fear. They inspired the
 soldiers with the same sentiment. Languor was changed to ardour, the slow
 step converted to a speedy pace, while the hollow murmur of the multitude,
 inspired by one feeling, and that deadly, filled the air, drowning the
 clang of arms and sound of music. Adrian perceived the change, and feared
 that it would be difficult to prevent them from wreaking their utmost fury
 on the Irish. He rode through the lines, charging the officers to restrain
 the troops, exhorting the soldiers, restoring order, and quieting in some
 degree the violent agitation that swelled every bosom.
 
 We first came upon a few stragglers of the Irish at St. Albans. They
 retreated, and, joining others of their companions, still fell back, till
 they reached the main body. Tidings of an armed and regular opposition
 recalled them to a sort of order. They made Buckingham their head-quarters,
 and scouts were sent out to ascertain our situation. We remained for the
 night at Luton. In the morning a simultaneous movement caused us each to
 advance. It was early dawn, and the air, impregnated with freshest odour,
 seemed in idle mockery to play with our banners, and bore onwards towards
 the enemy the music of the bands, the neighings of the horses, and regular
 step of the infantry. The first sound of martial instruments that came upon
 our undisciplined foe, inspired surprise, not unmingled with dread. It
 spoke of other days, of days of concord and order; it was associated with
 times when plague was not, and man lived beyond the shadow of imminent
 fate. The pause was momentary. Soon we heard their disorderly clamour, the
 barbarian shouts, the untimed step of thousands coming on in disarray.
 Their troops now came pouring on us from the open country or narrow lanes;
 a large extent of unenclosed fields lay between us; we advanced to the
 middle of this, and then made a halt: being somewhat on superior ground, we
 could discern the space they covered. When their leaders perceived us drawn
 out in opposition, they also gave the word to halt, and endeavoured to form
 their men into some imitation of military discipline. The first ranks had
 muskets; some were mounted, but their arms were such as they had seized
 during their advance, their horses those they had taken from the peasantry;
 there was no uniformity, and little obedience, but their shouts and wild
 gestures showed the untamed spirit that inspired them. Our soldiers
 received the word, and advanced to quickest time, but in perfect order:
 their uniform dresses, the gleam of their polished arms, their silence, and
 looks of sullen hate, were more appalling than the savage clamour of our
 innumerous foe. Thus coming nearer and nearer each other, the howls and
 shouts of the Irish increased; the English proceeded in obedience to their
 officers, until they came near enough to distinguish the faces of their
 enemies; the sight inspired them with fury: with one cry, that rent heaven
 and was re-echoed by the furthest lines, they rushed on; they disdained the
 use of the bullet, but with fixed bayonet dashed among the opposing foe,
 while the ranks opening at intervals, the matchmen lighted the cannon,
 whose deafening roar and blinding smoke filled up the horror of the scene. I
 was beside Adrian; a moment before he had again given the word to halt, and
 had remained a few yards distant from us in deep meditation: he was forming
 swiftly his plan of action, to prevent the effusion of blood; the noise of
 cannon, the sudden rush of the troops, and yell of the foe, startled him:
 with flashing eyes he exclaimed, "Not one of these must perish!" and
 plunging the rowels into his horse's sides, he dashed between the
 conflicting bands. We, his staff, followed him to surround and protect him;
 obeying his signal, however, we fell back somewhat. The soldiery perceiving
 him, paused in their onset; he did not swerve from the bullets that passed
 near him, but rode immediately between the opposing lines. Silence
 succeeded to clamour; about fifty men lay on the ground dying or dead.
 Adrian raised his sword in act to speak: "By whose command," he cried,
 addressing his own troops, "do you advance? Who ordered your attack? Fall
 back; these misguided men shall not be slaughtered, while I am your
 general. Sheath your weapons; these are your brothers, commit not
 fratricide; soon the plague will not leave one for you to glut your revenge
 upon: will you be more pitiless than pestilence? As you honour me--as you
 worship God, in whose image those also are created--as your children and
 friends are dear to you,--shed not a drop of precious human blood."
 
 He spoke with outstretched hand and winning voice, and then turning to our
 invaders, with a severe brow, he commanded them to lay down their arms: "Do
 you think," he said, "that because we are wasted by plague, you can
 overcome us; the plague is also among you, and when ye are vanquished by
 famine and disease, the ghosts of those you have murdered will arise to bid
 you not hope in death. Lay down your arms, barbarous and cruel men--men
 whose hands are stained with the blood of the innocent, whose souls are
 weighed down by the orphan's cry! We shall conquer, for the right is on our
 side; already your cheeks are pale--the weapons fall from your nerveless
 grasp. Lay down your arms, fellow men! brethren! Pardon, succour, and
 brotherly love await your repentance. You are dear to us, because you wear
 the frail shape of humanity; each one among you will find a friend and
 host among these forces. Shall man be the enemy of man, while plague, the
 foe to all, even now is above us, triumphing in our butchery, more cruel
 than her own?"
 
 Each army paused. On our side the soldiers grasped their arms firmly, and
 looked with stern glances on the foe. These had not thrown down their
 weapons, more from fear than the spirit of contest; they looked at each
 other, each wishing to follow some example given him,--but they had no
 leader. Adrian threw himself from his horse, and approaching one of those
 just slain: "He was a man," he cried, "and he is dead. O quickly bind up
 the wounds of the fallen--let not one die; let not one more soul escape
 through your merciless gashes, to relate before the throne of God the tale
 of fratricide; bind up their wounds--restore them to their friends. Cast
 away the hearts of tigers that burn in your breasts; throw down those tools
 of cruelty and hate; in this pause of exterminating destiny, let each man
 be brother, guardian, and stay to the other. Away with those blood-stained
 arms, and hasten some of you to bind up these wounds."
 
 As he spoke, he knelt on the ground, and raised in his arms a man from
 whose side the warm tide of life gushed--the poor wretch gasped--so
 still had either host become, that his moans were distinctly heard, and
 every heart, late fiercely bent on universal massacre, now beat anxiously
 in hope and fear for the fate of this one man. Adrian tore off his military
 scarf and bound it round the sufferer--it was too late--the man heaved
 a deep sigh, his head fell back, his limbs lost their sustaining power.--
 "He is dead!" said Adrian, as the corpse fell from his arms on the ground,
 and he bowed his head in sorrow and awe. The fate of the world seemed bound
 up in the death of this single man. On either side the bands threw down
 their arms, even the veterans wept, and our party held out their hands to
 their foes, while a gush of love and deepest amity filled every heart. The
 two forces mingling, unarmed and hand in hand, talking only how each might
 assist the other, the adversaries conjoined; each repenting, the one side
 their former cruelties, the other their late violence, they obeyed the
 orders of the General to proceed towards London.
 
 Adrian was obliged to exert his utmost prudence, first to allay the
 discord, and then to provide for the multitude of the invaders. They were
 marched to various parts of the southern counties, quartered in deserted
 villages,--a part were sent back to their own island, while the season of
 winter so far revived our energy, that the passes of the country were
 defended, and any increase of numbers prohibited.
 
 On this occasion Adrian and Idris met after a separation of nearly a year.
 Adrian had been occupied in fulfilling a laborious and painful task. He had
 been familiar with every species of human misery, and had for ever found
 his powers inadequate, his aid of small avail. Yet the purpose of his soul,
 his energy and ardent resolution, prevented any re-action of sorrow. He
 seemed born anew, and virtue, more potent than Medean alchemy, endued him
 with health and strength. Idris hardly recognized the fragile being, whose
 form had seemed to bend even to the summer breeze, in the energetic man,
 whose very excess of sensibility rendered him more capable of fulfilling
 his station of pilot in storm-tossed England.
 
 It was not thus with Idris. She was uncomplaining; but the very soul of
 fear had taken its seat in her heart. She had grown thin and pale, her eyes
 filled with involuntary tears, her voice was broken and low. She tried to
 throw a veil over the change which she knew her brother must observe in
 her, but the effort was ineffectual; and when alone with him, with a burst
 of irrepressible grief she gave vent to her apprehensions and sorrow. She
 described in vivid terms the ceaseless care that with still renewing hunger
 ate into her soul; she compared this gnawing of sleepless expectation of
 evil, to the vulture that fed on the heart of Prometheus; under the
 influence of this eternal excitement, and of the interminable struggles she
 endured to combat and conceal it, she felt, she said, as if all the wheels
 and springs of the animal machine worked at double rate, and were fast
 consuming themselves. Sleep was not sleep, for her waking thoughts, bridled
 by some remains of reason, and by the sight of her children happy and in
 health, were then transformed to wild dreams, all her terrors were
 realized, all her fears received their dread fulfilment. To this state
 there was no hope, no alleviation, unless the grave should quickly receive
 its destined prey, and she be permitted to die, before she experienced a
 thousand living deaths in the loss of those she loved. Fearing to give me
 pain, she hid as best she could the excess of her wretchedness, but meeting
 thus her brother after a long absence, she could not restrain the
 expression of her woe, but with all the vividness of imagination with which
 misery is always replete, she poured out the emotions of her heart to her
 beloved and sympathizing Adrian.
 
 Her present visit to London tended to augment her state of inquietude, by
 shewing in its utmost extent the ravages occasioned by pestilence. It
 hardly preserved the appearance of an inhabited city; grass sprung up thick
 in the streets; the squares were weed-grown, the houses were shut up, while
 silence and loneliness characterized the busiest parts of the town. Yet in
 the midst of desolation Adrian had preserved order; and each one continued
 to live according to law and custom--human institutions thus surviving as
 it were divine ones, and while the decree of population was abrogated,
 property continued sacred. It was a melancholy reflection; and in spite of
 the diminution of evil produced, it struck on the heart as a wretched
 mockery. All idea of resort for pleasure, of theatres and festivals had
 passed away. "Next summer," said Adrian as we parted on our return to
 Windsor, "will decide the fate of the human race. I shall not pause in
 my exertions until that time; but, if plague revives with the coming year,
 all contest with her must cease, and our only occupation be the choice of
 a grave."
 
 I must not forget one incident that occurred during this visit to London.
 The visits of Merrival to Windsor, before frequent, had suddenly ceased. At
 this time where but a hair's line separated the living from the dead, I
 feared that our friend had become a victim to the all-embracing evil. On
 this occasion I went, dreading the worst, to his dwelling, to see if I
 could be of any service to those of his family who might have survived. The
 house was deserted, and had been one of those assigned to the invading
 strangers quartered in London. I saw his astronomical instruments put to
 strange uses, his globes defaced, his papers covered with abstruse
 calculations destroyed. The neighbours could tell me little, till I lighted
 on a poor woman who acted as nurse in these perilous times. She told me
 that all the family were dead, except Merrival himself, who had gone mad--
 mad, she called it, yet on questioning her further, it appeared that he was
 possessed only by the delirium of excessive grief. This old man, tottering
 on the edge of the grave, and prolonging his prospect through millions of
 calculated years,--this visionary who had not seen starvation in the
 wasted forms of his wife and children, or plague in the horrible sights and
 sounds that surrounded him--this astronomer, apparently dead on earth,
 and living only in the motion of the spheres--loved his family with
 unapparent but intense affection. Through long habit they had become a part
 of himself; his want of worldly knowledge, his absence of mind and infant
 guilelessness, made him utterly dependent on them. It was not till one of
 them died that he perceived their danger; one by one they were carried off
 by pestilence; and his wife, his helpmate and supporter, more necessary to
 him than his own limbs and frame, which had hardly been taught the lesson
 of self-preservation, the kind companion whose voice always spoke peace to
 him, closed her eyes in death. The old man felt the system of universal
 nature which he had so long studied and adored, slide from under him, and
 he stood among the dead, and lifted his voice in curses.--No wonder that
 the attendant should interpret as phrensy the harrowing maledictions of the
 grief-struck old man.
 
 I had commenced my search late in the day, a November day, that closed in
 early with pattering rain and melancholy wind. As I turned from the door, I
 saw Merrival, or rather the shadow of Merrival, attenuated and wild, pass
 me, and sit on the steps of his home. The breeze scattered the grey locks
 on his temples, the rain drenched his uncovered head, he sat hiding his
 face in his withered hands. I pressed his shoulder to awaken his attention,
 but he did not alter his position. "Merrival," I said, "it is long since we
 have seen you--you must return to Windsor with me--Lady Idris desires
 to see you, you will not refuse her request--come home with me."
 
 He replied in a hollow voice, "Why deceive a helpless old man, why talk
 hypocritically to one half crazed? Windsor is not my home; my true home I
 have found; the home that the Creator has prepared for me."
 
 His accent of bitter scorn thrilled me--"Do not tempt me to speak," he
 continued, "my words would scare you--in an universe of cowards I dare
 think--among the church-yard tombs--among the victims of His merciless
 tyranny I dare reproach the Supreme Evil. How can he punish me? Let him
 bare his arm and transfix me with lightning--this is also one of his
 attributes"--and the old man laughed.
 
 He rose, and I followed him through the rain to a neighbouring church-yard
 --he threw himself on the wet earth. "Here they are," he cried, "beautiful
 creatures--breathing, speaking, loving creatures. She who by day and
 night cherished the age-worn lover of her youth--they, parts of my flesh,
 my children--here they are: call them, scream their names through the
 night; they will not answer!" He clung to the little heaps that marked the
 graves. "I ask but one thing; I do not fear His hell, for I have it here; I
 do not desire His heaven, let me but die and be laid beside them; let me
 but, when I lie dead, feel my flesh as it moulders, mingle with theirs.
 Promise," and he raised himself painfully, and seized my arm, "promise to
 bury me with them."
 
 "So God help me and mine as I promise," I replied, "on one condition:
 return with me to Windsor."
 
 "To Windsor!" he cried with a shriek, "Never!--from this place I never go
 --my bones, my flesh, I myself, are already buried here, and what you see
 of me is corrupted clay like them. I will lie here, and cling here, till
 rain, and hail, and lightning and storm, ruining on me, make me one in
 substance with them below."
 
 In a few words I must conclude this tragedy. I was obliged to leave London,
 and Adrian undertook to watch over him; the task was soon fulfilled; age,
 grief, and inclement weather, all united to hush his sorrows, and bring
 repose to his heart, whose beats were agony. He died embracing the sod,
 which was piled above his breast, when he was placed beside the beings whom
 he regretted with such wild despair.
 
 I returned to Windsor at the wish of Idris, who seemed to think that there
 was greater safety for her children at that spot; and because, once having
 taken on me the guardianship of the district, I would not desert it while
 an inhabitant survived. I went also to act in conformity with Adrian's
 plans, which was to congregate in masses what remained of the population;
 for he possessed the conviction that it was only through the benevolent and
 social virtues that any safety was to be hoped for the remnant of mankind.
 
 It was a melancholy thing to return to this spot so dear to us, as the
 scene of a happiness rarely before enjoyed, here to mark the extinction of
 our species, and trace the deep uneraseable footsteps of disease over the
 fertile and cherished soil. The aspect of the country had so far changed,
 that it had been impossible to enter on the task of sowing seed, and other
 autumnal labours. That season was now gone; and winter had set in with
 sudden and unusual severity. Alternate frosts and thaws succeeding to
 floods, rendered the country impassable. Heavy falls of snow gave an arctic
 appearance to the scenery; the roofs of the houses peeped from the white
 mass; the lowly cot and stately mansion, alike deserted, were blocked up,
 their thresholds uncleared; the windows were broken by the hail, while the
 prevalence of a north-east wind rendered out-door exertions extremely
 painful. The altered state of society made these accidents of nature,
 sources of real misery. The luxury of command and the attentions of
 servitude were lost. It is true that the necessaries of life were assembled
 in such quantities, as to supply to superfluity the wants of the diminished
 population; but still much labour was required to arrange these, as it
 were, raw materials; and depressed by sickness, and fearful of the future,
 we had not energy to enter boldly and decidedly on any system.
 
 I can speak for myself--want of energy was not my failing. The intense
 life that quickened my pulses, and animated my frame, had the effect, not
 of drawing me into the mazes of active life, but of exalting my lowliness,
 and of bestowing majestic proportions on insignificant objects--I could
 have lived the life of a peasant in the same way--my trifling occupations
 were swelled into important pursuits; my affections were impetuous and
 engrossing passions, and nature with all her changes was invested in divine
 attributes. The very spirit of the Greek mythology inhabited my heart; I
 deified the uplands, glades, and streams, I
 
   Had sight of Proteus coming from the sea;
   And heard old Triton blow his wreathed horn.[1]
 
 Strange, that while the earth preserved her monotonous course, I dwelt with
 ever-renewing wonder on her antique laws, and now that with excentric wheel
 she rushed into an untried path, I should feel this spirit fade; I
 struggled with despondency and weariness, but like a fog, they choked me.
 Perhaps, after the labours and stupendous excitement of the past summer,
 the calm of winter and the almost menial toils it brought with it, were by
 natural re-action doubly irksome. It was not the grasping passion of the
 preceding year, which gave life and individuality to each moment--it was
 not the aching pangs induced by the distresses of the times. The utter
 inutility that had attended all my exertions took from them their usual
 effects of exhilaration, and despair rendered abortive the balm of self
 applause--I longed to return to my old occupations, but of what use were
 they? To read were futile--to write, vanity indeed. The earth, late wide
 circus for the display of dignified exploits, vast theatre for a
 magnificent drama, now presented a vacant space, an empty stage--for
 actor or spectator there was no longer aught to say or hear.
 
 Our little town of Windsor, in which the survivors from the neighbouring
 counties were chiefly assembled, wore a melancholy aspect. Its streets were
 blocked up with snow--the few passengers seemed palsied, and frozen by
 the ungenial visitation of winter. To escape these evils was the aim and
 scope of all our exertions. Families late devoted to exalting and refined
 pursuits, rich, blooming, and young, with diminished numbers and
 care-fraught hearts, huddled over a fire, grown selfish and grovelling
 through suffering. Without the aid of servants, it was necessary to
 discharge all household duties; hands unused to such labour must knead the
 bread, or in the absence of flour, the statesmen or perfumed courtier must
 undertake the butcher's office. Poor and rich were now equal, or rather the
 poor were the superior, since they entered on such tasks with alacrity and
 experience; while ignorance, inaptitude, and habits of repose, rendered
 them fatiguing to the luxurious, galling to the proud, disgustful to all
 whose minds, bent on intellectual improvement, held it their dearest
 privilege to be exempt from attending to mere animal wants.
 
 But in every change goodness and affection can find field for exertion and
 display. Among some these changes produced a devotion and sacrifice of self
 at once graceful and heroic. It was a sight for the lovers of the human
 race to enjoy; to behold, as in ancient times, the patriarchal modes in
 which the variety of kindred and friendship fulfilled their duteous and
 kindly offices. Youths, nobles of the land, performed for the sake of
 mother or sister, the services of menials with amiable cheerfulness. They
 went to the river to break the ice, and draw water: they assembled on
 foraging expeditions, or axe in hand felled the trees for fuel. The females
 received them on their return with the simple and affectionate welcome
 known before only to the lowly cottage--a clean hearth and bright fire;
 the supper ready cooked by beloved hands; gratitude for the provision for
 to-morrow's meal: strange enjoyments for the high-born English, yet they
 were now their sole, hard earned, and dearly prized luxuries.
 
 None was more conspicuous for this graceful submission to circumstances,
 noble humility, and ingenious fancy to adorn such acts with romantic
 colouring, than our own Clara. She saw my despondency, and the aching cares
 of Idris. Her perpetual study was to relieve us from labour and to spread
 ease and even elegance over our altered mode of life. We still had some
 attendants spared by disease, and warmly attached to us. But Clara was
 jealous of their services; she would be sole handmaid of Idris, sole
 minister to the wants of her little cousins; nothing gave her so much
 pleasure as our employing her in this way; she went beyond our desires,
 earnest, diligent, and unwearied,--
 
   Abra was ready ere we called her name,
   And though we called another, Abra came.[2]
 
 It was my task each day to visit the various families assembled in our
 town, and when the weather permitted, I was glad to prolong my ride, and to
 muse in solitude over every changeful appearance of our destiny,
 endeavouring to gather lessons for the future from the experience of the
 past. The impatience with which, while in society, the ills that afflicted
 my species inspired me, were softened by loneliness, when individual
 suffering was merged in the general calamity, strange to say, less
 afflicting to contemplate. Thus often, pushing my way with difficulty
 through the narrow snow-blocked town, I crossed the bridge and passed
 through Eton. No youthful congregation of gallant-hearted boys thronged the
 portal of the college; sad silence pervaded the busy school-room and noisy
 playground. I extended my ride towards Salt Hill, on every side impeded by
 the snow. Were those the fertile fields I loved--was that the interchange
 of gentle upland and cultivated dale, once covered with waving corn,
 diversified by stately trees, watered by the meandering Thames? One sheet
 of white covered it, while bitter recollection told me that cold as the
 winter-clothed earth, were the hearts of the inhabitants. I met troops of
 horses, herds of cattle, flocks of sheep, wandering at will; here throwing
 down a hay-rick, and nestling from cold in its heart, which afforded them
 shelter and food--there having taken possession of a vacant cottage. Once
 on a frosty day, pushed on by restless unsatisfying reflections, I sought a
 favourite haunt, a little wood not far distant from Salt Hill. A bubbling
 spring prattles over stones on one side, and a plantation of a few elms and
 beeches, hardly deserve, and yet continue the name of wood. This spot had
 for me peculiar charms. It had been a favourite resort of Adrian; it was
 secluded; and he often said that in boyhood, his happiest hours were spent
 here; having escaped the stately bondage of his mother, he sat on the rough
 hewn steps that led to the spring, now reading a favourite book, now
 musing, with speculation beyond his years, on the still unravelled skein of
 morals or metaphysics. A melancholy foreboding assured me that I should
 never see this place more; so with careful thought, I noted each tree,
 every winding of the streamlet and irregularity of the soil, that I might
 better call up its idea in absence. A robin red-breast dropt from the
 frosty branches of the trees, upon the congealed rivulet; its panting
 breast and half-closed eyes shewed that it was dying: a hawk appeared in
 the air; sudden fear seized the little creature; it exerted its last
 strength, throwing itself on its back, raising its talons in impotent
 defence against its powerful enemy. I took it up and placed it in my
 breast. I fed it with a few crumbs from a biscuit; by degrees it revived;
 its warm fluttering heart beat against me; I cannot tell why I detail this
 trifling incident--but the scene is still before me; the snow-clad fields
 seen through the silvered trunks of the beeches,--the brook, in days of
 happiness alive with sparkling waters, now choked by ice--the leafless
 trees fantastically dressed in hoar frost--the shapes of summer leaves
 imaged by winter's frozen hand on the hard ground--the dusky sky, drear
 cold, and unbroken silence--while close in my bosom, my feathered
 nursling lay warm, and safe, speaking its content with a light chirp--
 painful reflections thronged, stirring my brain with wild commotion--cold
 and death-like as the snowy fields was all earth--misery-stricken the
 life-tide of the inhabitants--why should I oppose the cataract of
 destruction that swept us away?--why string my nerves and renew my
 wearied efforts--ah, why? But that my firm courage and cheerful exertions
 might shelter the dear mate, whom I chose in the spring of my life; though
 the throbbings of my heart be replete with pain, though my hopes for the
 future are chill, still while your dear head, my gentlest love, can repose
 in peace on that heart, and while you derive from its fostering care,
 comfort, and hope, my struggles shall not cease,--I will not call myself
 altogether vanquished.
 
 One fine February day, when the sun had reassumed some of its genial power,
 I walked in the forest with my family. It was one of those lovely
 winter-days which assert the capacity of nature to bestow beauty on
 barrenness. The leafless trees spread their fibrous branches against the
 pure sky; their intricate and pervious tracery resembled delicate sea-weed;
 the deer were turning up the snow in search of the hidden grass; the white
 was made intensely dazzling by the sun, and trunks of the trees, rendered
 more conspicuous by the loss of preponderating foliage, gathered around
 like the labyrinthine columns of a vast temple; it was impossible not to
 receive pleasure from the sight of these things. Our children, freed from
 the bondage of winter, bounded before us; pursuing the deer, or rousing the
 pheasants and partridges from their coverts. Idris leant on my arm; her
 sadness yielded to the present sense of pleasure. We met other families on
 the Long Walk, enjoying like ourselves the return of the genial season. At
 once, I seemed to awake; I cast off the clinging sloth of the past months;
 earth assumed a new appearance, and my view of the future was suddenly made
 clear. I exclaimed, "I have now found out the secret!"
 
 "What secret?"
 
 In answer to this question, I described our gloomy winter-life, our sordid
 cares, our menial labours:--"This northern country," I said, "is no place
 for our diminished race. When mankind were few, it was not here that they
 battled with the powerful agents of nature, and were enabled to cover the
 globe with offspring. We must seek some natural Paradise, some garden of
 the earth, where our simple wants may be easily supplied, and the enjoyment
 of a delicious climate compensate for the social pleasures we have lost. If
 we survive this coming summer, I will not spend the ensuing winter in
 England; neither I nor any of us."
 
 I spoke without much heed, and the very conclusion of what I said brought
 with it other thoughts. Should we, any of us, survive the coming summer? I
 saw the brow of Idris clouded; I again felt, that we were enchained to the
 car of fate, over whose coursers we had no control. We could no longer say,
 This we will do, and this we will leave undone. A mightier power than the
 human was at hand to destroy our plans or to achieve the work we avoided.
 It were madness to calculate upon another winter. This was our last. The
 coming summer was the extreme end of our vista; and, when we arrived there,
 instead of a continuation of the long road, a gulph yawned, into which we
 must of force be precipitated. The last blessing of humanity was wrested
 from us; we might no longer hope. Can the madman, as he clanks his chains,
 hope? Can the wretch, led to the scaffold, who when he lays his head on the
 block, marks the double shadow of himself and the executioner, whose
 uplifted arm bears the axe, hope? Can the ship-wrecked mariner, who spent
 with swimming, hears close behind the splashing waters divided by a shark
 which pursues him through the Atlantic, hope? Such hope as theirs, we also
 may entertain!
 
 Old fable tells us, that this gentle spirit sprung from the box of Pandora,
 else crammed with evils; but these were unseen and null, while all admired
 the inspiriting loveliness of young Hope; each man's heart became her home;
 she was enthroned sovereign of our lives, here and here-after; she was
 deified and worshipped, declared incorruptible and everlasting. But like
 all other gifts of the Creator to Man, she is mortal; her life has attained
 its last hour. We have watched over her; nursed her flickering existence;
 now she has fallen at once from youth to decrepitude, from health to
 immedicinable disease; even as we spend ourselves in struggles for her
 recovery, she dies; to all nations the voice goes forth, Hope is dead! We
 are but mourners in the funeral train, and what immortal essence or
 perishable creation will refuse to make one in the sad procession that
 attends to its grave the dead comforter of humanity?
 
   Does not the sun call in his light? and day
   Like a thin exhalation melt away--
   Both wrapping up their beams in clouds to be
   Themselves close mourners at this obsequie.[3]
 
 [1] Wordsworth.
 [2] Prior's "Solomon."
 [3] Cleveland's Poems.
 
 
 
 
 VOL. III.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 HEAR YOU not the rushing sound of the coming tempest? Do you not behold the
 clouds open, and destruction lurid and dire pour down on the blasted earth?
 See you not the thunderbolt fall, and are deafened by the shout of heaven
 that follows its descent? Feel you not the earth quake and open with
 agonizing groans, while the air is pregnant with shrieks and wailings,--
 all announcing the last days of man? No! none of these things accompanied
 our fall! The balmy air of spring, breathed from nature's ambrosial home,
 invested the lovely earth, which wakened as a young mother about to lead
 forth in pride her beauteous offspring to meet their sire who had been long
 absent. The buds decked the trees, the flowers adorned the land: the dark
 branches, swollen with seasonable juices, expanded into leaves, and the
 variegated foliage of spring, bending and singing in the breeze, rejoiced
 in the genial warmth of the unclouded empyrean: the brooks flowed
 murmuring, the sea was waveless, and the promontories that over-hung it
 were reflected in the placid waters; birds awoke in the woods, while
 abundant food for man and beast sprung up from the dark ground. Where was
 pain and evil? Not in the calm air or weltering ocean; not in the woods or
 fertile fields, nor among the birds that made the woods resonant with song,
 nor the animals that in the midst of plenty basked in the sunshine. Our
 enemy, like the Calamity of Homer, trod our hearts, and no sound was echoed
 from her steps--
 
   With ills the land is rife, with ills the sea,
   Diseases haunt our frail humanity,
   Through noon, through night, on casual wing they glide,
   Silent,--a voice the power all-wise denied.[1]
 
 Once man was a favourite of the Creator, as the royal psalmist sang, "God
 had made him a little lower than the angels, and had crowned him with glory
 and honour. God made him to have dominion over the works of his hands, and
 put all things under his feet." Once it was so; now is man lord of the
 creation? Look at him--ha! I see plague! She has invested his form, is
 incarnate in his flesh, has entwined herself with his being, and blinds his
 heaven-seeking eyes. Lie down, O man, on the flower-strown earth; give up
 all claim to your inheritance, all you can ever possess of it is the small
 cell which the dead require. Plague is the companion of spring, of sunshine,
 and plenty. We no longer struggle with her. We have forgotten what we did
 when she was not. Of old navies used to stem the giant ocean-waves betwixt
 Indus and the Pole for slight articles of luxury. Men made perilous
 journies to possess themselves of earth's splendid trifles, gems and gold.
 Human labour was wasted--human life set at nought. Now life is all that
 we covet; that this automaton of flesh should, with joints and springs in
 order, perform its functions, that this dwelling of the soul should be
 capable of containing its dweller. Our minds, late spread abroad through
 countless spheres and endless combinations of thought, now retrenched
 themselves behind this wall of flesh, eager to preserve its well-being
 only. We were surely sufficiently degraded.
 
 At first the increase of sickness in spring brought increase of toil to
 such of us, who, as yet spared to life, bestowed our time and thoughts on
 our fellow creatures. We nerved ourselves to the task: "in the midst of
 despair we performed the tasks of hope." We went out with the resolution of
 disputing with our foe. We aided the sick, and comforted the sorrowing;
 turning from the multitudinous dead to the rare survivors, with an energy
 of desire that bore the resemblance of power, we bade them--live. Plague
 sat paramount the while, and laughed us to scorn.
 
 Have any of you, my readers, observed the ruins of an anthill immediately
 after its destruction? At first it appears entirely deserted of its former
 inhabitants; in a little time you see an ant struggling through the
 upturned mould; they reappear by twos and threes, running hither and
 thither in search of their lost companions. Such were we upon earth,
 wondering aghast at the effects of pestilence. Our empty habitations
 remained, but the dwellers were gathered to the shades of the tomb.
 
 As the rules of order and pressure of laws were lost, some began with
 hesitation and wonder to transgress the accustomed uses of society. Palaces
 were deserted, and the poor man dared at length, unreproved, intrude into
 the splendid apartments, whose very furniture and decorations were an
 unknown world to him. It was found, that, though at first the stop put
 to all circulation of property, had reduced those before supported by the
 factitious wants of society to sudden and hideous poverty, yet when the
 boundaries of private possession were thrown down, the products of human
 labour at present existing were more, far more, than the thinned generation
 could possibly consume. To some among the poor this was matter of
 exultation. We were all equal now; magnificent dwellings, luxurious
 carpets, and beds of down, were afforded to all. Carriages and horses,
 gardens, pictures, statues, and princely libraries, there were enough of
 these even to superfluity; and there was nothing to prevent each from
 assuming possession of his share. We were all equal now; but near at hand
 was an equality still more levelling, a state where beauty and strength,
 and wisdom, would be as vain as riches and birth. The grave yawned beneath
 us all, and its prospect prevented any of us from enjoying the ease and
 plenty which in so awful a manner was presented to us.
 
 Still the bloom did not fade on the cheeks of my babes; and Clara sprung up
 in years and growth, unsullied by disease. We had no reason to think the
 site of Windsor Castle peculiarly healthy, for many other families had
 expired beneath its roof; we lived therefore without any particular
 precaution; but we lived, it seemed, in safety. If Idris became thin and
 pale, it was anxiety that occasioned the change; an anxiety I could in no
 way alleviate. She never complained, but sleep and appetite fled from her,
 a slow fever preyed on her veins, her colour was hectic, and she often wept
 in secret; gloomy prognostications, care, and agonizing dread, ate up the
 principle of life within her. I could not fail to perceive this change. I
 often wished that I had permitted her to take her own course, and engage
 herself in such labours for the welfare of others as might have distracted
 her thoughts. But it was too late now. Besides that, with the nearly
 extinct race of man, all our toils grew near a conclusion, she was too
 weak; consumption, if so it might be called, or rather the over active life
 within her, which, as with Adrian, spent the vital oil in the early morning
 hours, deprived her limbs of strength. At night, when she could leave me
 unperceived, she wandered through the house, or hung over the couches of
 her children; and in the day time would sink into a perturbed sleep, while
 her murmurs and starts betrayed the unquiet dreams that vexed her. As this
 state of wretchedness became more confirmed, and, in spite of her
 endeavours at concealment more apparent, I strove, though vainly, to awaken
 in her courage and hope. I could not wonder at the vehemence of her care;
 her very soul was tenderness; she trusted indeed that she should not
 outlive me if I became the prey of the vast calamity, and this thought
 sometimes relieved her. We had for many years trod the highway of life hand
 in hand, and still thus linked, we might step within the shades of death;
 but her children, her lovely, playful, animated children--beings sprung
 from her own dear side--portions of her own being--depositories of our
 loves--even if we died, it would be comfort to know that they ran man's
 accustomed course. But it would not be so; young and blooming as they were,
 they would die, and from the hopes of maturity, from the proud name of
 attained manhood, they were cut off for ever. Often with maternal affection
 she had figured their merits and talents exerted on life's wide stage. Alas
 for these latter days! The world had grown old, and all its inmates partook
 of the decrepitude. Why talk of infancy, manhood, and old age? We all stood
 equal sharers of the last throes of time-worn nature. Arrived at the same
 point of the world's age--there was no difference in us; the name of
 parent and child had lost their meaning; young boys and girls were level
 now with men. This was all true; but it was not less agonizing to take the
 admonition home.
 
 Where could we turn, and not find a desolation pregnant with the dire
 lesson of example? The fields had been left uncultivated, weeds and gaudy
 flowers sprung up,--or where a few wheat-fields shewed signs of the
 living hopes of the husbandman, the work had been left halfway, the
 ploughman had died beside the plough; the horses had deserted the furrow,
 and no seedsman had approached the dead; the cattle unattended wandered
 over the fields and through the lanes; the tame inhabitants of the poultry
 yard, baulked of their daily food, had become wild--young lambs were
 dropt in flower-gardens, and the cow stalled in the hall of pleasure.
 Sickly and few, the country people neither went out to sow nor reap; but
 sauntered about the meadows, or lay under the hedges, when the inclement
 sky did not drive them to take shelter under the nearest roof. Many of
 those who remained, secluded themselves; some had laid up stores which
 should prevent the necessity of leaving their homes;--some deserted wife
 and child, and imagined that they secured their safety in utter solitude.
 Such had been Ryland's plan, and he was discovered dead and half-devoured
 by insects, in a house many miles from any other, with piles of food laid
 up in useless superfluity. Others made long journies to unite themselves to
 those they loved, and arrived to find them dead.
 
 London did not contain above a thousand inhabitants; and this number was
 continually diminishing. Most of them were country people, come up for the
 sake of change; the Londoners had sought the country. The busy eastern part
 of the town was silent, or at most you saw only where, half from cupidity,
 half from curiosity, the warehouses had been more ransacked than pillaged:
 bales of rich India goods, shawls of price, jewels, and spices, unpacked,
 strewed the floors. In some places the possessor had to the last kept watch
 on his store, and died before the barred gates. The massy portals of the
 churches swung creaking on their hinges; and some few lay dead on the
 pavement. The wretched female, loveless victim of vulgar brutality, had
 wandered to the toilet of high-born beauty, and, arraying herself in the
 garb of splendour, had died before the mirror which reflected to herself
 alone her altered appearance. Women whose delicate feet had seldom touched
 the earth in their luxury, had fled in fright and horror from their homes,
 till, losing themselves in the squalid streets of the metropolis, they had
 died on the threshold of poverty. The heart sickened at the variety of
 misery presented; and, when I saw a specimen of this gloomy change, my soul
 ached with the fear of what might befall my beloved Idris and my babes.
 Were they, surviving Adrian and myself, to find themselves protectorless in
 the world? As yet the mind alone had suffered--could I for ever put off
 the time, when the delicate frame and shrinking nerves of my child of
 prosperity, the nursling of rank and wealth, who was my companion, should
 be invaded by famine, hardship, and disease? Better die at once--better
 plunge a poinard in her bosom, still untouched by drear adversity, and then
 again sheathe it in my own! But, no; in times of misery we must fight
 against our destinies, and strive not to be overcome by them. I would not
 yield, but to the last gasp resolutely defended my dear ones against sorrow
 and pain; and if I were vanquished at last, it should not be ingloriously.
 I stood in the gap, resisting the enemy--the impalpable, invisible foe,
 who had so long besieged us--as yet he had made no breach: it must be my
 care that he should not, secretly undermining, burst up within the very
 threshold of the temple of love, at whose altar I daily sacrificed. The
 hunger of Death was now stung more sharply by the diminution of his food:
 or was it that before, the survivors being many, the dead were less eagerly
 counted? Now each life was a gem, each human breathing form of far, O! far
 more worth than subtlest imagery of sculptured stone; and the daily, nay,
 hourly decrease visible in our numbers, visited the heart with sickening
 misery. This summer extinguished our hopes, the vessel of society was
 wrecked, and the shattered raft, which carried the few survivors over the
 sea of misery, was riven and tempest tost. Man existed by twos and threes;
 man, the individual who might sleep, and wake, and perform the animal
 functions; but man, in himself weak, yet more powerful in congregated
 numbers than wind or ocean; man, the queller of the elements, the lord of
 created nature, the peer of demi-gods, existed no longer.
 
 Farewell to the patriotic scene, to the love of liberty and well earned
 meed of virtuous aspiration!--farewell to crowded senate, vocal with the
 councils of the wise, whose laws were keener than the sword blade tempered
 at Damascus!--farewell to kingly pomp and warlike pageantry; the crowns
 are in the dust, and the wearers are in their graves!--farewell to the
 desire of rule, and the hope of victory; to high vaulting ambition, to the
 appetite for praise, and the craving for the suffrage of their fellows! The
 nations are no longer! No senate sits in council for the dead; no scion of
 a time honoured dynasty pants to rule over the inhabitants of a charnel
 house; the general's hand is cold, and the soldier has his untimely grave
 dug in his native fields, unhonoured, though in youth. The market-place is
 empty, the candidate for popular favour finds none whom he can represent.
 To chambers of painted state farewell!--To midnight revelry, and the
 panting emulation of beauty, to costly dress and birth-day shew, to title
 and the gilded coronet, farewell!
 
 Farewell to the giant powers of man,--to knowledge that could pilot the
 deep-drawing bark through the opposing waters of shoreless ocean,--to
 science that directed the silken balloon through the pathless air,--to
 the power that could put a barrier to mighty waters, and set in motion
 wheels, and beams, and vast machinery, that could divide rocks of granite
 or marble, and make the mountains plain!
 
 Farewell to the arts,--to eloquence, which is to the human mind as the
 winds to the sea, stirring, and then allaying it;--farewell to poetry and
 deep philosophy, for man's imagination is cold, and his enquiring mind can
 no longer expatiate on the wonders of life, for "there is no work, nor
 device, nor knowledge, nor wisdom in the grave, whither thou goest!"--to
 the graceful building, which in its perfect proportion transcended the rude
 forms of nature, the fretted gothic and massy saracenic pile, to the
 stupendous arch and glorious dome, the fluted column with its capital,
 Corinthian, Ionic, or Doric, the peristyle and fair entablature, whose
 harmony of form is to the eye as musical concord to the ear!--farewell to
 sculpture, where the pure marble mocks human flesh, and in the plastic
 expression of the culled excellencies of the human shape, shines forth the
 god!--farewell to painting, the high wrought sentiment and deep knowledge
 of the artists's mind in pictured canvas--to paradisaical scenes, where
 trees are ever vernal, and the ambrosial air rests in perpetual glow:--to
 the stamped form of tempest, and wildest uproar of universal nature encaged
 in the narrow frame, O farewell! Farewell to music, and the sound of song;
 to the marriage of instruments, where the concord of soft and harsh unites
 in sweet harmony, and gives wings to the panting listeners, whereby to
 climb heaven, and learn the hidden pleasures of the eternals!--Farewell
 to the well-trod stage; a truer tragedy is enacted on the world's ample
 scene, that puts to shame mimic grief: to high-bred comedy, and the low
 buffoon, farewell!--Man may laugh no more. Alas! to enumerate the
 adornments of humanity, shews, by what we have lost, how supremely great
 man was. It is all over now. He is solitary; like our first parents
 expelled from Paradise, he looks back towards the scene he has quitted. The
 high walls of the tomb, and the flaming sword of plague, lie between it and
 him. Like to our first parents, the whole earth is before him, a wide
 desart. Unsupported and weak, let him wander through fields where the
 unreaped corn stands in barren plenty, through copses planted by his
 fathers, through towns built for his use. Posterity is no more; fame, and
 ambition, and love, are words void of meaning; even as the cattle that
 grazes in the field, do thou, O deserted one, lie down at evening-tide,
 unknowing of the past, careless of the future, for from such fond ignorance
 alone canst thou hope for ease!
 
 Joy paints with its own colours every act and thought. The happy do not
 feel poverty--for delight is as a gold-tissued robe, and crowns them with
 priceless gems. Enjoyment plays the cook to their homely fare, and mingles
 intoxication with their simple drink. Joy strews the hard couch with roses,
 and makes labour ease.
 
 Sorrow doubles the burthen to the bent-down back; plants thorns in the
 unyielding pillow; mingles gall with water; adds saltness to their bitter
 bread; cloathing them in rags, and strewing ashes on their bare heads. To
 our irremediable distress every small and pelting inconvenience came with
 added force; we had strung our frames to endure the Atlean weight thrown on
 us; we sank beneath the added feather chance threw on us, "the grasshopper
 was a burthen." Many of the survivors had been bred in luxury--their
 servants were gone, their powers of command vanished like unreal shadows:
 the poor even suffered various privations; and the idea of another winter
 like the last, brought affright to our minds. Was it not enough that we
 must die, but toil must be added?--must we prepare our funeral repast
 with labour, and with unseemly drudgery heap fuel on our deserted hearths
 --must we with servile hands fabricate the garments, soon to be our
 shroud?
 
 Not so! We are presently to die, let us then enjoy to its full relish the
 remnant of our lives. Sordid care, avaunt! menial labours, and pains,
 slight in themselves, but too gigantic for our exhausted strength, shall
 make no part of our ephemeral existences. In the beginning of time, when,
 as now, man lived by families, and not by tribes or nations, they were
 placed in a genial clime, where earth fed them untilled, and the balmy air
 enwrapt their reposing limbs with warmth more pleasant than beds of down.
 The south is the native place of the human race; the land of fruits, more
 grateful to man than the hard-earned Ceres of the north,--of trees, whose
 boughs are as a palace-roof, of couches of roses, and of the
 thirst-appeasing grape. We need not there fear cold and hunger.
 
 Look at England! the grass shoots up high in the meadows; but they are dank
 and cold, unfit bed for us. Corn we have none, and the crude fruits cannot
 support us. We must seek firing in the bowels of the earth, or the unkind
 atmosphere will fill us with rheums and aches. The labour of hundreds of
 thousands alone could make this inclement nook fit habitation for one man.
 To the south then, to the sun!--where nature is kind, where Jove has
 showered forth the contents of Amalthea's horn, and earth is garden.
 
 England, late birth-place of excellence and school of the wise, thy
 children are gone, thy glory faded! Thou, England, wert the triumph of man!
 Small favour was shewn thee by thy Creator, thou Isle of the North; a
 ragged canvas naturally, painted by man with alien colours; but the hues he
 gave are faded, never more to be renewed. So we must leave thee, thou
 marvel of the world; we must bid farewell to thy clouds, and cold, and
 scarcity for ever! Thy manly hearts are still; thy tale of power and
 liberty at its close! Bereft of man, O little isle! the ocean waves will
 buffet thee, and the raven flap his wings over thee; thy soil will be
 birth-place of weeds, thy sky will canopy barrenness. It was not for the
 rose of Persia thou wert famous, nor the banana of the east; not for the
 spicy gales of India, nor the sugar groves of America; not for thy vines
 nor thy double harvests, nor for thy vernal airs, nor solstitial sun--but
 for thy children, their unwearied industry and lofty aspiration. They are
 gone, and thou goest with them the oft trodden path that leads to oblivion,
 --
 
   Farewell, sad Isle, farewell, thy fatal glory
   Is summed, cast up, and cancelled in this story.[2]
 
 [1] Elton's translation of Hesiod.
 [2] Cleveland's Poems.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 IN the autumn of this year 2096, the spirit of emigration crept in among
 the few survivors, who, congregating from various parts of England, met in
 London. This spirit existed as a breath, a wish, a far off thought, until
 communicated to Adrian, who imbibed it with ardour, and instantly engaged
 himself in plans for its execution. The fear of immediate death vanished
 with the heats of September. Another winter was before us, and we might
 elect our mode of passing it to the best advantage. Perhaps in rational
 philosophy none could be better chosen than this scheme of migration, which
 would draw us from the immediate scene of our woe, and, leading us through
 pleasant and picturesque countries, amuse for a time our despair. The idea
 once broached, all were impatient to put it in execution.
 
 We were still at Windsor; our renewed hopes medicined the anguish we had
 suffered from the late tragedies. The death of many of our inmates had
 weaned us from the fond idea, that Windsor Castle was a spot sacred from
 the plague; but our lease of life was renewed for some months, and even
 Idris lifted her head, as a lily after a storm, when a last sunbeam tinges
 its silver cup. Just at this time Adrian came down to us; his eager looks
 shewed us that he was full of some scheme. He hastened to take me aside,
 and disclosed to me with rapidity his plan of emigration from England.
 
 To leave England for ever! to turn from its polluted fields and groves,
 and, placing the sea between us, to quit it, as a sailor quits the rock on
 which he has been wrecked, when the saving ship rides by. Such was his
 plan.
 
 To leave the country of our fathers, made holy by their graves!--We could
 not feel even as a voluntary exile of old, who might for pleasure or
 convenience forsake his native soil; though thousands of miles might divide
 him, England was still a part of him, as he of her. He heard of the passing
 events of the day; he knew that, if he returned, and resumed his place in
 society, the entrance was still open, and it required but the will, to
 surround himself at once with the associations and habits of boyhood. Not
 so with us, the remnant. We left none to represent us, none to repeople the
 desart land, and the name of England died, when we left her,
 
   In vagabond pursuit of dreadful safety.
 
 Yet let us go! England is in her shroud,--we may not enchain ourselves to
 a corpse. Let us go--the world is our country now, and we will choose for
 our residence its most fertile spot. Shall we, in these desart halls, under
 this wintry sky, sit with closed eyes and folded hands, expecting death?
 Let us rather go out to meet it gallantly: or perhaps--for all this
 pendulous orb, this fair gem in the sky's diadem, is not surely
 plague-striken--perhaps, in some secluded nook, amidst eternal spring,
 and waving trees, and purling streams, we may find Life. The world is vast,
 and England, though her many fields and wide spread woods seem
 interminable, is but a small part of her. At the close of a day's march
 over high mountains and through snowy vallies, we may come upon health, and
 committing our loved ones to its charge, replant the uprooted tree of
 humanity, and send to late posterity the tale of the ante-pestilential
 race, the heroes and sages of the lost state of things.
 
 Hope beckons and sorrow urges us, the heart beats high with expectation,
 and this eager desire of change must be an omen of success. O come!
 Farewell to the dead! farewell to the tombs of those we loved!--farewell
 to giant London and the placid Thames, to river and mountain or fair
 district, birth-place of the wise and good, to Windsor Forest and its
 antique castle, farewell! themes for story alone are they,--we must live
 elsewhere.
 
 Such were in part the arguments of Adrian, uttered with enthusiasm and
 unanswerable rapidity. Something more was in his heart, to which he dared
 not give words. He felt that the end of time was come; he knew that one by
 one we should dwindle into nothingness. It was not adviseable to wait this
 sad consummation in our native country; but travelling would give us our
 object for each day, that would distract our thoughts from the
 swift-approaching end of things. If we went to Italy, to sacred and eternal
 Rome, we might with greater patience submit to the decree, which had laid
 her mighty towers low. We might lose our selfish grief in the sublime
 aspect of its desolation. All this was in the mind of Adrian; but he
 thought of my children, and, instead of communicating to me these resources
 of despair, he called up the image of health and life to be found, where we
 knew not--when we knew not; but if never to be found, for ever and for
 ever to be sought. He won me over to his party, heart and soul.
 
 It devolved on me to disclose our plan to Idris. The images of health and
 hope which I presented to her, made her with a smile consent. With a smile
 she agreed to leave her country, from which she had never before been
 absent, and the spot she had inhabited from infancy; the forest and its
 mighty trees, the woodland paths and green recesses, where she had played
 in childhood, and had lived so happily through youth; she would leave them
 without regret, for she hoped to purchase thus the lives of her children.
 They were her life; dearer than a spot consecrated to love, dearer than all
 else the earth contained. The boys heard with childish glee of our removal:
 Clara asked if we were to go to Athens. "It is possible," I replied; and
 her countenance became radiant with pleasure. There she would behold the
 tomb of her parents, and the territory filled with recollections of her
 father's glory. In silence, but without respite, she had brooded over these
 scenes. It was the recollection of them that had turned her infant gaiety
 to seriousness, and had impressed her with high and restless thoughts.
 
 There were many dear friends whom we must not leave behind, humble though
 they were. There was the spirited and obedient steed which Lord Raymond had
 given his daughter; there was Alfred's dog and a pet eagle, whose sight was
 dimmed through age. But this catalogue of favourites to be taken with us,
 could not be made without grief to think of our heavy losses, and a deep
 sigh for the many things we must leave behind. The tears rushed into the
 eyes of Idris, while Alfred and Evelyn brought now a favourite rose tree,
 now a marble vase beautifully carved, insisting that these must go, and
 exclaiming on the pity that we could not take the castle and the forest,
 the deer and the birds, and all accustomed and cherished objects along with
 us. "Fond and foolish ones," I said, "we have lost for ever treasures far
 more precious than these; and we desert them, to preserve treasures to
 which in comparison they are nothing. Let us not for a moment forget our
 object and our hope; and they will form a resistless mound to stop the
 overflowing of our regret for trifles."
 
 The children were easily distracted, and again returned to their prospect
 of future amusement. Idris had disappeared. She had gone to hide her
 weakness; escaping from the castle, she had descended to the little park,
 and sought solitude, that she might there indulge her tears; I found her
 clinging round an old oak, pressing its rough trunk with her roseate lips,
 as her tears fell plenteously, and her sobs and broken exclamations could
 not be suppressed; with surpassing grief I beheld this loved one of my
 heart thus lost in sorrow! I drew her towards me; and, as she felt my
 kisses on her eyelids, as she felt my arms press her, she revived to the
 knowledge of what remained to her. "You are very kind not to reproach me,"
 she said: "I weep, and a bitter pang of intolerable sorrow tears my heart.
 And yet I am happy; mothers lament their children, wives lose their
 husbands, while you and my children are left to me. Yes, I am happy, most
 happy, that I can weep thus for imaginary sorrows, and that the slight loss
 of my adored country is not dwindled and annihilated in mightier misery.
 Take me where you will; where you and my children are, there shall be
 Windsor, and every country will be England to me. Let these tears flow not
 for myself, happy and ungrateful as I am, but for the dead world--for our
 lost country--for all of love, and life, and joy, now choked in the dusty
 chambers of death."
 
 She spoke quickly, as if to convince herself; she turned her eyes from the
 trees and forest-paths she loved; she hid her face in my bosom, and we--
 yes, my masculine firmness dissolved--we wept together consolatory tears,
 and then calm--nay, almost cheerful, we returned to the castle.
 
 The first cold weather of an English October, made us hasten our
 preparations. I persuaded Idris to go up to London, where she might better
 attend to necessary arrangements. I did not tell her, that to spare her the
 pang of parting from inanimate objects, now the only things left, I had
 resolved that we should none of us return to Windsor. For the last time we
 looked on the wide extent of country visible from the terrace, and saw the
 last rays of the sun tinge the dark masses of wood variegated by autumnal
 tints; the uncultivated fields and smokeless cottages lay in shadow below;
 the Thames wound through the wide plain, and the venerable pile of Eton
 college, stood in dark relief, a prominent object; the cawing of the myriad
 rooks which inhabited the trees of the little park, as in column or thick
 wedge they speeded to their nests, disturbed the silence of evening. Nature
 was the same, as when she was the kind mother of the human race; now,
 childless and forlorn, her fertility was a mockery; her loveliness a mask
 for deformity. Why should the breeze gently stir the trees, man felt not
 its refreshment? Why did dark night adorn herself with stars--man saw
 them not? Why are there fruits, or flowers, or streams, man is not here to
 enjoy them?
 
 Idris stood beside me, her dear hand locked in mine. Her face was radiant
 with a smile.--"The sun is alone," she said, "but we are not. A strange
 star, my Lionel, ruled our birth; sadly and with dismay we may look upon
 the annihilation of man; but we remain for each other. Did I ever in the
 wide world seek other than thee? And since in the wide world thou
 remainest, why should I complain? Thou and nature are still true to me.
 Beneath the shades of night, and through the day, whose garish light
 displays our solitude, thou wilt still be at my side, and even Windsor will
 not be regretted."
 
 I had chosen night time for our journey to London, that the change and
 desolation of the country might be the less observable. Our only surviving
 servant drove us. We past down the steep hill, and entered the dusky avenue
 of the Long Walk. At times like these, minute circumstances assume giant
 and majestic proportions; the very swinging open of the white gate that
 admitted us into the forest, arrested my thoughts as matter of interest; it
 was an every day act, never to occur again! The setting crescent of the
 moon glittered through the massy trees to our right, and when we entered
 the park, we scared a troop of deer, that fled bounding away in the forest
 shades. Our two boys quietly slept; once, before our road turned from the
 view, I looked back on the castle. Its windows glistened in the moonshine,
 and its heavy outline lay in a dark mass against the sky--the trees near
 us waved a solemn dirge to the midnight breeze. Idris leaned back in the
 carriage; her two hands pressed mine, her countenance was placid, she
 seemed to lose the sense of what she now left, in the memory of what she
 still possessed.
 
 My thoughts were sad and solemn, yet not of unmingled pain. The very excess
 of our misery carried a relief with it, giving sublimity and elevation to
 sorrow. I felt that I carried with me those I best loved; I was pleased,
 after a long separation to rejoin Adrian; never again to part. I felt that
 I quitted what I loved, not what loved me. The castle walls, and long
 familiar trees, did not hear the parting sound of our carriage-wheels with
 regret. And, while I felt Idris to be near, and heard the regular breathing
 of my children, I could not be unhappy. Clara was greatly moved; with
 streaming eyes, suppressing her sobs, she leaned from the window, watching
 the last glimpse of her native Windsor.
 
 Adrian welcomed us on our arrival. He was all animation; you could no
 longer trace in his look of health, the suffering valetudinarian; from his
 smile and sprightly tones you could not guess that he was about to lead
 forth from their native country, the numbered remnant of the English
 nation, into the tenantless realms of the south, there to die, one by one,
 till the LAST MAN should remain in a voiceless, empty world.
 
 Adrian was impatient for our departure, and had advanced far in his
 preparations. His wisdom guided all. His care was the soul, to move the
 luckless crowd, who relied wholly on him. It was useless to provide many
 things, for we should find abundant provision in every town. It was
 Adrian's wish to prevent all labour; to bestow a festive appearance on this
 funeral train. Our numbers amounted to not quite two thousand persons.
 These were not all assembled in London, but each day witnessed the arrival
 of fresh numbers, and those who resided in the neighbouring towns, had
 received orders to assemble at one place, on the twentieth of November.
 Carriages and horses were provided for all; captains and under officers
 chosen, and the whole assemblage wisely organized. All obeyed the Lord
 Protector of dying England; all looked up to him. His council was chosen,
 it consisted of about fifty persons. Distinction and station were not the
 qualifications of their election. We had no station among us, but that
 which benevolence and prudence gave; no distinction save between the living
 and the dead. Although we were anxious to leave England before the depth of
 winter, yet we were detained. Small parties had been dispatched to various
 parts of England, in search of stragglers; we would not go, until we had
 assured ourselves that in all human probability we did not leave behind a
 single human being.
 
 On our arrival in London, we found that the aged Countess of Windsor was
 residing with her son in the palace of the Protectorate; we repaired to our
 accustomed abode near Hyde Park. Idris now for the first time for many
 years saw her mother, anxious to assure herself that the childishness of
 old age did not mingle with unforgotten pride, to make this high-born dame
 still so inveterate against me. Age and care had furrowed her cheeks, and
 bent her form; but her eye was still bright, her manners authoritative and
 unchanged; she received her daughter coldly, but displayed more feeling as
 she folded her grand-children in her arms. It is our nature to wish to
 continue our systems and thoughts to posterity through our own offspring.
 The Countess had failed in this design with regard to her children; perhaps
 she hoped to find the next remove in birth more tractable. Once Idris named
 me casually--a frown, a convulsive gesture of anger, shook her mother,
 and, with voice trembling with hate, she said--"I am of little worth in
 this world; the young are impatient to push the old off the scene; but,
 Idris, if you do not wish to see your mother expire at your feet, never
 again name that person to me; all else I can bear; and now I am resigned to
 the destruction of my cherished hopes: but it is too much to require that I
 should love the instrument that providence gifted with murderous properties
 for my destruction."
 
 This was a strange speech, now that, on the empty stage, each might play
 his part without impediment from the other. But the haughty Ex-Queen
 thought as Octavius Caesar and Mark Antony,
 
   We could not stall together
   In the whole world.
 
 The period of our departure was fixed for the twenty-fifth of November. The
 weather was temperate; soft rains fell at night, and by day the wintry sun
 shone out. Our numbers were to move forward in separate parties, and to go
 by different routes, all to unite at last at Paris. Adrian and his
 division, consisting in all of five hundred persons, were to take the
 direction of Dover and Calais. On the twentieth of November, Adrian and I
 rode for the last time through the streets of London. They were grass-grown
 and desert. The open doors of the empty mansions creaked upon their hinges;
 rank herbage, and deforming dirt, had swiftly accumulated on the steps of
 the houses; the voiceless steeples of the churches pierced the smokeless
 air; the churches were open, but no prayer was offered at the altars;
 mildew and damp had already defaced their ornaments; birds, and tame
 animals, now homeless, had built nests, and made their lairs in consecrated
 spots. We passed St. Paul's. London, which had extended so far in suburbs
 in all direction, had been somewhat deserted in the midst, and much of what
 had in former days obscured this vast building was removed. Its ponderous
 mass, blackened stone, and high dome, made it look, not like a temple, but
 a tomb. Methought above the portico was engraved the Hic jacet of England.
 We passed on eastwards, engaged in such solemn talk as the times inspired.
 No human step was heard, nor human form discerned. Troops of dogs, deserted
 of their masters, passed us; and now and then a horse, unbridled and
 unsaddled, trotted towards us, and tried to attract the attention of those
 which we rode, as if to allure them to seek like liberty. An unwieldy ox,
 who had fed in an abandoned granary, suddenly lowed, and shewed his
 shapeless form in a narrow door-way; every thing was desert; but nothing
 was in ruin. And this medley of undamaged buildings, and luxurious
 accommodation, in trim and fresh youth, was contrasted with the lonely
 silence of the unpeopled streets.
 
 Night closed in, and it began to rain. We were about to return homewards,
 when a voice, a human voice, strange now to hear, attracted our attention.
 It was a child singing a merry, lightsome air; there was no other sound. We
 had traversed London from Hyde Park even to where we now were in the
 Minories, and had met no person, heard no voice nor footstep. The singing
 was interrupted by laughing and talking; never was merry ditty so sadly
 timed, never laughter more akin to tears. The door of the house from which
 these sounds proceeded was open, the upper rooms were illuminated as for a
 feast. It was a large magnificent house, in which doubtless some rich
 merchant had lived. The singing again commenced, and rang through the
 high-roofed rooms, while we silently ascended the stair-case. Lights now
 appeared to guide us; and a long suite of splendid rooms illuminated, made
 us still more wonder. Their only inhabitant, a little girl, was dancing,
 waltzing, and singing about them, followed by a large Newfoundland dog, who
 boisterously jumping on her, and interrupting her, made her now scold, now
 laugh, now throw herself on the carpet to play with him. She was dressed
 grotesquely, in glittering robes and shawls fit for a woman; she appeared
 about ten years of age. We stood at the door looking on this strange scene,
 till the dog perceiving us barked loudly; the child turned and saw us: her
 face, losing its gaiety, assumed a sullen expression: she slunk back,
 apparently meditating an escape. I came up to her, and held her hand; she
 did not resist, but with a stern brow, so strange in childhood, so
 different from her former hilarity, she stood still, her eyes fixed on the
 ground. "What do you do here?" I said gently; "Who are you?"--she was
 silent, but trembled violently.--"My poor child," asked Adrian, "are you
 alone?" There was a winning softness in his voice, that went to the heart
 of the little girl; she looked at him, then snatching her hand from me,
 threw herself into his arms, clinging round his neck, ejaculating--"Save
 me! save me!" while her unnatural sullenness dissolved in tears.
 
 "I will save you," he replied, "of what are you afraid? you need not fear
 my friend, he will do you no harm. Are you alone?"
 
 "No, Lion is with me."
 
 "And your father and mother?--"
 
 "I never had any; I am a charity girl. Every body is gone, gone for a
 great, great many days; but if they come back and find me out, they will
 beat me so!"
 
 Her unhappy story was told in these few words: an orphan, taken on
 pretended charity, ill-treated and reviled, her oppressors had died:
 unknowing of what had passed around her, she found herself alone; she had
 not dared venture out, but by the continuance of her solitude her courage
 revived, her childish vivacity caused her to play a thousand freaks, and
 with her brute companion she passed a long holiday, fearing nothing but the
 return of the harsh voices and cruel usage of her protectors. She readily
 consented to go with Adrian.
 
 In the mean time, while we descanted on alien sorrows, and on a solitude
 which struck our eyes and not our hearts, while we imagined all of change
 and suffering that had intervened in these once thronged streets, before,
 tenantless and abandoned, they became mere kennels for dogs, and stables
 for cattle:--while we read the death of the world upon the dark fane, and
 hugged ourselves in the remembrance that we possessed that which was all
 the world to us--in the meanwhile---
 
 We had arrived from Windsor early in October, and had now been in London
 about six weeks. Day by day, during that time, the health of my Idris
 declined: her heart was broken; neither sleep nor appetite, the chosen
 servants of health, waited on her wasted form. To watch her children hour
 by hour, to sit by me, drinking deep the dear persuasion that I remained to
 her, was all her pastime. Her vivacity, so long assumed, her affectionate
 display of cheerfulness, her light-hearted tone and springy gait were gone.
 I could not disguise to myself, nor could she conceal, her life-consuming
 sorrow. Still change of scene, and reviving hopes might restore her; I
 feared the plague only, and she was untouched by that.
 
 I had left her this evening, reposing after the fatigues of her
 preparations. Clara sat beside her, relating a story to the two boys. The
 eyes of Idris were closed: but Clara perceived a sudden change in the
 appearance of our eldest darling; his heavy lids veiled his eyes, an
 unnatural colour burnt in his cheeks, his breath became short. Clara looked
 at the mother; she slept, yet started at the pause the narrator made--
 Fear of awakening and alarming her, caused Clara to go on at the eager call
 of Evelyn, who was unaware of what was passing. Her eyes turned alternately
 from Alfred to Idris; with trembling accents she continued her tale, till
 she saw the child about to fall: starting forward she caught him, and her
 cry roused Idris. She looked on her son. She saw death stealing across his
 features; she laid him on a bed, she held drink to his parched lips.
 
 Yet he might be saved. If I were there, he might be saved; perhaps it was
 not the plague. Without a counsellor, what could she do? stay and behold
 him die! Why at that moment was I away? "Look to him, Clara," she
 exclaimed, "I will return immediately."
 
 She inquired among those who, selected as the companions of our journey,
 had taken up their residence in our house; she heard from them merely that
 I had gone out with Adrian. She entreated them to seek me: she returned to
 her child, he was plunged in a frightful state of torpor; again she rushed
 down stairs; all was dark, desert, and silent; she lost all
 self-possession; she ran into the street; she called on my name. The
 pattering rain and howling wind alone replied to her. Wild fear gave wings
 to her feet; she darted forward to seek me, she knew not where; but,
 putting all her thoughts, all her energy, all her being in speed only, most
 misdirected speed, she neither felt, nor feared, nor paused, but ran right
 on, till her strength suddenly deserted her so suddenly, that she had not
 thought to save herself. Her knees failed her, and she fell heavily on the
 pavement. She was stunned for a time; but at length rose, and though sorely
 hurt, still walked on, shedding a fountain of tears, stumbling at times,
 going she knew not whither, only now and then with feeble voice she called
 my name, adding with heart-piercing exclamations, that I was cruel and
 unkind. Human being there was none to reply; and the inclemency of the
 night had driven the wandering animals to the habitations they had usurped.
 Her thin dress was drenched with rain; her wet hair clung round her neck;
 she tottered through the dark streets; till, striking her foot against an
 unseen impediment, she again fell; she could not rise; she hardly strove;
 but, gathering up her limbs, she resigned herself to the fury of the
 elements, and the bitter grief of her own heart. She breathed an earnest
 prayer to die speedily, for there was no relief but death. While hopeless
 of safety for herself, she ceased to lament for her dying child, but shed
 kindly, bitter tears for the grief I should experience in losing her. While
 she lay, life almost suspended, she felt a warm, soft hand on her brow, and
 a gentle female voice asked her, with expressions of tender compassion, if
 she could not rise? That another human being, sympathetic and kind, should
 exist near, roused her; half rising, with clasped hands, and fresh
 springing tears, she entreated her companion to seek for me, to bid me
 hasten to my dying child, to save him, for the love of heaven, to save
 him!
 
 The woman raised her; she led her under shelter, she entreated her to
 return to her home, whither perhaps I had already returned. Idris easily
 yielded to her persuasions, she leaned on the arm of her friend, she
 endeavoured to walk on, but irresistible faintness made her pause again and
 again.
 
 Quickened by the encreasing storm, we had hastened our return, our little
 charge was placed before Adrian on his horse. There was an assemblage of
 persons under the portico of our house, in whose gestures I instinctively
 read some heavy change, some new misfortune. With swift alarm, afraid to
 ask a single question, I leapt from my horse; the spectators saw me, knew
 me, and in awful silence divided to make way for me. I snatched a light,
 and rushing up stairs, and hearing a groan, without reflection I threw open
 the door of the first room that presented itself. It was quite dark; but,
 as I stept within, a pernicious scent assailed my senses, producing
 sickening qualms, which made their way to my very heart, while I felt my
 leg clasped, and a groan repeated by the person that held me. I lowered my
 lamp, and saw a negro half clad, writhing under the agony of disease, while
 he held me with a convulsive grasp. With mixed horror and impatience I
 strove to disengage myself, and fell on the sufferer; he wound his naked
 festering arms round me, his face was close to mine, and his breath,
 death-laden, entered my vitals. For a moment I was overcome, my head was
 bowed by aching nausea; till, reflection returning, I sprung up, threw the
 wretch from me, and darting up the staircase, entered the chamber usually
 inhabited by my family. A dim light shewed me Alfred on a couch; Clara
 trembling, and paler than whitest snow, had raised him on her arm, holding
 a cup of water to his lips. I saw full well that no spark of life existed
 in that ruined form, his features were rigid, his eyes glazed, his head had
 fallen back. I took him from her, I laid him softly down, kissed his cold
 little mouth, and turned to speak in a vain whisper, when loudest sound of
 thunderlike cannon could not have reached him in his immaterial abode.
 
 And where was Idris? That she had gone out to seek me, and had not
 returned, were fearful tidings, while the rain and driving wind clattered
 against the window, and roared round the house. Added to this, the
 sickening sensation of disease gained upon me; no time was to be lost, if
 ever I would see her again. I mounted my horse and rode out to seek her,
 fancying that I heard her voice in every gust, oppressed by fever and
 aching pain.
 
 I rode in the dark and rain through the labyrinthine streets of unpeopled
 London. My child lay dead at home; the seeds of mortal disease had taken
 root in my bosom; I went to seek Idris, my adored, now wandering alone,
 while the waters were rushing from heaven like a cataract to bathe her dear
 head in chill damp, her fair limbs in numbing cold. A female stood on the
 step of a door, and called to me as I gallopped past. It was not Idris; so
 I rode swiftly on, until a kind of second sight, a reflection back again on
 my senses of what I had seen but not marked, made me feel sure that another
 figure, thin, graceful and tall, stood clinging to the foremost person who
 supported her. In a minute I was beside the suppliant, in a minute I
 received the sinking Idris in my arms. Lifting her up, I placed her on the
 horse; she had not strength to support herself; so I mounted
 behind her, and held her close to my bosom, wrapping my riding-cloak round
 her, while her companion, whose well known, but changed countenance, (it
 was Juliet, daughter of the Duke of L---) could at this moment of horror
 obtain from me no more than a passing glance of compassion. She took the
 abandoned rein, and conducted our obedient steed homewards. Dare I avouch
 it? That was the last moment of my happiness; but I was happy. Idris must
 die, for her heart was broken: I must die, for I had caught the plague;
 earth was a scene of desolation; hope was madness; life had married death;
 they were one; but, thus supporting my fainting love, thus feeling that I
 must soon die, I revelled in the delight of possessing her once more; again
 and again I kissed her, and pressed her to my heart.
 
 We arrived at our home. I assisted her to dismount, I carried her up
 stairs, and gave her into Clara's care, that her wet garments might be
 changed. Briefly I assured Adrian of her safety, and requested that we
 might be left to repose. As the miser, who with trembling caution visits
 his treasure to count it again and again, so I numbered each moment, and
 grudged every one that was not spent with Idris. I returned swiftly to the
 chamber where the life of my life reposed; before I entered the room I
 paused for a few seconds; for a few seconds I tried to examine my state;
 sickness and shuddering ever and anon came over me; my head was heavy, my
 chest oppressed, my legs bent under me; but I threw off resolutely the
 swift growing symptoms of my disorder, and met Idris with placid and even
 joyous looks. She was lying on a couch; carefully fastening the door to
 prevent all intrusion; I sat by her, we embraced, and our lips met in a
 kiss long drawn and breathless--would that moment had been my last!
 
 Maternal feeling now awoke in my poor girl's bosom, and she asked: "And
 Alfred?"
 
 "Idris," I replied, "we are spared to each other, we are together;
 do not let any other idea intrude. I am happy; even on this fatal night, I
 declare myself happy, beyond all name, all thought--what would you more,
 sweet one?"
 
 Idris understood me: she bowed her head on my shoulder and wept. "Why," she
 again asked, "do you tremble, Lionel, what shakes you thus?"
 
 "Well may I be shaken," I replied, "happy as I am. Our child is dead, and
 the present hour is dark and ominous. Well may I tremble! but, I am happy,
 mine own Idris, most happy."
 
 "I understand thee, my kind love," said Idris, "thus--pale as thou art
 with sorrow at our loss; trembling and aghast, though wouldest assuage my
 grief by thy dear assurances. I am not happy," (and the tears flashed and
 fell from under her down-cast lids), "for we are inmates of a miserable
 prison, and there is no joy for us; but the true love I bear you will
 render this and every other loss endurable."
 
 "We have been happy together, at least," I said; "no future misery can
 deprive us of the past. We have been true to each other for years, ever
 since my sweet princess-love came through the snow to the lowly cottage
 of the poverty-striken heir of the ruined Verney. Even now, that eternity
 is before us, we take hope only from the presence of each other. Idris,
 do you think, that when we die, we shall be divided?"
 
 "Die! when we die! what mean you? What secret lies hid from me in those
 dreadful words?"
 
 "Must we not all die, dearest?" I asked with a sad smile.
 
 "Gracious God! are you ill, Lionel, that you speak of death? My only
 friend, heart of my heart, speak!"
 
 "I do not think," replied I, "that we have any of us long to live; and when
 the curtain drops on this mortal scene, where, think you, we shall find
 ourselves?" Idris was calmed by my unembarrassed tone and look; she
 answered:--"You may easily believe that during this long progress of the
 plague, I have thought much on death, and asked myself, now that all
 mankind is dead to this life, to what other life they may have been borne.
 Hour after hour, I have dwelt on these thoughts, and strove to form a
 rational conclusion concerning the mystery of a future state. What a
 scare-crow, indeed, would death be, if we were merely to cast aside the
 shadow in which we now walk, and, stepping forth into the unclouded
 sunshine of knowledge and love, revived with the same companions, the same
 affections, and reached the fulfilment of our hopes, leaving our fears with
 our earthly vesture in the grave. Alas! the same strong feeling which makes
 me sure that I shall not wholly die, makes me refuse to believe that I
 shall live wholly as I do now. Yet, Lionel, never, never, can I love any
 but you; through eternity I must desire your society; and, as I am innocent
 of harm to others, and as relying and confident as my mortal nature
 permits, I trust that the Ruler of the world will never tear us asunder."
 
 "Your remarks are like yourself, dear love," replied I, "gentle and good;
 let us cherish such a belief, and dismiss anxiety from our minds. But,
 sweet, we are so formed, (and there is no sin, if God made our nature, to
 yield to what he ordains), we are so formed, that we must love life, and
 cling to it; we must love the living smile, the sympathetic touch, and
 thrilling voice, peculiar to our mortal mechanism. Let us not, through
 security in hereafter, neglect the present. This present moment, short as
 it is, is a part of eternity, and the dearest part, since it is our own
 unalienably. Thou, the hope of my futurity, art my present joy. Let me then
 look on thy dear eyes, and, reading love in them, drink intoxicating
 pleasure."
 
 Timidly, for my vehemence somewhat terrified her, Idris looked on me. My
 eyes were bloodshot, starting from my head; every artery beat, methought,
 audibly, every muscle throbbed, each single nerve felt. Her look of wild
 affright told me, that I could no longer keep my secret:--"So it is, mine
 own beloved," I said, "the last hour of many happy ones is arrived, nor can
 we shun any longer the inevitable destiny. I cannot live long--but, again
 and again, I say, this moment is ours!"
 
 Paler than marble, with white lips and convulsed features, Idris became
 aware of my situation. My arm, as I sat, encircled her waist. She felt the
 palm burn with fever, even on the heart it pressed:--"One moment," she
 murmured, scarce audibly, "only one moment."--
 
 She kneeled, and hiding her face in her hands, uttered a brief, but earnest
 prayer, that she might fulfil her duty, and watch over me to the last.
 While there was hope, the agony had been unendurable;--all was now
 concluded; her feelings became solemn and calm. Even as Epicharis,
 unperturbed and firm, submitted to the instruments of torture, did Idris,
 suppressing every sigh and sign of grief, enter upon the endurance of
 torments, of which the rack and the wheel are but faint and metaphysical
 symbols.
 
 I was changed; the tight-drawn cord that sounded so harshly was loosened,
 the moment that Idris participated in my knowledge of our real situation.
 The perturbed and passion-tossed waves of thought subsided, leaving only
 the heavy swell that kept right on without any outward manifestation of its
 disturbance, till it should break on the remote shore towards which I
 rapidly advanced:--"It is true that I am sick," I said, "and your
 society, my Idris is my only medicine; come, and sit beside me."
 
 She made me lie down on the couch, and, drawing a low ottoman near, sat
 close to my pillow, pressing my burning hands in her cold palms. She
 yielded to my feverish restlessness, and let me talk, and talked to me, on
 subjects strange indeed to beings, who thus looked the last, and heard the
 last, of what they loved alone in the world. We talked of times gone by; of
 the happy period of our early love; of Raymond, Perdita, and Evadne. We
 talked of what might arise on this desert earth, if, two or three being
 saved, it were slowly re-peopled.--We talked of what was beyond the tomb;
 and, man in his human shape being nearly extinct, we felt with certainty of
 faith, that other spirits, other minds, other perceptive beings, sightless
 to us, must people with thought and love this beauteous and imperishable
 universe.
 
 We talked--I know not how long--but, in the morning I awoke from a
 painful heavy slumber; the pale cheek of Idris rested on my pillow; the
 large orbs of her eyes half raised the lids, and shewed the deep blue
 lights beneath; her lips were unclosed, and the slight murmurs they formed
 told that, even while asleep, she suffered. "If she were dead," I thought,
 "what difference? now that form is the temple of a residing deity; those
 eyes are the windows of her soul; all grace, love, and intelligence are
 throned on that lovely bosom--were she dead, where would this mind, the
 dearer half of mine, be? For quickly the fair proportion of this edifice
 would be more defaced, than are the sand-choked ruins of the desert temples
 of Palmyra."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 IDRIS stirred and awoke; alas! she awoke to misery. She saw the signs of
 disease on my countenance, and wondered how she could permit the long night
 to pass without her having sought, not cure, that was impossible, but
 alleviation to my sufferings. She called Adrian; my couch was quickly
 surrounded by friends and assistants, and such medicines as were judged
 fitting were administered. It was the peculiar and dreadful distinction of
 our visitation, that none who had been attacked by the pestilence had
 recovered. The first symptom of the disease was the death-warrant, which in
 no single instance had been followed by pardon or reprieve. No gleam of
 hope therefore cheered my friends.
 
 While fever producing torpor, heavy pains, sitting like lead on my limbs,
 and making my breast heave, were upon me; I continued insensible to every
 thing but pain, and at last even to that. I awoke on the fourth morning as
 from a dreamless sleep. An irritating sense of thirst, and, when I strove
 to speak or move, an entire dereliction of power, was all I felt.
 
 For three days and nights Idris had not moved from my side. She
 administered to all my wants, and never slept nor rested. She did not hope;
 and therefore she neither endeavoured to read the physician's countenance,
 nor to watch for symptoms of recovery. All her thought was to attend on me
 to the last, and then to lie down and die beside me. On the third night
 animation was suspended; to the eye and touch of all I was dead. With
 earnest prayer, almost with force, Adrian tried to draw Idris from me. He
 exhausted every adjuration, her child's welfare and his own. She shook her
 head, and wiped a stealing tear from her sunk cheek, but would not yield;
 she entreated to be allowed to watch me that one night only, with such
 affliction and meek earnestness, that she gained her point, and sat silent
 and motionless, except when, stung by intolerable remembrance, she kissed
 my closed eyes and pallid lips, and pressed my stiffening hands to her
 beating heart.
 
 At dead of night, when, though it was mid winter, the cock crowed at three
 o'clock, as herald of the morning change, while hanging over me, and
 mourning in silent, bitter thought for the loss of all of love towards her
 that had been enshrined in my heart; her dishevelled hair hung over her
 face, and the long tresses fell on the bed; she saw one ringlet in motion,
 and the scattered hair slightly stirred, as by a breath. It is not so, she
 thought, for he will never breathe more. Several times the same thing
 occurred, and she only marked it by the same reflection; till the whole
 ringlet waved back, and she thought she saw my breast heave. Her first
 emotion was deadly fear, cold dew stood on her brow; my eyes half opened;
 and, re-assured, she would have exclaimed, "He lives!" but the words were
 choked by a spasm, and she fell with a groan on the floor.
 
 Adrian was in the chamber. After long watching, he had unwillingly fallen
 into a sleep. He started up, and beheld his sister senseless on the earth,
 weltering in a stream of blood that gushed from her mouth. Encreasing signs
 of life in me in some degree explained her state; the surprise, the burst
 of joy, the revulsion of every sentiment, had been too much for her frame,
 worn by long months of care, late shattered by every species of woe and
 toil. She was now in far greater danger than I, the wheels and springs of
 my life, once again set in motion, acquired elasticity from their short
 suspension. For a long time, no one believed that I should indeed continue
 to live; during the reign of the plague upon earth, not one person,
 attacked by the grim disease, had recovered. My restoration was looked on
 as a deception; every moment it was expected that the evil symptoms would
 recur with redoubled violence, until confirmed convalescence, absence of
 all fever or pain, and encreasing strength, brought slow conviction that I
 had recovered from the plague.
 
 The restoration of Idris was more problematical. When I had been attacked
 by illness, her cheeks were sunk, her form emaciated; but now, the vessel,
 which had broken from the effects of extreme agitation, did not entirely
 heal, but was as a channel that drop by drop drew from her the ruddy stream
 that vivified her heart. Her hollow eyes and worn countenance had a ghastly
 appearance; her cheek-bones, her open fair brow, the projection of the
 mouth, stood fearfully prominent; you might tell each bone in the thin
 anatomy of her frame. Her hand hung powerless; each joint lay bare, so that
 the light penetrated through and through. It was strange that life could
 exist in what was wasted and worn into a very type of death.
 
 To take her from these heart-breaking scenes, to lead her to forget the
 world's desolation in the variety of objects presented by travelling, and
 to nurse her failing strength in the mild climate towards which we had
 resolved to journey, was my last hope for her preservation. The
 preparations for our departure, which had been suspended during my illness,
 were renewed. I did not revive to doubtful convalescence; health spent her
 treasures upon me; as the tree in spring may feel from its wrinkled limbs
 the fresh green break forth, and the living sap rise and circulate, so did
 the renewed vigour of my frame, the cheerful current of my blood, the
 new-born elasticity of my limbs, influence my mind to cheerful endurance
 and pleasurable thoughts. My body, late the heavy weight that bound me to
 the tomb, was exuberant with health; mere common exercises were
 insufficient for my reviving strength; methought I could emulate the speed
 of the race-horse, discern through the air objects at a blinding distance,
 hear the operations of nature in her mute abodes; my senses had become so
 refined and susceptible after my recovery from mortal disease.
 
 Hope, among my other blessings, was not denied to me; and I did fondly
 trust that my unwearied attentions would restore my adored girl. I was
 therefore eager to forward our preparations. According to the plan first
 laid down, we were to have quitted London on the twenty-fifth of November;
 and, in pursuance of this scheme, two-thirds of our people--thepeople--
 all that remained of England, had gone forward, and had already been some
 weeks in Paris. First my illness, and subsequently that of Idris, had
 detained Adrian with his division, which consisted of three hundred
 persons, so that we now departed on the first of January, 2098. It was my
 wish to keep Idris as distant as possible from the hurry and clamour of the
 crowd, and to hide from her those appearances that would remind her most
 forcibly of our real situation. We separated ourselves to a great degree
 from Adrian, who was obliged to give his whole time to public business. The
 Countess of Windsor travelled with her son. Clara, Evelyn, and a female who
 acted as our attendant, were the only persons with whom we had contact. We
 occupied a commodious carriage, our servant officiated as coachman. A party
 of about twenty persons preceded us at a small distance. They had it in
 charge to prepare our halting places and our nightly abode. They had been
 selected for this service out of a great number that offered, on account of
 the superior sagacity of the man who had been appointed their leader.
 
 Immediately on our departure, I was delighted to find a change in Idris,
 which I fondly hoped prognosticated the happiest results. All the
 cheerfulness and gentle gaiety natural to her revived. She was weak, and
 this alteration was rather displayed in looks and voice than in acts; but
 it was permanent and real. My recovery from the plague and confirmed health
 instilled into her a firm belief that I was now secure from this dread
 enemy. She told me that she was sure she should recover. That she had a
 presentiment, that the tide of calamity which deluged our unhappy race had
 now turned. That the remnant would be preserved, and among them the dear
 objects of her tender affection; and that in some selected spot we should
 wear out our lives together in pleasant society. "Do not let my state of
 feebleness deceive you," she said; "I feel that I am better; there is a
 quick life within me, and a spirit of anticipation that assures me, that I
 shall continue long to make a part of this world. I shall throw off this
 degrading weakness of body, which infects even my mind with debility, and I
 shall enter again on the performance of my duties. I was sorry to leave
 Windsor: but now I am weaned from this local attachment; I am content to
 remove to a mild climate, which will complete my recovery. Trust me,
 dearest, I shall neither leave you, nor my brother, nor these dear
 children; my firm determination to remain with you to the last, and to
 continue to contribute to your happiness and welfare, would keep me alive,
 even if grim death were nearer at hand than he really is."
 
 I was only half re-assured by these expressions; I could not believe that
 the over-quick flow of her blood was a sign of health, or that her burning
 cheeks denoted convalescence. But I had no fears of an immediate
 catastrophe; nay, I persuaded myself that she would ultimately recover. And
 thus cheerfulness reigned in our little society. Idris conversed with
 animation on a thousand topics. Her chief desire was to lead our thoughts
 from melancholy reflections; so she drew charming pictures of a tranquil
 solitude, of a beauteous retreat, of the simple manners of our little
 tribe, and of the patriarchal brotherhood of love, which would survive the
 ruins of the populous nations which had lately existed. We shut out from
 our thoughts the present, and withdrew our eyes from the dreary landscape
 we traversed. Winter reigned in all its gloom. The leafless trees lay
 without motion against the dun sky; the forms of frost, mimicking the
 foliage of summer, strewed the ground; the paths were overgrown; the
 unploughed cornfields were patched with grass and weeds; the sheep
 congregated at the threshold of the cottage, the horned ox thrust his head
 from the window. The wind was bleak, and frequent sleet or snow-storms,
 added to the melancholy appearance wintry nature assumed.
 
 We arrived at Rochester, and an accident caused us to be detained there a
 day. During that time, a circumstance occurred that changed our plans, and
 which, alas! in its result changed the eternal course of events, turning me
 from the pleasant new sprung hope I enjoyed, to an obscure and gloomy
 desert. But I must give some little explanation before I proceed with the
 final cause of our temporary alteration of plan, and refer again to those
 times when man walked the earth fearless, before Plague had become Queen of
 the World.
 
 There resided a family in the neighbourhood of Windsor, of very humble
 pretensions, but which had been an object of interest to us on account of
 one of the persons of whom it was composed. The family of the Claytons had
 known better days; but, after a series of reverses, the father died a
 bankrupt, and the mother heartbroken, and a confirmed invalid, retired with
 her five children to a little cottage between Eton and Salt Hill. The
 eldest of these children, who was thirteen years old, seemed at once from
 the influence of adversity, to acquire the sagacity and principle belonging
 to a more mature age. Her mother grew worse and worse in health, but Lucy
 attended on her, and was as a tender parent to her younger brothers and
 sisters, and in the meantime shewed herself so good-humoured, social, and
 benevolent, that she was beloved as well as honoured, in her little
 neighbourhood.
 
 Lucy was besides extremely pretty; so when she grew to be sixteen, it was
 to be supposed, notwithstanding her poverty, that she should have admirers.
 One of these was the son of a country-curate; he was a generous,
 frank-hearted youth, with an ardent love of knowledge, and no mean
 acquirements. Though Lucy was untaught, her mother's conversation and
 manners gave her a taste for refinements superior to her present situation.
 She loved the youth even without knowing it, except that in any difficulty
 she naturally turned to him for aid, and awoke with a lighter heart every
 Sunday, because she knew that she would be met and accompanied by him in
 her evening walk with her sisters. She had another admirer, one of the
 head-waiters at the inn at Salt Hill. He also was not without pretensions
 to urbane superiority, such as he learnt from gentlemen's servants and
 waiting-maids, who initiating him in all the slang of high life below
 stairs, rendered his arrogant temper ten times more intrusive. Lucy did not
 disclaim him--she was incapable of that feeling; but she was sorry when
 she saw him approach, and quietly resisted all his endeavours to establish
 an intimacy. The fellow soon discovered that his rival was preferred to
 him; and this changed what was at first a chance admiration into a passion,
 whose main springs were envy, and a base desire to deprive his competitor
 of the advantage he enjoyed over himself.
 
 Poor Lucy's sad story was but a common one. Her lover's father died; and he
 was left destitute. He accepted the offer of a gentleman to go to India
 with him, feeling secure that he should soon acquire an independence, and
 return to claim the hand of his beloved. He became involved in the war
 carried on there, was taken prisoner, and years elapsed before tidings of
 his existence were received in his native land. In the meantime disastrous
 poverty came on Lucy. Her little cottage, which stood looking from its
 trellice, covered with woodbine and jessamine, was burnt down; and the
 whole of their little property was included in the destruction. Whither
 betake them? By what exertion of industry could Lucy procure them another
 abode? Her mother nearly bed-rid, could not survive any extreme of
 famine-struck poverty. At this time her other admirer stept forward, and
 renewed his offer of marriage. He had saved money, and was going to set up
 a little inn at Datchet. There was nothing alluring to Lucy in this offer,
 except the home it secured to her mother; and she felt more sure of this,
 since she was struck by the apparent generosity which occasioned the
 present offer. She accepted it; thus sacrificing herself for the comfort
 and welfare of her parent.
 
 It was some years after her marriage that we became acquainted with her.
 The accident of a storm caused us to take refuge in the inn, where we
 witnessed the brutal and quarrelsome behaviour of her husband, and her
 patient endurance. Her lot was not a fortunate one. Her first lover had
 returned with the hope of making her his own, and met her by accident, for
 the first time, as the mistress of his country inn, and the wife of
 another. He withdrew despairingly to foreign parts; nothing went well with
 him; at last he enlisted, and came back again wounded and sick, and yet
 Lucy was debarred from nursing him. Her husband's brutal disposition was
 aggravated by his yielding to the many temptations held out by his
 situation, and the consequent disarrangement of his affairs. Fortunately
 she had no children; but her heart was bound up in her brothers and
 sisters, and these his avarice and ill temper soon drove from the house;
 they were dispersed about the country, earning their livelihood with toil
 and care. He even shewed an inclination to get rid of her mother--but
 Lucy was firm here--she had sacrificed herself for her; she lived for her
 --she would not part with her--if the mother went, she would also go beg
 bread for her, die with her, but never desert her. The presence of Lucy was
 too necessary in keeping up the order of the house, and in preventing the
 whole establishment from going to wreck, for him to permit her to leave
 him. He yielded the point; but in all accesses of anger, or in his drunken
 fits, he recurred to the old topic, and stung poor Lucy's heart by
 opprobrious epithets bestowed on her parent.
 
 A passion however, if it be wholly pure, entire, and reciprocal, brings
 with it its own solace. Lucy was truly, and from the depth of heart,
 devoted to her mother; the sole end she proposed to herself in life, was
 the comfort and preservation of this parent. Though she grieved for the
 result, yet she did not repent of her marriage, even when her lover
 returned to bestow competence on her. Three years had intervened, and how,
 in their pennyless state, could her mother have existed during this time?
 This excellent woman was worthy of her child's devotion. A perfect
 confidence and friendship existed between them; besides, she was by no
 means illiterate; and Lucy, whose mind had been in some degree cultivated
 by her former lover, now found in her the only person who could understand
 and appreciate her. Thus, though suffering, she was by no means desolate,
 and when, during fine summer days, she led her mother into the flowery and
 shady lanes near their abode, a gleam of unmixed joy enlightened her
 countenance; she saw that her parent was happy, and she knew that this
 happiness was of her sole creating.
 
 Meanwhile her husband's affairs grew more and more involved; ruin was near
 at hand, and she was about to lose the fruit of all her labours, when
 pestilence came to change the aspect of the world. Her husband reaped
 benefit from the universal misery; but, as the disaster encreased, the
 spirit of lawlessness seized him; he deserted his home to revel in the
 luxuries promised him in London, and found there a grave. Her former lover
 had been one of the first victims of the disease. But Lucy continued to
 live for and in her mother. Her courage only failed when she dreaded peril
 for her parent, or feared that death might prevent her from performing
 those duties to which she was unalterably devoted.
 
 When we had quitted Windsor for London, as the previous step to our final
 emigration, we visited Lucy, and arranged with her the plan of her own and
 her mother's removal. Lucy was sorry at the necessity which forced her to
 quit her native lanes and village, and to drag an infirm parent from her
 comforts at home, to the homeless waste of depopulate earth; but she was
 too well disciplined by adversity, and of too sweet a temper, to indulge in
 repinings at what was inevitable.
 
 Subsequent circumstances, my illness and that of Idris, drove her from our
 remembrance; and we called her to mind at last, only to conclude that she
 made one of the few who came from Windsor to join the emigrants, and that
 she was already in Paris. When we arrived at Rochester therefore, we were
 surprised to receive, by a man just come from Slough, a letter from this
 exemplary sufferer. His account was, that, journeying from his home, and
 passing through Datchet, he was surprised to see smoke issue from the
 chimney of the inn, and supposing that he should find comrades for his
 journey assembled there, he knocked and was admitted. There was no one in
 the house but Lucy, and her mother; the latter had been deprived of the use
 of her limbs by an attack of rheumatism, and so, one by one, all the
 remaining inhabitants of the country set forward, leaving them alone. Lucy
 intreated the man to stay with her; in a week or two her mother would be
 better, and they would then set out; but they must perish, if they were
 left thus helpless and forlorn. The man said, that his wife and children
 were already among the emigrants, and it was therefore, according to his
 notion, impossible for him to remain. Lucy, as a last resource, gave him a
 letter for Idris, to be delivered to her wherever he should meet us. This
 commission at least he fulfilled, and Idris received with emotion the
 following letter:--
 
 "HONOURED LADY,
 
 "I am sure that you will remember and pity me, and I dare hope that you
 will assist me; what other hope have I? Pardon my manner of writing, I am
 so bewildered. A month ago my dear mother was deprived of the use of her
 limbs. She is already better, and in another month would I am sure be able
 to travel, in the way you were so kind as to say you would arrange for us.
 But now everybody is gone--everybody--as they went away, each said,
 that perhaps my mother would be better, before we were quite deserted. But
 three days ago I went to Samuel Woods, who, on account of his new-born
 child, remained to the last; and there being a large family of them, I
 thought I could persuade them to wait a little longer for us; but I found
 the house deserted. I have not seen a soul since, till this good man came.
 --What will become of us? My mother does not know our state; she is so
 ill, that I have hidden it from her.
 
 "Will you not send some one to us? I am sure we must perish miserably as we
 are. If I were to try to move my mother now, she would die on the road; and
 if, when she gets better, I were able, I cannot guess how, to find out the
 roads, and get on so many many miles to the sea, you would all be in
 France, and the great ocean would be between us, which is so terrible even
 to sailors. What would it be to me, a woman, who never saw it? We should be
 imprisoned by it in this country, all, all alone, with no help; better die
 where we are. I can hardly write--I cannot stop my tears--it is not for
 myself; I could put my trust in God; and let the worst come, I think I
 could bear it, if I were alone. But my mother, my sick, my dear, dear
 mother, who never, since I was born, spoke a harsh word to me,
 who has been patient in many sufferings; pity her, dear Lady,
 she must die a miserable death if you do not pity her. People speak
 carelessly of her, because she is old and infirm, as if we must not all, if
 we are spared, become so; and then, when the young are old themselves, they
 will think that they ought to be taken care of. It is very silly of me to
 write in this way to you; but, when I hear her trying not to groan, and see
 her look smiling on me to comfort me, when I know she is in pain; and when
 I think that she does not know the worst, but she soon must; and then she
 will not complain; but I shall sit guessing at all that she is dwelling
 upon, of famine and misery--I feel as if my heart must break, and I do
 not know what I say or do; my mother--mother for whom I have borne much,
 God preserve you from this fate! Preserve her, Lady, and He will bless you;
 and I, poor miserable creature as I am, will thank you and pray for you
 while I live.
 
 "Your unhappy and dutiful servant,
 
 "Dec. 30th, 2097. LUCY MARTIN."
 
 This letter deeply affected Idris, and she instantly proposed, that we
 should return to Datchet, to assist Lucy and her mother. I said that I
 would without delay set out for that place, but entreated her to join her
 brother, and there await my return with the children. But Idris was in high
 spirits, and full of hope. She declared that she could not consent even to
 a temporary separation from me, but that there was no need of this, the
 motion of the carriage did her good, and the distance was too trifling to
 be considered. We could dispatch messengers to Adrian, to inform him of our
 deviation from the original plan. She spoke with vivacity, and drew a
 picture after her own dear heart, of the pleasure we should bestow upon
 Lucy, and declared, if I went, she must accompany me, and that she should
 very much dislike to entrust the charge of rescuing them to others, who
 might fulfil it with coldness or inhumanity. Lucy's life had been one act
 of devotion and virtue; let her now reap the small reward of finding her
 excellence appreciated, and her necessity assisted, by those whom she
 respected and honoured.
 
 These, and many other arguments, were urged with gentle pertinacity, and
 the ardour of a wish to do all the good in her power, by her whose simple
 expression of a desire and slightest request had ever been a law with me.
 I, of course, consented, the moment that I saw that she had set her heart
 upon this step. We sent half our attendant troop on to Adrian; and with the
 other half our carriage took a retrograde course back to Windsor.
 
 I wonder now how I could be so blind and senseless, as thus to risk the
 safety of Idris; for, if I had eyes, surely I could see the sure, though
 deceitful, advance of death in her burning cheek and encreasing weakness.
 But she said she was better; and I believed her. Extinction could not be
 near a being, whose vivacity and intelligence hourly encreased, and whose
 frame was endowed with an intense, and I fondly thought, a strong and
 permanent spirit of life. Who, after a great disaster, has not looked back
 with wonder at his inconceivable obtuseness of understanding, that could
 not perceive the many minute threads with which fate weaves the
 inextricable net of our destinies, until he is inmeshed completely in it?
 
 The cross roads which we now entered upon, were even in a worse state than
 the long neglected high-ways; and the inconvenience seemed to menace the
 perishing frame of Idris with destruction. Passing through Dartford, we
 arrived at Hampton on the second day. Even in this short interval my
 beloved companion grew sensibly worse in health, though her spirits were
 still light, and she cheered my growing anxiety with gay sallies; sometimes
 the thought pierced my brain--Is she dying?--as I saw her fair
 fleshless hand rest on mine, or observed the feebleness with which she
 performed the accustomed acts of life. I drove away the idea, as if it had
 been suggested by insanity; but it occurred again and again, only to be
 dispelled by the continued liveliness of her manner.
 
 About mid-day, after quitting Hampton, our carriage broke down: the shock
 caused Idris to faint, but on her reviving no other ill consequence ensued;
 our party of attendants had as usual gone on before us, and our coachman
 went in search of another vehicle, our former one being rendered by this
 accident unfit for service. The only place near us was a poor village, in
 which he found a kind of caravan, able to hold four people, but it was
 clumsy and ill hung; besides this he found a very excellent cabriolet: our
 plan was soon arranged; I would drive Idris in the latter; while the
 children were conveyed by the servant in the former. But these arrangements
 cost time; we had agreed to proceed that night to Windsor, and thither our
 purveyors had gone: we should find considerable difficulty in getting
 accommodation, before we reached this place; after all, the distance was
 only ten miles; my horse was a good one; I would go forward at a good pace
 with Idris, leaving the children to follow at a rate more consonant to the
 uses of their cumberous machine.
 
 Evening closed in quickly, far more quickly than I was prepared to expect.
 At the going down of the sun it began to snow heavily. I attempted in vain
 to defend my beloved companion from the storm; the wind drove the snow in
 our faces; and it lay so high on the ground, that we made but small way;
 while the night was so dark, that but for the white covering on the ground
 we should not have been able to see a yard before us. We had left our
 accompanying caravan far behind us; and now I perceived that the storm had
 made me unconsciously deviate from my intended route. I had gone some miles
 out of my way. My knowledge of the country enabled me to regain the right
 road; but, instead of going, as at first agreed upon, by a cross road
 through Stanwell to Datchet, I was obliged to take the way of Egham and
 Bishopgate. It was certain therefore that I should not be rejoined by the
 other vehicle, that I should not meet a single fellow-creature till we
 arrived at Windsor.
 
 The back of our carriage was drawn up, and I hung a pelisse before it, thus
 to curtain the beloved sufferer from the pelting sleet. She leaned on my
 shoulder, growing every moment more languid and feeble; at first she
 replied to my words of cheer with affectionate thanks; but by degrees she
 sunk into silence; her head lay heavily upon me; I only knew that she lived
 by her irregular breathing and frequent sighs. For a moment I resolved to
 stop, and, opposing the back of the cabriolet to the force of the tempest,
 to expect morning as well as I might. But the wind was bleak and piercing,
 while the occasional shudderings of my poor Idris, and the intense cold I
 felt myself, demonstrated that this would be a dangerous experiment. At
 length methought she slept--fatal sleep, induced by frost: at this moment
 I saw the heavy outline of a cottage traced on the dark horizon close to
 us: "Dearest love," I said, "support yourself but one moment, and we shall
 have shelter; let us stop here, that I may open the door of this blessed
 dwelling."
 
 As I spoke, my heart was transported, and my senses swam with excessive
 delight and thankfulness; I placed the head of Idris against the carriage,
 and, leaping out, scrambled through the snow to the cottage, whose door was
 open. I had apparatus about me for procuring light, and that shewed me a
 comfortable room, with a pile of wood in one corner, and no appearance of
 disorder, except that, the door having been left partly open, the snow,
 drifting in, had blocked up the threshold. I returned to the carriage, and
 the sudden change from light to darkness at first blinded me. When I
 recovered my sight--eternal God of this lawless world! O supreme Death! I
 will not disturb thy silent reign, or mar my tale with fruitless
 exclamations of horror--I saw Idris, who had fallen from the seat to the
 bottom of the carriage; her head, its long hair pendent, with one arm, hung
 over the side.--Struck by a spasm of horror, I lifted her up; her heart
 was pulseless, her faded lips unfanned by the slightest breath.
 
 I carried her into the cottage; I placed her on the bed. Lighting a fire, I
 chafed her stiffening limbs; for two long hours I sought to restore
 departed life; and, when hope was as dead as my beloved, I closed with
 trembling hands her glazed eyes. I did not doubt what I should now do. In
 the confusion attendant on my illness, the task of interring our darling
 Alfred had devolved on his grandmother, the Ex-Queen, and she, true to her
 ruling passion, had caused him to be carried to Windsor, and buried in the
 family vault, in St. George's Chapel. I must proceed to Windsor, to calm
 the anxiety of Clara, who would wait anxiously for us--yet I would fain
 spare her the heart-breaking spectacle of Idris, brought in by me lifeless
 from the journey. So first I would place my beloved beside her child in the
 vault, and then seek the poor children who would be expecting me.
 
 I lighted the lamps of my carriage; I wrapt her in furs, and placed her
 along the seat; then taking the reins, made the horses go forward. We
 proceeded through the snow, which lay in masses impeding the way, while the
 descending flakes, driving against me with redoubled fury, blinded me. The
 pain occasioned by the angry elements, and the cold iron of the shafts of
 frost which buffetted me, and entered my aching flesh, were a relief to me;
 blunting my mental suffering. The horses staggered on, and the reins hung
 loosely in my hands. I often thought I would lay my head close to the
 sweet, cold face of my lost angel, and thus resign myself to conquering
 torpor. Yet I must not leave her a prey to the fowls of the air; but, in
 pursuance of my determination place her in the tomb of her forefathers,
 where a merciful God might permit me to rest also.
 
 The road we passed through Egham was familiar to me; but the wind and snow
 caused the horses to drag their load slowly and heavily. Suddenly the wind
 veered from south-west to west, and then again to north-west. As Sampson
 with tug and strain stirred from their bases the columns that supported the
 Philistine temple, so did the gale shake the dense vapours propped on the
 horizon, while the massy dome of clouds fell to the south, disclosing
 through the scattered web the clear empyrean, and the little stars, which
 were set at an immeasurable distance in the crystalline fields, showered
 their small rays on the glittering snow. Even the horses were cheered, and
 moved on with renovated strength. We entered the forest at Bishopgate, and
 at the end of the Long Walk I saw the Castle, "the proud Keep of Windsor,
 rising in the majesty of proportion, girt with the double belt of its
 kindred and coeval towers." I looked with reverence on a structure, ancient
 almost as the rock on which it stood, abode of kings, theme of admiration
 for the wise. With greater reverence and, tearful affection I beheld it as
 the asylum of the long lease of love I had enjoyed there with the
 perishable, unmatchable treasure of dust, which now lay cold beside me. Now
 indeed, I could have yielded to all the softness of my nature, and wept;
 and, womanlike, have uttered bitter plaints; while the familiar trees, the
 herds of living deer, the sward oft prest by her fairy-feet, one by one
 with sad association presented themselves. The white gate at the end of the
 Long Walk was wide open, and I rode up the empty town through the first
 gate of the feudal tower; and now St. George's Chapel, with its blackened
 fretted sides, was right before me. I halted at its door, which was open; I
 entered, and placed my lighted lamp on the altar; then I returned, and with
 tender caution I bore Idris up the aisle into the chancel, and laid her
 softly down on the carpet which covered the step leading to the communion
 table. The banners of the knights of the garter, and their half drawn
 swords, were hung in vain emblazonry above the stalls. The banner of her
 family hung there, still surmounted by its regal crown. Farewell to the
 glory and heraldry of England!--I turned from such vanity with a slight
 feeling of wonder, at how mankind could have ever been interested in such
 things. I bent over the lifeless corpse of my beloved; and, while looking
 on her uncovered face, the features already contracted by the rigidity of
 death, I felt as if all the visible universe had grown as soulless, inane,
 and comfortless as the clay-cold image beneath me. I felt for a moment the
 intolerable sense of struggle with, and detestation for, the laws which
 govern the world; till the calm still visible on the face of my dead love
 recalled me to a more soothing tone of mind, and I proceeded to fulfil the
 last office that could now be paid her. For her I could not lament, so much
 I envied her enjoyment of "the sad immunities of the grave."
 
 The vault had been lately opened to place our Alfred therein. The ceremony
 customary in these latter days had been cursorily performed, and the
 pavement of the chapel, which was its entrance, having been removed, had
 not been replaced. I descended the steps, and walked through the long
 passage to the large vault which contained the kindred dust of my Idris. I
 distinguished the small coffin of my babe. With hasty, trembling hands I
 constructed a bier beside it, spreading it with the furs and Indian shawls,
 which had wrapt Idris in her journey thither. I lighted the glimmering
 lamp, which flickered in this damp abode of the dead; then I bore my lost
 one to her last bed, decently composing her limbs, and covering them with a
 mantle, veiling all except her face, which remained lovely and placid. She
 appeared to rest like one over-wearied, her beauteous eyes steeped in sweet
 slumber. Yet, so it was not--she was dead! How intensely I then longed to
 lie down beside her, to gaze till death should gather me to the same
 repose.
 
 But death does not come at the bidding of the miserable. I had lately
 recovered from mortal illness, and my blood had never flowed with such an
 even current, nor had my limbs ever been so instinct with quick life, as
 now. I felt that my death must be voluntary. Yet what more natural than
 famine, as I watched in this chamber of mortality, placed in a world of the
 dead, beside the lost hope of my life? Meanwhile as I looked on her, the
 features, which bore a sisterly resemblance to Adrian, brought my thoughts
 back again to the living, to this dear friend, to Clara, and to Evelyn, who
 were probably now in Windsor, waiting anxiously for our arrival.
 
 Methought I heard a noise, a step in the far chapel, which was re-echoed by
 its vaulted roof, and borne to me through the hollow passages. Had Clara
 seen my carriage pass up the town, and did she seek me here? I must save
 her at least from the horrible scene the vault presented. I sprung up the
 steps, and then saw a female figure, bent with age, and clad in long
 mourning robes, advance through the dusky chapel, supported by a slender
 cane, yet tottering even with this support. She heard me, and looked up;
 the lamp I held illuminated my figure, and the moon-beams, struggling
 through the painted glass, fell upon her face, wrinkled and gaunt, yet with
 a piercing eye and commanding brow--I recognized the Countess of Windsor.
 With a hollow voice she asked, "Where is the princess?"
 
 I pointed to the torn up pavement: she walked to the spot, and looked down
 into the palpable darkness; for the vault was too distant for the rays of
 the small lamp I had left there to be discernible.
 
 "Your light," she said. I gave it her; and she regarded the now visible,
 but precipitous steps, as if calculating her capacity to descend.
 Instinctively I made a silent offer of my assistance. She motioned me away
 with a look of scorn, saying in an harsh voice, as she pointed downwards,
 "There at least I may have her undisturbed."
 
 She walked deliberately down, while I, overcome, miserable beyond words, or
 tears, or groans, threw myself on the pavement near--the stiffening form
 of Idris was before me, the death-struck countenance hushed in eternal
 repose beneath. That was to me the end of all! The day before, I had
 figured to my self various adventures, and communion with my friends in
 after time--now I had leapt the interval, and reached the utmost edge and
 bourne of life. Thus wrapt in gloom, enclosed, walled up, vaulted over by
 the omnipotent present, I was startled by the sound of feet on the steps of
 the tomb, and I remembered her whom I had utterly forgotten, my angry
 visitant; her tall form slowly rose upwards from the vault, a living
 statue, instinct with hate, and human, passionate strife: she seemed to me
 as having reached the pavement of the aisle; she stood motionless, seeking
 with her eyes alone, some desired object--till, perceiving me close to
 her, she placed her wrinkled hand on my arm, exclaiming with tremulous
 accents, "Lionel Verney, my son!" This name, applied at such a moment by my
 angel's mother, instilled into me more respect than I had ever before felt
 for this disdainful lady. I bowed my head, and kissed her shrivelled hand,
 and, remarking that she trembled violently, supported her to the end of the
 chancel, where she sat on the steps that led to the regal stall. She
 suffered herself to be led, and still holding my hand, she leaned her head
 back against the stall, while the moon beams, tinged with various colours
 by the painted glass, fell on her glistening eyes; aware of her weakness,
 again calling to mind her long cherished dignity, she dashed the tears
 away; yet they fell fast, as she said, for excuse, "She is so beautiful and
 placid, even in death. No harsh feeling ever clouded her serene brow; how
 did I treat her? wounding her gentle heart with savage coldness; I had no
 compassion on her in past years, does she forgive me now? Little, little
 does it boot to talk of repentance and forgiveness to the dead, had I
 during her life once consulted her gentle wishes, and curbed my rugged
 nature to do her pleasure, I should not feel thus."
 
 Idris and her mother were unlike in person. The dark hair, deep-set black
 eyes, and prominent features of the Ex-Queen were in entire contrast to the
 golden tresses, the full blue orbs, and the soft lines and contour of her
 daughter's countenance. Yet, in latter days, illness had taken from my poor
 girl the full outline of her face, and reduced it to the inflexible shape
 of the bone beneath. In the form of her brow, in her oval chin, there was
 to be found a resemblance to her mother; nay in some moods, their gestures
 were not unlike; nor, having lived so long together, was this wonderful.
 
 There is a magic power in resemblance. When one we love dies, we hope to
 see them in another state, and half expect that the agency of mind will
 inform its new garb in imitation of its decayed earthly vesture. But these
 are ideas of the mind only. We know that the instrument is shivered, the
 sensible image lies in miserable fragments, dissolved to dusty nothingness;
 a look, a gesture, or a fashioning of the limbs similar to the dead in a
 living person, touches a thrilling chord, whose sacred harmony is felt in
 the heart's dearest recess. Strangely moved, prostrate before this spectral
 image, and enslaved by the force of blood manifested in likeness of look
 and movement, I remained trembling in the presence of the harsh, proud, and
 till now unloved mother of Idris.
 
 Poor, mistaken woman! in her tenderest mood before, she had cherished the
 idea, that a word, a look of reconciliation from her, would be received
 with joy, and repay long years of severity. Now that the time was gone for
 the exercise of such power, she fell at once upon the thorny truth of
 things, and felt that neither smile nor caress could penetrate to the
 unconscious state, or influence the happiness of her who lay in the vault
 beneath. This conviction, together with the remembrance of soft replies to
 bitter speeches, of gentle looks repaying angry glances; the perception of
 the falsehood, paltryness and futility of her cherished dreams of birth and
 power; the overpowering knowledge, that love and life were the true
 emperors of our mortal state; all, as a tide, rose, and filled her soul
 with stormy and bewildering confusion. It fell to my lot, to come as the
 influential power, to allay the fierce tossing of these tumultuous waves. I
 spoke to her; I led her to reflect how happy Idris had really been, and how
 her virtues and numerous excellencies had found scope and estimation in her
 past career. I praised her, the idol of my heart's dear worship, the
 admired type of feminine perfection. With ardent and overflowing eloquence,
 I relieved my heart from its burthen, and awoke to the sense of a new
 pleasure in life, as I poured forth the funeral eulogy. Then I referred to
 Adrian, her loved brother, and to her surviving child. I declared, which I
 had before almost forgotten, what my duties were with regard to these
 valued portions of herself, and bade the melancholy repentant mother
 reflect, how she could best expiate unkindness towards the dead, by
 redoubled love of the survivors. Consoling her, my own sorrows were
 assuaged; my sincerity won her entire conviction.
 
 She turned to me. The hard, inflexible, persecuting woman, turned with a
 mild expression of face, and said, "If our beloved angel sees us now, it
 will delight her to find that I do you even tardy justice. You were worthy
 of her; and from my heart I am glad that you won her away from me. Pardon,
 my son, the many wrongs I have done you; forget my bitter words and unkind
 treatment--take me, and govern me as you will."
 
 I seized this docile moment to propose our departure from the church.
 "First," she said, "let us replace the pavement above the vault."
 
 We drew near to it; "Shall we look on her again?" I asked.
 
 "I cannot," she replied, "and, I pray you, neither do you. We need not
 torture ourselves by gazing on the soulless body, while her living spirit
 is buried quick in our hearts, and her surpassing loveliness is so deeply
 carved there, that sleeping or waking she must ever be present to us."
 
 For a few moments, we bent in solemn silence over the open vault. I
 consecrated my future life, to the embalming of her dear memory; I vowed to
 serve her brother and her child till death. The convulsive sob of my
 companion made me break off my internal orisons. I next dragged the stones
 over the entrance of the tomb, and closed the gulph that contained the life
 of my life. Then, supporting my decrepid fellow-mourner, we slowly left the
 chapel. I felt, as I stepped into the open air, as if I had quitted an
 happy nest of repose, for a dreary wilderness, a tortuous path, a bitter,
 joyless, hopeless pilgrimage.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 OUR escort had been directed to prepare our abode for the night at the inn,
 opposite the ascent to the Castle. We could not again visit the halls and
 familiar chambers of our home, on a mere visit. We had already left for
 ever the glades of Windsor, and all of coppice, flowery hedgerow, and
 murmuring stream, which gave shape and intensity to the love of our
 country, and the almost superstitious attachment with which we regarded
 native England. It had been our intention to have called at Lucy's dwelling
 in Datchet, and to have re-assured her with promises of aid and protection
 before we repaired to our quarters for the night. Now, as the Countess of
 Windsor and I turned down the steep hill that led from the Castle, we saw
 the children, who had just stopped in their caravan, at the inn-door. They
 had passed through Datchet without halting. I dreaded to meet them, and to
 be the bearer of my tragic story, so while they were still occupied in the
 hurry of arrival, I suddenly left them, and through the snow and clear
 moon-light air, hastened along the well known road to Datchet.
 
 Well known indeed it was. Each cottage stood on its accustomed site, each
 tree wore its familiar appearance. Habit had graven uneraseably on my
 memory, every turn and change of object on the road. At a short distance
 beyond the Little Park, was an elm half blown down by a storm, some ten
 years ago; and still, with leafless snow-laden branches, it stretched
 across the pathway, which wound through a meadow, beside a shallow brook,
 whose brawling was silenced by frost--that stile, that white gate, that
 hollow oak tree, which doubtless once belonged to the forest, and which now
 shewed in the moonlight its gaping rent; to whose fanciful appearance,
 tricked out by the dusk into a resemblance of the human form, the children
 had given the name of Falstaff;--all these objects were as well known to
 me as the cold hearth of my deserted home, and every moss-grown wall and
 plot of orchard ground, alike as twin lambs are to each other in a
 stranger's eye, yet to my accustomed gaze bore differences, distinction,
 and a name. England remained, though England was dead--it was the ghost
 of merry England that I beheld, under those greenwood shade passing
 generations had sported in security and ease. To this painful recognition
 of familiar places, was added a feeling experienced by all, understood by
 none--a feeling as if in some state, less visionary than a dream, in some
 past real existence, I had seen all I saw, with precisely the same feelings
 as I now beheld them--as if all my sensations were a duplex mirror of a
 former revelation. To get rid of this oppressive sense I strove to imagine
 change in this tranquil spot--this augmented my mood, by causing me to
 bestow more attention on the objects which occasioned me pain.
 
 I reached Datchet and Lucy's humble abode--once noisy with Saturday night
 revellers, or trim and neat on Sunday morning it had borne testimony to the
 labours and orderly habits of the housewife. The snow lay high about the
 door, as if it had remained unclosed for many days.
 
 "What scene of death hath Roscius now to act?" I muttered to myself as
 I looked at the dark casements. At first I thought I saw a light in one of
 them, but it proved to be merely the refraction of the moon-beams, while
 the only sound was the crackling branches as the breeze whirred the snow
 flakes from them--the moon sailed high and unclouded in the interminable
 ether, while the shadow of the cottage lay black on the garden behind. I
 entered this by the open wicket, and anxiously examined each window. At
 length I detected a ray of light struggling through a closed shutter in one
 of the upper rooms--it was a novel feeling, alas! to look at any house
 and say there dwells its usual inmate--the door of the house was merely
 on the latch: so I entered and ascended the moon-lit staircase. The door of
 the inhabited room was ajar: looking in, I saw Lucy sitting as at work at
 the table on which the light stood; the implements of needlework were about
 her, but her hand had fallen on her lap, and her eyes, fixed on the ground,
 shewed by their vacancy that her thoughts wandered. Traces of care and
 watching had diminished her former attractions--but her simple dress and
 cap, her desponding attitude, and the single candle that cast its light
 upon her, gave for a moment a picturesque grouping to the whole. A fearful
 reality recalled me from the thought--a figure lay stretched on the bed
 covered by a sheet--her mother was dead, and Lucy, apart from all the
 world, deserted and alone, watched beside the corpse during the weary
 night. I entered the room, and my unexpected appearance at first drew a
 scream from the lone survivor of a dead nation; but she recognised me, and
 recovered herself, with the quick exercise of self-control habitual to her.
 "Did you not expect me?" I asked, in that low voice which the presence of
 the dead makes us as it were instinctively assume.
 
 "You are very good," replied she, "to have come yourself; I can never thank
 you sufficiently; but it is too late."
 
 "Too late," cried I, "what do you mean? It is not too late to take you from
 this deserted place, and conduct you to---"
 
 My own loss, which I had forgotten as I spoke, now made me turn away, while
 choking grief impeded my speech. I threw open the window, and looked on the
 cold, waning, ghastly, misshaped circle on high, and the chill white earth
 beneath--did the spirit of sweet Idris sail along the moon-frozen crystal
 air?--No, no, a more genial atmosphere, a lovelier habitation was surely
 hers!
 
 I indulged in this meditation for a moment, and then again addressed the
 mourner, who stood leaning against the bed with that expression of resigned
 despair, of complete misery, and a patient sufferance of it, which is far
 more touching than any of the insane ravings or wild gesticulation of
 untamed sorrow. I desired to draw her from this spot; but she opposed my
 wish. That class of persons whose imagination and sensibility have never
 been taken out of the narrow circle immediately in view, if they possess
 these qualities to any extent, are apt to pour their influence into the
 very realities which appear to destroy them, and to cling to these with
 double tenacity from not being able to comprehend any thing beyond. Thus
 Lucy, in desert England, in a dead world, wished to fulfil the usual
 ceremonies of the dead, such as were customary to the English country
 people, when death was a rare visitant, and gave us time to receive his
 dreaded usurpation with pomp and circumstance--going forth in procession
 to deliver the keys of the tomb into his conquering hand. She had already,
 alone as she was, accomplished some of these, and the work on which I found
 her employed, was her mother's shroud. My heart sickened at such detail of
 woe, which a female can endure, but which is more painful to the masculine
 spirit than deadliest struggle, or throes of unutterable but transient
 agony.
 
 This must not be, I told her; and then, as further inducement, I
 communicated to her my recent loss, and gave her the idea that she must
 come with me to take charge of the orphan children, whom the death of Idris
 had deprived of a mother's care. Lucy never resisted the call of a duty, so
 she yielded, and closing the casements and doors with care, she accompanied
 me back to Windsor. As we went she communicated to me the occasion of her
 mother's death. Either by some mischance she had got sight of Lucy's letter
 to Idris, or she had overheard her conversation with the countryman who
 bore it; however it might be, she obtained a knowledge of the appalling
 situation of herself and her daughter, her aged frame could not sustain the
 anxiety and horror this discovery instilled--she concealed her knowledge
 from Lucy, but brooded over it through sleepless nights, till fever and
 delirium, swift forerunners of death, disclosed the secret. Her life, which
 had long been hovering on its extinction, now yielded at once to the united
 effects of misery and sickness, and that same morning she had died.
 
 After the tumultuous emotions of the day, I was glad to find on my arrival
 at the inn that my companions had retired to rest. I gave Lucy in charge to
 the Countess's attendant, and then sought repose from my various struggles
 and impatient regrets. For a few moments the events of the day floated in
 disastrous pageant through my brain, till sleep bathed it in forgetfulness;
 when morning dawned and I awoke, it seemed as if my slumber had endured for
 years.
 
 My companions had not shared my oblivion. Clara's swollen eyes shewed that
 she has passed the night in weeping. The Countess looked haggard and wan.
 Her firm spirit had not found relief in tears, and she suffered the more
 from all the painful retrospect and agonizing regret that now occupied her.
 We departed from Windsor, as soon as the burial rites had been performed
 for Lucy's mother, and, urged on by an impatient desire to change the
 scene, went forward towards Dover with speed, our escort having gone before
 to provide horses; finding them either in the warm stables they
 instinctively sought during the cold weather, or standing shivering in the
 bleak fields ready to surrender their liberty in exchange for offered
 corn.
 
 During our ride the Countess recounted to me the extraordinary
 circumstances which had brought her so strangely to my side in the chancel
 of St. George's chapel. When last she had taken leave of Idris, as she
 looked anxiously on her faded person and pallid countenance, she had
 suddenly been visited by a conviction that she saw her for the last time.
 It was hard to part with her while under the dominion of this sentiment,
 and for the last time she endeavoured to persuade her daughter to commit
 herself to her nursing, permitting me to join Adrian. Idris mildly refused,
 and thus they separated. The idea that they should never again meet grew on
 the Countess's mind, and haunted her perpetually; a thousand times she had
 resolved to turn back and join us, and was again and again restrained by
 the pride and anger of which she was the slave. Proud of heart as she was,
 she bathed her pillow with nightly tears, and through the day was subdued
 by nervous agitation and expectation of the dreaded event, which she was
 wholly incapable of curbing. She confessed that at this period her hatred
 of me knew no bounds, since she considered me as the sole obstacle to the
 fulfilment of her dearest wish, that of attending upon her daughter in her
 last moments. She desired to express her fears to her son, and to seek
 consolation from his sympathy with, or courage from his rejection of, her
 auguries.
 
 On the first day of her arrival at Dover she walked with him on the sea
 beach, and with the timidity characteristic of passionate and exaggerated
 feeling was by degrees bringing the conversation to the desired point, when
 she could communicate her fears to him, when the messenger who bore my
 letter announcing our temporary return to Windsor, came riding down to
 them. He gave some oral account of how he had left us, and added, that
 notwithstanding the cheerfulness and good courage of Lady Idris, he was
 afraid that she would hardly reach Windsor alive. "True," said the Countess,
 "your fears are just, she is about to expire!"
 
 As she spoke, her eyes were fixed on a tomblike hollow of the cliff, and
 she saw, she averred the same to me with solemnity, Idris pacing slowly
 towards this cave. She was turned from her, her head was bent down, her
 white dress was such as she was accustomed to wear, except that a thin
 crape-like veil covered her golden tresses, and concealed her as a dim
 transparent mist. She looked dejected, as docilely yielding to a commanding
 power; she submissively entered, and was lost in the dark recess.
 
 "Were I subject to visionary moods," said the venerable lady, as she
 continued her narrative, "I might doubt my eyes, and condemn my credulity;
 but reality is the world I live in, and what I saw I doubt not had
 existence beyond myself. From that moment I could not rest; it was worth my
 existence to see her once again before she died; I knew that I should not
 accomplish this, yet I must endeavour. I immediately departed for Windsor;
 and, though I was assured that we travelled speedily, it seemed to me that
 our progress was snail-like, and that delays were created solely for my
 annoyance. Still I accused you, and heaped on your head the fiery ashes of
 my burning impatience. It was no disappointment, though an agonizing pang,
 when you pointed to her last abode; and words would ill express the
 abhorrence I that moment felt towards you, the triumphant impediment to my
 dearest wishes. I saw her, and anger, and hate, and injustice died at her
 bier, giving place at their departure to a remorse (Great God, that I
 should feel it!) which must last while memory and feeling endure."
 
 To medicine such remorse, to prevent awakening love and new-born mildness
 from producing the same bitter fruit that hate and harshness had done, I
 devoted all my endeavours to soothe the venerable penitent. Our party was a
 melancholy one; each was possessed by regret for what was remediless; for
 the absence of his mother shadowed even the infant gaiety of Evelyn. Added
 to this was the prospect of the uncertain future. Before the final
 accomplishment of any great voluntary change the mind vacillates, now
 soothing itself by fervent expectation, now recoiling from obstacles which
 seem never to have presented themselves before with so frightful an aspect.
 An involuntary tremor ran through me when I thought that in another day we
 might have crossed the watery barrier, and have set forward on that
 hopeless, interminable, sad wandering, which but a short time before I
 regarded as the only relief to sorrow that our situation afforded.
 
 Our approach to Dover was announced by the loud roarings of the wintry sea.
 They were borne miles inland by the sound-laden blast, and by their
 unaccustomed uproar, imparted a feeling of insecurity and peril to our
 stable abode. At first we hardly permitted ourselves to think that any
 unusual eruption of nature caused this tremendous war of air and water, but
 rather fancied that we merely listened to what we had heard a thousand
 times before, when we had watched the flocks of fleece-crowned waves,
 driven by the winds, come to lament and die on the barren sands and pointed
 rocks. But we found upon advancing farther, that Dover was overflowed--
 many of the houses were overthrown by the surges which filled the streets,
 and with hideous brawlings sometimes retreated leaving the pavement of the
 town bare, till again hurried forward by the influx of ocean, they returned
 with thunder-sound to their usurped station.
 
 Hardly less disturbed than the tempestuous world of waters was the assembly
 of human beings, that from the cliff fearfully watched its ravings. On the
 morning of the arrival of the emigrants under the conduct of Adrian, the
 sea had been serene and glassy, the slight ripples refracted the sunbeams,
 which shed their radiance through the clear blue frosty air. This placid
 appearance of nature was hailed as a good augury for the voyage, and the
 chief immediately repaired to the harbour to examine two steamboats which
 were moored there. On the following midnight, when all were at rest, a
 frightful storm of wind and clattering rain and hail first disturbed them,
 and the voice of one shrieking in the streets, that the sleepers must awake
 or they would be drowned; and when they rushed out, half clothed, to
 discover the meaning of this alarm, they found that the tide, rising above
 every mark, was rushing into the town. They ascended the cliff, but the
 darkness permitted only the white crest of waves to be seen, while the
 roaring wind mingled its howlings in dire accord with the wild surges. The
 awful hour of night, the utter inexperience of many who had never seen the
 sea before, the wailing of women and cries of children added to the horror
 of the tumult. All the following day the same scene continued. When the tide
 ebbed, the town was left dry; but on its flow, it rose even higher than on
 the preceding night. The vast ships that lay rotting in the roads were
 whirled from their anchorage, and driven and jammed against the cliff, the
 vessels in the harbour were flung on land like sea-weed, and there battered
 to pieces by the breakers. The waves dashed against the cliff, which if in
 any place it had been before loosened, now gave way, and the affrighted
 crowd saw vast fragments of the near earth fall with crash and roar into
 the deep. This sight operated differently on different persons. The greater
 part thought it a judgment of God, to prevent or punish our emigration from
 our native land. Many were doubly eager to quit a nook of ground now become
 their prison, which appeared unable to resist the inroads of ocean's giant
 waves.
 
 When we arrived at Dover, after a fatiguing day's journey, we all required
 rest and sleep; but the scene acting around us soon drove away such ideas.
 We were drawn, along with the greater part of our companions, to the edge
 of the cliff, there to listen to and make a thousand conjectures. A fog
 narrowed our horizon to about a quarter of a mile, and the misty veil, cold
 and dense, enveloped sky and sea in equal obscurity. What added to our
 inquietude was the circumstance that two-thirds of our original number were
 now waiting for us in Paris, and clinging, as we now did most painfully, to
 any addition to our melancholy remnant, this division, with the tameless
 impassable ocean between, struck us with affright. At length, after
 loitering for several hours on the cliff, we retired to Dover Castle, whose
 roof sheltered all who breathed the English air, and sought the sleep
 necessary to restore strength and courage to our worn frames and languid
 spirits.
 
 Early in the morning Adrian brought me the welcome intelligence that the
 wind had changed: it had been south-west; it was now north-east. The sky
 was stripped bare of clouds by the increasing gale, while the tide at its
 ebb seceded entirely from the town. The change of wind rather increased the
 fury of the sea, but it altered its late dusky hue to a bright green; and
 in spite of its unmitigated clamour, its more cheerful appearance instilled
 hope and pleasure. All day we watched the ranging of the mountainous waves,
 and towards sunset a desire to decypher the promise for the morrow at its
 setting, made us all gather with one accord on the edge of the cliff. When
 the mighty luminary approached within a few degrees of the tempest-tossed
 horizon, suddenly, a wonder! three other suns, alike burning and brilliant,
 rushed from various quarters of the heavens towards the great orb; they
 whirled round it. The glare of light was intense to our dazzled eyes; the
 sun itself seemed to join in the dance, while the sea burned like a
 furnace, like all Vesuvius a-light, with flowing lava beneath. The horses
 broke loose from their stalls in terror--a herd of cattle, panic struck,
 raced down to the brink of the cliff, and blinded by light, plunged down
 with frightful yells in the waves below. The time occupied by the
 apparition of these meteors was comparatively short; suddenly the three
 mock suns united in one, and plunged into the sea. A few seconds
 afterwards, a deafening watery sound came up with awful peal from the spot
 where they had disappeared.
 
 Meanwhile the sun, disencumbered from his strange satellites, paced with
 its accustomed majesty towards its western home. When--we dared not trust
 our eyes late dazzled, but it seemed that--the sea rose to meet it--it
 mounted higher and higher, till the fiery globe was obscured, and the wall
 of water still ascended the horizon; it appeared as if suddenly the motion
 of earth was revealed to us--as if no longer we were ruled by ancient
 laws, but were turned adrift in an unknown region of space. Many cried
 aloud, that these were no meteors, but globes of burning matter, which had
 set fire to the earth, and caused the vast cauldron at our feet to bubble
 up with its measureless waves; the day of judgment was come they averred,
 and a few moments would transport us before the awful countenance of the
 omnipotent judge; while those less given to visionary terrors, declared
 that two conflicting gales had occasioned the last phaenomenon. In support
 of this opinion they pointed out the fact that the east wind died away,
 while the rushing of the coming west mingled its wild howl with the roar of
 the advancing waters. Would the cliff resist this new battery? Was not the
 giant wave far higher than the precipice? Would not our little island be
 deluged by its approach? The crowd of spectators fled. They were dispersed
 over the fields, stopping now and then, and looking back in terror. A
 sublime sense of awe calmed the swift pulsations of my heart--I awaited
 the approach of the destruction menaced, with that solemn resignation which
 an unavoidable necessity instils. The ocean every moment assumed a more
 terrific aspect, while the twilight was dimmed by the rack which the west
 wind spread over the sky. By slow degrees however, as the wave advanced, it
 took a more mild appearance; some under current of air, or obstruction in
 the bed of the waters, checked its progress, and it sank gradually; while
 the surface of the sea became uniformly higher as it dissolved into it.
 This change took from us the fear of an immediate catastrophe, although we
 were still anxious as to the final result. We continued during the whole
 night to watch the fury of the sea and the pace of the driving clouds,
 through whose openings the rare stars rushed impetuously; the thunder of
 conflicting elements deprived us of all power to sleep.
 
 This endured ceaselessly for three days and nights. The stoutest hearts
 quailed before the savage enmity of nature; provisions began to fail us,
 though every day foraging parties were dispersed to the nearer towns. In
 vain we schooled ourselves into the belief, that there was nothing out of
 the common order of nature in the strife we witnessed; our disasterous and
 overwhelming destiny turned the best of us to cowards. Death had hunted us
 through the course of many months, even to the narrow strip of time on
 which we now stood; narrow indeed, and buffeted by storms, was our footway
 overhanging the great sea of calamity--
 
   As an unsheltered northern shore
   Is shaken by the wintry wave--
   And frequent storms for evermore,
   (While from the west the loud winds rave,
   Or from the east, or mountains hoar)
   The struck and tott'ring sand-bank lave.[1]
 
 It required more than human energy to bear up against the menaces of
 destruction that every where surrounded us.
 
 After the lapse of three days, the gale died away, the sea-gull sailed upon
 the calm bosom of the windless atmosphere, and the last yellow leaf on the
 topmost branch of the oak hung without motion. The sea no longer broke with
 fury; but a swell setting in steadily for shore, with long sweep and sullen
 burst replaced the roar of the breakers. Yet we derived hope from the
 change, and we did not doubt that after the interval of a few days the sea
 would resume its tranquillity. The sunset of the fourth day favoured this
 idea; it was clear and golden. As we gazed on the purple sea, radiant
 beneath, we were attracted by a novel spectacle; a dark speck--as it
 neared, visibly a boat--rode on the top of the waves, every now and then
 lost in the steep vallies between. We marked its course with eager
 questionings; and, when we saw that it evidently made for shore, we
 descended to the only practicable landing place, and hoisted a signal to
 direct them. By the help of glasses we distinguished her crew; it consisted
 of nine men, Englishmen, belonging in truth to the two divisions of our
 people, who had preceded us, and had been for several weeks at Paris. As
 countryman was wont to meet countryman in distant lands, did we greet our
 visitors on their landing, with outstretched hands and gladsome welcome.
 They were slow to reciprocate our gratulations. They looked angry and
 resentful; not less than the chafed sea which they had traversed with
 imminent peril, though apparently more displeased with each other than with
 us. It was strange to see these human beings, who appeared to be given
 forth by the earth like rare and inestimable plants, full of towering
 passion, and the spirit of angry contest. Their first demand was to be
 conducted to the Lord Protector of England, so they called Adrian, though
 he had long discarded the empty title, as a bitter mockery of the shadow to
 which the Protectorship was now reduced. They were speedily led to Dover
 Castle, from whose keep Adrian had watched the movements of the boat. He
 received them with the interest and wonder so strange a visitation created.
 In the confusion occasioned by their angry demands for precedence, it was
 long before we could discover the secret meaning of this strange scene. By
 degrees, from the furious declamations of one, the fierce interruptions of
 another, and the bitter scoffs of a third, we found that they were deputies
 from our colony at Paris, from three parties there formed, who, each with
 angry rivalry, tried to attain a superiority over the other two. These
 deputies had been dispatched by them to Adrian, who had been selected
 arbiter; and they had journied from Paris to Calais, through the vacant
 towns and desolate country, indulging the while violent hatred against each
 other; and now they pleaded their several causes with unmitigated
 party-spirit.
 
 By examining the deputies apart, and after much investigation, we learnt
 the true state of things at Paris. Since parliament had elected him
 Ryland's deputy, all the surviving English had submitted to Adrian. He was
 our captain to lead us from our native soil to unknown lands, our lawgiver
 and our preserver. On the first arrangement of our scheme of emigration, no
 continued separation of our members was contemplated, and the command of
 the whole body in gradual ascent of power had its apex in the Earl of
 Windsor. But unforeseen circumstances changed our plans for us, and
 occasioned the greater part of our numbers to be divided for the space of
 nearly two months, from the supreme chief. They had gone over in two
 distinct bodies; and on their arrival at Paris dissension arose between
 them.
 
 They had found Paris a desert. When first the plague had appeared, the
 return of travellers and merchants, and communications by letter, informed
 us regularly of the ravages made by disease on the continent. But with the
 encreased mortality this intercourse declined and ceased. Even in England
 itself communication from one part of the island to the other became slow
 and rare. No vessel stemmed the flood that divided Calais from Dover; or if
 some melancholy voyager, wishing to assure himself of the life or death of
 his relatives, put from the French shore to return among us, often the
 greedy ocean swallowed his little craft, or after a day or two he was
 infected by the disorder, and died before he could tell the tale of the
 desolation of France. We were therefore to a great degree ignorant of the
 state of things on the continent, and were not without some vague hope of
 finding numerous companions in its wide track. But the same causes that had
 so fearfully diminished the English nation had had even greater scope for
 mischief in the sister land. France was a blank; during the long line of
 road from Calais to Paris not one human being was found. In Paris there
 were a few, perhaps a hundred, who, resigned to their coming fate, flitted
 about the streets of the capital and assembled to converse of past times,
 with that vivacity and even gaiety that seldom deserts the individuals of
 this nation.
 
 The English took uncontested possession of Paris. Its high houses and
 narrow streets were lifeless. A few pale figures were to be distinguished
 at the accustomed resort at the Tuileries; they wondered wherefore the
 islanders should approach their ill-fated city--for in the excess of
 wretchedness, the sufferers always imagine, that their part of the calamity
 is the bitterest, as, when enduring intense pain, we would exchange the
 particular torture we writhe under, for any other which should visit a
 different part of the frame. They listened to the account the emigrants
 gave of their motives for leaving their native land, with a shrug almost of
 disdain--"Return," they said, "return to your island, whose sea breezes,
 and division from the continent gives some promise of health; if Pestilence
 among you has slain its hundreds, with us it has slain its thousands. Are
 you not even now more numerous than we are?--A year ago you would have
 found only the sick burying the dead; now we are happier; for the pang of
 struggle has passed away, and the few you find here are patiently waiting
 the final blow. But you, who are not content to die, breathe no longer the
 air of France, or soon you will only be a part of her soil."
 
 Thus, by menaces of the sword, they would have driven back those who had
 escaped from fire. But the peril left behind was deemed imminent by my
 countrymen; that before them doubtful and distant; and soon other feelings
 arose to obliterate fear, or to replace it by passions, that ought to have
 had no place among a brotherhood of unhappy survivors of the expiring
 world.
 
 The more numerous division of emigrants, which arrived first at Paris,
 assumed a superiority of rank and power; the second party asserted their
 independence. A third was formed by a sectarian, a self-erected prophet,
 who, while he attributed all power and rule to God, strove to get the real
 command of his comrades into his own hands. This third division consisted
 of fewest individuals, but their purpose was more one, their obedience to
 their leader more entire, their fortitude and courage more unyielding and
 active.
 
 During the whole progress of the plague, the teachers of religion were in
 possession of great power; a power of good, if rightly directed, or of
 incalculable mischief, if fanaticism or intolerance guided their efforts.
 In the present instance, a worse feeling than either of these actuated the
 leader. He was an impostor in the most determined sense of the term. A man
 who had in early life lost, through the indulgence of vicious propensities,
 all sense of rectitude or self-esteem; and who, when ambition was awakened
 in him, gave himself up to its influence unbridled by any scruple. His
 father had been a methodist preacher, an enthusiastic man with simple
 intentions; but whose pernicious doctrines of election and special grace
 had contributed to destroy all conscientious feeling in his son. During the
 progress of the pestilence he had entered upon various schemes, by which to
 acquire adherents and power. Adrian had discovered and defeated these
 attempts; but Adrian was absent; the wolf assumed the shepherd's garb, and
 the flock admitted the deception: he had formed a party during the few
 weeks he had been in Paris, who zealously propagated the creed of his
 divine mission, and believed that safety and salvation were to be afforded
 only to those who put their trust in him.
 
 When once the spirit of dissension had arisen, the most frivolous causes
 gave it activity. The first party, on arriving at Paris, had taken
 possession of the Tuileries; chance and friendly feeling had induced the
 second to lodge near to them. A contest arose concerning the distribution
 of the pillage; the chiefs of the first division demanded that the whole
 should be placed at their disposal; with this assumption the opposite party
 refused to comply. When next the latter went to forage, the gates of Paris
 were shut on them. After overcoming this difficulty, they marched in a body
 to the Tuileries. They found that their enemies had been already expelled
 thence by the Elect, as the fanatical party designated themselves, who
 refused to admit any into the palace who did not first abjure obedience to
 all except God, and his delegate on earth, their chief. Such was the
 beginning of the strife, which at length proceeded so far, that the three
 divisions, armed, met in the Place Vendome, each resolved to subdue by
 force the resistance of its adversaries. They assembled, their muskets were
 loaded, and even pointed at the breasts of their so called enemies. One
 word had been sufficient; and there the last of mankind would have
 burthened their souls with the crime of murder, and dipt their hands in
 each other's blood. A sense of shame, a recollection that not only their
 cause, but the existence of the whole human race was at stake, entered the
 breast of the leader of the more numerous party. He was aware, that if the
 ranks were thinned, no other recruits could fill them up; that each man was
 as a priceless gem in a kingly crown, which if destroyed, the earth's deep
 entrails could yield no paragon. He was a young man, and had been hurried
 on by presumption, and the notion of his high rank and superiority to all
 other pretenders; now he repented his work, he felt that all the blood
 about to be shed would be on his head; with sudden impulse therefore he
 spurred his horse between the bands, and, having fixed a white handkerchief
 on the point of his uplifted sword, thus demanded parley; the opposite
 leaders obeyed the signal. He spoke with warmth; he reminded them of the
 oath all the chiefs had taken to submit to the Lord Protector; he declared
 their present meeting to be an act of treason and mutiny; he allowed that
 he had been hurried away by passion, but that a cooler moment had arrived;
 and he proposed that each party should send deputies to the Earl of
 Windsor, inviting his interference and offering submission to his decision.
 His offer was accepted so far, that each leader consented to command a
 retreat, and moreover agreed, that after the approbation of their several
 parties had been consulted, they should meet that night on some neutral
 spot to ratify the truce. At the meeting of the chiefs, this plan was
 finally concluded upon. The leader of the fanatics indeed refused to admit
 the arbitration of Adrian; he sent ambassadors, rather than deputies, to
 assert his claim, not plead his cause.
 
 The truce was to continue until the first of February, when the bands were
 again to assemble on the Place Vendome; it was of the utmost consequence
 therefore that Adrian should arrive in Paris by that day, since an hair
 might turn the scale, and peace, scared away by intestine broils, might
 only return to watch by the silent dead. It was now the twenty-eighth of
 January; every vessel stationed near Dover had been beaten to pieces and
 destroyed by the furious storms I have commemorated. Our journey however
 would admit of no delay. That very night, Adrian, and I, and twelve others,
 either friends or attendants, put off from the English shore, in the boat
 that had brought over the deputies. We all took our turn at the oar; and
 the immediate occasion of our departure affording us abundant matter for
 conjecture and discourse, prevented the feeling that we left our native
 country, depopulate England, for the last time, to enter deeply into the
 minds of the greater part of our number. It was a serene starlight night,
 and the dark line of the English coast continued for some time visible at
 intervals, as we rose on the broad back of the waves. I exerted myself with
 my long oar to give swift impulse to our skiff; and, while the waters
 splashed with melancholy sound against its sides, I looked with sad
 affection on this last glimpse of sea-girt England, and strained my eyes
 not too soon to lose sight of the castellated cliff, which rose to protect
 the land of heroism and beauty from the inroads of ocean, that, turbulent
 as I had lately seen it, required such cyclopean walls for its repulsion. A
 solitary sea-gull winged its flight over our heads, to seek its nest in a
 cleft of the precipice. Yes, thou shalt revisit the land of thy birth, I
 thought, as I looked invidiously on the airy voyager; but we shall, never
 more! Tomb of Idris, farewell! Grave, in which my heart lies sepultured,
 farewell for ever!
 
 We were twelve hours at sea, and the heavy swell obliged us to exert all
 our strength. At length, by mere dint of rowing, we reached the French
 coast. The stars faded, and the grey morning cast a dim veil over the
 silver horns of the waning moon--the sun rose broad and red from the sea,
 as we walked over the sands to Calais. Our first care was to procure
 horses, and although wearied by our night of watching and toil, some of our
 party immediately went in quest of these in the wide fields of the
 unenclosed and now barren plain round Calais. We divided ourselves, like
 seamen, into watches, and some reposed, while others prepared the morning's
 repast. Our foragers returned at noon with only six horses--on these,
 Adrian and I, and four others, proceeded on our journey towards the great
 city, which its inhabitants had fondly named the capital of the civilized
 world. Our horses had become, through their long holiday, almost wild, and
 we crossed the plain round Calais with impetuous speed. From the height
 near Boulogne, I turned again to look on England; nature had cast a misty
 pall over her, her cliff was hidden--there was spread the watery barrier
 that divided us, never again to be crossed; she lay on the ocean plain,
 
   In the great pool a swan's nest.
 
 Ruined the nest, alas! the swans of Albion had passed away for ever--an
 uninhabited rock in the wide Pacific, which had remained since the
 creation uninhabited, unnamed, unmarked, would be of as much account in
 the world's future history, as desert England.
 
 Our journey was impeded by a thousand obstacles. As our horses grew tired,
 we had to seek for others; and hours were wasted, while we exhausted our
 artifices to allure some of these enfranchised slaves of man to resume the
 yoke; or as we went from stable to stable through the towns, hoping to find
 some who had not forgotten the shelter of their native stalls. Our ill
 success in procuring them, obliged us continually to leave some one of our
 companions behind; and on the first of February, Adrian and I entered
 Paris, wholly unaccompanied. The serene morning had dawned when we arrived
 at Saint Denis, and the sun was high, when the clamour of voices, and the
 clash, as we feared, of weapons, guided us to where our countrymen had
 assembled on the Place Vendome. We passed a knot of Frenchmen, who were
 talking earnestly of the madness of the insular invaders, and then coming
 by a sudden turn upon the Place, we saw the sun glitter on drawn swords and
 fixed bayonets, while yells and clamours rent the air. It was a scene of
 unaccustomed confusion in these days of depopulation. Roused by fancied
 wrongs, and insulting scoffs, the opposite parties had rushed to attack
 each other; while the elect, drawn up apart, seemed to wait an opportunity
 to fall with better advantage on their foes, when they should have mutually
 weakened each other. A merciful power interposed, and no blood was shed;
 for, while the insane mob were in the very act of attack, the females,
 wives, mothers and daughters, rushed between; they seized the bridles; they
 embraced the knees of the horsemen, and hung on the necks, or enweaponed
 arms of their enraged relatives; the shrill female scream was mingled with
 the manly shout, and formed the wild clamour that welcomed us on our
 arrival.
 
 Our voices could not be heard in the tumult; Adrian however was eminent for
 the white charger he rode; spurring him, he dashed into the midst of the
 throng: he was recognized, and a loud cry raised for England and the
 Protector. The late adversaries, warmed to affection at the sight of him,
 joined in heedless confusion, and surrounded him; the women kissed his
 hands, and the edges of his garments; nay, his horse received tribute of
 their embraces; some wept their welcome; he appeared an angel of peace
 descended among them; and the only danger was, that his mortal nature would
 be demonstrated, by his suffocation from the kindness of his friends. His
 voice was at length heard, and obeyed; the crowd fell back; the chiefs
 alone rallied round him. I had seen Lord Raymond ride through his lines;
 his look of victory, and majestic mien obtained the respect and obedience
 of all: such was not the appearance or influence of Adrian. His slight
 figure, his fervent look, his gesture, more of deprecation than rule, were
 proofs that love, unmingled with fear, gave him dominion over the hearts of
 a multitude, who knew that he never flinched from danger, nor was actuated
 by other motives than care for the general welfare. No distinction was now
 visible between the two parties, late ready to shed each other's blood,
 for, though neither would submit to the other, they both yielded ready
 obedience to the Earl of Windsor.
 
 One party however remained, cut off from the rest, which did not sympathize
 in the joy exhibited on Adrian's arrival, or imbibe the spirit of peace,
 which fell like dew upon the softened hearts of their countrymen. At the
 head of this assembly was a ponderous, dark-looking man, whose malign eye
 surveyed with gloating delight the stern looks of his followers. They had
 hitherto been inactive, but now, perceiving themselves to be forgotten in
 the universal jubilee, they advanced with threatening gestures: our friends
 had, as it were in wanton contention, attacked each other; they wanted but
 to be told that their cause was one, for it to become so: their mutual
 anger had been a fire of straw, compared to the slow-burning hatred they
 both entertained for these seceders, who seized a portion of the world to
 come, there to entrench and incastellate themselves, and to issue with
 fearful sally, and appalling denunciations, on the mere common children of
 the earth. The first advance of the little army of the elect reawakened
 their rage; they grasped their arms, and waited but their leader's signal
 to commence the attack, when the clear tones of Adrian's voice were heard,
 commanding them to fall back; with confused murmur and hurried retreat, as
 the wave ebbs clamorously from the sands it lately covered, our friends
 obeyed. Adrian rode singly into the space between the opposing bands; he
 approached the hostile leader, as requesting him to imitate his example,
 but his look was not obeyed, and the chief advanced, followed by his whole
 troop. There were many women among them, who seemed more eager and resolute
 than their male companions. They pressed round their leader, as if to
 shield him, while they loudly bestowed on him every sacred denomination and
 epithet of worship. Adrian met them half way; they halted: "What," he said,
 "do you seek? Do you require any thing of us that we refuse to give, and
 that you are forced to acquire by arms and warfare?"
 
 His questions were answered by a general cry, in which the words election,
 sin, and red right arm of God, could alone be heard.
 
 Adrian looked expressly at their leader, saying, "Can you not silence your
 followers? Mine, you perceive, obey me."
 
 The fellow answered by a scowl; and then, perhaps fearful that his people
 should become auditors of the debate he expected to ensue, he commanded
 them to fall back, and advanced by himself. "What, I again ask," said
 Adrian, "do you require of us?"
 
 "Repentance," replied the man, whose sinister brow gathered clouds as he
 spoke. "Obedience to the will of the Most High, made manifest to these his
 Elected People. Do we not all die through your sins, O generation of
 unbelief, and have we not a right to demand of you repentance and
 obedience?"
 
 "And if we refuse them, what then?" his opponent inquired mildly.
 
 "Beware," cried the man, "God hears you, and will smite your stony heart in
 his wrath; his poisoned arrows fly, his dogs of death are unleashed! We
 will not perish unrevenged--and mighty will our avenger be, when he
 descends in visible majesty, and scatters destruction among you."
 
 "My good fellow," said Adrian, with quiet scorn, "I wish that you were
 ignorant only, and I think it would be no difficult task to prove to you,
 that you speak of what you do not understand. On the present occasion
 however, it is enough for me to know that you seek nothing of us; and,
 heaven is our witness, we seek nothing of you. I should be sorry to
 embitter by strife the few days that we any of us may have here to live;
 when there," he pointed downwards, "we shall not be able to contend, while
 here we need not. Go home, or stay; pray to your God in your own mode; your
 friends may do the like. My orisons consist in peace and good will, in
 resignation and hope. Farewell!"
 
 He bowed slightly to the angry disputant who was about to reply; and,
 turning his horse down Rue Saint Honore, called on his friends to follow
 him. He rode slowly, to give time to all to join him at the Barrier, and
 then issued his orders that those who yielded obedience to him, should
 rendezvous at Versailles. In the meantime he remained within the walls of
 Paris, until he had secured the safe retreat of all. In about a fortnight
 the remainder of the emigrants arrived from England, and they all repaired
 to Versailles; apartments were prepared for the family of the Protector in
 the Grand Trianon, and there, after the excitement of these events, we
 reposed amidst the luxuries of the departed Bourbons.
 
 [1] Chorus in Oedipus Coloneus.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 AFTER the repose of a few days, we held a council, to decide on our future
 movements. Our first plan had been to quit our wintry native latitude, and
 seek for our diminished numbers the luxuries and delights of a southern
 climate. We had not fixed on any precise spot as the termination of our
 wanderings; but a vague picture of perpetual spring, fragrant groves, and
 sparkling streams, floated in our imagination to entice us on. A variety of
 causes had detained us in England, and we had now arrived at the middle of
 February; if we pursued our original project, we should find ourselves in a
 worse situation than before, having exchanged our temperate climate for the
 intolerable heats of a summer in Egypt or Persia. We were therefore obliged
 to modify our plan, as the season continued to be inclement; and it was
 determined that we should await the arrival of spring in our present abode,
 and so order our future movements as to pass the hot months in the icy
 vallies of Switzerland, deferring our southern progress until the ensuing
 autumn, if such a season was ever again to be beheld by us.
 
 The castle and town of Versailles afforded our numbers ample accommodation,
 and foraging parties took it by turns to supply our wants. There was a
 strange and appalling motley in the situation of these the last of the
 race. At first I likened it to a colony, which borne over the far seas,
 struck root for the first time in a new country. But where was the bustle
 and industry characteristic of such an assemblage; the rudely constructed
 dwelling, which was to suffice till a more commodious mansion could be
 built; the marking out of fields; the attempt at cultivation; the eager
 curiosity to discover unknown animals and herbs; the excursions for the
 sake of exploring the country? Our habitations were palaces our food was
 ready stored in granaries--there was no need of labour, no
 inquisitiveness, no restless desire to get on. If we had been assured that
 we should secure the lives of our present numbers, there would have been
 more vivacity and hope in our councils. We should have discussed as to the
 period when the existing produce for man's sustenance would no longer
 suffice for us, and what mode of life we should then adopt. We should have
 considered more carefully our future plans, and debated concerning the spot
 where we should in future dwell. But summer and the plague were near, and
 we dared not look forward. Every heart sickened at the thought of
 amusement; if the younger part of our community were ever impelled, by
 youthful and untamed hilarity, to enter on any dance or song, to cheer the
 melancholy time, they would suddenly break off, checked by a mournful look
 or agonizing sigh from any one among them, who was prevented by sorrows and
 losses from mingling in the festivity. If laughter echoed under our roof,
 yet the heart was vacant of joy; and, when ever it chanced that I witnessed
 such attempts at pastime, they encreased instead of diminishing my sense of
 woe. In the midst of the pleasure-hunting throng, I would close my eyes,
 and see before me the obscure cavern, where was garnered the mortality of
 Idris, and the dead lay around, mouldering in hushed repose. When I again
 became aware of the present hour, softest melody of Lydian flute, or
 harmonious maze of graceful dance, was but as the demoniac chorus in the
 Wolf's Glen, and the caperings of the reptiles that surrounded the magic
 circle.
 
 My dearest interval of peace occurred, when, released from the obligation
 of associating with the crowd, I could repose in the dear home where my
 children lived. Children I say, for the tenderest emotions of paternity
 bound me to Clara. She was now fourteen; sorrow, and deep insight into the
 scenes around her, calmed the restless spirit of girlhood; while the
 remembrance of her father whom she idolized, and respect for me and Adrian,
 implanted an high sense of duty in her young heart. Though serious she was
 not sad; the eager desire that makes us all, when young, plume our wings,
 and stretch our necks, that we may more swiftly alight tiptoe on the height
 of maturity, was subdued in her by early experience. All that she could
 spare of overflowing love from her parents' memory, and attention to her
 living relatives, was spent upon religion. This was the hidden law of her
 heart, which she concealed with childish reserve, and cherished the more
 because it was secret. What faith so entire, what charity so pure, what
 hope so fervent, as that of early youth? and she, all love, all tenderness
 and trust, who from infancy had been tossed on the wide sea of passion and
 misfortune, saw the finger of apparent divinity in all, and her best hope
 was to make herself acceptable to the power she worshipped. Evelyn was only
 five years old; his joyous heart was incapable of sorrow, and he enlivened
 our house with the innocent mirth incident to his years.
 
 The aged Countess of Windsor had fallen from her dream of power, rank and
 grandeur; she had been suddenly seized with the conviction, that love was
 the only good of life, virtue the only ennobling distinction and enriching
 wealth. Such a lesson had been taught her by the dead lips of her neglected
 daughter; and she devoted herself, with all the fiery violence of her
 character, to the obtaining the affection of the remnants of her family. In
 early years the heart of Adrian had been chilled towards her; and, though
 he observed a due respect, her coldness, mixed with the recollection of
 disappointment and madness, caused him to feel even pain in her society.
 She saw this, and yet determined to win his love; the obstacle served the
 rather to excite her ambition. As Henry, Emperor of Germany, lay in the
 snow before Pope Leo's gate for three winter days and nights, so did she in
 humility wait before the icy barriers of his closed heart, till he, the
 servant of love, and prince of tender courtesy, opened it wide for her
 admittance, bestowing, with fervency and gratitude, the tribute of filial
 affection she merited. Her understanding, courage, and presence of mind,
 became powerful auxiliaries to him in the difficult task of ruling the
 tumultuous crowd, which were subjected to his control, in truth by a single
 hair.
 
 The principal circumstances that disturbed our tranquillity during this
 interval, originated in the vicinity of the impostor-prophet and his
 followers. They continued to reside at Paris; but missionaries from among
 them often visited Versailles--and such was the power of assertions,
 however false, yet vehemently iterated, over the ready credulity of the
 ignorant and fearful, that they seldom failed in drawing over to their
 party some from among our numbers. An instance of this nature coming
 immediately under our notice, we were led to consider the miserable state
 in which we should leave our countrymen, when we should, at the approach of
 summer, move on towards Switzerland, and leave a deluded crew behind us in
 the hands of their miscreant leader. The sense of the smallness of our
 numbers, and expectation of decrease, pressed upon us; and, while it would
 be a subject of congratulation to ourselves to add one to our party, it
 would be doubly gratifying to rescue from the pernicious influence of
 superstition and unrelenting tyranny, the victims that now, though
 voluntarily enchained, groaned beneath it. If we had considered the
 preacher as sincere in a belief of his own denunciations, or only
 moderately actuated by kind feeling in the exercise of his assumed powers,
 we should have immediately addressed ourselves to him, and endeavoured with
 our best arguments to soften and humanize his views. But he was instigated
 by ambition, he desired to rule over these last stragglers from the fold of
 death; his projects went so far, as to cause him to calculate that, if,
 from these crushed remains, a few survived, so that a new race should
 spring up, he, by holding tight the reins of belief, might be remembered by
 the post-pestilential race as a patriarch, a prophet, nay a deity; such as
 of old among the post-diluvians were Jupiter the conqueror, Serapis the
 lawgiver, and Vishnou the preserver. These ideas made him inflexible in his
 rule, and violent in his hate of any who presumed to share with him his
 usurped empire.
 
 It is a strange fact, but incontestible, that the philanthropist, who
 ardent in his desire to do good, who patient, reasonable and gentle, yet
 disdains to use other argument than truth, has less influence over men's
 minds, than he who, grasping and selfish, refuses not to adopt any means,
 nor awaken any passion, nor diffuse any falsehood, for the advancement of
 his cause. If this from time immemorial has been the case, the contrast was
 infinitely greater, now that the one could bring harrowing fears and
 transcendent hopes into play; while the other had few hopes to hold forth,
 nor could influence the imagination to diminish the fears which he himself
 was the first to entertain. The preacher had persuaded his followers, that
 their escape from the plague, the salvation of their children, and the rise
 of a new race of men from their seed, depended on their faith in, and their
 submission to him. They greedily imbibed this belief; and their
 over-weening credulity even rendered them eager to make converts to the
 same faith.
 
 How to seduce any individuals from such an alliance of fraud, was a
 frequent subject of Adrian's meditations and discourse. He formed many
 plans for the purpose; but his own troop kept him in full occupation to
 ensure their fidelity and safety; beside which the preacher was as cautious
 and prudent, as he was cruel. His victims lived under the strictest rules
 and laws, which either entirely imprisoned them within the Tuileries, or
 let them out in such numbers, and under such leaders, as precluded the
 possibility of controversy. There was one among them however whom I
 resolved to save; she had been known to us in happier days; Idris had loved
 her; and her excellent nature made it peculiarly lamentable that she should
 be sacrificed by this merciless cannibal of souls.
 
 This man had between two and three hundred persons enlisted under his
 banners. More than half of them were women; there were about fifty children
 of all ages; and not more than eighty men. They were mostly drawn from that
 which, when such distinctions existed, was denominated the lower rank of
 society. The exceptions consisted of a few high-born females, who,
 panic-struck, and tamed by sorrow, had joined him. Among these was one,
 young, lovely, and enthusiastic, whose very goodness made her a more easy
 victim. I have mentioned her before: Juliet, the youngest daughter, and now
 sole relic of the ducal house of L---. There are some beings, whom fate
 seems to select on whom to pour, in unmeasured portion, the vials of her
 wrath, and whom she bathes even to the lips in misery. Such a one was the
 ill-starred Juliet. She had lost her indulgent parents, her brothers and
 sisters, companions of her youth; in one fell swoop they had been carried
 off from her. Yet she had again dared to call herself happy; united to her
 admirer, to him who possessed and filled her whole heart, she yielded to
 the lethean powers of love, and knew and felt only his life and presence.
 At the very time when with keen delight she welcomed the tokens of
 maternity, this sole prop of her life failed, her husband died of the
 plague. For a time she had been lulled in insanity; the birth of her child
 restored her to the cruel reality of things, but gave her at the same time
 an object for whom to preserve at once life and reason. Every friend and
 relative had died off, and she was reduced to solitude and penury; deep
 melancholy and angry impatience distorted her judgment, so that she could
 not persuade herself to disclose her distress to us. When she heard of the
 plan of universal emigration, she resolved to remain behind with her
 child, and alone in wide England to live or die, as fate might decree,
 beside the grave of her beloved. She had hidden herself in one of the many
 empty habitations of London; it was she who rescued my Idris on the fatal
 twentieth of November, though my immediate danger, and the subsequent
 illness of Idris, caused us to forget our hapless friend. This circumstance
 had however brought her again in contact with her fellow-creatures; a
 slight illness of her infant, proved to her that she was still bound to
 humanity by an indestructible tie; to preserve this little creature's life
 became the object of her being, and she joined the first division of
 migrants who went over to Paris.
 
 She became an easy prey to the methodist; her sensibility and acute fears
 rendered her accessible to every impulse; her love for her child made her
 eager to cling to the merest straw held out to save him. Her mind, once
 unstrung, and now tuned by roughest inharmonious hands, made her credulous:
 beautiful as fabled goddess, with voice of unrivalled sweetness, burning
 with new lighted enthusiasm, she became a stedfast proselyte, and powerful
 auxiliary to the leader of the elect. I had remarked her in the crowd, on
 the day we met on the Place Vendome; and, recollecting suddenly her
 providential rescue of my lost one, on the night of the twentieth of
 November, I reproached myself for my neglect and ingratitude, and felt
 impelled to leave no means that I could adopt untried, to recall her to her
 better self, and rescue her from the fangs of the hypocrite destroyer.
 
 I will not, at this period of my story, record the artifices I used to
 penetrate the asylum of the Tuileries, or give what would be a tedious
 account of my stratagems, disappointments, and perseverance. I at last
 succeeded in entering these walls, and roamed its halls and corridors in
 eager hope to find my selected convert. In the evening I contrived to
 mingle unobserved with the congregation, which assembled in the chapel to
 listen to the crafty and eloquent harangue of their prophet. I saw Juliet
 near him. Her dark eyes, fearfully impressed with the restless glare of
 madness, were fixed on him; she held her infant, not yet a year old, in her
 arms; and care of it alone could distract her attention from the words to
 which she eagerly listened. After the sermon was over, the congregation
 dispersed; all quitted the chapel except she whom I sought; her babe had
 fallen asleep; so she placed it on a cushion, and sat on the floor beside,
 watching its tranquil slumber.
 
 I presented myself to her; for a moment natural feeling produced a
 sentiment of gladness, which disappeared again, when with ardent and
 affectionate exhortation I besought her to accompany me in flight from this
 den of superstition and misery. In a moment she relapsed into the delirium
 of fanaticism, and, but that her gentle nature forbade, would have loaded
 me with execrations. She conjured me, she commanded me to leave her--
 "Beware, O beware," she cried, "fly while yet your escape is practicable.
 Now you are safe; but strange sounds and inspirations come on me at times,
 and if the Eternal should in awful whisper reveal to me his will, that to
 save my child you must be sacrificed, I would call in the satellites of him
 you call the tyrant; they would tear you limb from limb; nor would I hallow
 the death of him whom Idris loved, by a single tear."
 
 She spoke hurriedly, with tuneless voice, and wild look; her child awoke,
 and, frightened, began to cry; each sob went to the ill-fated mother's
 heart, and she mingled the epithets of endearment she addressed to her
 infant, with angry commands that I should leave her. Had I had the means, I
 would have risked all, have torn her by force from the murderer's den, and
 trusted to the healing balm of reason and affection. But I had no choice,
 no power even of longer struggle; steps were heard along the gallery, and
 the voice of the preacher drew near. Juliet, straining her child in a close
 embrace, fled by another passage. Even then I would have followed her; but
 my foe and his satellites entered; I was surrounded, and taken prisoner.
 
 I remembered the menace of the unhappy Juliet, and expected the full
 tempest of the man's vengeance, and the awakened wrath of his followers, to
 fall instantly upon me. I was questioned. My answers were simple and
 sincere. "His own mouth condemns him," exclaimed the impostor; "he
 confesses that his intention was to seduce from the way of salvation our
 well-beloved sister in God; away with him to the dungeon; to-morrow he dies
 the death; we are manifestly called upon to make an example, tremendous and
 appalling, to scare the children of sin from our asylum of the saved."
 
 My heart revolted from his hypocritical jargon: but it was unworthy of me
 to combat in words with the ruffian; and my answer was cool; while, far
 from being possessed with fear, methought, even at the worst, a man true to
 himself, courageous and determined, could fight his way, even from the
 boards of the scaffold, through the herd of these misguided maniacs.
 "Remember," I said, "who I am; and be well assured that I shall not die
 unavenged. Your legal magistrate, the Lord Protector, knew of my design,
 and is aware that I am here; the cry of blood will reach him, and you and
 your miserable victims will long lament the tragedy you are about to act."
 
 My antagonist did not deign to reply, even by a look;--"You know your
 duty," he said to his comrades,--"obey."
 
 In a moment I was thrown on the earth, bound, blindfolded, and hurried away
 --liberty of limb and sight was only restored to me, when, surrounded by
 dungeon-walls, dark and impervious, I found myself a prisoner and alone.
 
 Such was the result of my attempt to gain over the proselyte of this man of
 crime; I could not conceive that he would dare put me to death.--Yet I
 was in his hands; the path of his ambition had ever been dark and cruel;
 his power was founded upon fear; the one word which might cause me to die,
 unheard, unseen, in the obscurity of my dungeon, might be easier to speak
 than the deed of mercy to act. He would not risk probably a public
 execution; but a private assassination would at once terrify any of my
 companions from attempting a like feat, at the same time that a cautious
 line of conduct might enable him to avoid the enquiries and the vengeance
 of Adrian.
 
 Two months ago, in a vault more obscure than the one I now inhabited, I had
 revolved the design of quietly laying me down to die; now I shuddered at
 the approach of fate. My imagination was busied in shaping forth the kind
 of death he would inflict. Would he allow me to wear out life with famine;
 or was the food administered to me to be medicined with death? Would he
 steal on me in my sleep; or should I contend to the last with my murderers,
 knowing, even while I struggled, that I must be overcome? I lived upon an
 earth whose diminished population a child's arithmetic might number; I had
 lived through long months with death stalking close at my side, while at
 intervals the shadow of his skeleton-shape darkened my path. I had believed
 that I despised the grim phantom, and laughed his power to scorn.
 
 Any other fate I should have met with courage, nay, have gone out gallantly
 to encounter. But to be murdered thus at the midnight hour by cold-blooded
 assassins, no friendly hand to close my eyes, or receive my parting
 blessing--to die in combat, hate and execration--ah, why, my angel
 love, didst thou restore me to life, when already I had stepped within the
 portals of the tomb, now that so soon again I was to be flung back a
 mangled corpse!
 
 Hours passed--centuries. Could I give words to the many thoughts which
 occupied me in endless succession during this interval, I should fill
 volumes. The air was dank, the dungeon-floor mildewed and icy cold; hunger
 came upon me too, and no sound reached me from without. To-morrow the
 ruffian had declared that I should die. When would to-morrow come? Was it
 not already here?
 
 My door was about to be opened. I heard the key turn, and the bars and
 bolts slowly removed. The opening of intervening passages permitted sounds
 from the interior of the palace to reach me; and I heard the clock strike
 one. They come to murder me, I thought; this hour does not befit a public
 execution. I drew myself up against the wall opposite the entrance; I
 collected my forces, I rallied my courage, I would not fall a tame prey.
 Slowly the door receded on its hinges--I was ready to spring forward to
 seize and grapple with the intruder, till the sight of who it was changed
 at once the temper of my mind. It was Juliet herself; pale and trembling
 she stood, a lamp in her hand, on the threshold of the dungeon, looking at
 me with wistful countenance. But in a moment she re-assumed her
 self-possession; and her languid eyes recovered their brilliancy. She said,
 "I am come to save you, Verney."
 
 "And yourself also," I cried: "dearest friend, can we indeed be saved?"
 
 "Not a word," she replied, "follow me!"
 
 I obeyed instantly. We threaded with light steps many corridors, ascended
 several flights of stairs, and passed through long galleries; at the end of
 one she unlocked a low portal; a rush of wind extinguished our lamp; but,
 in lieu of it, we had the blessed moon-beams and the open face of heaven.
 Then first Juliet spoke:--"You are safe," she said, "God bless you!--
 farewell!"
 
 I seized her reluctant hand--"Dear friend," I cried, "misguided victim,
 do you not intend to escape with me? Have you not risked all in
 facilitating my flight? and do you think, that I will permit you to return,
 and suffer alone the effects of that miscreant's rage? Never!"
 
 "Do not fear for me," replied the lovely girl mournfully, "and do not
 imagine that without the consent of our chief you could be without these
 walls. It is he that has saved you; he assigned to me the part of leading
 you hither, because I am best acquainted with your motives for coming here,
 and can best appreciate his mercy in permitting you to depart."
 
 "And are you," I cried, "the dupe of this man? He dreads me alive as an
 enemy, and dead he fears my avengers. By favouring this clandestine escape
 he preserves a shew of consistency to his followers; but mercy is far from
 his heart. Do you forget his artifices, his cruelty, and fraud? As I am
 free, so are you. Come, Juliet, the mother of our lost Idris will welcome
 you, the noble Adrian will rejoice to receive you; you will find peace and
 love, and better hopes than fanaticism can afford. Come, and fear not; long
 before day we shall be at Versailles; close the door on this abode of crime
 --come, sweet Juliet, from hypocrisy and guilt to the society of the
 affectionate and good."
 
 I spoke hurriedly, but with fervour: and while with gentle violence I drew
 her from the portal, some thought, some recollection of past scenes of
 youth and happiness, made her listen and yield to me; suddenly she broke
 away with a piercing shriek:--"My child, my child! he has my child; my
 darling girl is my hostage."
 
 She darted from me into the passage; the gate closed between us--she was
 left in the fangs of this man of crime, a prisoner, still to inhale the
 pestilential atmosphere which adhered to his demoniac nature; the unimpeded
 breeze played on my cheek, the moon shone graciously upon me, my path was
 free. Glad to have escaped, yet melancholy in my very joy, I retrod my
 steps to Versailles.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 EVENTFUL winter passed; winter, the respite of our ills. By degrees the
 sun, which with slant beams had before yielded the more extended reign to
 night, lengthened his diurnal journey, and mounted his highest throne, at
 once the fosterer of earth's new beauty, and her lover. We who, like flies
 that congregate upon a dry rock at the ebbing of the tide, had played
 wantonly with time, allowing our passions, our hopes, and our mad desires
 to rule us, now heard the approaching roar of the ocean of destruction, and
 would have fled to some sheltered crevice, before the first wave broke over
 us. We resolved without delay, to commence our journey to Switzerland; we
 became eager to leave France. Under the icy vaults of the glaciers, beneath
 the shadow of the pines, the swinging of whose mighty branches was arrested
 by a load of snow; beside the streams whose intense cold proclaimed their
 origin to be from the slow-melting piles of congelated waters, amidst
 frequent storms which might purify the air, we should find health, if in
 truth health were not herself diseased.
 
 We began our preparations at first with alacrity. We did not now bid adieu
 to our native country, to the graves of those we loved, to the flowers, and
 streams, and trees, which had lived beside us from infancy. Small sorrow
 would be ours on leaving Paris. A scene of shame, when we remembered our
 late contentions, and thought that we left behind a flock of miserable,
 deluded victims, bending under the tyranny of a selfish impostor. Small
 pangs should we feel in leaving the gardens, woods, and halls of the
 palaces of the Bourbons at Versailles, which we feared would soon be
 tainted by the dead, when we looked forward to vallies lovelier than any
 garden, to mighty forests and halls, built not for mortal majesty, but
 palaces of nature's own, with the Alp of marmoreal whiteness for their
 walls, the sky for their roof.
 
 Yet our spirits flagged, as the day drew near which we had fixed for our
 departure. Dire visions and evil auguries, if such things were, thickened
 around us, so that in vain might men say--
 
   These are their reasons, they are natural,[1]
 
 we felt them to be ominous, and dreaded the future event enchained
 to them. That the night owl should screech before the noon-day
 sun, that the hard-winged bat should wheel around the bed of
 beauty, that muttering thunder should in early spring startle
 the cloudless air, that sudden and exterminating blight should fall
 on the tree and shrub, were unaccustomed, but physical events, less
 horrible than the mental creations of almighty fear. Some had sight of
 funeral processions, and faces all begrimed with tears, which flitted
 through the long avenues of the gardens, and drew aside the curtains of the
 sleepers at dead of night. Some heard wailing and cries in the air; a
 mournful chaunt would stream through the dark atmosphere, as if spirits
 above sang the requiem of the human race. What was there in all this, but
 that fear created other senses within our frames, making us see, hear, and
 feel what was not? What was this, but the action of diseased imaginations
 and childish credulity? So might it be; but what was most real, was the
 existence of these very fears; the staring looks of horror, the faces pale
 even to ghastliness, the voices struck dumb with harrowing dread, of those
 among us who saw and heard these things. Of this number was Adrian, who
 knew the delusion, yet could not cast off the clinging terror. Even
 ignorant infancy appeared with timorous shrieks and convulsions to
 acknowledge the presence of unseen powers. We must go: in change of scene,
 in occupation, and such security as we still hoped to find, we should
 discover a cure for these gathering horrors.
 
 On mustering our company, we found them to consist of fourteen hundred
 souls, men, women, and children. Until now therefore, we were undiminished
 in numbers, except by the desertion of those who had attached themselves to
 the impostor-prophet, and remained behind in Paris. About fifty French
 joined us. Our order of march was easily arranged; the ill success which
 had attended our division, determined Adrian to keep all in one body. I,
 with an hundred men, went forward first as purveyor, taking the road of the
 Cote d'Or, through Auxerre, Dijon, Dole, over the Jura to Geneva. I was to
 make arrangements, at every ten miles, for the accommodation of such
 numbers as I found the town or village would receive, leaving behind a
 messenger with a written order, signifying how many were to be quartered
 there. The remainder of our tribe was then divided into bands of fifty
 each, every division containing eighteen men, and the remainder, consisting
 of women and children. Each of these was headed by an officer, who carried
 the roll of names, by which they were each day to be mustered. If the
 numbers were divided at night, in the morning those in the van waited for
 those in the rear. At each of the large towns before mentioned, we were all
 to assemble; and a conclave of the principal officers would hold council
 for the general weal. I went first, as I said; Adrian last. His mother,
 with Clara and Evelyn under her protection, remained also with him. Thus
 our order being determined, I departed. My plan was to go at first no
 further than Fontainebleau, where in a few days I should be joined by
 Adrian, before I took flight again further eastward.
 
 My friend accompanied me a few miles from Versailles. He was sad; and, in a
 tone of unaccustomed despondency, uttered a prayer for our speedy arrival
 among the Alps, accompanied with an expression of vain regret that we were
 not already there. "In that case," I observed, "we can quicken our march;
 why adhere to a plan whose dilatory proceeding you already disapprove?"
 
 "Nay," replied he, "it is too late now. A month ago, and we were masters of
 ourselves; now,--" he turned his face from me; though gathering twilight
 had already veiled its expression, he turned it yet more away, as he added
 --"a man died of the plague last night!"
 
 He spoke in a smothered voice, then suddenly clasping his hands, he
 exclaimed, "Swiftly, most swiftly advances the last hour for us all; as the
 stars vanish before the sun, so will his near approach destroy us. I have
 done my best; with grasping hands and impotent strength, I have hung on the
 wheel of the chariot of plague; but she drags me along with it, while, like
 Juggernaut, she proceeds crushing out the being of all who strew the high
 road of life. Would that it were over--would that her procession
 achieved, we had all entered the tomb together!"
 
 Tears streamed from his eyes. "Again and again," he continued, "will the
 tragedy be acted; again I must hear the groans of the dying, the wailing of
 the survivors; again witness the pangs, which, consummating all, envelope
 an eternity in their evanescent existence. Why am I reserved for this? Why
 the tainted wether of the flock, am I not struck to earth among the first?
 It is hard, very hard, for one of woman born to endure all that I endure!"
 
 Hitherto, with an undaunted spirit, and an high feeling of duty and worth,
 Adrian had fulfilled his self-imposed task. I had contemplated him with
 reverence, and a fruitless desire of imitation. I now offered a few words
 of encouragement and sympathy. He hid his face in his hands, and while he
 strove to calm himself, he ejaculated, "For a few months, yet for a few
 months more, let not, O God, my heart fail, or my courage be bowed down;
 let not sights of intolerable misery madden this half-crazed brain, or
 cause this frail heart to beat against its prison-bound, so that it burst.
 I have believed it to be my destiny to guide and rule the last of the race
 of man, till death extinguish my government; and to this destiny I submit.
 
 "Pardon me, Verney, I pain you, but I will no longer complain. Now I am
 myself again, or rather I am better than myself. You have known how from my
 childhood aspiring thoughts and high desires have warred with inherent
 disease and overstrained sensitiveness, till the latter became victors. You
 know how I placed this wasted feeble hand on the abandoned helm of human
 government. I have been visited at times by intervals of fluctuation; yet,
 until now, I have felt as if a superior and indefatigable spirit had taken
 up its abode within me or rather incorporated itself with my weaker being.
 The holy visitant has for a time slept, perhaps to show me how powerless I
 am without its inspiration. Yet, stay for a while, O Power of goodness and
 strength; disdain not yet this rent shrine of fleshly mortality, O immortal
 Capability! While one fellow creature remains to whom aid can be afforded,
 stay by and prop your shattered, falling engine!"
 
 His vehemence, and voice broken by irrepressible sighs, sunk to my heart;
 his eyes gleamed in the gloom of night like two earthly stars; and, his
 form dilating, his countenance beaming, truly it almost seemed as if at his
 eloquent appeal a more than mortal spirit entered his frame, exalting him
 above humanity. He turned quickly towards me, and held out his hand.
 "Farewell, Verney," he cried, "brother of my love, farewell; no other weak
 expression must cross these lips, I am alive again: to our tasks, to our
 combats with our unvanquishable foe, for to the last I will struggle
 against her."
 
 He grasped my hand, and bent a look on me, more fervent and animated than
 any smile; then turning his horse's head, he touched the animal with the
 spur, and was out of sight in a moment.
 
 A man last night had died of the plague. The quiver was not emptied, nor
 the bow unstrung. We stood as marks, while Parthian Pestilence aimed and
 shot, insatiated by conquest, unobstructed by the heaps of slain. A
 sickness of the soul, contagious even to my physical mechanism, came over
 me. My knees knocked together, my teeth chattered, the current of my blood,
 clotted by sudden cold, painfully forced its way from my heavy heart. I did
 not fear for myself, but it was misery to think that we could not even save
 this remnant. That those I loved might in a few days be as clay-cold as
 Idris in her antique tomb; nor could strength of body or energy of mind
 ward off the blow. A sense of degradation came over me. Did God create man,
 merely in the end to become dead earth in the midst of healthful vegetating
 nature? Was he of no more account to his Maker, than a field of corn
 blighted in the ear? Were our proud dreams thus to fade? Our name was
 written "a little lower than the angels;" and, behold, we were no better
 than ephemera. We had called ourselves the "paragon of animals," and, lo!
 we were a "quint-essence of dust." We repined that the pyramids had
 outlasted the embalmed body of their builder. Alas! the mere shepherd's hut
 of straw we passed on the road, contained in its structure the principle of
 greater longevity than the whole race of man. How reconcile this sad change
 to our past aspirations, to our apparent powers!
 
 Sudden an internal voice, articulate and clear, seemed to say:--Thus from
 eternity, it was decreed: the steeds that bear Time onwards had this hour
 and this fulfilment enchained to them, since the void brought forth its
 burthen. Would you read backwards the unchangeable laws of Necessity?
 
 Mother of the world! Servant of the Omnipotent! eternal, changeless
 Necessity! who with busy fingers sittest ever weaving the indissoluble
 chain of events!--I will not murmur at thy acts. If my human mind cannot
 acknowledge that all that is, is right; yet since what is, must be, I will
 sit amidst the ruins and smile. Truly we were not born to enjoy, but to
 submit, and to hope.
 
 Will not the reader tire, if I should minutely describe our long-drawn
 journey from Paris to Geneva? If, day by day, I should record, in the form
 of a journal, the thronging miseries of our lot, could my hand write, or
 language afford words to express, the variety of our woe; the hustling and
 crowding of one deplorable event upon another? Patience, oh reader! whoever
 thou art, wherever thou dwellest, whether of race spiritual, or, sprung
 from some surviving pair, thy nature will be human, thy habitation the
 earth; thou wilt here read of the acts of the extinct race, and wilt ask
 wonderingly, if they, who suffered what thou findest recorded, were of
 frail flesh and soft organization like thyself. Most true, they were--
 weep therefore; for surely, solitary being, thou wilt be of gentle
 disposition; shed compassionate tears; but the while lend thy attention to
 the tale, and learn the deeds and sufferings of thy predecessors.
 
 Yet the last events that marked our progress through France were so full of
 strange horror and gloomy misery, that I dare not pause too long in the
 narration. If I were to dissect each incident, every small fragment of a
 second would contain an harrowing tale, whose minutest word would curdle
 the blood in thy young veins. It is right that I should erect for thy
 instruction this monument of the foregone race; but not that I should drag
 thee through the wards of an hospital, nor the secret chambers of the
 charnel-house. This tale, therefore, shall be rapidly unfolded. Images of
 destruction, pictures of despair, the procession of the last triumph of
 death, shall be drawn before thee, swift as the rack driven by the north
 wind along the blotted splendour of the sky.
 
 Weed-grown fields, desolate towns, the wild approach of riderless horses
 had now become habitual to my eyes; nay, sights far worse, of the unburied
 dead, and human forms which were strewed on the road side, and on the steps
 of once frequented habitations, where,
 
   Through the flesh that wastes away
   Beneath the parching sun, the whitening bones
   Start forth, and moulder in the sable dust.[2]
 
 Sights like these had become--ah, woe the while! so familiar, that we had
 ceased to shudder, or spur our stung horses to sudden speed, as we passed
 them. France in its best days, at least that part of France through which
 we travelled, had been a cultivated desert, and the absence of enclosures,
 of cottages, and even of peasantry, was saddening to a traveller from sunny
 Italy, or busy England. Yet the towns were frequent and lively, and the
 cordial politeness and ready smile of the wooden-shoed peasant restored
 good humour to the splenetic. Now, the old woman sat no more at the door
 with her distaff--the lank beggar no longer asked charity in
 courtier-like phrase; nor on holidays did the peasantry thread with slow
 grace the mazes of the dance. Silence, melancholy bride of death, went in
 procession with him from town to town through the spacious region.
 
 We arrived at Fontainebleau, and speedily prepared for the reception of our
 friends. On mustering our numbers for the night, three were found missing.
 When I enquired for them, the man to whom I spoke, uttered the word
 "plague," and fell at my feet in convulsions; he also was infected. There
 were hard faces around me; for among my troop were sailors who had crossed
 the line times unnumbered, soldiers who, in Russia and far America, had
 suffered famine, cold and danger, and men still sterner-featured, once
 nightly depredators in our over-grown metropolis; men bred from their
 cradle to see the whole machine of society at work for their destruction. I
 looked round, and saw upon the faces of all horror and despair written in
 glaring characters.
 
 We passed four days at Fontainebleau. Several sickened and died, and in the
 mean time neither Adrian nor any of our friends appeared. My own troop was
 in commotion; to reach Switzerland, to plunge into rivers of snow, and to
 dwell in caves of ice, became the mad desire of all. Yet we had promised to
 wait for the Earl; and he came not. My people demanded to be led forward--
 rebellion, if so we might call what was the mere casting away of
 straw-formed shackles, appeared manifestly among them. They would away on
 the word without a leader. The only chance of safety, the only hope of
 preservation from every form of indescribable suffering, was our keeping
 together. I told them this; while the most determined among them answered
 with sullenness, that they could take care of themselves, and replied to my
 entreaties with scoffs and menaces.
 
 At length, on the fifth day, a messenger arrived from Adrian, bearing
 letters, which directed us to proceed to Auxerre, and there await his
 arrival, which would only be deferred for a few days. Such was the tenor of
 his public letters. Those privately delivered to me, detailed at length the
 difficulties of his situation, and left the arrangement of my future plans
 to my own discretion. His account of the state of affairs at Versailles was
 brief, but the oral communications of his messenger filled up his
 omissions, and shewed me that perils of the most frightful nature were
 gathering around him. At first the re-awakening of the plague had been
 concealed; but the number of deaths encreasing, the secret was divulged,
 and the destruction already achieved, was exaggerated by the fears of the
 survivors. Some emissaries of the enemy of mankind, the accursed Impostors,
 were among them instilling their doctrine that safety and life could only
 be ensured by submission to their chief; and they succeeded so well, that
 soon, instead of desiring to proceed to Switzerland, the major part of the
 multitude, weak-minded women, and dastardly men, desired to return to
 Paris, and, by ranging themselves under the banners of the so called
 prophet, and by a cowardly worship of the principle of evil, to purchase
 respite, as they hoped, from impending death. The discord and tumult
 induced by these conflicting fears and passions, detained Adrian. It
 required all his ardour in pursuit of an object, and his patience under
 difficulties, to calm and animate such a number of his followers, as might
 counterbalance the panic of the rest, and lead them back to the means from
 which alone safety could be derived. He had hoped immediately to follow me;
 but, being defeated in this intention, he sent his messenger urging me to
 secure my own troop at such a distance from Versailles, as to prevent the
 contagion of rebellion from reaching them; promising, at the same time, to
 join me the moment a favourable occasion should occur, by means of which he
 could withdraw the main body of the emigrants from the evil influence at
 present exercised over them.
 
 I was thrown into a most painful state of uncertainty by these
 communications. My first impulse was that we should all return to
 Versailles, there to assist in extricating our chief from his perils. I
 accordingly assembled my troop, and proposed to them this retrograde
 movement, instead of the continuation of our journey to Auxerre. With one
 voice they refused to comply. The notion circulated among them was, that
 the ravages of the plague alone detained the Protector; they opposed his
 order to my request; they came to a resolve to proceed without me, should I
 refuse to accompany them. Argument and adjuration were lost on these
 dastards. The continual diminution of their own numbers, effected by
 pestilence, added a sting to their dislike of delay; and my opposition only
 served to bring their resolution to a crisis. That same evening they
 departed towards Auxerre. Oaths, as from soldiers to their general, had
 been taken by them: these they broke. I also had engaged myself not to
 desert them; it appeared to me inhuman to ground any infraction of my word
 on theirs. The same spirit that caused them to rebel against me, would
 impel them to desert each other; and the most dreadful sufferings would be
 the consequence of their journey in their present unordered and chiefless
 array. These feelings for a time were paramount; and, in obedience to them,
 I accompanied the rest towards Auxerre. We arrived the same night at
 Villeneuve-la-Guiard, a town at the distance of four posts from
 Fontainebleau. When my companions had retired to rest, and I was left alone
 to revolve and ruminate upon the intelligence I received of Adrian's
 situation, another view of the subject presented itself to me. What was I
 doing, and what was the object of my present movements? Apparently I was to
 lead this troop of selfish and lawless men towards Switzerland, leaving
 behind my family and my selected friend, which, subject as they were hourly
 to the death that threatened to all, I might never see again. Was it not my
 first duty to assist the Protector, setting an example of attachment and
 duty? At a crisis, such as the one I had reached, it is very difficult to
 balance nicely opposing interests, and that towards which our inclinations
 lead us, obstinately assumes the appearance of selfishness, even when we
 meditate a sacrifice. We are easily led at such times to make a compromise
 of the question; and this was my present resource. I resolved that very
 night to ride to Versailles; if I found affairs less desperate than I now
 deemed them, I would return without delay to my troop; I had a vague idea
 that my arrival at that town, would occasion some sensation more or less
 strong, of which we might profit, for the purpose of leading forward the
 vacillating multitude--at least no time was to be lost--I visited the
 stables, I saddled my favourite horse, and vaulting on his back, without
 giving myself time for further reflection or hesitation, quitted
 Villeneuve-la-Guiard on my return to Versailles.
 
 I was glad to escape from my rebellious troop, and to lose sight for a
 time, of the strife of evil with good, where the former for ever remained
 triumphant. I was stung almost to madness by my uncertainty concerning the
 fate of Adrian, and grew reckless of any event, except what might lose or
 preserve my unequalled friend. With an heavy heart, that sought relief in
 the rapidity of my course, I rode through the night to Versailles. I
 spurred my horse, who addressed his free limbs to speed, and tossed his
 gallant head in pride. The constellations reeled swiftly by, swiftly each
 tree and stone and landmark fled past my onward career. I bared my head to
 the rushing wind, which bathed my brow in delightful coolness. As I lost
 sight of Villeneuve-la-Guiard, I forgot the sad drama of human misery;
 methought it was happiness enough to live, sensitive the while of the
 beauty of the verdure-clad earth, the star-bespangled sky, and the tameless
 wind that lent animation to the whole. My horse grew tired--and I,
 forgetful of his fatigue, still as he lagged, cheered him with my voice,
 and urged him with the spur. He was a gallant animal, and I did not wish to
 exchange him for any chance beast I might light on, leaving him never to be
 refound. All night we went forward; in the morning he became sensible that
 we approached Versailles, to reach which as his home, he mustered his
 flagging strength. The distance we had come was not less than fifty miles,
 yet he shot down the long Boulevards swift as an arrow; poor fellow, as I
 dismounted at the gate of the castle, he sunk on his knees, his eyes were
 covered with a film, he fell on his side, a few gasps inflated his noble
 chest, and he died. I saw him expire with an anguish, unaccountable even to
 myself, the spasm was as the wrenching of some limb in agonizing torture,
 but it was brief as it was intolerable. I forgot him, as I swiftly darted
 through the open portal, and up the majestic stairs of this castle of
 victories--heard Adrian's voice--O fool! O woman nurtured, effeminate
 and contemptible being--I heard his voice, and answered it with
 convulsive shrieks; I rushed into the Hall of Hercules, where he stood
 surrounded by a crowd, whose eyes, turned in wonder on me, reminded me that
 on the stage of the world, a man must repress such girlish extacies. I
 would have given worlds to have embraced him; I dared not--Half in
 exhaustion, half voluntarily, I threw myself at my length on the ground--
 dare I disclose the truth to the gentle offspring of solitude? I did so,
 that I might kiss the dear and sacred earth he trod.
 
 I found everything in a state of tumult. An emissary of the leader of the
 elect, had been so worked up by his chief, and by his own fanatical creed,
 as to make an attempt on the life of the Protector and preserver of lost
 mankind. His hand was arrested while in the act of poignarding the Earl;
 this circumstance had caused the clamour I heard on my arrival at the
 castle, and the confused assembly of persons that I found assembled in the
 Salle d'Hercule. Although superstition and demoniac fury had crept among
 the emigrants, yet several adhered with fidelity to their noble chieftain;
 and many, whose faith and love had been unhinged by fear, felt all their
 latent affection rekindled by this detestable attempt. A phalanx of
 faithful breasts closed round him; the wretch, who, although a prisoner and
 in bonds, vaunted his design, and madly claimed the crown of martyrdom,
 would have been torn to pieces, had not his intended victim interposed.
 Adrian, springing forward, shielded him with his own person, and commanded
 with energy the submission of his infuriate friends--at this moment I had
 entered.
 
 Discipline and peace were at length restored in the castle; and then Adrian
 went from house to house, from troop to troop, to soothe the disturbed
 minds of his followers, and recall them to their ancient obedience. But the
 fear of immediate death was still rife amongst these survivors of a world's
 destruction; the horror occasioned by the attempted assassination, past
 away; each eye turned towards Paris. Men love a prop so well, that they
 will lean on a pointed poisoned spear; and such was he, the impostor, who,
 with fear of hell for his scourge, most ravenous wolf, played the driver to
 a credulous flock.
 
 It was a moment of suspense, that shook even the resolution of the
 unyielding friend of man. Adrian for one moment was about to give in, to
 cease the struggle, and quit, with a few adherents, the deluded crowd,
 leaving them a miserable prey to their passions, and to the worse tyrant
 who excited them. But again, after a brief fluctuation of purpose, he
 resumed his courage and resolves, sustained by the singleness of his
 purpose, and the untried spirit of benevolence which animated him. At this
 moment, as an omen of excellent import, his wretched enemy pulled
 destruction on his head, destroying with his own hands the dominion he had
 erected.
 
 His grand hold upon the minds of men, took its rise from the doctrine
 inculcated by him, that those who believed in, and followed him, were the
 remnant to be saved, while all the rest of mankind were marked out for
 death. Now, at the time of the Flood, the omnipotent repented him that he
 had created man, and as then with water, now with the arrows of pestilence,
 was about to annihilate all, except those who obeyed his decrees,
 promulgated by the ipse dixit prophet. It is impossible to say on what
 foundations this man built his hopes of being able to carry on such an
 imposture. It is likely that he was fully aware of the lie which murderous
 nature might give to his assertions, and believed it to be the cast of a
 die, whether he should in future ages be reverenced as an inspired delegate
 from heaven, or be recognized as an impostor by the present dying
 generation. At any rate he resolved to keep up the drama to the last act.
 When, on the first approach of summer, the fatal disease again made its
 ravages among the followers of Adrian, the impostor exultingly proclaimed
 the exemption of his own congregation from the universal calamity. He was
 believed; his followers, hitherto shut up in Paris, now came to Versailles.
 Mingling with the coward band there assembled, they reviled their admirable
 leader, and asserted their own superiority and exemption. At length the
 plague, slow-footed, but sure in her noiseless advance, destroyed the
 illusion, invading the congregation of the elect, and showering promiscuous
 death among them. Their leader endeavoured to conceal this event; he had a
 few followers, who, admitted into the arcana of his wickedness, could help
 him in the execution of his nefarious designs. Those who sickened were
 immediately and quietly withdrawn, the cord and a midnight-grave disposed
 of them for ever; while some plausible excuse was given for their absence.
 At last a female, whose maternal vigilance subdued even the effects of the
 narcotics administered to her, became a witness of their murderous designs
 on her only child. Mad with horror, she would have burst among her deluded
 fellow-victims, and, wildly shrieking, have awaked the dull ear of night
 with the history of the fiend-like crime; when the Impostor, in his last
 act of rage and desperation, plunged a poignard in her bosom. Thus wounded
 to death, her garments dripping with her own life-blood, bearing her
 strangled infant in her arms, beautiful and young as she was, Juliet, (for
 it was she) denounced to the host of deceived believers, the wickedness of
 their leader. He saw the aghast looks of her auditors, changing from horror
 to fury--the names of those already sacrificed were echoed by their
 relatives, now assured of their loss. The wretch with that energy of
 purpose, which had borne him thus far in his guilty career, saw his danger,
 and resolved to evade the worst forms of it--he rushed on one of the
 foremost, seized a pistol from his girdle, and his loud laugh of derision
 mingled with the report of the weapon with which he destroyed himself.
 
 They left his miserable remains even where they lay; they placed the corpse
 of poor Juliet and her babe upon a bier, and all, with hearts subdued to
 saddest regret, in long procession walked towards Versailles. They met
 troops of those who had quitted the kindly protection of Adrian, and were
 journeying to join the fanatics. The tale of horror was recounted--all
 turned back; and thus at last, accompanied by the undiminished numbers of
 surviving humanity, and preceded by the mournful emblem of their recovered
 reason, they appeared before Adrian, and again and for ever vowed obedience
 to his commands, and fidelity to his cause.
 
 [1] Shakespeare--Julius Caesar.
 [2] Elton's Translation of Hesiod's "Shield of Hercules."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 THESE events occupied so much time, that June had numbered more than half
 its days, before we again commenced our long-protracted journey. The day
 after my return to Versailles, six men, from among those I had left at
 Villeneuve-la-Guiard, arrived, with intelligence, that the rest of the
 troop had already proceeded towards Switzerland. We went forward in the
 same track.
 
 It is strange, after an interval of time, to look back on a period, which,
 though short in itself, appeared, when in actual progress, to be drawn out
 interminably. By the end of July we entered Dijon; by the end of July those
 hours, days, and weeks had mingled with the ocean of forgotten time, which
 in their passage teemed with fatal events and agonizing sorrow. By the end
 of July, little more than a month had gone by, if man's life were measured
 by the rising and setting of the sun: but, alas! in that interval ardent
 youth had become grey-haired; furrows deep and uneraseable were trenched in
 the blooming cheek of the young mother; the elastic limbs of early manhood,
 paralyzed as by the burthen of years, assumed the decrepitude of age.
 Nights passed, during whose fatal darkness the sun grew old before it rose;
 and burning days, to cool whose baleful heat the balmy eve, lingering far
 in eastern climes, came lagging and ineffectual; days, in which the dial,
 radiant in its noon-day station, moved not its shadow the space of a little
 hour, until a whole life of sorrow had brought the sufferer to an untimely
 grave.
 
 We departed from Versailles fifteen hundred souls. We set out on the
 eighteenth of June. We made a long procession, in which was contained every
 dear relationship, or tie of love, that existed in human society. Fathers
 and husbands, with guardian care, gathered their dear relatives around
 them; wives and mothers looked for support to the manly form beside them,
 and then with tender anxiety bent their eyes on the infant troop around.
 They were sad, but not hopeless. Each thought that someone would be saved;
 each, with that pertinacious optimism, which to the last characterized our
 human nature, trusted that their beloved family would be the one
 preserved.
 
 We passed through France, and found it empty of inhabitants. Some one or
 two natives survived in the larger towns, which they roamed through like
 ghosts; we received therefore small encrease to our numbers, and such
 decrease through death, that at last it became easier to count the scanty
 list of survivors. As we never deserted any of the sick, until their death
 permitted us to commit their remains to the shelter of a grave, our journey
 was long, while every day a frightful gap was made in our troop--they
 died by tens, by fifties, by hundreds. No mercy was shewn by death; we
 ceased to expect it, and every day welcomed the sun with the feeling that
 we might never see it rise again.
 
 The nervous terrors and fearful visions which had scared us during the
 spring, continued to visit our coward troop during this sad journey. Every
 evening brought its fresh creation of spectres; a ghost was depicted by
 every blighted tree; and appalling shapes were manufactured from each
 shaggy bush. By degrees these common marvels palled on us, and then other
 wonders were called into being. Once it was confidently asserted, that the
 sun rose an hour later than its seasonable time; again it was discovered
 that he grew paler and paler; that shadows took an uncommon appearance. It
 was impossible to have imagined, during the usual calm routine of life men
 had before experienced, the terrible effects produced by these extravagant
 delusions: in truth, of such little worth are our senses, when unsupported
 by concurring testimony, that it was with the utmost difficulty I kept
 myself free from the belief in supernatural events, to which the major part
 of our people readily gave credit. Being one sane amidst a crowd of the
 mad, I hardly dared assert to my own mind, that the vast luminary had
 undergone no change--that the shadows of night were unthickened by
 innumerable shapes of awe and terror; or that the wind, as it sung in the
 trees, or whistled round an empty building, was not pregnant with sounds of
 wailing and despair. Sometimes realities took ghostly shapes; and it was
 impossible for one's blood not to curdle at the perception of an evident
 mixture of what we knew to be true, with the visionary semblance of all
 that we feared.
 
 Once, at the dusk of the evening, we saw a figure all in white, apparently
 of more than human stature, flourishing about the road, now throwing up its
 arms, now leaping to an astonishing height in the air, then turning round
 several times successively, then raising itself to its full height and
 gesticulating violently. Our troop, on the alert to discover and believe in
 the supernatural, made a halt at some distance from this shape; and, as it
 became darker, there was something appalling even to the incredulous, in
 the lonely spectre, whose gambols, if they hardly accorded with spiritual
 dignity, were beyond human powers. Now it leapt right up in the air, now
 sheer over a high hedge, and was again the moment after in the road before
 us. By the time I came up, the fright experienced by the spectators of this
 ghostly exhibition, began to manifest itself in the flight of some, and the
 close huddling together of the rest. Our goblin now perceived us; he
 approached, and, as we drew reverentially back, made a low bow. The sight
 was irresistibly ludicrous even to our hapless band, and his politeness was
 hailed by a shout of laughter;--then, again springing up, as a last
 effort, it sunk to the ground, and became almost invisible through the
 dusky night. This circumstance again spread silence and fear through the
 troop; the more courageous at length advanced, and, raising the dying
 wretch, discovered the tragic explanation of this wild scene. It was an
 opera-dancer, and had been one of the troop which deserted from
 Villeneuve-la-Guiard: falling sick, he had been deserted by his companions;
 in an access of delirium he had fancied himself on the stage, and, poor
 fellow, his dying sense eagerly accepted the last human applause that could
 ever be bestowed on his grace and agility.
 
 At another time we were haunted for several days by an apparition, to which
 our people gave the appellation of the Black Spectre. We never saw it
 except at evening, when his coal black steed, his mourning dress, and plume
 of black feathers, had a majestic and awe-striking appearance; his face,
 one said, who had seen it for a moment, was ashy pale; he had lingered far
 behind the rest of his troop, and suddenly at a turn in the road, saw the
 Black Spectre coming towards him; he hid himself in fear, and the horse and
 his rider slowly past, while the moonbeams fell on the face of the latter,
 displaying its unearthly hue. Sometimes at dead of night, as we watched the
 sick, we heard one galloping through the town; it was the Black Spectre
 come in token of inevitable death. He grew giant tall to vulgar eyes; an
 icy atmosphere, they said, surrounded him; when he was heard, all animals
 shuddered, and the dying knew that their last hour was come. It was Death
 himself, they declared, come visibly to seize on subject earth, and quell
 at once our decreasing numbers, sole rebels to his law. One day at noon, we
 saw a dark mass on the road before us, and, coming up, beheld the Black
 Spectre fallen from his horse, lying in the agonies of disease upon the
 ground. He did not survive many hours; and his last words disclosed the
 secret of his mysterious conduct. He was a French noble of distinction,
 who, from the effects of plague, had been left alone in his district;
 during many months, he had wandered from town to town, from province to
 province, seeking some survivor for a companion, and abhorring the
 loneliness to which he was condemned. When he discovered our troop, fear of
 contagion conquered his love of society. He dared not join us, yet he could
 not resolve to lose sight of us, sole human beings who besides himself
 existed in wide and fertile France; so he accompanied us in the spectral
 guise I have described, till pestilence gathered him to a larger
 congregation, even that of Dead Mankind.
 
 It had been well, if such vain terrors could have distracted our thoughts
 from more tangible evils. But these were too dreadful and too many not to
 force themselves into every thought, every moment, of our lives. We were
 obliged to halt at different periods for days together, till another and
 yet another was consigned as a clod to the vast clod which had been once
 our living mother. Thus we continued travelling during the hottest season;
 and it was not till the first of August, that we, the emigrants,--reader,
 there were just eighty of us in number,--entered the gates of Dijon.
 
 We had expected this moment with eagerness, for now we had accomplished the
 worst part of our drear journey, and Switzerland was near at hand. Yet how
 could we congratulate ourselves on any event thus imperfectly fulfilled?
 Were these miserable beings, who, worn and wretched, passed in sorrowful
 procession, the sole remnants of the race of man, which, like a flood, had
 once spread over and possessed the whole earth? It had come down clear and
 unimpeded from its primal mountain source in Ararat, and grew from a puny
 streamlet to a vast perennial river, generation after generation flowing on
 ceaselessly. The same, but diversified, it grew, and swept onwards towards
 the absorbing ocean, whose dim shores we now reached. It had been the mere
 plaything of nature, when first it crept out of uncreative void into light;
 but thought brought forth power and knowledge; and, clad with these, the
 race of man assumed dignity and authority. It was then no longer the mere
 gardener of earth, or the shepherd of her flocks; "it carried with it an
 imposing and majestic aspect; it had a pedigree and illustrious ancestors;
 it had its gallery of portraits, its monumental inscriptions, its records
 and titles."[1]
 
 This was all over, now that the ocean of death had sucked in the slackening
 tide, and its source was dried up. We first had bidden adieu to the state
 of things which having existed many thousand years, seemed eternal; such a
 state of government, obedience, traffic, and domestic intercourse, as had
 moulded our hearts and capacities, as far back as memory could reach. Then
 to patriotic zeal, to the arts, to reputation, to enduring fame, to the
 name of country, we had bidden farewell. We saw depart all hope of
 retrieving our ancient state--all expectation, except the feeble one of
 saving our individual lives from the wreck of the past. To preserve these
 we had quitted England--England, no more; for without her children, what
 name could that barren island claim? With tenacious grasp we clung to such
 rule and order as could best save us; trusting that, if a little colony
 could be preserved, that would suffice at some remoter period to restore
 the lost community of mankind.
 
 But the game is up! We must all die; nor leave survivor nor heir to the
 wide inheritance of earth. We must all die! The species of man must perish;
 his frame of exquisite workmanship; the wondrous mechanism of his senses;
 the noble proportion of his godlike limbs; his mind, the throned king of
 these; must perish. Will the earth still keep her place among the planets;
 will she still journey with unmarked regularity round the sun; will the
 seasons change, the trees adorn themselves with leaves, and flowers shed
 their fragrance, in solitude? Will the mountains remain unmoved, and
 streams still keep a downward course towards the vast abyss; will the tides
 rise and fall, and the winds fan universal nature; will beasts pasture,
 birds fly, and fishes swim, when man, the lord, possessor, perceiver, and
 recorder of all these things, has passed away, as though he had never been?
 O, what mockery is this! Surely death is not death, and humanity is not
 extinct; but merely passed into other shapes, unsubjected to our
 perceptions. Death is a vast portal, an high road to life: let us hasten to
 pass; let us exist no more in this living death, but die that we may live!
 
 We had longed with inexpressible earnestness to reach Dijon, since we had
 fixed on it, as a kind of station in our progress. But now we entered it
 with a torpor more painful than acute suffering. We had come slowly but
 irrevocably to the opinion, that our utmost efforts would not preserve one
 human being alive. We took our hands therefore away from the long grasped
 rudder; and the frail vessel on which we floated, seemed, the government
 over her suspended, to rush, prow foremost, into the dark abyss of the
 billows. A gush of grief, a wanton profusion of tears, and vain laments,
 and overflowing tenderness, and passionate but fruitless clinging to the
 priceless few that remained, was followed by languor and recklessness.
 
 During this disastrous journey we lost all those, not of our own family, to
 whom we had particularly attached ourselves among the survivors. It were
 not well to fill these pages with a mere catalogue of losses; yet I cannot
 refrain from this last mention of those principally dear to us. The little
 girl whom Adrian had rescued from utter desertion, during our ride through
 London on the twentieth of November, died at Auxerre. The poor child had
 attached herself greatly to us; and the suddenness of her death added to
 our sorrow. In the morning we had seen her apparently in health--in the
 evening, Lucy, before we retired to rest, visited our quarters to say that
 she was dead. Poor Lucy herself only survived, till we arrived at Dijon.
 She had devoted herself throughout to the nursing the sick, and attending
 the friendless. Her excessive exertions brought on a slow fever, which
 ended in the dread disease whose approach soon released her from her
 sufferings. She had throughout been endeared to us by her good qualities,
 by her ready and cheerful execution of every duty, and mild acquiescence in
 every turn of adversity. When we consigned her to the tomb, we seemed at
 the same time to bid a final adieu to those peculiarly feminine virtues
 conspicuous in her; uneducated and unpretending as she was, she was
 distinguished for patience, forbearance, and sweetness. These, with all
 their train of qualities peculiarly English, would never again be revived
 for us. This type of all that was most worthy of admiration in her class
 among my countrywomen, was placed under the sod of desert France; and it
 was as a second separation from our country to have lost sight of her for
 ever.
 
 The Countess of Windsor died during our abode at Dijon. One morning I was
 informed that she wished to see me. Her message made me remember, that
 several days had elapsed since I had last seen her. Such a circumstance had
 often occurred during our journey, when I remained behind to watch to their
 close the last moments of some one of our hapless comrades, and the rest of
 the troop past on before me. But there was something in the manner of her
 messenger, that made me suspect that all was not right. A caprice of the
 imagination caused me to conjecture that some ill had occurred to Clara or
 Evelyn, rather than to this aged lady. Our fears, for ever on the stretch,
 demanded a nourishment of horror; and it seemed too natural an occurrence,
 too like past times, for the old to die before the young. I found the
 venerable mother of my Idris lying on a couch, her tall emaciated figure
 stretched out; her face fallen away, from which the nose stood out in sharp
 profile, and her large dark eyes, hollow and deep, gleamed with such light
 as may edge a thunder cloud at sun-set. All was shrivelled and dried up,
 except these lights; her voice too was fearfully changed, as she spoke to
 me at intervals. "I am afraid," said she, "that it is selfish in me to have
 asked you to visit the old woman again, before she dies: yet perhaps it
 would have been a greater shock to hear suddenly that I was dead, than to
 see me first thus."
 
 I clasped her shrivelled hand: "Are you indeed so ill?" I asked.
 
 "Do you not perceive death in my face," replied she, "it is strange; I
 ought to have expected this, and yet I confess it has taken me unaware. I
 never clung to life, or enjoyed it, till these last months, while among
 those I senselessly deserted: and it is hard to be snatched immediately
 away. I am glad, however, that I am not a victim of the plague; probably I
 should have died at this hour, though the world had continued as it was in
 my youth."
 
 She spoke with difficulty, and I perceived that she regretted the necessity
 of death, even more than she cared to confess. Yet she had not to complain
 of an undue shortening of existence; her faded person shewed that life had
 naturally spent itself. We had been alone at first; now Clara entered; the
 Countess turned to her with a smile, and took the hand of this lovely
 child; her roseate palm and snowy fingers, contrasted with relaxed fibres
 and yellow hue of those of her aged friend; she bent to kiss her, touching
 her withered mouth with the warm, full lips of youth. "Verney," said the
 Countess, "I need not recommend this dear girl to you, for your own sake
 you will preserve her. Were the world as it was, I should have a thousand
 sage precautions to impress, that one so sensitive, good, and beauteous,
 might escape the dangers that used to lurk for the destruction of the fair
 and excellent. This is all nothing now.
 
 "I commit you, my kind nurse, to your uncle's care; to yours I entrust the
 dearest relic of my better self. Be to Adrian, sweet one, what you have
 been to me--enliven his sadness with your sprightly sallies; sooth his
 anguish by your sober and inspired converse, when he is dying; nurse him as
 you have done me."
 
 Clara burst into tears; "Kind girl," said the Countess, "do not weep for
 me. Many dear friends are left to you."
 
 "And yet," cried Clara, "you talk of their dying also. This is indeed cruel
 --how could I live, if they were gone? If it were possible for my beloved
 protector to die before me, I could not nurse him; I could only die too."
 
 The venerable lady survived this scene only twenty-four hours. She was the
 last tie binding us to the ancient state of things. It was impossible to
 look on her, and not call to mind in their wonted guise, events and
 persons, as alien to our present situation as the disputes of Themistocles
 and Aristides, or the wars of the two roses in our native land. The crown
 of England had pressed her brow; the memory of my father and his
 misfortunes, the vain struggles of the late king, the images of Raymond,
 Evadne, and Perdita, who had lived in the world's prime, were brought
 vividly before us. We consigned her to the oblivious tomb with reluctance;
 and when I turned from her grave, Janus veiled his retrospective face; that
 which gazed on future generations had long lost its faculty.
 
 After remaining a week at Dijon, until thirty of our number deserted the
 vacant ranks of life, we continued our way towards Geneva. At noon on the
 second day we arrived at the foot of Jura. We halted here during the heat
 of the day. Here fifty human beings--fifty, the only human beings that
 survived of the food-teeming earth, assembled to read in the looks of each
 other ghastly plague, or wasting sorrow, desperation, or worse,
 carelessness of future or present evil. Here we assembled at the foot of
 this mighty wall of mountain, under a spreading walnut tree; a brawling
 stream refreshed the green sward by its sprinkling; and the busy
 grasshopper chirped among the thyme. We clustered together a group of
 wretched sufferers. A mother cradled in her enfeebled arms the child, last
 of many, whose glazed eye was about to close for ever. Here beauty, late
 glowing in youthful lustre and consciousness, now wan and neglected, knelt
 fanning with uncertain motion the beloved, who lay striving to paint his
 features, distorted by illness, with a thankful smile. There an
 hard-featured, weather-worn veteran, having prepared his meal, sat, his
 head dropped on his breast, the useless knife falling from his grasp, his
 limbs utterly relaxed, as thought of wife and child, and dearest relative,
 all lost, passed across his recollection. There sat a man who for forty
 years had basked in fortune's tranquil sunshine; he held the hand of his
 last hope, his beloved daughter, who had just attained womanhood; and he
 gazed on her with anxious eyes, while she tried to rally her fainting
 spirit to comfort him. Here a servant, faithful to the last, though dying,
 waited on one, who, though still erect with health, gazed with gasping fear
 on the variety of woe around.
 
 Adrian stood leaning against a tree; he held a book in his hand, but his
 eye wandered from the pages, and sought mine; they mingled a sympathetic
 glance; his looks confessed that his thoughts had quitted the inanimate
 print, for pages more pregnant with meaning, more absorbing, spread out
 before him. By the margin of the stream, apart from all, in a tranquil
 nook, where the purling brook kissed the green sward gently, Clara and
 Evelyn were at play, sometimes beating the water with large boughs,
 sometimes watching the summer-flies that sported upon it. Evelyn now chased
 a butterfly--now gathered a flower for his cousin; and his laughing
 cherub-face and clear brow told of the light heart that beat in his bosom.
 Clara, though she endeavoured to give herself up to his amusement, often
 forgot him, as she turned to observe Adrian and me. She was now fourteen,
 and retained her childish appearance, though in height a woman; she acted
 the part of the tenderest mother to my little orphan boy; to see her
 playing with him, or attending silently and submissively on our wants, you
 thought only of her admirable docility and patience; but, in her soft eyes,
 and the veined curtains that veiled them, in the clearness of her marmoreal
 brow, and the tender expression of her lips, there was an intelligence and
 beauty that at once excited admiration and love.
 
 When the sun had sunk towards the precipitate west, and the evening shadows
 grew long, we prepared to ascend the mountain. The attention that we were
 obliged to pay to the sick, made our progress slow. The winding road,
 though steep, presented a confined view of rocky fields and hills, each
 hiding the other, till our farther ascent disclosed them in succession. We
 were seldom shaded from the declining sun, whose slant beams were instinct
 with exhausting heat. There are times when minor difficulties grow gigantic
 --times, when as the Hebrew poet expressively terms it, "the grasshopper
 is a burthen;" so was it with our ill fated party this evening. Adrian,
 usually the first to rally his spirits, and dash foremost into fatigue and
 hardship, with relaxed limbs and declined head, the reins hanging loosely
 in his grasp, left the choice of the path to the instinct of his horse, now
 and then painfully rousing himself, when the steepness of the ascent
 required that he should keep his seat with better care. Fear and horror
 encompassed me. Did his languid air attest that he also was struck with
 contagion? How long, when I look on this matchless specimen of mortality,
 may I perceive that his thought answers mine? how long will those limbs
 obey the kindly spirit within? how long will light and life dwell in the
 eyes of this my sole remaining friend? Thus pacing slowly, each hill
 surmounted, only presented another to be ascended; each jutting corner only
 discovered another, sister to the last, endlessly. Sometimes the pressure
 of sickness in one among us, caused the whole cavalcade to halt; the call
 for water, the eagerly expressed wish to repose; the cry of pain, and
 suppressed sob of the mourner--such were the sorrowful attendants of our
 passage of the Jura.
 
 Adrian had gone first. I saw him, while I was detained by the loosening of
 a girth, struggling with the upward path, seemingly more difficult than any
 we had yet passed. He reached the top, and the dark outline of his figure
 stood in relief against the sky. He seemed to behold something unexpected
 and wonderful; for, pausing, his head stretched out, his arms for a moment
 extended, he seemed to give an All Hail! to some new vision. Urged by
 curiosity, I hurried to join him. After battling for many tedious minutes
 with the precipice, the same scene presented itself to me, which had wrapt
 him in extatic wonder.
 
 Nature, or nature's favourite, this lovely earth, presented her most
 unrivalled beauties in resplendent and sudden exhibition. Below, far, far
 below, even as it were in the yawning abyss of the ponderous globe, lay the
 placid and azure expanse of lake Leman; vine-covered hills hedged it in,
 and behind dark mountains in cone-like shape, or irregular cyclopean wall,
 served for further defence. But beyond, and high above all, as if the
 spirits of the air had suddenly unveiled their bright abodes, placed in
 scaleless altitude in the stainless sky, heaven-kissing, companions of the
 unattainable ether, were the glorious Alps, clothed in dazzling robes of
 light by the setting sun. And, as if the world's wonders were never to be
 exhausted, their vast immensities, their jagged crags, and roseate
 painting, appeared again in the lake below, dipping their proud heights
 beneath the unruffled waves--palaces for the Naiads of the placid waters.
 Towns and villages lay scattered at the foot of Jura, which, with dark
 ravine, and black promontories, stretched its roots into the watery expanse
 beneath. Carried away by wonder, I forgot the death of man, and the living
 and beloved friend near me. When I turned, I saw tears streaming from his
 eyes; his thin hands pressed one against the other, his animated
 countenance beaming with admiration; "Why," cried he, at last, "Why, oh
 heart, whisperest thou of grief to me? Drink in the beauty of that scene,
 and possess delight beyond what a fabled paradise could afford."
 
 By degrees, our whole party surmounting the steep, joined us, not one among
 them, but gave visible tokens of admiration, surpassing any before
 experienced. One cried, "God reveals his heaven to us; we may die blessed."
 Another and another, with broken exclamations, and extravagant phrases,
 endeavoured to express the intoxicating effect of this wonder of nature. So
 we remained awhile, lightened of the pressing burthen of fate, forgetful of
 death, into whose night we were about to plunge; no longer reflecting that
 our eyes now and for ever were and would be the only ones which might
 perceive the divine magnificence of this terrestrial exhibition. An
 enthusiastic transport, akin to happiness, burst, like a sudden ray from
 the sun, on our darkened life. Precious attribute of woe-worn humanity!
 that can snatch extatic emotion, even from under the very share and harrow,
 that ruthlessly ploughs up and lays waste every hope.
 
 This evening was marked by another event. Passing through Ferney in our way
 to Geneva, unaccustomed sounds of music arose from the rural church which
 stood embosomed in trees, surrounded by smokeless, vacant cottages. The
 peal of an organ with rich swell awoke the mute air, lingering along, and
 mingling with the intense beauty that clothed the rocks and woods, and
 waves around. Music--the language of the immortals, disclosed to us as
 testimony of their existence--music, "silver key of the fountain of
 tears," child of love, soother of grief, inspirer of heroism and radiant
 thoughts, O music, in this our desolation, we had forgotten thee! Nor pipe
 at eve cheered us, nor harmony of voice, nor linked thrill of string; thou
 camest upon us now, like the revealing of other forms of being; and
 transported as we had been by the loveliness of nature, fancying that we
 beheld the abode of spirits, now we might well imagine that we heard their
 melodious communings. We paused in such awe as would seize on a pale
 votarist, visiting some holy shrine at midnight; if she beheld animated and
 smiling, the image which she worshipped. We all stood mute; many knelt. In
 a few minutes however, we were recalled to human wonder and sympathy by a
 familiar strain. The air was Haydn's "New-Created World," and, old and
 drooping as humanity had become, the world yet fresh as at creation's day,
 might still be worthily celebrated by such an hymn of praise. Adrian and I
 entered the church; the nave was empty, though the smoke of incense rose
 from the altar, bringing with it the recollection of vast congregations, in
 once thronged cathedrals; we went into the loft. A blind old man sat at the
 bellows; his whole soul was ear; and as he sat in the attitude of attentive
 listening, a bright glow of pleasure was diffused over his countenance;
 for, though his lack-lustre eye could not reflect the beam, yet his parted
 lips, and every line of his face and venerable brow spoke delight. A young
 woman sat at the keys, perhaps twenty years of age. Her auburn hair hung on
 her neck, and her fair brow shone in its own beauty; but her drooping eyes
 let fall fast-flowing tears, while the constraint she exercised to suppress
 her sobs, and still her trembling, flushed her else pale cheek; she was
 thin; languor, and alas! sickness, bent her form. We stood looking at the
 pair, forgetting what we heard in the absorbing sight; till, the last chord
 struck, the peal died away in lessening reverberations. The mighty voice,
 inorganic we might call it, for we could in no way associate it with
 mechanism of pipe or key, stilled its sonorous tone, and the girl, turning
 to lend her assistance to her aged companion, at length perceived us.
 
 It was her father; and she, since childhood, had been the guide of his
 darkened steps. They were Germans from Saxony, and, emigrating thither but
 a few years before, had formed new ties with the surrounding villagers.
 About the time that the pestilence had broken out, a young German student
 had joined them. Their simple history was easily divined. He, a noble,
 loved the fair daughter of the poor musician, and followed them in their
 flight from the persecutions of his friends; but soon the mighty leveller
 came with unblunted scythe to mow, together with the grass, the tall
 flowers of the field. The youth was an early victim. She preserved herself
 for her father's sake. His blindness permitted her to continue a delusion,
 at first the child of accident--and now solitary beings, sole survivors
 in the land, he remained unacquainted with the change, nor was aware that
 when he listened to his child's music, the mute mountains, senseless lake,
 and unconscious trees, were, himself excepted, her sole auditors.
 
 The very day that we arrived she had been attacked by symptomatic illness.
 She was paralyzed with horror at the idea of leaving her aged, sightless
 father alone on the empty earth; but she had not courage to disclose the
 truth, and the very excess of her desperation animated her to surpassing
 exertions. At the accustomed vesper hour, she led him to the chapel; and,
 though trembling and weeping on his account, she played, without fault in
 time, or error in note, the hymn written to celebrate the creation of the
 adorned earth, soon to be her tomb.
 
 We came to her like visitors from heaven itself; her high-wrought courage;
 her hardly sustained firmness, fled with the appearance of relief. With a
 shriek she rushed towards us, embraced the knees of Adrian, and uttering
 but the words, "O save my father!" with sobs and hysterical cries, opened
 the long-shut floodgates of her woe.
 
 Poor girl!--she and her father now lie side by side, beneath the high
 walnut-tree where her lover reposes, and which in her dying moments she had
 pointed out to us. Her father, at length aware of his daughter's danger,
 unable to see the changes of her dear countenance, obstinately held her
 hand, till it was chilled and stiffened by death. Nor did he then move or
 speak, till, twelve hours after, kindly death took him to his breakless
 repose. They rest beneath the sod, the tree their monument;--the hallowed
 spot is distinct in my memory, paled in by craggy Jura, and the far,
 immeasurable Alps; the spire of the church they frequented still points
 from out the embosoming trees; and though her hand be cold, still methinks
 the sounds of divine music which they loved wander about, solacing their
 gentle ghosts.
 
 [1] Burke's Reflections on the French Revolution.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 WE had now reached Switzerland, so long the final mark and aim of our
 exertions. We had looked, I know not wherefore, with hope and pleasing
 expectation on her congregation of hills and snowy crags, and opened our
 bosoms with renewed spirits to the icy Biz, which even at Midsummer used to
 come from the northern glacier laden with cold. Yet how could we nourish
 expectation of relief? Like our native England, and the vast extent of
 fertile France, this mountain-embowered land was desolate of its
 inhabitants. Nor bleak mountain-top, nor snow-nourished rivulet; not the
 ice-laden Biz, nor thunder, the tamer of contagion, had preserved them--
 why therefore should we claim exemption?
 
 Who was there indeed to save? What troop had we brought fit to stand at
 bay, and combat with the conqueror? We were a failing remnant, tamed to
 mere submission to the coming blow. A train half dead, through fear of
 death--a hopeless, unresisting, almost reckless crew, which, in the
 tossed bark of life, had given up all pilotage, and resigned themselves to
 the destructive force of ungoverned winds. Like a few furrows of unreaped
 corn, which, left standing on a wide field after the rest is gathered to
 the garner, are swiftly borne down by the winter storm. Like a few
 straggling swallows, which, remaining after their fellows had, on the first
 unkind breath of passing autumn, migrated to genial climes, were struck to
 earth by the first frost of November. Like a stray sheep that wanders over
 the sleet-beaten hill-side, while the flock is in the pen, and dies before
 morning-dawn. Like a cloud, like one of many that were spread in
 impenetrable woof over the sky, which, when the shepherd north has driven
 its companions "to drink Antipodean noon," fades and dissolves in the clear
 ether--Such were we!
 
 We left the fair margin of the beauteous lake of Geneva, and entered the
 Alpine ravines; tracing to its source the brawling Arve, through the
 rock-bound valley of Servox, beside the mighty waterfalls, and under the
 shadow of the inaccessible mountains, we travelled on; while the luxuriant
 walnut-tree gave place to the dark pine, whose musical branches swung in
 the wind, and whose upright forms had braved a thousand storms--till the
 verdant sod, the flowery dell, and shrubbery hill were exchanged for the
 sky-piercing, untrodden, seedless rock, "the bones of the world, waiting to
 be clothed with every thing necessary to give life and beauty."[1] Strange
 that we should seek shelter here! Surely, if, in those countries where
 earth was wont, like a tender mother, to nourish her children, we had found
 her a destroyer, we need not seek it here, where stricken by keen penury
 she seems to shudder through her stony veins. Nor were we mistaken in our
 conjecture. We vainly sought the vast and ever moving glaciers of
 Chamounix, rifts of pendant ice, seas of congelated waters, the leafless
 groves of tempest-battered pines, dells, mere paths for the loud avalanche,
 and hill-tops, the resort of thunder-storms. Pestilence reigned paramount
 even here. By the time that day and night, like twin sisters of equal
 growth, shared equally their dominion over the hours, one by one, beneath
 the ice-caves, beside the waters springing from the thawed snows of a
 thousand winters, another and yet another of the remnant of the race of
 Man, closed their eyes for ever to the light.
 
 Yet we were not quite wrong in seeking a scene like this, whereon to close
 the drama. Nature, true to the last, consoled us in the very heart of
 misery. Sublime grandeur of outward objects soothed our hapless hearts, and
 were in harmony with our desolation. Many sorrows have befallen man during
 his chequered course; and many a woe-stricken mourner has found himself
 sole survivor among many. Our misery took its majestic shape and colouring
 from the vast ruin, that accompanied and made one with it. Thus on lovely
 earth, many a dark ravine contains a brawling stream, shadowed by romantic
 rocks, threaded by mossy paths--but all, except this, wanted the mighty
 back-ground, the towering Alps, whose snowy capes, or bared ridges, lifted
 us from our dull mortal abode, to the palaces of Nature's own.
 
 This solemn harmony of event and situation regulated our feelings, and gave
 as it were fitting costume to our last act. Majestic gloom and tragic pomp
 attended the decease of wretched humanity. The funeral procession of
 monarchs of old, was transcended by our splendid shews. Near the sources of
 the Arveiron we performed the rites for, four only excepted, the last of
 the species. Adrian and I, leaving Clara and Evelyn wrapt in peaceful
 unobserving slumber, carried the body to this desolate spot, and placed it
 in those caves of ice beneath the glacier, which rive and split with the
 slightest sound, and bring destruction on those within the clefts--no
 bird or beast of prey could here profane the frozen form. So, with hushed
 steps and in silence, we placed the dead on a bier of ice, and then,
 departing, stood on the rocky platform beside the river springs. All hushed
 as we had been, the very striking of the air with our persons had sufficed
 to disturb the repose of this thawless region; and we had hardly left the
 cavern, before vast blocks of ice, detaching themselves from the roof,
 fell, and covered the human image we had deposited within. We had chosen a
 fair moonlight night, but our journey thither had been long, and the
 crescent sank behind the western heights by the time we had accomplished
 our purpose. The snowy mountains and blue glaciers shone in their own
 light. The rugged and abrupt ravine, which formed one side of Mont Anvert,
 was opposite to us, the glacier at our side; at our feet Arveiron, white
 and foaming, dashed over the pointed rocks that jutted into it, and, with
 whirring spray and ceaseless roar, disturbed the stilly night. Yellow
 lightnings played around the vast dome of Mont Blanc, silent as the
 snow-clad rock they illuminated; all was bare, wild, and sublime, while the
 singing of the pines in melodious murmurings added a gentle interest to the
 rough magnificence. Now the riving and fall of icy rocks clave the air; now
 the thunder of the avalanche burst on our ears. In countries whose features
 are of less magnitude, nature betrays her living powers in the foliage of
 the trees, in the growth of herbage, in the soft purling of meandering
 streams; here, endowed with giant attributes, the torrent, the
 thunder-storm, and the flow of massive waters, display her activity. Such
 the church-yard, such the requiem, such the eternal congregation, that
 waited on our companion's funeral!
 
 Nor was it the human form alone which we had placed in this eternal
 sepulchre, whose obsequies we now celebrated. With this last victim Plague
 vanished from the earth. Death had never wanted weapons wherewith to
 destroy life, and we, few and weak as we had become, were still exposed to
 every other shaft with which his full quiver teemed. But pestilence was
 absent from among them. For seven years it had had full sway upon earth;
 she had trod every nook of our spacious globe; she had mingled with the
 atmosphere, which as a cloak enwraps all our fellow-creatures--the
 inhabitants of native Europe--the luxurious Asiatic--the swarthy
 African and free American had been vanquished and destroyed by her. Her
 barbarous tyranny came to its close here in the rocky vale of Chamounix.
 
 Still recurring scenes of misery and pain, the fruits of this distemper,
 made no more a part of our lives--the word plague no longer rung in our
 ears--the aspect of plague incarnate in the human countenance no longer
 appeared before our eyes. From this moment I saw plague no more. She
 abdicated her throne, and despoiled herself of her imperial sceptre among
 the ice rocks that surrounded us. She left solitude and silence co-heirs of
 her kingdom.
 
 My present feelings are so mingled with the past, that I cannot say whether
 the knowledge of this change visited us, as we stood on this sterile spot.
 It seems to me that it did; that a cloud seemed to pass from over us, that
 a weight was taken from the air; that henceforth we breathed more freely,
 and raised our heads with some portion of former liberty. Yet we did not
 hope. We were impressed by the sentiment, that our race was run, but that
 plague would not be our destroyer. The coming time was as a mighty river,
 down which a charmed boat is driven, whose mortal steersman knows, that the
 obvious peril is not the one he needs fear, yet that danger is nigh; and
 who floats awe-struck under beetling precipices, through the dark
 and turbid waters--seeing in the distance yet stranger and ruder
 shapes, towards which he is irresistibly impelled. What would
 become of us? O for some Delphic oracle, or Pythian maid, to utter
 the secrets of futurity! O for some Oedipus to solve the riddle of
 the cruel Sphynx! Such Oedipus was I to be--not divining a word's juggle,
 but whose agonizing pangs, and sorrow-tainted life were to be the engines,
 wherewith to lay bare the secrets of destiny, and reveal the meaning of the
 enigma, whose explanation closed the history of the human race.
 
 Dim fancies, akin to these, haunted our minds, and instilled feelings not
 unallied to pleasure, as we stood beside this silent tomb of nature, reared
 by these lifeless mountains, above her living veins, choking her vital
 principle. "Thus are we left," said Adrian, "two melancholy blasted trees,
 where once a forest waved. We are left to mourn, and pine, and die. Yet
 even now we have our duties, which we must string ourselves to fulfil: the
 duty of bestowing pleasure where we can, and by force of love, irradiating
 with rainbow hues the tempest of grief. Nor will I repine if in this
 extremity we preserve what we now possess. Something tells me, Verney, that
 we need no longer dread our cruel enemy, and I cling with delight to the
 oracular voice. Though strange, it will be sweet to mark the growth of your
 little boy, and the development of Clara's young heart. In the midst of a
 desert world, we are everything to them; and, if we live, it must be our
 task to make this new mode of life happy to them. At present this is easy,
 for their childish ideas do not wander into futurity, and the stinging
 craving for sympathy, and all of love of which our nature is susceptible,
 is not yet awake within them: we cannot guess what will happen then, when
 nature asserts her indefeasible and sacred powers; but, long before that
 time, we may all be cold, as he who lies in yonder tomb of ice. We need
 only provide for the present, and endeavour to fill with pleasant images
 the inexperienced fancy of your lovely niece. The scenes which now surround
 us, vast and sublime as they are, are not such as can best contribute to
 this work. Nature is here like our fortunes, grand, but too destructive,
 bare, and rude, to be able to afford delight to her young imagination. Let
 us descend to the sunny plains of Italy. Winter will soon be here, to
 clothe this wilderness in double desolation; but we will cross the bleak
 hill-tops, and lead her to scenes of fertility and beauty, where her path
 will be adorned with flowers, and the cheery atmosphere inspire pleasure
 and hope."
 
 In pursuance of this plan we quitted Chamounix on the following day. We had
 no cause to hasten our steps; no event was transacted beyond our actual
 sphere to enchain our resolves, so we yielded to every idle whim, and
 deemed our time well spent, when we could behold the passage of the hours
 without dismay. We loitered along the lovely Vale of Servox; passed long
 hours on the bridge, which, crossing the ravine of Arve, commands a
 prospect of its pine-clothed depths, and the snowy mountains that wall it
 in. We rambled through romantic Switzerland; till, fear of coming winter
 leading us forward, the first days of October found us in the valley of La
 Maurienne, which leads to Cenis. I cannot explain the reluctance we felt at
 leaving this land of mountains; perhaps it was, that we regarded the Alps
 as boundaries between our former and our future state of existence, and so
 clung fondly to what of old we had loved. Perhaps, because we had now so
 few impulses urging to a choice between two modes of action, we were
 pleased to preserve the existence of one, and preferred the prospect of
 what we were to do, to the recollection of what had been done. We felt that
 for this year danger was past; and we believed that, for some months, we
 were secured to each other. There was a thrilling, agonizing delight in the
 thought--it filled the eyes with misty tears, it tore the heart with
 tumultuous heavings; frailer than the "snow fall in the river," were we
 each and all--but we strove to give life and individuality to the
 meteoric course of our several existences, and to feel that no moment
 escaped us unenjoyed. Thus tottering on the dizzy brink, we were happy.
 Yes! as we sat beneath the toppling rocks, beside the waterfalls, near
 
  --Forests, ancient as the hills,
 
 And folding sunny spots of greenery, where the chamois grazed, and the
 timid squirrel laid up its hoard--descanting on the charms of nature,
 drinking in the while her unalienable beauties--we were, in an empty
 world, happy.
 
 Yet, O days of joy--days, when eye spoke to eye, and voices, sweeter than
 the music of the swinging branches of the pines, or rivulet's gentle
 murmur, answered mine--yet, O days replete with beatitude, days of loved
 society--days unutterably dear to me forlorn--pass, O pass before me,
 making me in your memory forget what I am. Behold, how my streaming eyes
 blot this senseless paper--behold, how my features are convulsed by
 agonizing throes, at your mere recollection, now that, alone, my tears
 flow, my lips quiver, my cries fill the air, unseen, unmarked, unheard!
 Yet, O yet, days of delight! let me dwell on your long-drawn hours!
 
 As the cold increased upon us, we passed the Alps, and descended into
 Italy. At the uprising of morn, we sat at our repast, and cheated our
 regrets by gay sallies or learned disquisitions. The live-long day we
 sauntered on, still keeping in view the end of our journey, but careless of
 the hour of its completion. As the evening star shone out, and the orange
 sunset, far in the west, marked the position of the dear land we had for
 ever left, talk, thought enchaining, made the hours fly--O that we had
 lived thus for ever and for ever! Of what consequence was it to our four
 hearts, that they alone were the fountains of life in the wide world? As
 far as mere individual sentiment was concerned, we had rather be left thus
 united together, than if, each alone in a populous desert of unknown men,
 we had wandered truly companionless till life's last term. In this manner,
 we endeavoured to console each other; in this manner, true philosophy
 taught us to reason.
 
 It was the delight of Adrian and myself to wait on Clara, naming her the
 little queen of the world, ourselves her humblest servitors. When we
 arrived at a town, our first care was to select for her its most choice
 abode; to make sure that no harrowing relic remained of its former
 inhabitants; to seek food for her, and minister to her wants with assiduous
 tenderness. Clara entered into our scheme with childish gaiety. Her chief
 business was to attend on Evelyn; but it was her sport to array herself in
 splendid robes, adorn herself with sunny gems, and ape a princely state.
 Her religion, deep and pure, did not teach her to refuse to blunt thus the
 keen sting of regret; her youthful vivacity made her enter, heart and soul,
 into these strange masquerades.
 
 We had resolved to pass the ensuing winter at Milan, which, as being a
 large and luxurious city, would afford us choice of homes. We had descended
 the Alps, and left far behind their vast forests and mighty crags. We
 entered smiling Italy. Mingled grass and corn grew in her plains, the
 unpruned vines threw their luxuriant branches around the elms. The grapes,
 overripe, had fallen on the ground, or hung purple, or burnished green,
 among the red and yellow leaves. The ears of standing corn winnowed to
 emptiness by the spendthrift winds; the fallen foliage of the trees, the
 weed-grown brooks, the dusky olive, now spotted with its blackened fruit;
 the chestnuts, to which the squirrel only was harvest-man; all plenty, and
 yet, alas! all poverty, painted in wondrous hues and fantastic groupings
 this land of beauty. In the towns, in the voiceless towns, we visited the
 churches, adorned by pictures, master-pieces of art, or galleries of
 statues--while in this genial clime the animals, in new found liberty,
 rambled through the gorgeous palaces, and hardly feared our forgotten
 aspect. The dove-coloured oxen turned their full eyes on us, and paced
 slowly by; a startling throng of silly sheep, with pattering feet, would
 start up in some chamber, formerly dedicated to the repose of beauty, and
 rush, huddling past us, down the marble staircase into the street, and
 again in at the first open door, taking unrebuked possession of hallowed
 sanctuary, or kingly council-chamber. We no longer started at these
 occurrences, nor at worse exhibition of change--when the palace had
 become a mere tomb, pregnant with fetid stench, strewn with the dead; and
 we could perceive how pestilence and fear had played strange antics,
 chasing the luxurious dame to the dank fields and bare cottage; gathering,
 among carpets of Indian woof, and beds of silk, the rough peasant, or the
 deformed half-human shape of the wretched beggar.
 
 We arrived at Milan, and stationed ourselves in the Vice-Roy's palace. Here
 we made laws for ourselves, dividing our day, and fixing distinct
 occupations for each hour. In the morning we rode in the adjoining country,
 or wandered through the palaces, in search of pictures or antiquities. In
 the evening we assembled to read or to converse. There were few books that
 we dared read; few, that did not cruelly deface the painting we bestowed on
 our solitude, by recalling combinations and emotions never more to be
 experienced by us. Metaphysical disquisition; fiction, which wandering from
 all reality, lost itself in self-created errors; poets of times so far gone
 by, that to read of them was as to read of Atlantis and Utopia; or such as
 referred to nature only, and the workings of one particular mind; but most
 of all, talk, varied and ever new, beguiled our hours.
 
 While we paused thus in our onward career towards death, time held on its
 accustomed course. Still and for ever did the earth roll on, enthroned in
 her atmospheric car, speeded by the force of the invisible coursers of
 never-erring necessity. And now, this dew-drop in the sky, this ball,
 ponderous with mountains, lucent with waves, passing from the short tyranny
 of watery Pisces and the frigid Ram, entered the radiant demesne of Taurus
 and the Twins. There, fanned by vernal airs, the Spirit of Beauty sprung
 from her cold repose; and, with winnowing wings and soft pacing feet, set a
 girdle of verdure around the earth, sporting among the violets, hiding
 within the springing foliage of the trees, tripping lightly down the
 radiant streams into the sunny deep. "For lo! winter is past, the rain is
 over and gone; the flowers appear on the earth, the time of the singing of
 birds is come, and the voice of the turtle is heard in our land; the fig
 tree putteth forth her green figs, and the vines, with the tender grape,
 give a good smell."[2] Thus was it in the time of the ancient regal poet;
 thus was it now.
 
 Yet how could we miserable hail the approach of this delightful season? We
 hoped indeed that death did not now as heretofore walk in its shadow; yet,
 left as we were alone to each other, we looked in each other's faces with
 enquiring eyes, not daring altogether to trust to our presentiments, and
 endeavouring to divine which would be the hapless survivor to the other
 three. We were to pass the summer at the lake of Como, and thither we
 removed as soon as spring grew to her maturity, and the snow disappeared
 from the hill tops. Ten miles from Como, under the steep heights of the
 eastern mountains, by the margin of the lake, was a villa called the
 Pliniana, from its being built on the site of a fountain, whose periodical
 ebb and flow is described by the younger Pliny in his letters. The house
 had nearly fallen into ruin, till in the year 2090, an English nobleman had
 bought it, and fitted it up with every luxury. Two large halls, hung with
 splendid tapestry, and paved with marble, opened on each side of a court,
 of whose two other sides one overlooked the deep dark lake, and the other
 was bounded by a mountain, from whose stony side gushed, with roar and
 splash, the celebrated fountain. Above, underwood of myrtle and tufts of
 odorous plants crowned the rock, while the star-pointing giant cypresses
 reared themselves in the blue air, and the recesses of the hills were
 adorned with the luxuriant growth of chestnut-trees. Here we fixed our
 summer residence. We had a lovely skiff, in which we sailed, now stemming
 the midmost waves, now coasting the over-hanging and craggy banks, thick
 sown with evergreens, which dipped their shining leaves in the waters, and
 were mirrored in many a little bay and creek of waters of translucent
 darkness. Here orange plants bloomed, here birds poured forth melodious
 hymns; and here, during spring, the cold snake emerged from the clefts, and
 basked on the sunny terraces of rock.
 
 Were we not happy in this paradisiacal retreat? If some kind spirit had
 whispered forgetfulness to us, methinks we should have been happy here,
 where the precipitous mountains, nearly pathless, shut from our view the
 far fields of desolate earth, and with small exertion of the imagination,
 we might fancy that the cities were still resonant with popular hum, and
 the peasant still guided his plough through the furrow, and that we, the
 world's free denizens, enjoyed a voluntary exile, and not a remediless
 cutting off from our extinct species.
 
 Not one among us enjoyed the beauty of this scenery so much as Clara.
 Before we quitted Milan, a change had taken place in her habits and
 manners. She lost her gaiety, she laid aside her sports, and assumed an
 almost vestal plainness of attire. She shunned us, retiring with Evelyn to
 some distant chamber or silent nook; nor did she enter into his pastimes
 with the same zest as she was wont, but would sit and watch him with sadly
 tender smiles, and eyes bright with tears, yet without a word of complaint.
 She approached us timidly, avoided our caresses, nor shook off her
 embarrassment till some serious discussion or lofty theme called her for
 awhile out of herself. Her beauty grew as a rose, which, opening to the
 summer wind, discloses leaf after leaf till the sense aches with its excess
 of loveliness. A slight and variable colour tinged her cheeks, and her
 motions seemed attuned by some hidden harmony of surpassing sweetness. We
 redoubled our tenderness and earnest attentions. She received them with
 grateful smiles, that fled swift as sunny beam from a glittering wave on an
 April day.
 
 Our only acknowledged point of sympathy with her, appeared to be Evelyn.
 This dear little fellow was a comforter and delight to us beyond all words.
 His buoyant spirit, and his innocent ignorance of our vast calamity, were
 balm to us, whose thoughts and feelings were over-wrought and spun out in
 the immensity of speculative sorrow. To cherish, to caress, to amuse him
 was the common task of all. Clara, who felt towards him in some degree like
 a young mother, gratefully acknowledged our kindness towards him. To me, O!
 to me, who saw the clear brows and soft eyes of the beloved of my heart, my
 lost and ever dear Idris, re-born in his gentle face, to me he was dear
 even to pain; if I pressed him to my heart, methought I clasped a real and
 living part of her, who had lain there through long years of youthful
 happiness.
 
 It was the custom of Adrian and myself to go out each day in our skiff to
 forage in the adjacent country. In these expeditions we were seldom
 accompanied by Clara or her little charge, but our return was an hour of
 hilarity. Evelyn ransacked our stores with childish eagerness, and we
 always brought some new found gift for our fair companion. Then too we made
 discoveries of lovely scenes or gay palaces, whither in the evening we all
 proceeded. Our sailing expeditions were most divine, and with a fair wind
 or transverse course we cut the liquid waves; and, if talk failed under the
 pressure of thought, I had my clarionet with me, which awoke the echoes,
 and gave the change to our careful minds. Clara at such times often
 returned to her former habits of free converse and gay sally; and though
 our four hearts alone beat in the world, those four hearts were happy.
 
 One day, on our return from the town of Como, with a laden boat, we
 expected as usual to be met at the port by Clara and Evelyn, and we were
 somewhat surprised to see the beach vacant. I, as my nature prompted, would
 not prognosticate evil, but explained it away as a mere casual incident.
 Not so Adrian. He was seized with sudden trembling and apprehension, and he
 called to me with vehemence to steer quickly for land, and, when near,
 leapt from the boat, half falling into the water; and, scrambling up the
 steep bank, hastened along the narrow strip of garden, the only level space
 between the lake and the mountain. I followed without delay; the garden and
 inner court were empty, so was the house, whose every room we visited.
 Adrian called loudly upon Clara's name, and was about to rush up the near
 mountain-path, when the door of a summer-house at the end of the garden
 slowly opened, and Clara appeared, not advancing towards us, but leaning
 against a column of the building with blanched cheeks, in a posture of
 utter despondency. Adrian sprang towards her with a cry of joy, and folded
 her delightedly in his arms. She withdrew from his embrace, and, without a
 word, again entered the summer-house. Her quivering lips, her despairing
 heart refused to afford her voice to express our misfortune. Poor little
 Evelyn had, while playing with her, been seized with sudden fever, and now
 lay torpid and speechless on a little couch in the summer-house.
 
 For a whole fortnight we unceasingly watched beside the poor child, as his
 life declined under the ravages of a virulent typhus. His little form and
 tiny lineaments encaged the embryo of the world-spanning mind of man. Man's
 nature, brimful of passions and affections, would have had an home in that
 little heart, whose swift pulsations hurried towards their close. His small
 hand's fine mechanism, now flaccid and unbent, would in the growth of sinew
 and muscle, have achieved works of beauty or of strength. His tender rosy
 feet would have trod in firm manhood the bowers and glades of earth--
 these reflections were now of little use: he lay, thought and strength
 suspended, waiting unresisting the final blow.
 
 We watched at his bedside, and when the access of fever was on him, we
 neither spoke nor looked at each other, marking only his obstructed breath
 and the mortal glow that tinged his sunken cheek, the heavy death that
 weighed on his eyelids. It is a trite evasion to say, that words could not
 express our long drawn agony; yet how can words image sensations, whose
 tormenting keenness throw us back, as it were, on the deep roots and hidden
 foundations of our nature, which shake our being with earth-quake-throe, so
 that we leave to confide in accustomed feelings which like mother-earth
 support us, and cling to some vain imagination or deceitful hope, which
 will soon be buried in the ruins occasioned by the final shock. I have
 called that period a fortnight, which we passed watching the changes of the
 sweet child's malady--and such it might have been--at night, we
 wondered to find another day gone, while each particular hour seemed
 endless. Day and night were exchanged for one another uncounted; we slept
 hardly at all, nor did we even quit his room, except when a pang of grief
 seized us, and we retired from each other for a short period to conceal our
 sobs and tears. We endeavoured in vain to abstract Clara from this
 deplorable scene. She sat, hour after hour, looking at him, now softly
 arranging his pillow, and, while he had power to swallow, administered his
 drink. At length the moment of his death came: the blood paused in its flow
 --his eyes opened, and then closed again: without convulsion or sigh, the
 frail tenement was left vacant of its spiritual inhabitant.
 
 I have heard that the sight of the dead has confirmed materialists in their
 belief. I ever felt otherwise. Was that my child--that moveless decaying
 inanimation? My child was enraptured by my caresses; his dear voice
 cloathed with meaning articulations his thoughts, otherwise inaccessible;
 his smile was a ray of the soul, and the same soul sat upon its throne in
 his eyes. I turn from this mockery of what he was. Take, O earth, thy debt!
 freely and for ever I consign to thee the garb thou didst afford. But thou,
 sweet child, amiable and beloved boy, either thy spirit has sought a fitter
 dwelling, or, shrined in my heart, thou livest while it lives.
 
 We placed his remains under a cypress, the upright mountain being scooped
 out to receive them. And then Clara said, "If you wish me to live, take me
 from hence. There is something in this scene of transcendent beauty, in
 these trees, and hills and waves, that for ever whisper to me, leave thy
 cumbrous flesh, and make a part of us. I earnestly entreat you to take me
 away."
 
 So on the fifteenth of August we bade adieu to our villa, and the
 embowering shades of this abode of beauty; to calm bay and noisy waterfall;
 to Evelyn's little grave we bade farewell! and then, with heavy hearts, we
 departed on our pilgrimage towards Rome.
 
 [1] Mary Wollstonecraft's Letters from Norway.
 [2] Solomon's Song.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 NOW--soft awhile--have I arrived so near the end? Yes! it is all over
 now--a step or two over those new made graves, and the wearisome way is
 done. Can I accomplish my task? Can I streak my paper with words capacious
 of the grand conclusion? Arise, black Melancholy! quit thy Cimmerian
 solitude! Bring with thee murky fogs from hell, which may drink up the day;
 bring blight and pestiferous exhalations, which, entering the hollow
 caverns and breathing places of earth, may fill her stony veins with
 corruption, so that not only herbage may no longer flourish, the trees may
 rot, and the rivers run with gall--but the everlasting mountains be
 decomposed, and the mighty deep putrify, and the genial atmosphere which
 clips the globe, lose all powers of generation and sustenance. Do this, sad
 visaged power, while I write, while eyes read these pages.
 
 And who will read them? Beware, tender offspring of the re-born world--
 beware, fair being, with human heart, yet untamed by care, and human brow,
 yet unploughed by time--beware, lest the cheerful current of thy blood be
 checked, thy golden locks turn grey, thy sweet dimpling smiles be changed
 to fixed, harsh wrinkles! Let not day look on these lines, lest garish day
 waste, turn pale, and die. Seek a cypress grove, whose moaning boughs will
 be harmony befitting; seek some cave, deep embowered in earth's dark
 entrails, where no light will penetrate, save that which struggles, red and
 flickering, through a single fissure, staining thy page with grimmest
 livery of death.
 
 There is a painful confusion in my brain, which refuses to delineate
 distinctly succeeding events. Sometimes the irradiation of my friend's
 gentle smile comes before me; and methinks its light spans and fills
 eternity--then, again, I feel the gasping throes--
 
 We quitted Como, and in compliance with Adrian's earnest desire, we took
 Venice in our way to Rome. There was something to the English peculiarly
 attractive in the idea of this wave-encircled, island-enthroned city.
 Adrian had never seen it. We went down the Po and the Brenta in a boat;
 and, the days proving intolerably hot, we rested in the bordering palaces
 during the day, travelling through the night, when darkness made the
 bordering banks indistinct, and our solitude less remarkable; when the
 wandering moon lit the waves that divided before our prow, and the
 night-wind filled our sails, and the murmuring stream, waving trees, and
 swelling canvass, accorded in harmonious strain. Clara, long overcome by
 excessive grief, had to a great degree cast aside her timid, cold reserve,
 and received our attentions with grateful tenderness. While Adrian with
 poetic fervour discoursed of the glorious nations of the dead, of the
 beauteous earth and the fate of man, she crept near him, drinking in his
 speech with silent pleasure. We banished from our talk, and as much as
 possible from our thoughts, the knowledge of our desolation. And it would
 be incredible to an inhabitant of cities, to one among a busy throng, to
 what extent we succeeded. It was as a man confined in a dungeon, whose
 small and grated rift at first renders the doubtful light more sensibly
 obscure, till, the visual orb having drunk in the beam, and adapted itself
 to its scantiness, he finds that clear noon inhabits his cell. So we, a
 simple triad on empty earth, were multiplied to each other, till we became
 all in all. We stood like trees, whose roots are loosened by the wind,
 which support one another, leaning and clinging with encreased fervour
 while the wintry storms howl. Thus we floated down the widening stream of
 the Po, sleeping when the cicale sang, awake with the stars. We entered the
 narrower banks of the Brenta, and arrived at the shore of the Laguna at
 sunrise on the sixth of September. The bright orb slowly rose from behind
 its cupolas and towers, and shed its penetrating light upon the glassy
 waters. Wrecks of gondolas, and some few uninjured ones, were strewed on
 the beach at Fusina. We embarked in one of these for the widowed daughter
 of ocean, who, abandoned and fallen, sat forlorn on her propping isles,
 looking towards the far mountains of Greece. We rowed lightly over the
 Laguna, and entered Canale Grande. The tide ebbed sullenly from out the
 broken portals and violated halls of Venice: sea weed and sea monsters were
 left on the blackened marble, while the salt ooze defaced the matchless
 works of art that adorned their walls, and the sea gull flew out from the
 shattered window. In the midst of this appalling ruin of the monuments of
 man's power, nature asserted her ascendancy, and shone more beauteous from
 the contrast. The radiant waters hardly trembled, while the rippling waves
 made many sided mirrors to the sun; the blue immensity, seen beyond Lido,
 stretched far, unspecked by boat, so tranquil, so lovely, that it seemed to
 invite us to quit the land strewn with ruins, and to seek refuge from
 sorrow and fear on its placid extent.
 
 We saw the ruins of this hapless city from the height of the tower of San
 Marco, immediately under us, and turned with sickening hearts to the sea,
 which, though it be a grave, rears no monument, discloses no ruin. Evening
 had come apace. The sun set in calm majesty behind the misty summits of the
 Apennines, and its golden and roseate hues painted the mountains of the
 opposite shore. "That land," said Adrian, "tinged with the last glories of
 the day, is Greece." Greece! The sound had a responsive chord in the bosom
 of Clara. She vehemently reminded us that we had promised to take her once
 again to Greece, to the tomb of her parents. Why go to Rome? what should we
 do at Rome? We might take one of the many vessels to be found here, embark
 in it, and steer right for Albania.
 
 I objected the dangers of ocean, and the distance of the mountains we saw,
 from Athens; a distance which, from the savage uncultivation of the
 country, was almost impassable. Adrian, who was delighted with Clara's
 proposal, obviated these objections. The season was favourable; the
 north-west that blew would take us transversely across the gulph; and then
 we might find, in some abandoned port, a light Greek caique, adapted for
 such navigation, and run down the coast of the Morea, and, passing over the
 Isthmus of Corinth, without much land-travelling or fatigue, find ourselves
 at Athens. This appeared to me wild talk; but the sea, glowing with a
 thousand purple hues, looked so brilliant and safe; my beloved companions
 were so earnest, so determined, that, when Adrian said, "Well, though it is
 not exactly what you wish, yet consent, to please me"--I could no longer
 refuse. That evening we selected a vessel, whose size just seemed fitted
 for our enterprize; we bent the sails and put the rigging in order, and
 reposing that night in one of the city's thousand palaces, agreed to embark
 at sunrise the following morning.
 
   When winds that move not its calm surface, sweep
   The azure sea, I love the land no more;
   The smiles of the serene and tranquil deep
   Tempt my unquiet mind--
 
 Thus said Adrian, quoting a translation of Moschus's poem, as in the clear
 morning light, we rowed over the Laguna, past Lido, into the open sea--I
 would have added in continuation,
 
   But when the roar
   Of ocean's gray abyss resounds, and foam
   Gathers upon the sea, and vast waves burst--
 
 But my friends declared that such verses were evil augury;
 so in cheerful mood we left the shallow waters, and, when
 out at sea, unfurled our sails to catch the favourable breeze.
 The laughing morning air filled them, while sun-light bathed earth, sky and
 ocean--the placid waves divided to receive our keel, and playfully kissed
 the dark sides of our little skiff, murmuring a welcome; as land receded,
 still the blue expanse, most waveless, twin sister to the azure empyrean,
 afforded smooth conduct to our bark. As the air and waters were tranquil
 and balmy, so were our minds steeped in quiet. In comparison with the
 unstained deep, funereal earth appeared a grave, its high rocks and stately
 mountains were but monuments, its trees the plumes of a herse, the brooks
 and rivers brackish with tears for departed man. Farewell to desolate towns
 --to fields with their savage intermixture of corn and weeds--to ever
 multiplying relics of our lost species. Ocean, we commit ourselves to thee
 --even as the patriarch of old floated above the drowned world, let us be
 saved, as thus we betake ourselves to thy perennial flood.
 
 Adrian sat at the helm; I attended to the rigging, the breeze right aft
 filled our swelling canvas, and we ran before it over the untroubled deep.
 The wind died away at noon; its idle breath just permitted us to hold our
 course. As lazy, fair-weather sailors, careless of the coming hour, we
 talked gaily of our coasting voyage, of our arrival at Athens. We would
 make our home of one of the Cyclades, and there in myrtle-groves, amidst
 perpetual spring, fanned by the wholesome sea-breezes--we would live long
 years in beatific union--Was there such a thing as death in the world?--
 
 
 The sun passed its zenith, and lingered down the stainless floor of heaven.
 Lying in the boat, my face turned up to the sky, I thought I saw on its
 blue white, marbled streaks, so slight, so immaterial, that now I said--
 They are there--and now, It is a mere imagination. A sudden fear stung me
 while I gazed; and, starting up, and running to the prow,--as I stood, my
 hair was gently lifted on my brow--a dark line of ripples appeared to the
 east, gaining rapidly on us--my breathless remark to Adrian, was followed
 by the flapping of the canvas, as the adverse wind struck it, and our boat
 lurched--swift as speech, the web of the storm thickened over head, the
 sun went down red, the dark sea was strewed with foam, and our skiff rose
 and fell in its encreasing furrows.
 
 Behold us now in our frail tenement, hemmed in by hungry, roaring waves,
 buffeted by winds. In the inky east two vast clouds, sailing contrary ways,
 met; the lightning leapt forth, and the hoarse thunder muttered. Again in
 the south, the clouds replied, and the forked stream of fire running along
 the black sky, shewed us the appalling piles of clouds, now met and
 obliterated by the heaving waves. Great God! And we alone--we three--
 alone--alone--sole dwellers on the sea and on the earth, we three must
 perish! The vast universe, its myriad worlds, and the plains of boundless
 earth which we had left--the extent of shoreless sea around--contracted
 to my view--they and all that they contained, shrunk up to one point,
 even to our tossing bark, freighted with glorious humanity.
 
 A convulsion of despair crossed the love-beaming face of Adrian, while with
 set teeth he murmured, "Yet they shall be saved!" Clara, visited by an
 human pang, pale and trembling, crept near him--he looked on her with an
 encouraging smile--"Do you fear, sweet girl? O, do not fear, we shall
 soon be on shore!"
 
 The darkness prevented me from seeing the changes of her countenance; but
 her voice was clear and sweet, as she replied, "Why should I fear? neither
 sea nor storm can harm us, if mighty destiny or the ruler of destiny does
 not permit. And then the stinging fear of surviving either of you, is not
 here--one death will clasp us undivided."
 
 Meanwhile we took in all our sails, save a gib; and, as soon as we might
 without danger, changed our course, running with the wind for the Italian
 shore. Dark night mixed everything; we hardly discerned the white crests of
 the murderous surges, except when lightning made brief noon, and drank the
 darkness, shewing us our danger, and restoring us to double night. We were
 all silent, except when Adrian, as steersman, made an encouraging
 observation. Our little shell obeyed the rudder miraculously well, and ran
 along on the top of the waves, as if she had been an offspring of the sea,
 and the angry mother sheltered her endangered child.
 
 I sat at the prow, watching our course; when suddenly I heard the waters
 break with redoubled fury. We were certainly near the shore--at the same
 time I cried, "About there!" and a broad lightning filling the concave,
 shewed us for one moment the level beach a-head, disclosing even the sands,
 and stunted, ooze-sprinkled beds of reeds, that grew at high water mark.
 Again it was dark, and we drew in our breath with such content as one may,
 who, while fragments of volcano-hurled rock darken the air, sees a vast
 mass ploughing the ground immediately at his feet. What to do we knew not
 --the breakers here, there, everywhere, encompassed us--they roared, and
 dashed, and flung their hated spray in our faces. With considerable
 difficulty and danger we succeeded at length in altering our course, and
 stretched out from shore. I urged my companions to prepare for the wreck of
 our little skiff, and to bind themselves to some oar or spar which might
 suffice to float them. I was myself an excellent swimmer--the very sight
 of the sea was wont to raise in me such sensations, as a huntsman
 experiences, when he hears a pack of hounds in full cry; I loved to feel
 the waves wrap me and strive to overpower me; while I, lord of myself,
 moved this way or that, in spite of their angry buffetings. Adrian also
 could swim--but the weakness of his frame prevented him from feeling
 pleasure in the exercise, or acquiring any great expertness. But what power
 could the strongest swimmer oppose to the overpowering violence of ocean in
 its fury? My efforts to prepare my companions were rendered nearly futile
 --for the roaring breakers prevented our hearing one another speak, and
 the waves, that broke continually over our boat, obliged me to exert all my
 strength in lading the water out, as fast as it came in. The while
 darkness, palpable and rayless, hemmed us round, dissipated only by the
 lightning; sometimes we beheld thunderbolts, fiery red, fall into the sea,
 and at intervals vast spouts stooped from the clouds, churning the wild
 ocean, which rose to meet them; while the fierce gale bore the rack
 onwards, and they were lost in the chaotic mingling of sky and sea. Our
 gunwales had been torn away, our single sail had been rent to ribbands, and
 borne down the stream of the wind. We had cut away our mast, and lightened
 the boat of all she contained--Clara attempted to assist me in heaving
 the water from the hold, and, as she turned her eyes to look on the
 lightning, I could discern by that momentary gleam, that resignation had
 conquered every fear. We have a power given us in any worst extremity,
 which props the else feeble mind of man, and enables us to endure the most
 savage tortures with a stillness of soul which in hours of happiness we
 could not have imagined. A calm, more dreadful in truth than the tempest,
 allayed the wild beatings of my heart--a calm like that of the gamester,
 the suicide, and the murderer, when the last die is on the point of being
 cast--while the poisoned cup is at the lips,--as the death-blow is
 about to be given.
 
 Hours passed thus--hours which might write old age on the face of
 beardless youth, and grizzle the silky hair of infancy---hours, while the
 chaotic uproar continued, while each dread gust transcended in fury the one
 before, and our skiff hung on the breaking wave, and then rushed into the
 valley below, and trembled and spun between the watery precipices that
 seemed most to meet above her. For a moment the gale paused, and ocean sank
 to comparative silence--it was a breathless interval; the wind which, as
 a practised leaper, had gathered itself up before it sprung, now with
 terrific roar rushed over the sea, and the waves struck our stern. Adrian
 exclaimed that the rudder was gone;--"We are lost," cried Clara, "Save
 yourselves--O save yourselves!" The lightning shewed me the poor girl
 half buried in the water at the bottom of the boat; as she was sinking in
 it Adrian caught her up, and sustained her in his arms. We were without a
 rudder--we rushed prow foremost into the vast billows piled up a-head--
 they broke over and filled the tiny skiff; one scream I heard--one cry
 that we were gone, I uttered; I found myself in the waters; darkness was
 around. When the light of the tempest flashed, I saw the keel of our upset
 boat close to me--I clung to this, grasping it with clenched hand and
 nails, while I endeavoured during each flash to discover any appearance of
 my companions. I thought I saw Adrian at no great distance from me,
 clinging to an oar; I sprung from my hold, and with energy beyond my human
 strength, I dashed aside the waters as I strove to lay hold of him. As that
 hope failed, instinctive love of life animated me, and feelings of
 contention, as if a hostile will combated with mine. I breasted the surges,
 and flung them from me, as I would the opposing front and sharpened claws
 of a lion about to enfang my bosom. When I had been beaten down by one
 wave, I rose on another, while I felt bitter pride curl my lip.
 
 Ever since the storm had carried us near the shore, we had never attained
 any great distance from it. With every flash I saw the bordering coast; yet
 the progress I made was small, while each wave, as it receded, carried me
 back into ocean's far abysses. At one moment I felt my foot touch the sand,
 and then again I was in deep water; my arms began to lose their power of
 motion; my breath failed me under the influence of the strangling waters--
 a thousand wild and delirious thoughts crossed me: as well as I can now
 recall them, my chief feeling was, how sweet it would be to lay my head on
 the quiet earth, where the surges would no longer strike my weakened frame,
 nor the sound of waters ring in my ears--to attain this repose, not to
 save my life, I made a last effort--the shelving shore suddenly presented
 a footing for me. I rose, and was again thrown down by the breakers--a
 point of rock to which I was enabled to cling, gave me a moment's respite;
 and then, taking advantage of the ebbing of the waves, I ran forwards--
 gained the dry sands, and fell senseless on the oozy reeds that sprinkled
 them.
 
 I must have lain long deprived of life; for when first, with a sickening
 feeling, I unclosed my eyes, the light of morning met them. Great change
 had taken place meanwhile: grey dawn dappled the flying clouds, which sped
 onwards, leaving visible at intervals vast lakes of pure ether. A fountain
 of light arose in an encreasing stream from the east, behind the waves of
 the Adriatic, changing the grey to a roseate hue, and then flooding sky and
 sea with aerial gold.
 
 A kind of stupor followed my fainting; my senses were alive, but memory was
 extinct. The blessed respite was short--a snake lurked near me to sting
 me into life--on the first retrospective emotion I would have started up,
 but my limbs refused to obey me; my knees trembled, the muscles had lost
 all power. I still believed that I might find one of my beloved companions
 cast like me, half alive, on the beach; and I strove in every way to
 restore my frame to the use of its animal functions. I wrung the brine from
 my hair; and the rays of the risen sun soon visited me with genial warmth.
 With the restoration of my bodily powers, my mind became in some degree
 aware of the universe of misery, henceforth to be its dwelling. I ran to
 the water's edge, calling on the beloved names. Ocean drank in, and
 absorbed my feeble voice, replying with pitiless roar. I climbed a near
 tree: the level sands bounded by a pine forest, and the sea clipped round
 by the horizon, was all that I could discern. In vain I extended my
 researches along the beach; the mast we had thrown overboard, with tangled
 cordage, and remnants of a sail, was the sole relic land received of our
 wreck. Sometimes I stood still, and wrung my hands. I accused earth and sky
 --the universal machine and the Almighty power that misdirected it. Again
 I threw myself on the sands, and then the sighing wind, mimicking a human
 cry, roused me to bitter, fallacious hope. Assuredly if any little bark or
 smallest canoe had been near, I should have sought the savage plains of
 ocean, found the dear remains of my lost ones, and clinging round them,
 have shared their grave.
 
 The day passed thus; each moment contained eternity; although when hour
 after hour had gone by, I wondered at the quick flight of time. Yet even
 now I had not drunk the bitter potion to the dregs; I was not yet persuaded
 of my loss; I did not yet feel in every pulsation, in every nerve, in every
 thought, that I remained alone of my race,--that I was the LAST MAN.
 
 The day had clouded over, and a drizzling rain set in at sunset. Even the
 eternal skies weep, I thought; is there any shame then, that mortal man
 should spend himself in tears? I remembered the ancient fables, in which
 human beings are described as dissolving away through weeping into
 ever-gushing fountains. Ah! that so it were; and then my destiny would be
 in some sort akin to the watery death of Adrian and Clara. Oh! grief is
 fantastic; it weaves a web on which to trace the history of its woe from
 every form and change around; it incorporates itself with all living
 nature; it finds sustenance in every object; as light, it fills all things,
 and, like light, it gives its own colours to all.
 
 I had wandered in my search to some distance from the spot on which I had
 been cast, and came to one of those watch-towers, which at stated distances
 line the Italian shore. I was glad of shelter, glad to find a work of human
 hands, after I had gazed so long on nature's drear barrenness; so I
 entered, and ascended the rough winding staircase into the guard-room. So
 far was fate kind, that no harrowing vestige remained of its former
 inhabitants; a few planks laid across two iron tressels, and strewed with
 the dried leaves of Indian corn, was the bed presented to me; and an open
 chest, containing some half mouldered biscuit, awakened an appetite, which
 perhaps existed before, but of which, until now, I was not aware. Thirst
 also, violent and parching, the result of the sea-water I had drank, and of
 the exhaustion of my frame, tormented me. Kind nature had gifted the supply
 of these wants with pleasurable sensations, so that I--even I!--was
 refreshed and calmed, as I ate of this sorry fare, and drank a little of
 the sour wine which half filled a flask left in this abandoned dwelling.
 Then I stretched myself on the bed, not to be disdained by the victim of
 shipwreck. The earthy smell of the dried leaves was balm to my sense after
 the hateful odour of sea-weed. I forgot my state of loneliness. I neither
 looked backward nor forward; my senses were hushed to repose; I fell asleep
 and dreamed of all dear inland scenes, of hay-makers, of the shepherd's
 whistle to his dog, when he demanded his help to drive the flock to fold;
 of sights and sounds peculiar to my boyhood's mountain life, which I had
 long forgotten.
 
 I awoke in a painful agony--for I fancied that ocean, breaking its
 bounds, carried away the fixed continent and deep rooted mountains,
 together with the streams I loved, the woods, and the flocks--it raged
 around, with that continued and dreadful roar which had accompanied the
 last wreck of surviving humanity. As my waking sense returned, the bare
 walls of the guard room closed round me, and the rain pattered against the
 single window. How dreadful it is, to emerge from the oblivion of slumber,
 and to receive as a good morrow the mute wailing of one's own hapless heart
 --to return from the land of deceptive dreams, to the heavy knowledge of
 unchanged disaster!--Thus was it with me, now, and for ever! The sting of
 other griefs might be blunted by time; and even mine yielded sometimes
 during the day, to the pleasure inspired by the imagination or the senses;
 but I never look first upon the morning-light but with my fingers pressed
 tight on my bursting heart, and my soul deluged with the interminable flood
 of hopeless misery. Now I awoke for the first time in the dead world--I
 awoke alone--and the dull dirge of the sea, heard even amidst the rain,
 recalled me to the reflection of the wretch I had become. The sound came
 like a reproach, a scoff--like the sting of remorse in the soul--I
 gasped--the veins and muscles of my throat swelled, suffocating me. I put
 my fingers to my ears, I buried my head in the leaves of my couch, I would
 have dived to the centre to lose hearing of that hideous moan.
 
 But another task must be mine--again I visited the detested beach--
 again I vainly looked far and wide--again I raised my unanswered cry,
 lifting up the only voice that could ever again force the mute air to
 syllable the human thought.
 
 What a pitiable, forlorn, disconsolate being I was! My very aspect and garb
 told the tale of my despair. My hair was matted and wild--my limbs soiled
 with salt ooze; while at sea, I had thrown off those of my garments that
 encumbered me, and the rain drenched the thin summer-clothing I had
 retained--my feet were bare, and the stunted reeds and broken shells made
 them bleed--the while, I hurried to and fro, now looking earnestly on
 some distant rock which, islanded in the sands, bore for a moment a
 deceptive appearance--now with flashing eyes reproaching the murderous
 ocean for its unutterable cruelty.
 
 For a moment I compared myself to that monarch of the waste--Robinson
 Crusoe. We had been both thrown companionless--he on the shore of a
 desolate island: I on that of a desolate world. I was rich in the so called
 goods of life. If I turned my steps from the near barren scene, and entered
 any of the earth's million cities, I should find their wealth stored up for
 my accommodation--clothes, food, books, and a choice of dwelling beyond
 the command of the princes of former times--every climate was subject to
 my selection, while he was obliged to toil in the acquirement of every
 necessary, and was the inhabitant of a tropical island, against whose heats
 and storms he could obtain small shelter.--Viewing the question thus, who
 would not have preferred the Sybarite enjoyments I could command, the
 philosophic leisure, and ample intellectual resources, to his life of
 labour and peril? Yet he was far happier than I: for he could hope, nor
 hope in vain--the destined vessel at last arrived, to bear him to
 countrymen and kindred, where the events of his solitude became a fire-side
 tale. To none could I ever relate the story of my adversity; no hope had I.
 He knew that, beyond the ocean which begirt his lonely island, thousands
 lived whom the sun enlightened when it shone also on him: beneath the
 meridian sun and visiting moon, I alone bore human features; I alone could
 give articulation to thought; and, when I slept, both day and night were
 unbeheld of any. He had fled from his fellows, and was transported with
 terror at the print of a human foot. I would have knelt down and worshipped
 the same. The wild and cruel Caribbee, the merciless Cannibal--or worse
 than these, the uncouth, brute, and remorseless veteran in the vices of
 civilization, would have been to me a beloved companion, a treasure dearly
 prized--his nature would be kin to mine; his form cast in the same mould;
 human blood would flow in his veins; a human sympathy must link us for
 ever. It cannot be that I shall never behold a fellow being more!--never!
 --never!--not in the course of years!--Shall I wake, and speak to
 none, pass the interminable hours, my soul, islanded in the world, a
 solitary point, surrounded by vacuum? Will day follow day endlessly thus?
 --No! no! a God rules the world--providence has not exchanged its golden
 sceptre for an aspic's sting. Away! let me fly from the ocean-grave, let me
 depart from this barren nook, paled in, as it is, from access by its own
 desolateness; let me tread once again the paved towns; step over the
 threshold of man's dwellings, and most certainly I shall find this thought
 a horrible vision--a maddening, but evanescent dream.
 
 I entered Ravenna, (the town nearest to the spot whereon I had been cast),
 before the second sun had set on the empty world; I saw many living
 creatures; oxen, and horses, and dogs, but there was no man among them; I
 entered a cottage, it was vacant; I ascended the marble stairs of a palace,
 the bats and the owls were nestled in the tapestry; I stepped softly, not
 to awaken the sleeping town: I rebuked a dog, that by yelping disturbed the
 sacred stillness; I would not believe that all was as it seemed--The
 world was not dead, but I was mad; I was deprived of sight, hearing, and
 sense of touch; I was labouring under the force of a spell, which permitted
 me to behold all sights of earth, except its human inhabitants; they were
 pursuing their ordinary labours. Every house had its inmate; but I could
 not perceive them. If I could have deluded myself into a belief of this
 kind, I should have been far more satisfied. But my brain, tenacious of its
 reason, refused to lend itself to such imaginations--and though I
 endeavoured to play the antic to myself, I knew that I, the offspring of
 man, during long years one among many--now remained sole survivor of my
 species.
 
 The sun sank behind the western hills; I had fasted since the preceding
 evening, but, though faint and weary, I loathed food, nor ceased, while yet
 a ray of light remained, to pace the lonely streets. Night came on, and
 sent every living creature but me to the bosom of its mate. It was my
 solace, to blunt my mental agony by personal hardship--of the thousand
 beds around, I would not seek the luxury of one; I lay down on the
 pavement,--a cold marble step served me for a pillow--midnight came;
 and then, though not before, did my wearied lids shut out the sight of the
 twinkling stars, and their reflex on the pavement near. Thus I passed the
 second night of my desolation.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 
 I AWOKE in the morning, just as the higher windows of the lofty houses
 received the first beams of the rising sun. The birds were chirping,
 perched on the windows sills and deserted thresholds of the doors. I awoke,
 and my first thought was, Adrian and Clara are dead. I no longer shall be
 hailed by their good-morrow--or pass the long day in their society. I
 shall never see them more. The ocean has robbed me of them--stolen their
 hearts of love from their breasts, and given over to corruption what was
 dearer to me than light, or life, or hope.
 
 I was an untaught shepherd-boy, when Adrian deigned to confer on me his
 friendship. The best years of my life had been passed with him. All I had
 possessed of this world's goods, of happiness, knowledge, or virtue--I
 owed to him. He had, in his person, his intellect, and rare qualities,
 given a glory to my life, which without him it had never known. Beyond all
 other beings he had taught me, that goodness, pure and single, can be an
 attribute of man. It was a sight for angels to congregate to behold, to
 view him lead, govern, and solace, the last days of the human race.
 
 My lovely Clara also was lost to me--she who last of the daughters of
 man, exhibited all those feminine and maiden virtues, which poets,
 painters, and sculptors, have in their various languages strove to express.
 Yet, as far as she was concerned, could I lament that she was removed in
 early youth from the certain advent of misery? Pure she was of soul, and
 all her intents were holy. But her heart was the throne of love, and the
 sensibility her lovely countenance expressed, was the prophet of many
 woes, not the less deep and drear, because she would have for ever
 concealed them.
 
 These two wondrously endowed beings had been spared from the universal
 wreck, to be my companions during the last year of solitude. I had felt,
 while they were with me, all their worth. I was conscious that every other
 sentiment, regret, or passion had by degrees merged into a yearning,
 clinging affection for them. I had not forgotten the sweet partner of my
 youth, mother of my children, my adored Idris; but I saw at least a part of
 her spirit alive again in her brother; and after, that by Evelyn's death I
 had lost what most dearly recalled her to me; I enshrined her memory in
 Adrian's form, and endeavoured to confound the two dear ideas. I sound the
 depths of my heart, and try in vain to draw thence the expressions that can
 typify my love for these remnants of my race. If regret and sorrow came
 athwart me, as well it might in our solitary and uncertain state, the clear
 tones of Adrian's voice, and his fervent look, dissipated the gloom; or I
 was cheered unaware by the mild content and sweet resignation Clara's
 cloudless brow and deep blue eyes expressed. They were all to me--the
 suns of my benighted soul--repose in my weariness--slumber in my
 sleepless woe. Ill, most ill, with disjointed words, bare and weak, have I
 expressed the feeling with which I clung to them. I would have wound myself
 like ivy inextricably round them, so that the same blow might destroy us. I
 would have entered and been a part of them--so that
 
   If the dull substance of my flesh were thought,
 
 even now I had accompanied them to their new and incommunicable abode.
 
 Never shall I see them more. I am bereft of their dear converse--bereft
 of sight of them. I am a tree rent by lightning; never will the bark close
 over the bared fibres--never will their quivering life, torn by the
 winds, receive the opiate of a moment's balm. I am alone in the world--
 but that expression as yet was less pregnant with misery, than that Adrian
 and Clara are dead.
 
 The tide of thought and feeling rolls on for ever the same, though the
 banks and shapes around, which govern its course, and the reflection in the
 wave, vary. Thus the sentiment of immediate loss in some sort decayed,
 while that of utter, irremediable loneliness grew on me with time. Three
 days I wandered through Ravenna--now thinking only of the beloved beings
 who slept in the oozy caves of ocean--now looking forward on the dread
 blank before me; shuddering to make an onward step--writhing at each
 change that marked the progress of the hours.
 
 For three days I wandered to and fro in this melancholy town. I passed
 whole hours in going from house to house, listening whether I could detect
 some lurking sign of human existence. Sometimes I rang at a bell; it
 tinkled through the vaulted rooms, and silence succeeded to the sound. I
 called myself hopeless, yet still I hoped; and still disappointment ushered
 in the hours, intruding the cold, sharp steel which first pierced me, into
 the aching festering wound. I fed like a wild beast, which seizes its food
 only when stung by intolerable hunger. I did not change my garb, or seek
 the shelter of a roof, during all those days. Burning heats, nervous
 irritation, a ceaseless, but confused flow of thought, sleepless nights,
 and days instinct with a frenzy of agitation, possessed me during that
 time.
 
 As the fever of my blood encreased, a desire of wandering came upon me. I
 remember, that the sun had set on the fifth day after my wreck, when,
 without purpose or aim, I quitted the town of Ravenna. I must have been
 very ill. Had I been possessed by more or less of delirium, that night had
 surely been my last; for, as I continued to walk on the banks of the
 Mantone, whose upward course I followed, I looked wistfully on the stream,
 acknowledging to myself that its pellucid waves could medicine my woes
 for ever, and was unable to account to myself for my tardiness in seeking
 their shelter from the poisoned arrows of thought, that were piercing me
 through and through. I walked a considerable part of the night, and
 excessive weariness at length conquered my repugnance to the availing
 myself of the deserted habitations of my species. The waning moon, which
 had just risen, shewed me a cottage, whose neat entrance and trim garden
 reminded me of my own England. I lifted up the latch of the door and
 entered. A kitchen first presented itself, where, guided by the moon beams,
 I found materials for striking a light. Within this was a bed room; the
 couch was furnished with sheets of snowy whiteness; the wood piled on the
 hearth, and an array as for a meal, might almost have deceived me into the
 dear belief that I had here found what I had so long sought--one
 survivor, a companion for my loneliness, a solace to my despair. I steeled
 myself against the delusion; the room itself was vacant: it was only
 prudent, I repeated to myself, to examine the rest of the house. I fancied
 that I was proof against the expectation; yet my heart beat audibly, as I
 laid my hand on the lock of each door, and it sunk again, when I perceived
 in each the same vacancy. Dark and silent they were as vaults; so I
 returned to the first chamber, wondering what sightless host had spread the
 materials for my repast, and my repose. I drew a chair to the table, and
 examined what the viands were of which I was to partake. In truth it was a
 death feast! The bread was blue and mouldy; the cheese lay a heap of dust.
 I did not dare examine the other dishes; a troop of ants passed in a double
 line across the table cloth; every utensil was covered with dust, with
 cobwebs, and myriads of dead flies: these were objects each and all
 betokening the fallaciousness of my expectations. Tears rushed into my
 eyes; surely this was a wanton display of the power of the destroyer. What
 had I done, that each sensitive nerve was thus to be anatomized? Yet why
 complain more now than ever? This vacant cottage revealed no new sorrow--
 the world was empty; mankind was dead--I knew it well--why quarrel
 therefore with an acknowledged and stale truth? Yet, as I said, I had hoped
 in the very heart of despair, so that every new impression of the hard-cut
 reality on my soul brought with it a fresh pang, telling me the yet
 unstudied lesson, that neither change of place nor time could bring
 alleviation to my misery, but that, as I now was, I must continue, day
 after day, month after month, year after year, while I lived. I hardly
 dared conjecture what space of time that expression implied. It is true, I
 was no longer in the first blush of manhood; neither had I declined far in
 the vale of years--men have accounted mine the prime of life: I had just
 entered my thirty-seventh year; every limb was as well knit, every
 articulation as true, as when I had acted the shepherd on the hills of
 Cumberland; and with these advantages I was to commence the train of
 solitary life. Such were the reflections that ushered in my slumber on that
 night.
 
 The shelter, however, and less disturbed repose which I enjoyed, restored
 me the following morning to a greater portion of health and strength, than
 I had experienced since my fatal shipwreck. Among the stores I had
 discovered on searching the cottage the preceding night, was a quantity of
 dried grapes; these refreshed me in the morning, as I left my lodging and
 proceeded towards a town which I discerned at no great distance. As far as
 I could divine, it must have been Forli. I entered with pleasure its wide
 and grassy streets. All, it is true, pictured the excess of desolation; yet
 I loved to find myself in those spots which had been the abode of my fellow
 creatures. I delighted to traverse street after street, to look up at the
 tall houses, and repeat to myself, once they contained beings similar to
 myself--I was not always the wretch I am now. The wide square of Forli,
 the arcade around it, its light and pleasant aspect cheered me. I was
 pleased with the idea, that, if the earth should be again peopled, we, the
 lost race, would, in the relics left behind, present no contemptible
 exhibition of our powers to the new comers.
 
 I entered one of the palaces, and opened the door of a magnificent saloon.
 I started--I looked again with renewed wonder. What wild-looking,
 unkempt, half-naked savage was that before me? The surprise was momentary.
 
 I perceived that it was I myself whom I beheld in a large mirror at the end
 of the hall. No wonder that the lover of the princely Idris should fail to
 recognize himself in the miserable object there pourtrayed. My tattered
 dress was that in which I had crawled half alive from the tempestuous sea.
 My long and tangled hair hung in elf locks on my brow--my dark eyes, now
 hollow and wild, gleamed from under them--my cheeks were discoloured by
 the jaundice, which (the effect of misery and neglect) suffused my skin,
 and were half hid by a beard of many days' growth.
 
 Yet why should I not remain thus, I thought; the world is dead, and this
 squalid attire is a fitter mourning garb than the foppery of a black suit.
 And thus, methinks, I should have remained, had not hope, without which I
 do not believe man could exist, whispered to me, that, in such a plight, I
 should be an object of fear and aversion to the being, preserved I knew not
 where, but I fondly trusted, at length, to be found by me. Will my readers
 scorn the vanity, that made me attire myself with some care, for the sake
 of this visionary being? Or will they forgive the freaks of a half crazed
 imagination? I can easily forgive myself--for hope, however vague, was so
 dear to me, and a sentiment of pleasure of so rare occurrence, that I
 yielded readily to any idea, that cherished the one, or promised any
 recurrence of the former to my sorrowing heart. After such occupation, I
 visited every street, alley, and nook of Forli. These Italian towns
 presented an appearance of still greater desolation, than those of England
 or France. Plague had appeared here earlier--it had finished its course,
 and achieved its work much sooner than with us. Probably the last summer
 had found no human being alive, in all the track included between the
 shores of Calabria and the northern Alps. My search was utterly vain, yet I
 did not despond. Reason methought was on my side; and the chances were by
 no means contemptible, that there should exist in some part of Italy a
 survivor like myself--of a wasted, depopulate land. As therefore I
 rambled through the empty town, I formed my plan for future operations. I
 would continue to journey on towards Rome. After I should have satisfied
 myself, by a narrow search, that I left behind no human being in the towns
 through which I passed, I would write up in a conspicuous part of each,
 with white paint, in three languages, that "Verney, the last of the race of
 Englishmen, had taken up his abode in Rome."
 
 In pursuance of this scheme, I entered a painter's shop, and procured
 myself the paint. It is strange that so trivial an occupation should have
 consoled, and even enlivened me. But grief renders one childish, despair
 fantastic. To this simple inscription, I merely added the adjuration,
 "Friend, come! I wait for thee!--Deh, vieni! ti aspetto!" On the
 following morning, with something like hope for my companion, I quitted
 Forli on my way to Rome. Until now, agonizing retrospect, and dreary
 prospects for the future, had stung me when awake, and cradled me to my
 repose. Many times I had delivered myself up to the tyranny of anguish--
 many times I resolved a speedy end to my woes; and death by my own hands
 was a remedy, whose practicability was even cheering to me. What could I
 fear in the other world? If there were an hell, and I were doomed to it, I
 should come an adept to the sufferance of its tortures--the act were
 easy, the speedy and certain end of my deplorable tragedy. But now these
 thoughts faded before the new born expectation. I went on my way, not as
 before, feeling each hour, each minute, to be an age instinct with
 incalculable pain.
 
 As I wandered along the plain, at the foot of the Appennines--through
 their vallies, and over their bleak summits, my path led me through a
 country which had been trodden by heroes, visited and admired by thousands.
 They had, as a tide, receded, leaving me blank and bare in the midst. But
 why complain? Did I not hope?--so I schooled myself, even after the
 enlivening spirit had really deserted me, and thus I was obliged to call up
 all the fortitude I could command, and that was not much, to prevent a
 recurrence of that chaotic and intolerable despair, that had succeeded to
 the miserable shipwreck, that had consummated every fear, and dashed to
 annihilation every joy.
 
 I rose each day with the morning sun, and left my desolate inn. As my feet
 strayed through the unpeopled country, my thoughts rambled through the
 universe, and I was least miserable when I could, absorbed in reverie,
 forget the passage of the hours. Each evening, in spite of weariness, I
 detested to enter any dwelling, there to take up my nightly abode--I have
 sat, hour after hour, at the door of the cottage I had selected, unable to
 lift the latch, and meet face to face blank desertion within. Many nights,
 though autumnal mists were spread around, I passed under an ilex--many
 times I have supped on arbutus berries and chestnuts, making a fire,
 gypsy-like, on the ground--because wild natural scenery reminded me less
 acutely of my hopeless state of loneliness. I counted the days, and bore
 with me a peeled willow-wand, on which, as well as I could remember, I had
 notched the days that had elapsed since my wreck, and each night I added
 another unit to the melancholy sum.
 
 I had toiled up a hill which led to Spoleto. Around was spread a plain,
 encircled by the chestnut-covered Appennines. A dark ravine was on one
 side, spanned by an aqueduct, whose tall arches were rooted in the dell
 below, and attested that man had once deigned to bestow labour and thought
 here, to adorn and civilize nature. Savage, ungrateful nature, which in
 wild sport defaced his remains, protruding her easily renewed, and fragile
 growth of wild flowers and parasite plants around his eternal edifices. I
 sat on a fragment of rock, and looked round. The sun had bathed in gold the
 western atmosphere, and in the east the clouds caught the radiance, and
 budded into transient loveliness. It set on a world that contained me alone
 for its inhabitant. I took out my wand--I counted the marks. Twenty-five
 were already traced--twenty-five days had already elapsed, since human
 voice had gladdened my ears, or human countenance met my gaze. Twenty-five
 long, weary days, succeeded by dark and lonesome nights, had mingled with
 foregone years, and had become a part of the past--the never to be
 recalled--a real, undeniable portion of my life--twenty-five long, long
 days.
 
 Why this was not a month!--Why talk of days--or weeks--or months--I
 must grasp years in my imagination, if I would truly picture the future to
 myself--three, five, ten, twenty, fifty anniversaries of that fatal epoch
 might elapse--every year containing twelve months, each of more numerous
 calculation in a diary, than the twenty-five days gone by--Can it be?
 Will it be?--We had been used to look forward to death tremulously--
 wherefore, but because its place was obscure? But more terrible, and far
 more obscure, was the unveiled course of my lone futurity. I broke my wand;
 I threw it from me. I needed no recorder of the inch and barley-corn growth
 of my life, while my unquiet thoughts created other divisions, than those
 ruled over by the planets--and, in looking back on the age that had
 elapsed since I had been alone, I disdained to give the name of days and
 hours to the throes of agony which had in truth portioned it out.
 
 I hid my face in my hands. The twitter of the young birds going to rest,
 and their rustling among the trees, disturbed the still evening-air--the
 crickets chirped--the aziolo cooed at intervals. My thoughts had been of
 death--these sounds spoke to me of life. I lifted up my eyes--a bat
 wheeled round--the sun had sunk behind the jagged line of mountains, and
 the paly, crescent moon was visible, silver white, amidst the orange
 sunset, and accompanied by one bright star, prolonged thus the twilight. A
 herd of cattle passed along in the dell below, untended, towards their
 watering place--the grass was rustled by a gentle breeze, and the
 olive-woods, mellowed into soft masses by the moonlight, contrasted their
 sea-green with the dark chestnut foliage. Yes, this is the earth; there is
 no change--no ruin--no rent made in her verdurous expanse; she
 continues to wheel round and round, with alternate night and day, through
 the sky, though man is not her adorner or inhabitant. Why could I not
 forget myself like one of those animals, and no longer suffer the wild
 tumult of misery that I endure? Yet, ah! what a deadly breach yawns between
 their state and mine! Have not they companions? Have not they each their
 mate--their cherished young, their home, which, though unexpressed to us,
 is, I doubt not, endeared and enriched, even in their eyes, by the society
 which kind nature has created for them? It is I only that am alone--I, on
 this little hill top, gazing on plain and mountain recess--on sky, and
 its starry population, listening to every sound of earth, and air, and
 murmuring wave,--I only cannot express to any companion my many thoughts,
 nor lay my throbbing head on any loved bosom, nor drink from meeting eyes
 an intoxicating dew, that transcends the fabulous nectar of the gods. Shall
 I not then complain? Shall I not curse the murderous engine which has mowed
 down the children of men, my brethren? Shall I not bestow a malediction on
 every other of nature's offspring, which dares live and enjoy, while I live
 and suffer?
 
 Ah, no! I will discipline my sorrowing heart to sympathy in your joys; I
 will be happy, because ye are so. Live on, ye innocents, nature's selected
 darlings; I am not much unlike to you. Nerves, pulse, brain, joint, and
 flesh, of such am I composed, and ye are organized by the same laws. I have
 something beyond this, but I will call it a defect, not an endowment, if it
 leads me to misery, while ye are happy. Just then, there emerged from a
 near copse two goats and a little kid, by the mother's side; they began to
 browze the herbage of the hill. I approached near to them, without their
 perceiving me; I gathered a handful of fresh grass, and held it out; the
 little one nestled close to its mother, while she timidly withdrew. The
 male stepped forward, fixing his eyes on me: I drew near, still holding out
 my lure, while he, depressing his head, rushed at me with his horns. I was
 a very fool; I knew it, yet I yielded to my rage. I snatched up a huge
 fragment of rock; it would have crushed my rash foe. I poized it--aimed
 it--then my heart failed me. I hurled it wide of the mark; it rolled
 clattering among the bushes into dell. My little visitants, all aghast,
 galloped back into the covert of the wood; while I, my very heart bleeding
 and torn, rushed down the hill, and by the violence of bodily exertion,
 sought to escape from my miserable self.
 
 No, no, I will not live among the wild scenes of nature, the enemy of all
 that lives. I will seek the towns--Rome, the capital of the world, the
 crown of man's achievements. Among its storied streets, hallowed ruins, and
 stupendous remains of human exertion, I shall not, as here, find every
 thing forgetful of man; trampling on his memory, defacing his works,
 proclaiming from hill to hill, and vale to vale,--by the torrents freed
 from the boundaries which he imposed--by the vegetation liberated from
 the laws which he enforced--by his habitation abandoned to mildew and
 weeds, that his power is lost, his race annihilated for ever.
 
 I hailed the Tiber, for that was as it were an unalienable possession of
 humanity. I hailed the wild Campagna, for every rood had been trod by man;
 and its savage uncultivation, of no recent date, only proclaimed more
 distinctly his power, since he had given an honourable name and sacred
 title to what else would have been a worthless, barren track. I entered
 Eternal Rome by the Porta del Popolo, and saluted with awe its
 time-honoured space. The wide square, the churches near, the long extent of
 the Corso, the near eminence of Trinita de' Monti appeared like fairy work,
 they were so silent, so peaceful, and so very fair. It was evening; and the
 population of animals which still existed in this mighty city, had gone to
 rest; there was no sound, save the murmur of its many fountains, whose soft
 monotony was harmony to my soul. The knowledge that I was in Rome, soothed
 me; that wondrous city, hardly more illustrious for its heroes and sages,
 than for the power it exercised over the imaginations of men. I went to
 rest that night; the eternal burning of my heart quenched,--my senses
 tranquil.
 
 The next morning I eagerly began my rambles in search of oblivion. I
 ascended the many terraces of the garden of the Colonna Palace, under whose
 roof I had been sleeping; and passing out from it at its summit, I found
 myself on Monte Cavallo. The fountain sparkled in the sun; the obelisk
 above pierced the clear dark-blue air. The statues on each side, the works,
 as they are inscribed, of Phidias and Praxiteles, stood in undiminished
 grandeur, representing Castor and Pollux, who with majestic power tamed the
 rearing animal at their side. If those illustrious artists had in truth
 chiselled these forms, how many passing generations had their giant
 proportions outlived! and now they were viewed by the last of the species
 they were sculptured to represent and deify. I had shrunk into
 insignificance in my own eyes, as I considered the multitudinous beings
 these stone demigods had outlived, but this after-thought restored me to
 dignity in my own conception. The sight of the poetry eternized in these
 statues, took the sting from the thought, arraying it only in poetic
 ideality.
 
 I repeated to myself,--I am in Rome! I behold, and as it were, familiarly
 converse with the wonder of the world, sovereign mistress of the
 imagination, majestic and eternal survivor of millions of generations of
 extinct men. I endeavoured to quiet the sorrows of my aching heart, by even
 now taking an interest in what in my youth I had ardently longed to see.
 Every part of Rome is replete with relics of ancient times. The meanest
 streets are strewed with truncated columns, broken capitals--Corinthian
 and Ionic, and sparkling fragments of granite or porphyry. The walls of the
 most penurious dwellings enclose a fluted pillar or ponderous stone, which
 once made part of the palace of the Caesars; and the voice of dead time, in
 still vibrations, is breathed from these dumb things, animated and
 glorified as they were by man.
 
 I embraced the vast columns of the temple of Jupiter Stator, which survives
 in the open space that was the Forum, and leaning my burning cheek against
 its cold durability, I tried to lose the sense of present misery and
 present desertion, by recalling to the haunted cell of my brain vivid
 memories of times gone by. I rejoiced at my success, as I figured Camillus,
 the Gracchi, Cato, and last the heroes of Tacitus, which shine meteors of
 surpassing brightness during the murky night of the empire;--as the
 verses of Horace and Virgil, or the glowing periods of Cicero thronged into
 the opened gates of my mind, I felt myself exalted by long forgotten
 enthusiasm. I was delighted to know that I beheld the scene which they
 beheld--the scene which their wives and mothers, and crowds of the
 unnamed witnessed, while at the same time they honoured, applauded, or wept
 for these matchless specimens of humanity. At length, then, I had found a
 consolation. I had not vainly sought the storied precincts of Rome--I had
 discovered a medicine for my many and vital wounds.
 
 I sat at the foot of these vast columns. The Coliseum, whose naked ruin is
 robed by nature in a verdurous and glowing veil, lay in the sunlight on my
 right. Not far off, to the left, was the Tower of the Capitol. Triumphal
 arches, the falling walls of many temples, strewed the ground at my feet. I
 strove, I resolved, to force myself to see the Plebeian multitude and lofty
 Patrician forms congregated around; and, as the Diorama of ages passed
 across my subdued fancy, they were replaced by the modern Roman; the Pope,
 in his white stole, distributing benedictions to the kneeling worshippers;
 the friar in his cowl; the dark-eyed girl, veiled by her mezzera; the
 noisy, sun-burnt rustic, leading his herd of buffaloes and oxen to the
 Campo Vaccino. The romance with which, dipping our pencils in the rainbow
 hues of sky and transcendent nature, we to a degree gratuitously endow the
 Italians, replaced the solemn grandeur of antiquity. I remembered the dark
 monk, and floating figures of "The Italian," and how my boyish blood had
 thrilled at the description. I called to mind Corinna ascending the Capitol
 to be crowned, and, passing from the heroine to the author, reflected how
 the Enchantress Spirit of Rome held sovereign sway over the minds of the
 imaginative, until it rested on me--sole remaining spectator of its
 wonders.
 
 I was long wrapt by such ideas; but the soul wearies of a pauseless flight;
 and, stooping from its wheeling circuits round and round this spot,
 suddenly it fell ten thousand fathom deep, into the abyss of the present--
 into self-knowledge--into tenfold sadness. I roused myself--I cast off
 my waking dreams; and I, who just now could almost hear the shouts of the
 Roman throng, and was hustled by countless multitudes, now beheld the
 desart ruins of Rome sleeping under its own blue sky; the shadows lay
 tranquilly on the ground; sheep were grazing untended on the Palatine, and
 a buffalo stalked down the Sacred Way that led to the Capitol. I was alone
 in the Forum; alone in Rome; alone in the world. Would not one living man
 --one companion in my weary solitude, be worth all the glory and
 remembered power of this time-honoured city? Double sorrow--sadness,
 bred in Cimmerian caves, robed my soul in a mourning garb. The generations
 I had conjured up to my fancy, contrasted more strongly with the end of all
 --the single point in which, as a pyramid, the mighty fabric of society
 had ended, while I, on the giddy height, saw vacant space around me.
 
 From such vague laments I turned to the contemplation of the minutiae of my
 situation. So far, I had not succeeded in the sole object of my desires,
 the finding a companion for my desolation. Yet I did not despair. It is
 true that my inscriptions were set up for the most part, in insignificant
 towns and villages; yet, even without these memorials, it was possible that
 the person, who like me should find himself alone in a depopulate land,
 should, like me, come to Rome. The more slender my expectation was, the
 more I chose to build on it, and to accommodate my actions to this vague
 possibility.
 
 It became necessary therefore, that for a time I should domesticate myself
 at Rome. It became necessary, that I should look my disaster in the face--
 not playing the school-boy's part of obedience without submission; enduring
 life, and yet rebelling against the laws by which I lived.
 
 Yet how could I resign myself? Without love, without sympathy, without
 communion with any, how could I meet the morning sun, and with it trace its
 oft repeated journey to the evening shades? Why did I continue to live--
 why not throw off the weary weight of time, and with my own hand, let out
 the fluttering prisoner from my agonized breast?--It was not cowardice
 that withheld me; for the true fortitude was to endure; and death had a
 soothing sound accompanying it, that would easily entice me to enter its
 demesne. But this I would not do. I had, from the moment I had reasoned on
 the subject, instituted myself the subject to fate, and the servant of
 necessity, the visible laws of the invisible God--I believed that my
 obedience was the result of sound reasoning, pure feeling, and an exalted
 sense of the true excellence and nobility of my nature. Could I have seen
 in this empty earth, in the seasons and their change, the hand of a blind
 power only, most willingly would I have placed my head on the sod, and
 closed my eyes on its loveliness for ever. But fate had administered life
 to me, when the plague had already seized on its prey--she had dragged me
 by the hair from out the strangling waves--By such miracles she had
 bought me for her own; I admitted her authority, and bowed to her decrees.
 If, after mature consideration, such was my resolve, it was doubly
 necessary that I should not lose the end of life, the improvement of my
 faculties, and poison its flow by repinings without end. Yet how cease to
 repine, since there was no hand near to extract the barbed spear that had
 entered my heart of hearts? I stretched out my hand, and it touched none
 whose sensations were responsive to mine. I was girded, walled in, vaulted
 over, by seven-fold barriers of loneliness. Occupation alone, if I could
 deliver myself up to it, would be capable of affording an opiate to my
 sleepless sense of woe. Having determined to make Rome my abode, at least
 for some months, I made arrangements for my accommodation--I selected my
 home. The Colonna Palace was well adapted for my purpose. Its grandeur--
 its treasure of paintings, its magnificent halls were objects soothing and
 even exhilarating.
 
 I found the granaries of Rome well stored with grain, and particularly with
 Indian corn; this product requiring less art in its preparation for food, I
 selected as my principal support. I now found the hardships and lawlessness
 of my youth turn to account. A man cannot throw off the habits of sixteen
 years. Since that age, it is true, I had lived luxuriously, or at least
 surrounded by all the conveniences civilization afforded. But before that
 time, I had been "as uncouth a savage, as the wolf-bred founder of old
 Rome"--and now, in Rome itself, robber and shepherd propensities, similar
 to those of its founder, were of advantage to its sole inhabitant. I spent
 the morning riding and shooting in the Campagna--I passed long hours in
 the various galleries--I gazed at each statue, and lost myself in a
 reverie before many a fair Madonna or beauteous nymph. I haunted the
 Vatican, and stood surrounded by marble forms of divine beauty. Each stone
 deity was possessed by sacred gladness, and the eternal fruition of love.
 They looked on me with unsympathizing complacency, and often in wild
 accents I reproached them for their supreme indifference--for they were
 human shapes, the human form divine was manifest in each fairest limb and
 lineament. The perfect moulding brought with it the idea of colour and
 motion; often, half in bitter mockery, half in self-delusion, I clasped
 their icy proportions, and, coming between Cupid and his Psyche's lips,
 pressed the unconceiving marble.
 
 I endeavoured to read. I visited the libraries of Rome. I selected a
 volume, and, choosing some sequestered, shady nook, on the banks of the
 Tiber, or opposite the fair temple in the Borghese Gardens, or under the
 old pyramid of Cestius, I endeavoured to conceal me from myself, and
 immerse myself in the subject traced on the pages before me. As if in the
 same soil you plant nightshade and a myrtle tree, they will each
 appropriate the mould, moisture, and air administered, for the fostering
 their several properties--so did my grief find sustenance, and power of
 existence, and growth, in what else had been divine manna, to feed radiant
 meditation. Ah! while I streak this paper with the tale of what my so named
 occupations were--while I shape the skeleton of my days--my hand
 trembles--my heart pants, and my brain refuses to lend expression, or
 phrase, or idea, by which to image forth the veil of unutterable woe that
 clothed these bare realities. O, worn and beating heart, may I dissect thy
 fibres, and tell how in each unmitigable misery, sadness dire, repinings,
 and despair, existed? May I record my many ravings--the wild curses I
 hurled at torturing nature--and how I have passed days shut out from
 light and food--from all except the burning hell alive in my own bosom?
 
 I was presented, meantime, with one other occupation, the one best fitted
 to discipline my melancholy thoughts, which strayed backwards, over many a
 ruin, and through many a flowery glade, even to the mountain recess, from
 which in early youth I had first emerged.
 
 During one of my rambles through the habitations of Rome, I found writing
 materials on a table in an author's study. Parts of a manuscript lay
 scattered about. It contained a learned disquisition on the Italian
 language; one page an unfinished dedication to posterity, for whose profit
 the writer had sifted and selected the niceties of this harmonious language
 --to whose everlasting benefit he bequeathed his labours.
 
 I also will write a book, I cried--for whom to read?--to whom
 dedicated? And then with silly flourish (what so capricious and childish as
 despair?) I wrote, DEDICATION TO THE ILLUSTRIOUS DEAD. SHADOWS, ARISE, AND
 READ YOUR FALL! BEHOLD THE HISTORY OF THE LAST MAN.
 
 Yet, will not this world be re-peopled, and the children of a saved pair of
 lovers, in some to me unknown and unattainable seclusion, wandering to
 these prodigious relics of the ante-pestilential race, seek to learn how
 beings so wondrous in their achievements, with imaginations infinite, and
 powers godlike, had departed from their home to an unknown country?
 
 I will write and leave in this most ancient city, this "world's sole
 monument," a record of these things. I will leave a monument of the
 existence of Verney, the Last Man. At first I thought only to speak of
 plague, of death, and last, of desertion; but I lingered fondly on my early
 years, and recorded with sacred zeal the virtues of my companions. They
 have been with me during the fulfilment of my task. I have brought it to an
 end--I lift my eyes from my paper--again they are lost to me. Again I
 feel that I am alone.
 
 A year has passed since I have been thus occupied. The seasons have made
 their wonted round, and decked this eternal city in a changeful robe of
 surpassing beauty. A year has passed; and I no longer guess at my state or
 my prospects--loneliness is my familiar, sorrow my inseparable companion.
 I have endeavoured to brave the storm--I have endeavoured to school
 myself to fortitude--I have sought to imbue myself with the lessons of
 wisdom. It will not do. My hair has become nearly grey--my voice, unused
 now to utter sound, comes strangely on my ears. My person, with its human
 powers and features, seem to me a monstrous excrescence of nature. How
 express in human language a woe human being until this hour never knew! How
 give intelligible expression to a pang none but I could ever understand!--
 No one has entered Rome. None will ever come. I smile bitterly at the
 delusion I have so long nourished, and still more, when I reflect that I
 have exchanged it for another as delusive, as false, but to which I now
 cling with the same fond trust.
 
 Winter has come again; and the gardens of Rome have lost their leaves--
 the sharp air comes over the Campagna, and has driven its brute inhabitants
 to take up their abode in the many dwellings of the deserted city--frost
 has suspended the gushing fountains--and Trevi has stilled her eternal
 music. I had made a rough calculation, aided by the stars, by which I
 endeavoured to ascertain the first day of the new year. In the old out-worn
 age, the Sovereign Pontiff was used to go in solemn pomp, and mark the
 renewal of the year by driving a nail in the gate of the temple of Janus.
 On that day I ascended St. Peter's, and carved on its topmost stone the
 aera 2100, last year of the world!
 
 My only companion was a dog, a shaggy fellow, half water and half
 shepherd's dog, whom I found tending sheep in the Campagna. His master was
 dead, but nevertheless he continued fulfilling his duties in expectation of
 his return. If a sheep strayed from the rest, he forced it to return to the
 flock, and sedulously kept off every intruder. Riding in the Campagna I had
 come upon his sheep-walk, and for some time observed his repetition of
 lessons learned from man, now useless, though unforgotten. His delight was
 excessive when he saw me. He sprung up to my knees; he capered round and
 round, wagging his tail, with the short, quick bark of pleasure: he left
 his fold to follow me, and from that day has never neglected to watch by
 and attend on me, shewing boisterous gratitude whenever I caressed or
 talked to him. His pattering steps and mine alone were heard, when we
 entered the magnificent extent of nave and aisle of St. Peter's. We
 ascended the myriad steps together, when on the summit I achieved my
 design, and in rough figures noted the date of the last year. I then turned
 to gaze on the country, and to take leave of Rome. I had long determined to
 quit it, and I now formed the plan I would adopt for my future career,
 after I had left this magnificent abode.
 
 A solitary being is by instinct a wanderer, and that I would become. A hope
 of amelioration always attends on change of place, which would even lighten
 the burthen of my life. I had been a fool to remain in Rome all this time:
 Rome noted for Malaria, the famous caterer for death. But it was still
 possible, that, could I visit the whole extent of earth, I should find in
 some part of the wide extent a survivor. Methought the sea-side was the
 most probable retreat to be chosen by such a one. If left alone in an
 inland district, still they could not continue in the spot where their last
 hopes had been extinguished; they would journey on, like me, in search of a
 partner for their solitude, till the watery barrier stopped their further
 progress.
 
 To that water--cause of my woes, perhaps now to be their cure, I would
 betake myself. Farewell, Italy!--farewell, thou ornament of the world,
 matchless Rome, the retreat of the solitary one during long months!--to
 civilized life--to the settled home and succession of monotonous days,
 farewell! Peril will now be mine; and I hail her as a friend--death will
 perpetually cross my path, and I will meet him as a benefactor; hardship,
 inclement weather, and dangerous tempests will be my sworn mates. Ye
 spirits of storm, receive me! ye powers of destruction, open wide your
 arms, and clasp me for ever! if a kinder power have not decreed another
 end, so that after long endurance I may reap my reward, and again feel my
 heart beat near the heart of another like to me.
 
 Tiber, the road which is spread by nature's own hand, threading her
 continent, was at my feet, and many a boat was tethered to the banks. I
 would with a few books, provisions, and my dog, embark in one of these and
 float down the current of the stream into the sea; and then, keeping near
 land, I would coast the beauteous shores and sunny promontories of the blue
 Mediterranean, pass Naples, along Calabria, and would dare the twin perils
 of Scylla and Charybdis; then, with fearless aim, (for what had I to lose?)
 skim ocean's surface towards Malta and the further Cyclades. I would avoid
 Constantinople, the sight of whose well-known towers and inlets belonged to
 another state of existence from my present one; I would coast Asia Minor,
 and Syria, and, passing the seven-mouthed Nile, steer northward again, till
 losing sight of forgotten Carthage and deserted Lybia, I should reach the
 pillars of Hercules. And then--no matter where--the oozy caves, and
 soundless depths of ocean may be my dwelling, before I accomplish this
 long-drawn voyage, or the arrow of disease find my heart as I float singly
 on the weltering Mediterranean; or, in some place I touch at, I may find
 what I seek--a companion; or if this may not be--to endless time,
 decrepid and grey headed--youth already in the grave with those I love--
 the lone wanderer will still unfurl his sail, and clasp the tiller--and,
 still obeying the breezes of heaven, for ever round another and another
 promontory, anchoring in another and another bay, still ploughing seedless
 ocean, leaving behind the verdant land of native Europe, adown the tawny
 shore of Africa, having weathered the fierce seas of the Cape, I may moor
 my worn skiff in a creek, shaded by spicy groves of the odorous islands of
 the far Indian ocean.
 
 These are wild dreams. Yet since, now a week ago, they came on me, as I
 stood on the height of St. Peter's, they have ruled my imagination. I have
 chosen my boat, and laid in my scant stores. I have selected a few books;
 the principal are Homer and Shakespeare--But the libraries of the world
 are thrown open to me--and in any port I can renew my stock. I form no
 expectation of alteration for the better; but the monotonous present is
 intolerable to me. Neither hope nor joy are my pilots--restless despair
 and fierce desire of change lead me on. I long to grapple with danger, to
 be excited by fear, to have some task, however slight or voluntary, for
 each day's fulfilment. I shall witness all the variety of appearance, that
 the elements can assume--I shall read fair augury in the rainbow--
 menace in the cloud--some lesson or record dear to my heart in
 everything. Thus around the shores of deserted earth, while the sun is
 high, and the moon waxes or wanes, angels, the spirits of the dead, and the
 ever-open eye of the Supreme, will behold the tiny bark, freighted with
 Verney--the LAST MAN.
 
 THE END.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Greg Weeks, Mary Meehan and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                              FRANKENSTEIN;
 
                                   OR,
 
                          THE MODERN PROMETHEUS.
 
 [Transcriber's Note: This text was produced from a photo-reprint of the
 1818 edition.]
 
 
     IN THREE VOLUMES.
     VOL. I.
 
     London:
 
     _PRINTED FOR_
     LACKINGTON, HUGHES, HARDING, MAVOR, & JONES,
     FINSBURY SQUARE.
 
     1818.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
     Did I request thee, Maker, from my clay
     To mould me man? Did I solicit thee
     From darkness to promote me?----
 
                                   Paradise Lost.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
                           _TO_
                      WILLIAM GODWIN,
     _AUTHOR OF POLITICAL JUSTICE, CALEB WILLIAMS, &c._
                       THESE VOLUMES
                _Are respectfully inscribed_
                            BY
                        THE AUTHOR.
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 
 The event on which this fiction is founded has been supposed, by Dr.
 Darwin, and some of the physiological writers of Germany, as not of
 impossible occurrence. I shall not be supposed as according the remotest
 degree of serious faith to such an imagination; yet, in assuming it as
 the basis of a work of fancy, I have not considered myself as merely
 weaving a series of supernatural terrors. The event on which the
 interest of the story depends is exempt from the disadvantages of a mere
 tale of spectres or enchantment. It was recommended by the novelty of
 the situations which it developes; and, however impossible as a physical
 fact, affords a point of view to the imagination for the delineating of
 human passions more comprehensive and commanding than any which the
 ordinary relations of existing events can yield.
 
 I have thus endeavoured to preserve the truth of the elementary
 principles of human nature, while I have not scrupled to innovate
 upon their combinations. The _Iliad_, the tragic poetry of
 Greece,--Shakespeare, in the _Tempest_ and _Midsummer Night's
 Dream_,--and most especially Milton, in _Paradise Lost_, conform to this
 rule; and the most humble novelist, who seeks to confer or receive
 amusement from his labours, may, without presumption, apply to prose
 fiction a licence, or rather a rule, from the adoption of which so many
 exquisite combinations of human feeling have resulted in the highest
 specimens of poetry.
 
 The circumstance on which my story rests was suggested in casual
 conversation. It was commenced, partly as a source of amusement, and
 partly as an expedient for exercising any untried resources of mind.
 Other motives were mingled with these, as the work proceeded. I am by no
 means indifferent to the manner in which whatever moral tendencies exist
 in the sentiments or characters it contains shall affect the reader; yet
 my chief concern in this respect has been limited to the avoiding of the
 enervating effects of the novels of the present day, and to the
 exhibitions of the amiableness of domestic affection, and the excellence
 of universal virtue. The opinions which naturally spring from the
 character and situation of the hero are by no means to be conceived as
 existing always in my own conviction; nor is any inference justly to be
 drawn from the following pages as prejudicing any philosophical doctrine
 of whatever kind.
 
 It is a subject also of additional interest to the author, that this
 story was begun in the majestic region where the scene is principally
 laid, and in society which cannot cease to be regretted. I passed the
 summer of 1816 in the environs of Geneva. The season was cold and rainy,
 and in the evenings we crowded around a blazing wood fire, and
 occasionally amused ourselves with some German stories of ghosts, which
 happened to fall into our hands. These tales excited in us a playful
 desire of imitation. Two other friends (a tale from the pen of one of
 whom would be far more acceptable to the public than any thing I can
 ever hope to produce) and myself agreed to write each a story, founded
 on some supernatural occurrence.
 
 The weather, however, suddenly became serene; and my two friends left me
 on a journey among the Alps, and lost, in the magnificent scenes which
 they present, all memory of their ghostly visions. The following tale is
 the only one which has been completed.
 
 
 
 
 FRANKENSTEIN;
 
 OR, THE
 
 _MODERN PROMETHEUS._
 
 
 
 
 LETTER I.
 
 
 _To Mrs._ SAVILLE, _England_.
 
 St. Petersburgh, Dec. 11th, 17--.
 
 You will rejoice to hear that no disaster has accompanied the
 commencement of an enterprise which you have regarded with such evil
 forebodings. I arrived here yesterday; and my first task is to assure my
 dear sister of my welfare, and increasing confidence in the success of
 my undertaking.
 
 I am already far north of London; and as I walk in the streets of
 Petersburgh, I feel a cold northern breeze play upon my cheeks, which
 braces my nerves, and fills me with delight. Do you understand this
 feeling? This breeze, which has travelled from the regions towards which
 I am advancing, gives me a foretaste of those icy climes. Inspirited by
 this wind of promise, my day dreams become more fervent and vivid. I try
 in vain to be persuaded that the pole is the seat of frost and
 desolation; it ever presents itself to my imagination as the region of
 beauty and delight. There, Margaret, the sun is for ever visible; its
 broad disk just skirting the horizon, and diffusing a perpetual
 splendour. There--for with your leave, my sister, I will put some trust
 in preceding navigators--there snow and frost are banished; and, sailing
 over a calm sea, we may be wafted to a land surpassing in wonders and in
 beauty every region hitherto discovered on the habitable globe. Its
 productions and features may be without example, as the phaenomena of the
 heavenly bodies undoubtedly are in those undiscovered solitudes. What
 may not be expected in a country of eternal light? I may there discover
 the wondrous power which attracts the needle; and may regulate a
 thousand celestial observations, that require only this voyage to render
 their seeming eccentricities consistent for ever. I shall satiate my
 ardent curiosity with the sight of a part of the world never before
 visited, and may tread a land never before imprinted by the foot of man.
 These are my enticements, and they are sufficient to conquer all fear of
 danger or death, and to induce me to commence this laborious voyage with
 the joy a child feels when he embarks in a little boat, with his holiday
 mates, on an expedition of discovery up his native river. But, supposing
 all these conjectures to be false, you cannot contest the inestimable
 benefit which I shall confer on all mankind to the last generation, by
 discovering a passage near the pole to those countries, to reach which
 at present so many months are requisite; or by ascertaining the secret
 of the magnet, which, if at all possible, can only be effected by an
 undertaking such as mine.
 
 These reflections have dispelled the agitation with which I began my
 letter, and I feel my heart glow with an enthusiasm which elevates me to
 heaven; for nothing contributes so much to tranquillize the mind as a
 steady purpose,--a point on which the soul may fix its intellectual eye.
 This expedition has been the favourite dream of my early years. I have
 read with ardour the accounts of the various voyages which have been
 made in the prospect of arriving at the North Pacific Ocean through the
 seas which surround the pole. You may remember, that a history of all
 the voyages made for purposes of discovery composed the whole of our
 good uncle Thomas's library. My education was neglected, yet I was
 passionately fond of reading. These volumes were my study day and night,
 and my familiarity with them increased that regret which I had felt, as
 a child, on learning that my father's dying injunction had forbidden my
 uncle to allow me to embark in a sea-faring life.
 
 These visions faded when I perused, for the first time, those poets
 whose effusions entranced my soul, and lifted it to heaven. I also
 became a poet, and for one year lived in a Paradise of my own creation;
 I imagined that I also might obtain a niche in the temple where the
 names of Homer and Shakespeare are consecrated. You are well acquainted
 with my failure, and how heavily I bore the disappointment. But just at
 that time I inherited the fortune of my cousin, and my thoughts were
 turned into the channel of their earlier bent.
 
 Six years have passed since I resolved on my present undertaking. I can,
 even now, remember the hour from which I dedicated myself to this great
 enterprise. I commenced by inuring my body to hardship. I accompanied
 the whale-fishers on several expeditions to the North Sea; I voluntarily
 endured cold, famine, thirst, and want of sleep; I often worked harder
 than the common sailors during the day, and devoted my nights to the
 study of mathematics, the theory of medicine, and those branches of
 physical science from which a naval adventurer might derive the greatest
 practical advantage. Twice I actually hired myself as an under-mate in
 a Greenland whaler, and acquitted myself to admiration. I must own I
 felt a little proud, when my captain offered me the second dignity in
 the vessel, and entreated me to remain with the greatest earnestness; so
 valuable did he consider my services.
 
 And now, dear Margaret, do I not deserve to accomplish some great
 purpose. My life might have been passed in ease and luxury; but I
 preferred glory to every enticement that wealth placed in my path. Oh,
 that some encouraging voice would answer in the affirmative! My courage
 and my resolution is firm; but my hopes fluctuate, and my spirits are
 often depressed. I am about to proceed on a long and difficult voyage;
 the emergencies of which will demand all my fortitude: I am required not
 only to raise the spirits of others, but sometimes to sustain my own,
 when their's are failing.
 
 This is the most favourable period for travelling in Russia. They fly
 quickly over the snow in their sledges; the motion is pleasant, and, in
 my opinion, far more agreeable than that of an English stage-coach. The
 cold is not excessive, if you are wrapt in furs, a dress which I have
 already adopted; for there is a great difference between walking the
 deck and remaining seated motionless for hours, when no exercise
 prevents the blood from actually freezing in your veins. I have no
 ambition to lose my life on the post-road between St. Petersburgh and
 Archangel.
 
 I shall depart for the latter town in a fortnight or three weeks; and my
 intention is to hire a ship there, which can easily be done by paying
 the insurance for the owner, and to engage as many sailors as I think
 necessary among those who are accustomed to the whale-fishing. I do not
 intend to sail until the month of June: and when shall I return? Ah,
 dear sister, how can I answer this question? If I succeed, many, many
 months, perhaps years, will pass before you and I may meet. If I fail,
 you will see me again soon, or never.
 
 Farewell, my dear, excellent, Margaret. Heaven shower down blessings on
 you, and save me, that I may again and again testify my gratitude for
 all your love and kindness.
 
 Your affectionate brother,
 
 R. WALTON.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER II.
 
 
 _To Mrs._ SAVILLE, _England_.
 
 Archangel, 28th March, 17--.
 
 How slowly the time passes here, encompassed as I am by frost and snow;
 yet a second step is taken towards my enterprise. I have hired a vessel,
 and am occupied in collecting my sailors; those whom I have already
 engaged appear to be men on whom I can depend, and are certainly
 possessed of dauntless courage.
 
 But I have one want which I have never yet been able to satisfy; and the
 absence of the object of which I now feel as a most severe evil. I have
 no friend, Margaret: when I am glowing with the enthusiasm of success,
 there will be none to participate my joy; if I am assailed by
 disappointment, no one will endeavour to sustain me in dejection. I
 shall commit my thoughts to paper, it is true; but that is a poor medium
 for the communication of feeling. I desire the company of a man who
 could sympathize with me; whose eyes would reply to mine. You may deem
 me romantic, my dear sister, but I bitterly feel the want of a friend. I
 have no one near me, gentle yet courageous, possessed of a cultivated as
 well as of a capacious mind, whose tastes are like my own, to approve
 or amend my plans. How would such a friend repair the faults of your
 poor brother! I am too ardent in execution, and too impatient of
 difficulties. But it is a still greater evil to me that I am
 self-educated: for the first fourteen years of my life I ran wild on a
 common, and read nothing but our uncle Thomas's books of voyages. At
 that age I became acquainted with the celebrated poets of our own
 country; but it was only when it had ceased to be in my power to derive
 its most important benefits from such a conviction, that I perceived the
 necessity of becoming acquainted with more languages than that of my
 native country. Now I am twenty-eight, and am in reality more illiterate
 than many school-boys of fifteen. It is true that I have thought more,
 and that my day dreams are more extended and magnificent; but they want
 (as the painters call it) _keeping_; and I greatly need a friend who
 would have sense enough not to despise me as romantic, and affection
 enough for me to endeavour to regulate my mind.
 
 Well, these are useless complaints; I shall certainly find no friend on
 the wide ocean, nor even here in Archangel, among merchants and seamen.
 Yet some feelings, unallied to the dross of human nature, beat even in
 these rugged bosoms. My lieutenant, for instance, is a man of wonderful
 courage and enterprise; he is madly desirous of glory. He is an
 Englishman, and in the midst of national and professional prejudices,
 unsoftened by cultivation, retains some of the noblest endowments of
 humanity. I first became acquainted with him on board a whale vessel:
 finding that he was unemployed in this city, I easily engaged him to
 assist in my enterprise.
 
 The master is a person of an excellent disposition, and is remarkable in
 the ship for his gentleness, and the mildness of his discipline. He is,
 indeed, of so amiable a nature, that he will not hunt (a favourite, and
 almost the only amusement here), because he cannot endure to spill
 blood. He is, moreover, heroically generous. Some years ago he loved a
 young Russian lady, of moderate fortune; and having amassed a
 considerable sum in prize-money, the father of the girl consented to the
 match. He saw his mistress once before the destined ceremony; but she
 was bathed in tears, and, throwing herself at his feet, entreated him to
 spare her, confessing at the same time that she loved another, but that
 he was poor, and that her father would never consent to the union. My
 generous friend reassured the suppliant, and on being informed of the
 name of her lover instantly abandoned his pursuit. He had already bought
 a farm with his money, on which he had designed to pass the remainder of
 his life; but he bestowed the whole on his rival, together with the
 remains of his prize-money to purchase stock, and then himself solicited
 the young woman's father to consent to her marriage with her lover. But
 the old man decidedly refused, thinking himself bound in honour to my
 friend; who, when he found the father inexorable, quitted his country,
 nor returned until he heard that his former mistress was married
 according to her inclinations. "What a noble fellow!" you will exclaim.
 He is so; but then he has passed all his life on board a vessel, and has
 scarcely an idea beyond the rope and the shroud.
 
 But do not suppose that, because I complain a little, or because I can
 conceive a consolation for my toils which I may never know, that I am
 wavering in my resolutions. Those are as fixed as fate; and my voyage is
 only now delayed until the weather shall permit my embarkation. The
 winter has been dreadfully severe; but the spring promises well, and it
 is considered as a remarkably early season; so that, perhaps, I may sail
 sooner than I expected. I shall do nothing rashly; you know me
 sufficiently to confide in my prudence and considerateness whenever the
 safety of others is committed to my care.
 
 I cannot describe to you my sensations on the near prospect of my
 undertaking. It is impossible to communicate to you a conception of the
 trembling sensation, half pleasurable and half fearful, with which I am
 preparing to depart. I am going to unexplored regions, to "the land of
 mist and snow;" but I shall kill no albatross, therefore do not be
 alarmed for my safety.
 
 Shall I meet you again, after having traversed immense seas, and
 returned by the most southern cape of Africa or America? I dare not
 expect such success, yet I cannot bear to look on the reverse of the
 picture. Continue to write to me by every opportunity: I may receive
 your letters (though the chance is very doubtful) on some occasions when
 I need them most to support my spirits. I love you very tenderly.
 Remember me with affection, should you never hear from me again.
 
 Your affectionate brother,
 
 ROBERT WALTON.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER III.
 
 
 _To Mrs._ SAVILLE, _England_.
 
 July 7th, 17--.
 
 MY DEAR SISTER,
 
 I write a few lines in haste, to say that I am safe, and well advanced
 on my voyage. This letter will reach England by a merchant-man now on
 its homeward voyage from Archangel; more fortunate than I, who may not
 see my native land, perhaps, for many years. I am, however, in good
 spirits: my men are bold, and apparently firm of purpose; nor do the
 floating sheets of ice that continually pass us, indicating the dangers
 of the region towards which we are advancing, appear to dismay them. We
 have already reached a very high latitude; but it is the height of
 summer, and although not so warm as in England, the southern gales,
 which blow us speedily towards those shores which I so ardently desire
 to attain, breathe a degree of renovating warmth which I had not
 expected.
 
 No incidents have hitherto befallen us, that would make a figure in a
 letter. One or two stiff gales, and the breaking of a mast, are
 accidents which experienced navigators scarcely remember to record; and
 I shall be well content, if nothing worse happen to us during our
 voyage.
 
 Adieu, my dear Margaret. Be assured, that for my own sake, as well as
 your's, I will not rashly encounter danger. I will be cool, persevering,
 and prudent.
 
 Remember me to all my English friends.
 
 Most affectionately yours,
 
 R. W.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER IV.
 
 
 _To Mrs._ SAVILLE, _England_.
 
 August 5th, 17--.
 
 So strange an accident has happened to us, that I cannot forbear
 recording it, although it is very probable that you will see me before
 these papers can come into your possession.
 
 Last Monday (July 31st), we were nearly surrounded by ice, which closed
 in the ship on all sides, scarcely leaving her the sea room in which she
 floated. Our situation was somewhat dangerous, especially as we were
 compassed round by a very thick fog. We accordingly lay to, hoping that
 some change would take place in the atmosphere and weather.
 
 About two o'clock the mist cleared away, and we beheld, stretched out in
 every direction, vast and irregular plains of ice, which seemed to have
 no end. Some of my comrades groaned, and my own mind began to grow
 watchful with anxious thoughts, when a strange sight suddenly attracted
 our attention, and diverted our solicitude from our own situation. We
 perceived a low carriage, fixed on a sledge and drawn by dogs, pass on
 towards the north, at the distance of half a mile: a being which had the
 shape of a man, but apparently of gigantic stature, sat in the sledge,
 and guided the dogs. We watched the rapid progress of the traveller
 with our telescopes, until he was lost among the distant inequalities of
 the ice.
 
 This appearance excited our unqualified wonder. We were, as we believed,
 many hundred miles from any land; but this apparition seemed to denote
 that it was not, in reality, so distant as we had supposed. Shut in,
 however, by ice, it was impossible to follow his track, which we had
 observed with the greatest attention.
 
 About two hours after this occurrence, we heard the ground sea; and
 before night the ice broke, and freed our ship. We, however, lay to
 until the morning, fearing to encounter in the dark those large loose
 masses which float about after the breaking up of the ice. I profited of
 this time to rest for a few hours.
 
 In the morning, however, as soon as it was light, I went upon deck, and
 found all the sailors busy on one side of the vessel, apparently talking
 to some one in the sea. It was, in fact, a sledge, like that we had seen
 before, which had drifted towards us in the night, on a large fragment
 of ice. Only one dog remained alive; but there was a human being within
 it, whom the sailors were persuading to enter the vessel. He was not, as
 the other traveller seemed to be, a savage inhabitant of some
 undiscovered island, but an European. When I appeared on deck, the
 master said, "Here is our captain, and he will not allow you to perish
 on the open sea."
 
 On perceiving me, the stranger addressed me in English, although with a
 foreign accent. "Before I come on board your vessel," said he, "will you
 have the kindness to inform me whither you are bound?"
 
 You may conceive my astonishment on hearing such a question addressed to
 me from a man on the brink of destruction, and to whom I should have
 supposed that my vessel would have been a resource which he would not
 have exchanged for the most precious wealth the earth can afford. I
 replied, however, that we were on a voyage of discovery towards the
 northern pole.
 
 Upon hearing this he appeared satisfied, and consented to come on board.
 Good God! Margaret, if you had seen the man who thus capitulated for his
 safety, your surprise would have been boundless. His limbs were nearly
 frozen, and his body dreadfully emaciated by fatigue and suffering. I
 never saw a man in so wretched a condition. We attempted to carry him
 into the cabin; but as soon as he had quitted the fresh air, he fainted.
 We accordingly brought him back to the deck, and restored him to
 animation by rubbing him with brandy, and forcing him to swallow a small
 quantity. As soon as he shewed signs of life, we wrapped him up in
 blankets, and placed him near the chimney of the kitchen-stove. By slow
 degrees he recovered, and ate a little soup, which restored him
 wonderfully.
 
 Two days passed in this manner before he was able to speak; and I often
 feared that his sufferings had deprived him of understanding. When he
 had in some measure recovered, I removed him to my own cabin, and
 attended on him as much as my duty would permit. I never saw a more
 interesting creature: his eyes have generally an expression of wildness,
 and even madness; but there are moments when, if any one performs an act
 of kindness towards him, or does him any the most trifling service, his
 whole countenance is lighted up, as it were, with a beam of benevolence
 and sweetness that I never saw equalled. But he is generally melancholy
 and despairing; and sometimes he gnashes his teeth, as if impatient of
 the weight of woes that oppresses him.
 
 When my guest was a little recovered, I had great trouble to keep off
 the men, who wished to ask him a thousand questions; but I would not
 allow him to be tormented by their idle curiosity, in a state of body
 and mind whose restoration evidently depended upon entire repose. Once,
 however, the lieutenant asked, Why he had come so far upon the ice in so
 strange a vehicle?
 
 His countenance instantly assumed an aspect of the deepest gloom; and he
 replied, "To seek one who fled from me."
 
 "And did the man whom you pursued travel in the same fashion?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "Then I fancy we have seen him; for, the day before we picked you up, we
 saw some dogs drawing a sledge, with a man in it, across the ice."
 
 This aroused the stranger's attention; and he asked a multitude of
 questions concerning the route which the daemon, as he called him, had
 pursued. Soon after, when he was alone with me, he said, "I have,
 doubtless, excited your curiosity, as well as that of these good people;
 but you are too considerate to make inquiries."
 
 "Certainly; it would indeed be very impertinent and inhuman in me to
 trouble you with any inquisitiveness of mine."
 
 "And yet you rescued me from a strange and perilous situation; you have
 benevolently restored me to life."
 
 Soon after this he inquired, if I thought that the breaking up of the
 ice had destroyed the other sledge? I replied, that I could not answer
 with any degree of certainty; for the ice had not broken until near
 midnight, and the traveller might have arrived at a place of safety
 before that time; but of this I could not judge.
 
 From this time the stranger seemed very eager to be upon deck, to watch
 for the sledge which had before appeared; but I have persuaded him to
 remain in the cabin, for he is far too weak to sustain the rawness of
 the atmosphere. But I have promised that some one should watch for him,
 and give him instant notice if any new object should appear in sight.
 
 Such is my journal of what relates to this strange occurrence up to the
 present day. The stranger has gradually improved in health, but is very
 silent, and appears uneasy when any one except myself enters his cabin.
 Yet his manners are so conciliating and gentle, that the sailors are all
 interested in him, although they have had very little communication with
 him. For my own part, I begin to love him as a brother; and his constant
 and deep grief fills me with sympathy and compassion. He must have been
 a noble creature in his better days, being even now in wreck so
 attractive and amiable.
 
 I said in one of my letters, my dear Margaret, that I should find no
 friend on the wide ocean; yet I have found a man who, before his spirit
 had been broken by misery, I should have been happy to have possessed as
 the brother of my heart.
 
 I shall continue my journal concerning the stranger at intervals, should
 I have any fresh incidents to record.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 August 13th, 17--.
 
 My affection for my guest increases every day. He excites at once my
 admiration and my pity to an astonishing degree. How can I see so noble
 a creature destroyed by misery without feeling the most poignant grief?
 He is so gentle, yet so wise; his mind is so cultivated; and when he
 speaks, although his words are culled with the choicest art, yet they
 flow with rapidity and unparalleled eloquence.
 
 He is now much recovered from his illness, and is continually on the
 deck, apparently watching for the sledge that preceded his own. Yet,
 although unhappy, he is not so utterly occupied by his own misery, but
 that he interests himself deeply in the employments of others. He has
 asked me many questions concerning my design; and I have related my
 little history frankly to him. He appeared pleased with the confidence,
 and suggested several alterations in my plan, which I shall find
 exceedingly useful. There is no pedantry in his manner; but all he does
 appears to spring solely from the interest he instinctively takes in the
 welfare of those who surround him. He is often overcome by gloom, and
 then he sits by himself, and tries to overcome all that is sullen or
 unsocial in his humour. These paroxysms pass from him like a cloud from
 before the sun, though his dejection never leaves him. I have
 endeavoured to win his confidence; and I trust that I have succeeded.
 One day I mentioned to him the desire I had always felt of finding a
 friend who might sympathize with me, and direct me by his counsel. I
 said, I did not belong to that class of men who are offended by advice.
 "I am self-educated, and perhaps I hardly rely sufficiently upon my own
 powers. I wish therefore that my companion should be wiser and more
 experienced than myself, to confirm and support me; nor have I believed
 it impossible to find a true friend."
 
 "I agree with you," replied the stranger, "in believing that friendship
 is not only a desirable, but a possible acquisition. I once had a
 friend, the most noble of human creatures, and am entitled, therefore,
 to judge respecting friendship. You have hope, and the world before you,
 and have no cause for despair. But I----I have lost every thing, and
 cannot begin life anew."
 
 As he said this, his countenance became expressive of a calm settled
 grief, that touched me to the heart. But he was silent, and presently
 retired to his cabin.
 
 Even broken in spirit as he is, no one can feel more deeply than he does
 the beauties of nature. The starry sky, the sea, and every sight
 afforded by these wonderful regions, seems still to have the power of
 elevating his soul from earth. Such a man has a double existence: he may
 suffer misery, and be overwhelmed by disappointments; yet when he has
 retired into himself, he will be like a celestial spirit, that has a
 halo around him, within whose circle no grief or folly ventures.
 
 Will you laugh at the enthusiasm I express concerning this divine
 wanderer? If you do, you must have certainly lost that simplicity which
 was once your characteristic charm. Yet, if you will, smile at the
 warmth of my expressions, while I find every day new causes for
 repeating them.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 August 19th, 17--.
 
 Yesterday the stranger said to me, "You may easily perceive, Captain
 Walton, that I have suffered great and unparalleled misfortunes. I had
 determined, once, that the memory of these evils should die with me; but
 you have won me to alter my determination. You seek for knowledge and
 wisdom, as I once did; and I ardently hope that the gratification of
 your wishes may not be a serpent to sting you, as mine has been. I do
 not know that the relation of my misfortunes will be useful to you, yet,
 if you are inclined, listen to my tale. I believe that the strange
 incidents connected with it will afford a view of nature, which may
 enlarge your faculties and understanding. You will hear of powers and
 occurrences, such as you have been accustomed to believe impossible: but
 I do not doubt that my tale conveys in its series internal evidence of
 the truth of the events of which it is composed."
 
 You may easily conceive that I was much gratified by the offered
 communication; yet I could not endure that he should renew his grief by
 a recital of his misfortunes. I felt the greatest eagerness to hear the
 promised narrative, partly from curiosity, and partly from a strong
 desire to ameliorate his fate, if it were in my power. I expressed these
 feelings in my answer.
 
 "I thank you," he replied, "for your sympathy, but it is useless; my
 fate is nearly fulfilled. I wait but for one event, and then I shall
 repose in peace. I understand your feeling," continued he, perceiving
 that I wished to interrupt him; "but you are mistaken, my friend, if
 thus you will allow me to name you; nothing can alter my destiny: listen
 to my history, and you will perceive how irrevocably it is determined."
 
 He then told me, that he would commence his narrative the next day when
 I should be at leisure. This promise drew from me the warmest thanks. I
 have resolved every night, when I am not engaged, to record, as nearly
 as possible in his own words, what he has related during the day. If I
 should be engaged, I will at least make notes. This manuscript will
 doubtless afford you the greatest pleasure: but to me, who know him, and
 who hear it from his own lips, with what interest and sympathy shall I
 read it in some future day!
 
 
 
 
 FRANKENSTEIN;
 
 OR,
 
 THE MODERN PROMETHEUS.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 I am by birth a Genevese; and my family is one of the most distinguished
 of that republic. My ancestors had been for many years counsellors and
 syndics; and my father had filled several public situations with honour
 and reputation. He was respected by all who knew him for his integrity
 and indefatigable attention to public business. He passed his younger
 days perpetually occupied by the affairs of his country; and it was not
 until the decline of life that he thought of marrying, and bestowing on
 the state sons who might carry his virtues and his name down to
 posterity.
 
 As the circumstances of his marriage illustrate his character, I cannot
 refrain from relating them. One of his most intimate friends was a
 merchant, who, from a flourishing state, fell, through numerous
 mischances, into poverty. This man, whose name was Beaufort, was of a
 proud and unbending disposition, and could not bear to live in poverty
 and oblivion in the same country where he had formerly been
 distinguished for his rank and magnificence. Having paid his debts,
 therefore, in the most honourable manner, he retreated with his daughter
 to the town of Lucerne, where he lived unknown and in wretchedness. My
 father loved Beaufort with the truest friendship, and was deeply grieved
 by his retreat in these unfortunate circumstances. He grieved also for
 the loss of his society, and resolved to seek him out and endeavour to
 persuade him to begin the world again through his credit and assistance.
 
 Beaufort had taken effectual measures to conceal himself; and it was ten
 months before my father discovered his abode. Overjoyed at this
 discovery, he hastened to the house, which was situated in a mean
 street, near the Reuss. But when he entered, misery and despair alone
 welcomed him. Beaufort had saved but a very small sum of money from the
 wreck of his fortunes; but it was sufficient to provide him with
 sustenance for some months, and in the mean time he hoped to procure
 some respectable employment in a merchant's house. The interval was
 consequently spent in inaction; his grief only became more deep and
 rankling, when he had leisure for reflection; and at length it took so
 fast hold of his mind, that at the end of three months he lay on a bed
 of sickness, incapable of any exertion.
 
 His daughter attended him with the greatest tenderness; but she saw with
 despair that their little fund was rapidly decreasing, and that there
 was no other prospect of support. But Caroline Beaufort possessed a mind
 of an uncommon mould; and her courage rose to support her in her
 adversity. She procured plain work; she plaited straw; and by various
 means contrived to earn a pittance scarcely sufficient to support life.
 
 Several months passed in this manner. Her father grew worse; her time
 was more entirely occupied in attending him; her means of subsistence
 decreased; and in the tenth month her father died in her arms, leaving
 her an orphan and a beggar. This last blow overcame her; and she knelt
 by Beaufort's coffin, weeping bitterly, when my father entered the
 chamber. He came like a protecting spirit to the poor girl, who
 committed herself to his care, and after the interment of his friend he
 conducted her to Geneva, and placed her under the protection of a
 relation. Two years after this event Caroline became his wife.
 
 When my father became a husband and a parent, he found his time so
 occupied by the duties of his new situation, that he relinquished many
 of his public employments, and devoted himself to the education of his
 children. Of these I was the eldest, and the destined successor to all
 his labours and utility. No creature could have more tender parents than
 mine. My improvement and health were their constant care, especially as
 I remained for several years their only child. But before I continue my
 narrative, I must record an incident which took place when I was four
 years of age.
 
 My father had a sister, whom he tenderly loved, and who had married
 early in life an Italian gentleman. Soon after her marriage, she had
 accompanied her husband into her native country, and for some years my
 father had very little communication with her. About the time I
 mentioned she died; and a few months afterwards he received a letter
 from her husband, acquainting him with his intention of marrying an
 Italian lady, and requesting my father to take charge of the infant
 Elizabeth, the only child of his deceased sister. "It is my wish," he
 said, "that you should consider her as your own daughter, and educate
 her thus. Her mother's fortune is secured to her, the documents of which
 I will commit to your keeping. Reflect upon this proposition; and decide
 whether you would prefer educating your niece yourself to her being
 brought up by a stepmother."
 
 My father did not hestitate, and immediately went to Italy, that he
 might accompany the little Elizabeth to her future home. I have often
 heard my mother say, that she was at that time the most beautiful child
 she had ever seen, and shewed signs even then of a gentle and
 affectionate disposition. These indications, and a desire to bind as
 closely as possible the ties of domestic love, determined my mother to
 consider Elizabeth as my future wife; a design which she never found
 reason to repent.
 
 From this time Elizabeth Lavenza became my playfellow, and, as we grew
 older, my friend. She was docile and good tempered, yet gay and playful
 as a summer insect. Although she was lively and animated, her feelings
 were strong and deep, and her disposition uncommonly affectionate. No
 one could better enjoy liberty, yet no one could submit with more grace
 than she did to constraint and caprice. Her imagination was luxuriant,
 yet her capability of application was great. Her person was the image of
 her mind; her hazel eyes, although as lively as a bird's, possessed an
 attractive softness. Her figure was light and airy; and, though capable
 of enduring great fatigue, she appeared the most fragile creature in the
 world. While I admired her understanding and fancy, I loved to tend on
 her, as I should on a favourite animal; and I never saw so much grace
 both of person and mind united to so little pretension.
 
 Every one adored Elizabeth. If the servants had any request to make, it
 was always through her intercession. We were strangers to any species of
 disunion and dispute; for although there was a great dissimilitude in
 our characters, there was an harmony in that very dissimilitude. I was
 more calm and philosophical than my companion; yet my temper was not so
 yielding. My application was of longer endurance; but it was not so
 severe whilst it endured. I delighted in investigating the facts
 relative to the actual world; she busied herself in following the aerial
 creations of the poets. The world was to me a secret, which I desired to
 discover; to her it was a vacancy, which she sought to people with
 imaginations of her own.
 
 My brothers were considerably younger than myself; but I had a friend
 in one of my schoolfellows, who compensated for this deficiency. Henry
 Clerval was the son of a merchant of Geneva, an intimate friend of my
 father. He was a boy of singular talent and fancy. I remember, when he
 was nine years old, he wrote a fairy tale, which was the delight and
 amazement of all his companions. His favourite study consisted in books
 of chivalry and romance; and when very young, I can remember, that we
 used to act plays composed by him out of these favourite books, the
 principal characters of which were Orlando, Robin Hood, Amadis, and St.
 George.
 
 No youth could have passed more happily than mine. My parents were
 indulgent, and my companions amiable. Our studies were never forced; and
 by some means we always had an end placed in view, which excited us to
 ardour in the prosecution of them. It was by this method, and not by
 emulation, that we were urged to application. Elizabeth was not incited
 to apply herself to drawing, that her companions might not outstrip her;
 but through the desire of pleasing her aunt, by the representation of
 some favourite scene done by her own hand. We learned Latin and English,
 that we might read the writings in those languages; and so far from
 study being made odious to us through punishment, we loved application,
 and our amusements would have been the labours of other children.
 Perhaps we did not read so many books, or learn languages so quickly, as
 those who are disciplined according to the ordinary methods; but what
 we learned was impressed the more deeply on our memories.
 
 In this description of our domestic circle I include Henry Clerval; for
 he was constantly with us. He went to school with me, and generally
 passed the afternoon at our house; for being an only child, and
 destitute of companions at home, his father was well pleased that he
 should find associates at our house; and we were never completely happy
 when Clerval was absent.
 
 I feel pleasure in dwelling on the recollections of childhood, before
 misfortune had tainted my mind, and changed its bright visions of
 extensive usefulness into gloomy and narrow reflections upon self. But,
 in drawing the picture of my early days, I must not omit to record those
 events which led, by insensible steps to my after tale of misery: for
 when I would account to myself for the birth of that passion, which
 afterwards ruled my destiny, I find it arise, like a mountain river,
 from ignoble and almost forgotten sources; but, swelling as it
 proceeded, it became the torrent which, in its course, has swept away
 all my hopes and joys.
 
 Natural philosophy is the genius that has regulated my fate; I desire
 therefore, in this narration, to state those facts which led to my
 predilection for that science. When I was thirteen years of age, we all
 went on a party of pleasure to the baths near Thonon: the inclemency of
 the weather obliged us to remain a day confined to the inn. In this
 house I chanced to find a volume of the works of Cornelius Agrippa. I
 opened it with apathy; the theory which he attempts to demonstrate, and
 the wonderful facts which he relates, soon changed this feeling into
 enthusiasm. A new light seemed to dawn upon my mind; and, bounding with
 joy, I communicated my discovery to my father. I cannot help remarking
 here the many opportunities instructors possess of directing the
 attention of their pupils to useful knowledge, which they utterly
 neglect. My father looked carelessly at the title-page of my book, and
 said, "Ah! Cornelius Agrippa! My dear Victor, do not waste your time
 upon this; it is sad trash."
 
 If, instead of this remark, my father had taken the pains, to explain to
 me, that the principles of Agrippa had been entirely exploded, and that
 a modern system of science had been introduced, which possessed much
 greater powers than the ancient, because the powers of the latter were
 chimerical, while those of the former were real and practical; under
 such circumstances, I should certainly have thrown Agrippa aside, and,
 with my imagination warmed as it was, should probably have applied
 myself to the more rational theory of chemistry which has resulted from
 modern discoveries. It is even possible, that the train of my ideas
 would never have received the fatal impulse that led to my ruin. But the
 cursory glance my father had taken of my volume by no means assured me
 that he was acquainted with its contents; and I continued to read with
 the greatest avidity.
 
 When I returned home, my first care was to procure the whole works of
 this author, and afterwards of Paracelsus and Albertus Magnus. I read
 and studied the wild fancies of these writers with delight; they
 appeared to me treasures known to few beside myself; and although I
 often wished to communicate these secret stores of knowledge to my
 father, yet his indefinite censure of my favourite Agrippa always
 withheld me. I disclosed my discoveries to Elizabeth, therefore, under a
 promise of strict secrecy; but she did not interest herself in the
 subject, and I was left by her to pursue my studies alone.
 
 It may appear very strange, that a disciple of Albertus Magnus should
 arise in the eighteenth century; but our family was not scientifical,
 and I had not attended any of the lectures given at the schools of
 Geneva. My dreams were therefore undisturbed by reality; and I entered
 with the greatest diligence into the search of the philosopher's stone
 and the elixir of life. But the latter obtained my most undivided
 attention: wealth was an inferior object; but what glory would attend
 the discovery, if I could banish disease from the human frame, and
 render man invulnerable to any but a violent death!
 
 Nor were these my only visions. The raising of ghosts or devils was a
 promise liberally accorded by my favourite authors, the fulfilment of
 which I most eagerly sought; and if my incantations were always
 unsuccessful, I attributed the failure rather to my own inexperience and
 mistake, than to a want of skill or fidelity in my instructors.
 
 The natural phaenomena that take place every day before our eyes did not
 escape my examinations. Distillation, and the wonderful effects of
 steam, processes of which my favourite authors were utterly ignorant,
 excited my astonishment; but my utmost wonder was engaged by some
 experiments on an air-pump, which I saw employed by a gentleman whom we
 were in the habit of visiting.
 
 The ignorance of the early philosophers on these and several other
 points served to decrease their credit with me: but I could not entirely
 throw them aside, before some other system should occupy their place in
 my mind.
 
 When I was about fifteen years old, we had retired to our house near
 Belrive, when we witnessed a most violent and terrible thunder-storm. It
 advanced from behind the mountains of Jura; and the thunder burst at
 once with frightful loudness from various quarters of the heavens. I
 remained, while the storm lasted, watching its progress with curiosity
 and delight. As I stood at the door, on a sudden I beheld a stream of
 fire issue from an old and beautiful oak, which stood about twenty yards
 from our house; and so soon as the dazzling light vanished, the oak had
 disappeared, and nothing remained but a blasted stump. When we visited
 it the next morning, we found the tree shattered in a singular manner.
 It was not splintered by the shock, but entirely reduced to thin
 ribbands of wood. I never beheld any thing so utterly destroyed.
 
 The catastrophe of this tree excited my extreme astonishment; and I
 eagerly inquired of my father the nature and origin of thunder and
 lightning. He replied, "Electricity;" describing at the same time the
 various effects of that power. He constructed a small electrical
 machine, and exhibited a few experiments; he made also a kite, with a
 wire and string, which drew down that fluid from the clouds.
 
 This last stroke completed the overthrow of Cornelius Agrippa, Albertus
 Magnus, and Paracelsus, who had so long reigned the lords of my
 imagination. But by some fatality I did not feel inclined to commence
 the study of any modern system; and this disinclination was influenced
 by the following circumstance.
 
 My father expressed a wish that I should attend a course of lectures
 upon natural philosophy, to which I cheerfully consented. Some accident
 prevented my attending these lectures until the course was nearly
 finished. The lecture, being therefore one of the last, was entirely
 incomprehensible to me. The professor discoursed with the greatest
 fluency of potassium and boron, of sulphates and oxyds, terms to which I
 could affix no idea; and I became disgusted with the science of natural
 philosophy, although I still read Pliny and Buffon with delight,
 authors, in my estimation, of nearly equal interest and utility.
 
 My occupations at this age were principally the mathematics, and most of
 the branches of study appertaining to that science. I was busily
 employed in learning languages; Latin was already familiar to me, and I
 began to read some of the easiest Greek authors without the help of a
 lexicon. I also perfectly understood English and German. This is the
 list of my accomplishments at the age of seventeen; and you may conceive
 that my hours were fully employed in acquiring and maintaining a
 knowledge of this various literature.
 
 Another task also devolved upon me, when I became the instructor of my
 brothers. Ernest was six years younger than myself, and was my principal
 pupil. He had been afflicted with ill health from his infancy, through
 which Elizabeth and I had been his constant nurses: his disposition was
 gentle, but he was incapable of any severe application. William, the
 youngest of our family, was yet an infant, and the most beautiful little
 fellow in the world; his lively blue eyes, dimpled cheeks, and endearing
 manners, inspired the tenderest affection.
 
 Such was our domestic circle, from which care and pain seemed for ever
 banished. My father directed our studies, and my mother partook of our
 enjoyments. Neither of us possessed the slightest pre-eminence over the
 other; the voice of command was never heard amongst us; but mutual
 affection engaged us all to comply with and obey the slightest desire of
 each other.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 When I had attained the age of seventeen, my parents resolved that I
 should become a student at the university of Ingolstadt. I had hitherto
 attended the schools of Geneva; but my father thought it necessary, for
 the completion of my education, that I should be made acquainted with
 other customs than those of my native country. My departure was
 therefore fixed at an early date; but, before the day resolved upon
 could arrive, the first misfortune of my life occurred--an omen, as it
 were, of my future misery.
 
 Elizabeth had caught the scarlet fever; but her illness was not severe,
 and she quickly recovered. During her confinement, many arguments had
 been urged to persuade my mother to refrain from attending upon her. She
 had, at first, yielded to our entreaties; but when she heard that her
 favourite was recovering, she could no longer debar herself from her
 society, and entered her chamber long before the danger of infection was
 past. The consequences of this imprudence were fatal. On the third day
 my mother sickened; her fever was very malignant, and the looks of her
 attendants prognosticated the worst event. On her death-bed the
 fortitude and benignity of this admirable woman did not desert her. She
 joined the hands of Elizabeth and myself: "My children," she said, "my
 firmest hopes of future happiness were placed on the prospect of your
 union. This expectation will now be the consolation of your father.
 Elizabeth, my love, you must supply my place to your younger cousins.
 Alas! I regret that I am taken from you; and, happy and beloved as I
 have been, is it not hard to quit you all? But these are not thoughts
 befitting me; I will endeavour to resign myself cheerfully to death, and
 will indulge a hope of meeting you in another world."
 
 She died calmly; and her countenance expressed affection even in death.
 I need not describe the feelings of those whose dearest ties are rent by
 that most irreparable evil, the void that presents itself to the soul,
 and the despair that is exhibited on the countenance. It is so long
 before the mind can persuade itself that she, whom we saw every day, and
 whose very existence appeared a part of our own, can have departed for
 ever--that the brightness of a beloved eye can have been extinguished,
 and the sound of a voice so familiar, and dear to the ear, can be
 hushed, never more to be heard. These are the reflections of the first
 days; but when the lapse of time proves the reality of the evil, then
 the actual bitterness of grief commences. Yet from whom has not that
 rude hand rent away some dear connexion; and why should I describe a
 sorrow which all have felt, and must feel? The time at length arrives,
 when grief is rather an indulgence than a necessity; and the smile that
 plays upon the lips, although it may be deemed a sacrilege, is not
 banished. My mother was dead, but we had still duties which we ought to
 perform; we must continue our course with the rest, and learn to think
 ourselves fortunate, whilst one remains whom the spoiler has not seized.
 
 My journey to Ingolstadt, which had been deferred by these events, was
 now again determined upon. I obtained from my father a respite of some
 weeks. This period was spent sadly; my mother's death, and my speedy
 departure, depressed our spirits; but Elizabeth endeavoured to renew the
 spirit of cheerfulness in our little society. Since the death of her
 aunt, her mind had acquired new firmness and vigour. She determined to
 fulfil her duties with the greatest exactness; and she felt that that
 most imperious duty, of rendering her uncle and cousins happy, had
 devolved upon her. She consoled me, amused her uncle, instructed my
 brothers; and I never beheld her so enchanting as at this time, when she
 was continually endeavouring to contribute to the happiness of others,
 entirely forgetful of herself.
 
 The day of my departure at length arrived. I had taken leave of all my
 friends, excepting Clerval, who spent the last evening with us. He
 bitterly lamented that he was unable to accompany me: but his father
 could not be persuaded to part with him, intending that he should become
 a partner with him in business, in compliance with his favourite theory,
 that learning was superfluous in the commerce of ordinary life. Henry
 had a refined mind; he had no desire to be idle, and was well pleased to
 become his father's partner, but he believed that a man might be a very
 good trader, and yet possess a cultivated understanding.
 
 We sat late, listening to his complaints, and making many little
 arrangements for the future. The next morning early I departed. Tears
 gushed from the eyes of Elizabeth; they proceeded partly from sorrow at
 my departure, and partly because she reflected that the same journey was
 to have taken place three months before, when a mother's blessing would
 have accompanied me.
 
 I threw myself into the chaise that was to convey me away, and indulged
 in the most melancholy reflections. I, who had ever been surrounded by
 amiable companions, continually engaged in endeavouring to bestow
 mutual pleasure, I was now alone. In the university, whither I was
 going, I must form my own friends, and be my own protector. My life had
 hitherto been remarkably secluded and domestic; and this had given me
 invincible repugnance to new countenances. I loved my brothers,
 Elizabeth, and Clerval: these were "old familiar faces;" but I believed
 myself totally unfitted for the company of strangers. Such were my
 reflections as I commenced my journey; but as I proceeded, my spirits
 and hopes rose. I ardently desired the acquisition of knowledge. I had
 often, when at home, thought it hard to remain during my youth cooped up
 in one place, and had longed to enter the world, and take my station
 among other human beings. Now my desires were complied with, and it
 would, indeed, have been folly to repent.
 
 I had sufficient leisure for these and many other reflections during my
 journey to Ingolstadt, which was long and fatiguing. At length the high
 white steeple of the town met my eyes. I alighted, and was conducted to
 my solitary apartment, to spend the evening as I pleased.
 
 The next morning I delivered my letters of introduction, and paid a
 visit to some of the principal professors, and among others to M.
 Krempe, professor of natural philosophy. He received me with politeness,
 and asked me several questions concerning my progress in the different
 branches of science appertaining to natural philosophy. I mentioned, it
 is true, with fear and trembling, the only authors I had ever read upon
 those subjects. The professor stared: "Have you," he said, "really spent
 your time in studying such nonsense?"
 
 I replied in the affirmative. "Every minute," continued M. Krempe with
 warmth, "every instant that you have wasted on those books is utterly
 and entirely lost. You have burdened your memory with exploded systems,
 and useless names. Good God! in what desert land have you lived, where
 no one was kind enough to inform you that these fancies, which you have
 so greedily imbibed, are a thousand years old, and as musty as they are
 ancient? I little expected in this enlightened and scientific age to
 find a disciple of Albertus Magnus and Paracelsus. My dear Sir, you must
 begin your studies entirely anew."
 
 So saying, he stept aside, and wrote down a list of several books
 treating of natural philosophy, which he desired me to procure, and
 dismissed me, after mentioning that in the beginning of the following
 week he intended to commence a course of lectures upon natural
 philosophy in its general relations, and that M. Waldman, a
 fellow-professor, would lecture upon chemistry the alternate days that
 he missed.
 
 I returned home, not disappointed, for I had long considered those
 authors useless whom the professor had so strongly reprobated; but I did
 not feel much inclined to study the books which I procured at his
 recommendation. M. Krempe was a little squat man, with a gruff voice and
 repulsive countenance; the teacher, therefore, did not prepossess me in
 favour of his doctrine. Besides, I had a contempt for the uses of modern
 natural philosophy. It was very different, when the masters of the
 science sought immortality and power; such views, although futile, were
 grand: but now the scene was changed. The ambition of the inquirer
 seemed to limit itself to the annihilation of those visions on which my
 interest in science was chiefly founded. I was required to exchange
 chimeras of boundless grandeur for realities of little worth.
 
 Such were my reflections during the first two or three days spent almost
 in solitude. But as the ensuing week commenced, I thought of the
 information which M. Krempe had given me concerning the lectures. And
 although I could not consent to go and hear that little conceited fellow
 deliver sentences out of a pulpit, I recollected what he had said of M.
 Waldman, whom I had never seen, as he had hitherto been out of town.
 
 Partly from curiosity, and partly from idleness, I went into the
 lecturing room, which M. Waldman entered shortly after. This professor
 was very unlike his colleague. He appeared about fifty years of age, but
 with an aspect expressive of the greatest benevolence; a few gray hairs
 covered his temples, but those at the back of his head were nearly
 black. His person was short, but remarkably erect; and his voice the
 sweetest I had ever heard. He began his lecture by a recapitulation of
 the history of chemistry and the various improvements made by different
 men of learning, pronouncing with fervour the names of the most
 distinguished discoverers. He then took a cursory view of the present
 state of the science, and explained many of its elementary terms. After
 having made a few preparatory experiments, he concluded with a panegyric
 upon modern chemistry, the terms of which I shall never forget:--
 
 "The ancient teachers of this science," said he, "promised
 impossibilities, and performed nothing. The modern masters promise very
 little; they know that metals cannot be transmuted, and that the elixir
 of life is a chimera. But these philosophers, whose hands seem only made
 to dabble in dirt, and their eyes to pour over the microscope or
 crucible, have indeed performed miracles. They penetrate into the
 recesses of nature, and shew how she works in her hiding places. They
 ascend into the heavens; they have discovered how the blood circulates,
 and the nature of the air we breathe. They have acquired new and almost
 unlimited powers; they can command the thunders of heaven, mimic the
 earthquake, and even mock the invisible world with its own shadows."
 
 I departed highly pleased with the professor and his lecture, and paid
 him a visit the same evening. His manners in private were even more mild
 and attractive than in public; for there was a certain dignity in his
 mien during his lecture, which in his own house was replaced by the
 greatest affability and kindness. He heard with attention my little
 narration concerning my studies, and smiled at the names of Cornelius
 Agrippa, and Paracelsus, but without the contempt that M. Krempe had
 exhibited. He said, that "these were men to whose indefatigable zeal
 modern philosophers were indebted for most of the foundations of their
 knowledge. They had left to us, as an easier task, to give new names,
 and arrange in connected classifications, the facts which they in a
 great degree had been the instruments of bringing to light. The labours
 of men of genius, however erroneously directed, scarcely ever fail in
 ultimately turning to the solid advantage of mankind." I listened to his
 statement, which was delivered without any presumption or affectation;
 and then added, that his lecture had removed my prejudices against
 modern chemists; and I, at the same time, requested his advice
 concerning the books I ought to procure.
 
 "I am happy," said M. Waldman, "to have gained a disciple; and if your
 application equals your ability, I have no doubt of your success.
 Chemistry is that branch of natural philosophy in which the greatest
 improvements have been and may be made; it is on that account that I
 have made it my peculiar study; but at the same time I have not
 neglected the other branches of science. A man would make but a very
 sorry chemist, if he attended to that department of human knowledge
 alone. If your wish is to become really a man of science, and not merely
 a petty experimentalist, I should advise you to apply to every branch of
 natural philosophy, including mathematics."
 
 He then took me into his laboratory, and explained to me the uses of
 his various machines; instructing me as to what I ought to procure, and
 promising me the use of his own, when I should have advanced far enough
 in the science not to derange their mechanism. He also gave me the list
 of books which I had requested; and I took my leave.
 
 Thus ended a day memorable to me; it decided my future destiny.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 From this day natural philosophy, and particularly chemistry, in the
 most comprehensive sense of the term, became nearly my sole occupation.
 I read with ardour those works, so full of genius and discrimination,
 which modern inquirers have written on these subjects. I attended the
 lectures, and cultivated the acquaintance, of the men of science of the
 university; and I found even in M. Krempe a great deal of sound sense
 and real information, combined, it is true, with a repulsive physiognomy
 and manners, but not on that account the less valuable. In M. Waldman I
 found a true friend. His gentleness was never tinged by dogmatism; and
 his instructions were given with an air of frankness and good nature,
 that banished every idea of pedantry. It was, perhaps, the amiable
 character of this man that inclined me more to that branch of natural
 philosophy which he professed, than an intrinsic love for the science
 itself. But this state of mind had place only in the first steps towards
 knowledge: the more fully I entered into the science, the more
 exclusively I pursued it for its own sake. That application, which at
 first had been a matter of duty and resolution, now became so ardent and
 eager, that the stars often disappeared in the light of morning whilst
 I was yet engaged in my laboratory.
 
 As I applied so closely, it may be easily conceived that I improved
 rapidly. My ardour was indeed the astonishment of the students; and my
 proficiency, that of the masters. Professor Krempe often asked me, with
 a sly smile, how Cornelius Agrippa went on? whilst M. Waldman expressed
 the most heart-felt exultation in my progress. Two years passed in this
 manner, during which I paid no visit to Geneva, but was engaged, heart
 and soul, in the pursuit of some discoveries, which I hoped to make.
 None but those who have experienced them can conceive of the enticements
 of science. In other studies you go as far as others have gone before
 you, and there is nothing more to know; but in a scientific pursuit
 there is continual food for discovery and wonder. A mind of moderate
 capacity, which closely pursues one study, must infallibly arrive at
 great proficiency in that study; and I, who continually sought the
 attainment of one object of pursuit, and was solely wrapt up in this,
 improved so rapidly, that, at the end of two years, I made some
 discoveries in the improvement of some chemical instruments, which
 procured me great esteem and admiration at the university. When I had
 arrived at this point, and had become as well acquainted with the theory
 and practice of natural philosophy as depended on the lessons of any of
 the professors at Ingolstadt, my residence there being no longer
 conducive to my improvements, I thought of returning to my friends and
 my native town, when an incident happened that protracted my stay.
 
 One of the phaenonema which had peculiarly attracted my attention was the
 structure of the human frame, and, indeed, any animal endued with life.
 Whence, I often asked myself, did the principle of life proceed? It was
 a bold question, and one which has ever been considered as a mystery;
 yet with how many things are we upon the brink of becoming acquainted,
 if cowardice or carelessness did not restrain our inquiries. I revolved
 these circumstances in my mind, and determined thenceforth to apply
 myself more particularly to those branches of natural philosophy which
 relate to physiology. Unless I had been animated by an almost
 supernatural enthusiasm, my application to this study would have been
 irksome, and almost intolerable. To examine the causes of life, we must
 first have recourse to death. I became acquainted with the science of
 anatomy: but this was not sufficient; I must also observe the natural
 decay and corruption of the human body. In my education my father had
 taken the greatest precautions that my mind should be impressed with no
 supernatural horrors. I do not ever remember to have trembled at a tale
 of superstition, or to have feared the apparition of a spirit. Darkness
 had no effect upon my fancy; and a church-yard was to me merely the
 receptacle of bodies deprived of life, which, from being the seat of
 beauty and strength, had become food for the worm. Now I was led to
 examine the cause and progress of this decay, and forced to spend days
 and nights in vaults and charnel houses. My attention was fixed upon
 every object the most insupportable to the delicacy of the human
 feelings. I saw how the fine form of man was degraded and wasted; I
 beheld the corruption of death succeed to the blooming cheek of life; I
 saw how the worm inherited the wonders of the eye and brain. I paused,
 examining and analysing all the minutiae of causation, as exemplified in
 the change from life to death, and death to life, until from the midst
 of this darkness a sudden light broke in upon me--a light so brilliant
 and wondrous, yet so simple, that while I became dizzy with the
 immensity of the prospect which it illustrated, I was surprised that
 among so many men of genius, who had directed their inquiries towards
 the same science, that I alone should be reserved to discover so
 astonishing a secret.
 
 Remember, I am not recording the vision of a madman. The sun does not
 more certainly shine in the heavens, than that which I now affirm is
 true. Some miracle might have produced it, yet the stages of the
 discovery were distinct and probable. After days and nights of
 incredible labour and fatigue, I succeeded in discovering the cause of
 generation and life; nay, more, I became myself capable of bestowing
 animation upon lifeless matter.
 
 The astonishment which I had at first experienced on this discovery soon
 gave place to delight and rapture. After so much time spent in painful
 labour, to arrive at once at the summit of my desires, was the most
 gratifying consummation of my toils. But this discovery was so great
 and overwhelming, that all the steps by which I had been progressively
 led to it were obliterated, and I beheld only the result. What had been
 the study and desire of the wisest men since the creation of the world,
 was now within my grasp. Not that, like a magic scene, it all opened
 upon me at once: the information I had obtained was of a nature rather
 to direct my endeavours so soon as I should point them towards the
 object of my search, than to exhibit that object already accomplished. I
 was like the Arabian who had been buried with the dead, and found a
 passage to life aided only by one glimmering, and seemingly ineffectual
 light.
 
 I see by your eagerness, and the wonder and hope which your eyes
 express, my friend, that you expect to be informed of the secret with
 which I am acquainted; that cannot be: listen patiently until the end of
 my story, and you will easily perceive why I am reserved upon that
 subject. I will not lead you on, unguarded and ardent as I then was, to
 your destruction and infallible misery. Learn from me, if not by my
 precepts, at least by my example, how dangerous is the acquirement of
 knowledge, and how much happier that man is who believes his native town
 to be the world, than he who aspires to become greater than his nature
 will allow.
 
 When I found so astonishing a power placed within my hands, I hesitated
 a long time concerning the manner in which I should employ it. Although
 I possessed the capacity of bestowing animation, yet to prepare a frame
 for the reception of it, with all its intricacies of fibres, muscles,
 and veins, still remained a work of inconceivable difficulty and labour.
 I doubted at first whether I should attempt the creation of a being like
 myself or one of simpler organization; but my imagination was too much
 exalted by my first success to permit me to doubt of my ability to give
 life to an animal as complex and wonderful as man. The materials at
 present within my command hardly appeared adequate to so arduous an
 undertaking; but I doubted not that I should ultimately succeed. I
 prepared myself for a multitude of reverses; my operations might be
 incessantly baffled, and at last my work be imperfect: yet, when I
 considered the improvement which every day takes place in science and
 mechanics, I was encouraged to hope my present attempts would at least
 lay the foundations of future success. Nor could I consider the
 magnitude and complexity of my plan as any argument of its
 impracticability. It was with these feelings that I began the creation
 of a human being. As the minuteness of the parts formed a great
 hindrance to my speed, I resolved, contrary to my first intention, to
 make the being of a gigantic stature; that is to say, about eight feet
 in height, and proportionably large. After having formed this
 determination, and having spent some months in successfully collecting
 and arranging my materials, I began.
 
 No one can conceive the variety of feelings which bore me onwards, like
 a hurricane, in the first enthusiasm of success. Life and death appeared
 to me ideal bounds, which I should first break through, and pour a
 torrent of light into our dark world. A new species would bless me as
 its creator and source; many happy and excellent natures would owe their
 being to me. No father could claim the gratitude of his child so
 completely as I should deserve their's. Pursuing these reflections, I
 thought, that if I could bestow animation upon lifeless matter, I might
 in process of time (although I now found it impossible) renew life where
 death had apparently devoted the body to corruption.
 
 These thoughts supported my spirits, while I pursued my undertaking with
 unremitting ardour. My cheek had grown pale with study, and my person
 had become emaciated with confinement. Sometimes, on the very brink of
 certainty, I failed; yet still I clung to the hope which the next day or
 the next hour might realize. One secret which I alone possessed was the
 hope to which I had dedicated myself; and the moon gazed on my midnight
 labours, while, with unrelaxed and breathless eagerness, I pursued
 nature to her hiding places. Who shall conceive the horrors of my secret
 toil, as I dabbled among the unhallowed damps of the grave, or tortured
 the living animal to animate the lifeless clay? My limbs now tremble,
 and my eyes swim with the remembrance; but then a resistless, and almost
 frantic impulse, urged me forward; I seemed to have lost all soul or
 sensation but for this one pursuit. It was indeed but a passing trance,
 that only made me feel with renewed acuteness so soon as, the unnatural
 stimulus ceasing to operate, I had returned to my old habits. I
 collected bones from charnel houses; and disturbed, with profane
 fingers, the tremendous secrets of the human frame. In a solitary
 chamber, or rather cell, at the top of the house, and separated from all
 the other apartments by a gallery and staircase, I kept my workshop of
 filthy creation; my eyeballs were starting from their sockets in
 attending to the details of my employment. The dissecting room and the
 slaughter-house furnished many of my materials; and often did my human
 nature turn with loathing from my occupation, whilst, still urged on by
 an eagerness which perpetually increased, I brought my work near to a
 conclusion.
 
 The summer months passed while I was thus engaged, heart and soul, in
 one pursuit. It was a most beautiful season; never did the fields bestow
 a more plentiful harvest, or the vines yield a more luxuriant vintage:
 but my eyes were insensible to the charms of nature. And the same
 feelings which made me neglect the scenes around me caused me also to
 forget those friends who were so many miles absent, and whom I had not
 seen for so long a time. I knew my silence disquieted them; and I well
 remembered the words of my father: "I know that while you are pleased
 with yourself, you will think of us with affection, and we shall hear
 regularly from you. You must pardon me, if I regard any interruption in
 your correspondence as a proof that your other duties are equally
 neglected."
 
 I knew well therefore what would be my father's feelings; but I could
 not tear my thoughts from my employment, loathsome in itself, but which
 had taken an irresistible hold of my imagination. I wished, as it were,
 to procrastinate all that related to my feelings of affection until the
 great object, which swallowed up every habit of my nature, should be
 completed.
 
 I then thought that my father would be unjust if he ascribed my neglect
 to vice, or faultiness on my part; but I am now convinced that he was
 justified in conceiving that I should not be altogether free from blame.
 A human being in perfection ought always to preserve a calm and peaceful
 mind, and never to allow passion or a transitory desire to disturb his
 tranquillity. I do not think that the pursuit of knowledge is an
 exception to this rule. If the study to which you apply yourself has a
 tendency to weaken your affections, and to destroy your taste for those
 simple pleasures in which no alloy can possibly mix, then that study is
 certainly unlawful, that is to say, not befitting the human mind. If
 this rule were always observed; if no man allowed any pursuit
 whatsoever to interfere with the tranquillity of his domestic
 affections, Greece had not been enslaved; Caesar would have spared his
 country; America would have been discovered more gradually; and the
 empires of Mexico and Peru had not been destroyed.
 
 But I forget that I am moralizing in the most interesting part of my
 tale; and your looks remind me to proceed.
 
 My father made no reproach in his letters; and only took notice of my
 silence by inquiring into my occupations more particularly than before.
 Winter, spring, and summer, passed away during my labours; but I did not
 watch the blossom or the expanding leaves--sights which before always
 yielded me supreme delight, so deeply was I engrossed in my occupation.
 The leaves of that year had withered before my work drew near to a
 close; and now every day shewed me more plainly how well I had
 succeeded. But my enthusiasm was checked by my anxiety, and I appeared
 rather like one doomed by slavery to toil in the mines, or any other
 unwholesome trade, than an artist occupied by his favourite employment.
 Every night I was oppressed by a slow fever, and I became nervous to a
 most painful degree; a disease that I regretted the more because I had
 hitherto enjoyed most excellent health, and had always boasted of the
 firmness of my nerves. But I believed that exercise and amusement would
 soon drive away such symptoms; and I promised myself both of these, when
 my creation should be complete.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 It was on a dreary night of November, that I beheld the accomplishment
 of my toils. With an anxiety that almost amounted to agony, I collected
 the instruments of life around me, that I might infuse a spark of being
 into the lifeless thing that lay at my feet. It was already one in the
 morning; the rain pattered dismally against the panes, and my candle was
 nearly burnt out, when, by the glimmer of the half-extinguished light, I
 saw the dull yellow eye of the creature open; it breathed hard, and a
 convulsive motion agitated its limbs.
 
 How can I describe my emotions at this catastrophe, or how delineate the
 wretch whom with such infinite pains and care I had endeavoured to form?
 His limbs were in proportion, and I had selected his features as
 beautiful. Beautiful!--Great God! His yellow skin scarcely covered the
 work of muscles and arteries beneath; his hair was of a lustrous black,
 and flowing; his teeth of a pearly whiteness; but these luxuriances only
 formed a more horrid contrast with his watery eyes, that seemed almost
 of the same colour as the dun white sockets in which they were set, his
 shrivelled complexion, and straight black lips.
 
 The different accidents of life are not so changeable as the feelings of
 human nature. I had worked hard for nearly two years, for the sole
 purpose of infusing life into an inanimate body. For this I had deprived
 myself of rest and health. I had desired it with an ardour that far
 exceeded moderation; but now that I had finished, the beauty of the
 dream vanished, and breathless horror and disgust filled my heart.
 Unable to endure the aspect of the being I had created, I rushed out of
 the room, and continued a long time traversing my bed-chamber, unable
 to compose my mind to sleep. At length lassitude succeeded to the
 tumult I had before endured; and I threw myself on the bed in my
 clothes, endeavouring to seek a few moments of forgetfulness. But it was
 in vain: I slept indeed, but I was disturbed by the wildest dreams. I
 thought I saw Elizabeth, in the bloom of health, walking in the streets
 of Ingolstadt. Delighted and surprised, I embraced her; but as I
 imprinted the first kiss on her lips, they became livid with the hue of
 death; her features appeared to change, and I thought that I held the
 corpse of my dead mother in my arms; a shroud enveloped her form, and I
 saw the grave-worms crawling in the folds of the flannel. I started from
 my sleep with horror; a cold dew covered my forehead, my teeth
 chattered, and every limb became convulsed; when, by the dim and yellow
 light of the moon, as it forced its way through the window-shutters, I
 beheld the wretch--the miserable monster whom I had created. He held up
 the curtain of the bed; and his eyes, if eyes they may be called, were
 fixed on me. His jaws opened, and he muttered some inarticulate sounds,
 while a grin wrinkled his cheeks. He might have spoken, but I did not
 hear; one hand was stretched out, seemingly to detain me, but I escaped,
 and rushed down stairs. I took refuge in the court-yard belonging to the
 house which I inhabited; where I remained during the rest of the night,
 walking up and down in the greatest agitation, listening attentively,
 catching and fearing each sound as if it were to announce the approach
 of the demoniacal corpse to which I had so miserably given life.
 
 Oh! no mortal could support the horror of that countenance. A mummy
 again endued with animation could not be so hideous as that wretch. I
 had gazed on him while unfinished; he was ugly then; but when those
 muscles and joints were rendered capable of motion, it became a thing
 such as even Dante could not have conceived.
 
 I passed the night wretchedly. Sometimes my pulse beat so quickly and
 hardly, that I felt the palpitation of every artery; at others, I nearly
 sank to the ground through languor and extreme weakness. Mingled with
 this horror, I felt the bitterness of disappointment: dreams that had
 been my food and pleasant rest for so long a space, were now become a
 hell to me; and the change was so rapid, the overthrow so complete!
 
 Morning, dismal and wet, at length dawned, and discovered to my
 sleepless and aching eyes the church of Ingolstadt, its white steeple
 and clock, which indicated the sixth hour. The porter opened the gates
 of the court, which had that night been my asylum, and I issued into the
 streets, pacing them with quick steps, as if I sought to avoid the
 wretch whom I feared every turning of the street would present to my
 view. I did not dare return to the apartment which I inhabited, but felt
 impelled to hurry on, although wetted by the rain, which poured from a
 black and comfortless sky.
 
 I continued walking in this manner for some time, endeavouring, by
 bodily exercise, to ease the load that weighed upon my mind. I
 traversed the streets, without any clear conception of where I was, or
 what I was doing. My heart palpitated in the sickness of fear; and I
 hurried on with irregular steps, not daring to look about me:
 
     Like one who, on a lonely road,
       Doth walk in fear and dread,
     And, having once turn'd round, walks on,
       And turns no more his head;
     Because he knows a frightful fiend
       Doth close behind him tread.
 
 Continuing thus, I came at length opposite to the inn at which the
 various diligences and carriages usually stopped. Here I paused, I knew
 not why; but I remained some minutes with my eyes fixed on a coach that
 was coming towards me from the other end of the street. As it drew
 nearer, I observed that it was the Swiss diligence: it stopped just
 where I was standing; and, on the door being opened, I perceived Henry
 Clerval, who, on seeing me, instantly sprung out. "My dear
 Frankenstein," exclaimed he, "how glad I am to see you! how fortunate
 that you should be here at the very moment of my alighting!"
 
 Nothing could equal my delight on seeing Clerval; his presence brought
 back to my thoughts my father, Elizabeth, and all those scenes of home
 so dear to my recollection. I grasped his hand, and in a moment forgot
 my horror and misfortune; I felt suddenly, and for the first time during
 many months, calm and serene joy. I welcomed my friend, therefore, in
 the most cordial manner, and we walked towards my college. Clerval
 continued talking for some time about our mutual friends, and his own
 good fortune in being permitted to come to Ingolstadt. "You may easily
 believe," said he, "how great was the difficulty to persuade my father
 that it was not absolutely necessary for a merchant not to understand
 any thing except book-keeping; and, indeed, I believe I left him
 incredulous to the last, for his constant answer to my unwearied
 entreaties was the same as that of the Dutch schoolmaster in the Vicar
 of Wakefield: 'I have ten thousand florins a year without Greek, I eat
 heartily without Greek.' But his affection for me at length overcame his
 dislike of learning, and he has permitted me to undertake a voyage of
 discovery to the land of knowledge."
 
 "It gives me the greatest delight to see you; but tell me how you left
 my father, brothers, and Elizabeth."
 
 "Very well, and very happy, only a little uneasy that they hear from you
 so seldom. By the bye, I mean to lecture you a little upon their account
 myself.--But, my dear Frankenstein," continued he, stopping short, and
 gazing full in my face, "I did not before remark how very ill you
 appear; so thin and pale; you look as if you had been watching for
 several nights."
 
 "You have guessed right; I have lately been so deeply engaged in one
 occupation, that I have not allowed myself sufficient rest, as you see:
 but I hope, I sincerely hope, that all these employments are now at an
 end, and that I am at length free."
 
 I trembled excessively; I could not endure to think of, and far less to
 allude to the occurrences of the preceding night. I walked with a quick
 pace, and we soon arrived at my college. I then reflected, and the
 thought made me shiver, that the creature whom I had left in my
 apartment might still be there, alive, and walking about. I dreaded to
 behold this monster; but I feared still more that Henry should see him.
 Entreating him therefore to remain a few minutes at the bottom of the
 stairs, I darted up towards my own room. My hand was already on the lock
 of the door before I recollected myself. I then paused; and a cold
 shivering came over me. I threw the door forcibly open, as children are
 accustomed to do when they expect a spectre to stand in waiting for them
 on the other side; but nothing appeared. I stepped fearfully in: the
 apartment was empty; and my bedroom was also freed from its hideous
 guest. I could hardly believe that so great a good-fortune could have
 befallen me; but when I became assured that my enemy had indeed fled, I
 clapped my hands for joy, and ran down to Clerval.
 
 We ascended into my room, and the servant presently brought breakfast;
 but I was unable to contain myself. It was not joy only that possessed
 me; I felt my flesh tingle with excess of sensitiveness, and my pulse
 beat rapidly. I was unable to remain for a single instant in the same
 place; I jumped over the chairs, clapped my hands, and laughed aloud.
 Clerval at first attributed my unusual spirits to joy on his arrival;
 but when he observed me more attentively, he saw a wildness in my eyes
 for which he could not account; and my loud, unrestrained, heartless
 laughter, frightened and astonished him.
 
 "My dear Victor," cried he, "what, for God's sake, is the matter? Do not
 laugh in that manner. How ill you are! What is the cause of all this?"
 
 "Do not ask me," cried I, putting my hands before my eyes, for I thought
 I saw the dreaded spectre glide into the room; "_he_ can tell.--Oh, save
 me! save me!" I imagined that the monster seized me; I struggled
 furiously, and fell down in a fit.
 
 Poor Clerval! what must have been his feelings? A meeting, which he
 anticipated with such joy, so strangely turned to bitterness. But I was
 not the witness of his grief; for I was lifeless, and did not recover my
 senses for a long, long time.
 
 This was the commencement of a nervous fever, which confined me for
 several months. During all that time Henry was my only nurse. I
 afterwards learned that, knowing my father's advanced age, and unfitness
 for so long a journey, and how wretched my sickness would make
 Elizabeth, he spared them this grief by concealing the extent of my
 disorder. He knew that I could not have a more kind and attentive nurse
 than himself; and, firm in the hope he felt of my recovery, he did not
 doubt that, instead of doing harm, he performed the kindest action that
 he could towards them.
 
 But I was in reality very ill; and surely nothing but the unbounded and
 unremitting attentions of my friend could have restored me to life. The
 form of the monster on whom I had bestowed existence was for ever before
 my eyes, and I raved incessantly concerning him. Doubtless my words
 surprised Henry: he at first believed them to be the wanderings of my
 disturbed imagination; but the pertinacity with which I continually
 recurred to the same subject persuaded him that my disorder indeed owed
 its origin to some uncommon and terrible event.
 
 By very slow degrees, and with frequent relapses, that alarmed and
 grieved my friend, I recovered. I remember the first time I became
 capable of observing outward objects with any kind of pleasure, I
 perceived that the fallen leaves had disappeared, and that the young
 buds were shooting forth from the trees that shaded my window. It was a
 divine spring; and the season contributed greatly to my convalescence. I
 felt also sentiments of joy and affection revive in my bosom; my gloom
 disappeared, and in a short time I became as cheerful as before I was
 attacked by the fatal passion.
 
 "Dearest Clerval," exclaimed I, "how kind, how very good you are to me.
 This whole winter, instead of being spent in study, as you promised
 yourself, has been consumed in my sick room. How shall I ever repay
 you? I feel the greatest remorse for the disappointment of which I have
 been the occasion; but you will forgive me."
 
 "You will repay me entirely, if you do not discompose yourself, but get
 well as fast as you can; and since you appear in such good spirits, I
 may speak to you on one subject, may I not?"
 
 I trembled. One subject! what could it be? Could he allude to an object
 on whom I dared not even think?
 
 "Compose yourself," said Clerval, who observed my change of colour, "I
 will not mention it, if it agitates you; but your father and cousin
 would be very happy if they received a letter from you in your own
 hand-writing. They hardly know how ill you have been, and are uneasy at
 your long silence."
 
 "Is that all? my dear Henry. How could you suppose that my first thought
 would not fly towards those dear, dear friends whom I love, and who are
 so deserving of my love."
 
 "If this is your present temper, my friend, you will perhaps be glad to
 see a letter that has been lying here some days for you: it is from your
 cousin, I believe."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 Clerval then put the following letter into my hands.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 "_To_ V. FRANKENSTEIN.
 
 "MY DEAR COUSIN,
 
 "I cannot describe to you the uneasiness we have all felt concerning
 your health. We cannot help imagining that your friend Clerval conceals
 the extent of your disorder: for it is now several months since we have
 seen your hand-writing; and all this time you have been obliged to
 dictate your letters to Henry. Surely, Victor, you must have been
 exceedingly ill; and this makes us all very wretched, as much so nearly
 as after the death of your dear mother. My uncle was almost persuaded
 that you were indeed dangerously ill, and could hardly be restrained
 from undertaking a journey to Ingolstadt. Clerval always writes that you
 are getting better; I eagerly hope that you will confirm this
 intelligence soon in your own hand-writing; for indeed, indeed, Victor,
 we are all very miserable on this account. Relieve us from this fear,
 and we shall be the happiest creatures in the world. Your father's
 health is now so vigorous, that he appears ten years younger since last
 winter. Ernest also is so much improved, that you would hardly know him:
 he is now nearly sixteen, and has lost that sickly appearance which he
 had some years ago; he is grown quite robust and active.
 
 "My uncle and I conversed a long time last night about what profession
 Ernest should follow. His constant illness when young has deprived him
 of the habits of application; and now that he enjoys good health, he is
 continually in the open air, climbing the hills, or rowing on the lake.
 I therefore proposed that he should be a farmer; which you know, Cousin,
 is a favourite scheme of mine. A farmer's is a very healthy happy life;
 and the least hurtful, or rather the most beneficial profession of any.
 My uncle had an idea of his being educated as an advocate, that through
 his interest he might become a judge. But, besides that he is not at all
 fitted for such an occupation, it is certainly more creditable to
 cultivate the earth for the sustenance of man, than to be the confidant,
 and sometimes the accomplice, of his vices; which is the profession of a
 lawyer. I said, that the employments of a prosperous farmer, if they
 were not a more honourable, they were at least a happier species of
 occupation than that of a judge, whose misfortune it was always to
 meddle with the dark side of human nature. My uncle smiled, and said,
 that I ought to be an advocate myself, which put an end to the
 conversation on that subject.
 
 "And now I must tell you a little story that will please, and perhaps
 amuse you. Do you not remember Justine Moritz? Probably you do not; I
 will relate her history, therefore, in a few words. Madame Moritz, her
 mother, was a widow with four children, of whom Justine was the third.
 This girl had always been the favourite of her father; but, through a
 strange perversity, her mother could not endure her, and, after the
 death of M. Moritz, treated her very ill. My aunt observed this; and,
 when Justine was twelve years of age, prevailed on her mother to allow
 her to live at her house. The republican institutions of our country
 have produced simpler and happier manners than those which prevail in
 the great monarchies that surround it. Hence there is less distinction
 between the several classes of its inhabitants; and the lower orders
 being neither so poor nor so despised, their manners are more refined
 and moral. A servant in Geneva does not mean the same thing as a servant
 in France and England. Justine, thus received in our family, learned the
 duties of a servant; a condition which, in our fortunate country, does
 not include the idea of ignorance, and a sacrifice of the dignity of a
 human being.
 
 "After what I have said, I dare say you well remember the heroine of my
 little tale: for Justine was a great favourite of your's; and I
 recollect you once remarked, that if you were in an ill humour, one
 glance from Justine could dissipate it, for the same reason that Ariosto
 gives concerning the beauty of Angelica--she looked so frank-hearted and
 happy. My aunt conceived a great attachment for her, by which she was
 induced to give her an education superior to that which she had at
 first intended. This benefit was fully repaid; Justine was the most
 grateful little creature in the world: I do not mean that she made any
 professions, I never heard one pass her lips; but you could see by her
 eyes that she almost adored her protectress. Although her disposition
 was gay, and in many respects inconsiderate, yet she paid the greatest
 attention to every gesture of my aunt. She thought her the model of all
 excellence, and endeavoured to imitate her phraseology and manners, so
 that even now she often reminds me of her.
 
 "When my dearest aunt died, every one was too much occupied in their own
 grief to notice poor Justine, who had attended her during her illness
 with the most anxious affection. Poor Justine was very ill; but other
 trials were reserved for her.
 
 "One by one, her brothers and sister died; and her mother, with the
 exception of her neglected daughter, was left childless. The conscience
 of the woman was troubled; she began to think that the deaths of her
 favourites was a judgment from heaven to chastise her partiality. She
 was a Roman Catholic; and I believe her confessor confirmed the idea
 which she had conceived. Accordingly, a few months after your departure
 for Ingolstadt, Justine was called home by her repentant mother. Poor
 girl! she wept when she quitted our house: she was much altered since
 the death of my aunt; grief had given softness and a winning mildness to
 her manners, which had before been remarkable for vivacity. Nor was her
 residence at her mother's house of a nature to restore her gaiety. The
 poor woman was very vacillating in her repentance. She sometimes begged
 Justine to forgive her unkindness, but much oftener accused her of
 having caused the deaths of her brothers and sister. Perpetual fretting
 at length threw Madame Moritz into a decline, which at first increased
 her irritability, but she is now at peace for ever. She died on the
 first approach of cold weather, at the beginning of this last winter.
 Justine has returned to us; and I assure you I love her tenderly. She is
 very clever and gentle, and extremely pretty; as I mentioned before, her
 mien and her expressions continually remind me of my dear aunt.
 
 "I must say also a few words to you, my dear cousin, of little darling
 William. I wish you could see him; he is very tall of his age, with
 sweet laughing blue eyes, dark eye-lashes, and curling hair. When he
 smiles, two little dimples appear on each cheek, which are rosy with
 health. He has already had one or two little _wives_, but Louisa Biron
 is his favourite, a pretty little girl of five years of age.
 
 "Now, dear Victor, I dare say you wish to be indulged in a little gossip
 concerning the good people of Geneva. The pretty Miss Mansfield has
 already received the congratulatory visits on her approaching marriage
 with a young Englishman, John Melbourne, Esq. Her ugly sister, Manon,
 married M. Duvillard, the rich banker, last autumn. Your favourite
 schoolfellow, Louis Manoir, has suffered several misfortunes since the
 departure of Clerval from Geneva. But he has already recovered his
 spirits, and is reported to be on the point of marrying a very lively
 pretty Frenchwoman, Madame Tavernier. She is a widow, and much older
 than Manoir; but she is very much admired, and a favourite with every
 body.
 
 "I have written myself into good spirits, dear cousin; yet I cannot
 conclude without again anxiously inquiring concerning your health. Dear
 Victor, if you are not very ill, write yourself, and make your father
 and all of us happy; or----I cannot bear to think of the other side of
 the question; my tears already flow. Adieu, my dearest cousin."
 
 "ELIZABETH LAVENZA.
 
 "Geneva, March 18th, 17--."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 "Dear, dear Elizabeth!" I exclaimed when I had read her letter, "I will
 write instantly, and relieve them from the anxiety they must feel." I
 wrote, and this exertion greatly fatigued me; but my convalescence had
 commenced, and proceeded regularly. In another fortnight I was able to
 leave my chamber.
 
 One of my first duties on my recovery was to introduce Clerval to the
 several professors of the university. In doing this, I underwent a kind
 of rough usage, ill befitting the wounds that my mind had sustained.
 Ever since the fatal night, the end of my labours, and the beginning of
 my misfortunes, I had conceived a violent antipathy even to the name of
 natural philosophy. When I was otherwise quite restored to health, the
 sight of a chemical instrument would renew all the agony of my nervous
 symptoms. Henry saw this, and had removed all my apparatus from my view.
 He had also changed my apartment; for he perceived that I had acquired a
 dislike for the room which had previously been my laboratory. But these
 cares of Clerval were made of no avail when I visited the professors. M.
 Waldman inflicted torture when he praised, with kindness and warmth, the
 astonishing progress I had made in the sciences. He soon perceived that
 I disliked the subject; but, not guessing the real cause, he attributed
 my feelings to modesty, and changed the subject from my improvement to
 the science itself, with a desire, as I evidently saw, of drawing me
 out. What could I do? He meant to please, and he tormented me. I felt as
 if he had placed carefully, one by one, in my view those instruments
 which were to be afterwards used in putting me to a slow and cruel
 death. I writhed under his words, yet dared not exhibit the pain I felt.
 Clerval, whose eyes and feelings were always quick in discerning the
 sensations of others, declined the subject, alleging, in excuse, his
 total ignorance; and the conversation took a more general turn. I
 thanked my friend from my heart, but I did not speak. I saw plainly that
 he was surprised, but he never attempted to draw my secret from me; and
 although I loved him with a mixture of affection and reverence that knew
 no bounds, yet I could never persuade myself to confide to him that
 event which was so often present to my recollection, but which I feared
 the detail to another would only impress more deeply.
 
 M. Krempe was not equally docile; and in my condition at that time, of
 almost insupportable sensitiveness, his harsh blunt encomiums gave me
 even more pain than the benevolent approbation of M. Waldman. "D--n the
 fellow!" cried he; "why, M. Clerval, I assure you he has outstript us
 all. Aye, stare if you please; but it is nevertheless true. A youngster
 who, but a few years ago, believed Cornelius Agrippa as firmly as the
 gospel, has now set himself at the head of the university; and if he is
 not soon pulled down, we shall all be out of countenance.--Aye, aye,"
 continued he, observing my face expressive of suffering, "M.
 Frankenstein is modest; an excellent quality in a young man. Young men
 should be diffident of themselves, you know, M. Clerval; I was myself
 when young: but that wears out in a very short time."
 
 M. Krempe had now commenced an eulogy on himself, which happily turned
 the conversation from a subject that was so annoying to me.
 
 Clerval was no natural philosopher. His imagination was too vivid for
 the minutiae of science. Languages were his principal study; and he
 sought, by acquiring their elements, to open a field for
 self-instruction on his return to Geneva. Persian, Arabic, and Hebrew,
 gained his attention, after he had made himself perfectly master of
 Greek and Latin. For my own part, idleness had ever been irksome to me;
 and now that I wished to fly from reflection, and hated my former
 studies, I felt great relief in being the fellow-pupil with my friend,
 and found not only instruction but consolation in the works of the
 orientalists. Their melancholy is soothing, and their joy elevating to a
 degree I never experienced in studying the authors of any other country.
 When you read their writings, life appears to consist in a warm sun and
 garden of roses,--in the smiles and frowns of a fair enemy, and the fire
 that consumes your own heart. How different from the manly and heroical
 poetry of Greece and Rome.
 
 Summer passed away in these occupations, and my return to Geneva was
 fixed for the latter end of autumn; but being delayed by several
 accidents, winter and snow arrived, the roads were deemed impassable,
 and my journey was retarded until the ensuing spring. I felt this delay
 very bitterly; for I longed to see my native town, and my beloved
 friends. My return had only been delayed so long from an unwillingness
 to leave Clerval in a strange place, before he had become acquainted
 with any of its inhabitants. The winter, however, was spent cheerfully;
 and although the spring was uncommonly late, when it came, its beauty
 compensated for its dilatoriness.
 
 The month of May had already commenced, and I expected the letter daily
 which was to fix the date of my departure, when Henry proposed a
 pedestrian tour in the environs of Ingolstadt that I might bid a
 personal farewell to the country I had so long inhabited. I acceded
 with pleasure to this proposition: I was fond of exercise, and Clerval
 had always been my favourite companion in the rambles of this nature
 that I had taken among the scenes of my native country.
 
 We passed a fortnight in these perambulations: my health and spirits had
 long been restored, and they gained additional strength from the
 salubrious air I breathed, the natural incidents of our progress, and
 the conversation of my friend. Study had before secluded me from the
 intercourse of my fellow-creatures, and rendered me unsocial; but
 Clerval called forth the better feelings of my heart; he again taught me
 to love the aspect of nature, and the cheerful faces of children.
 Excellent friend! how sincerely did you love me, and endeavour to
 elevate my mind, until it was on a level with your own. A selfish
 pursuit had cramped and narrowed me, until your gentleness and affection
 warmed and opened my senses; I became the same happy creature who, a few
 years ago, loving and beloved by all, had no sorrow or care. When happy,
 inanimate nature had the power of bestowing on me the most delightful
 sensations. A serene sky and verdant fields filled me with ecstacy. The
 present season was indeed divine; the flowers of spring bloomed in the
 hedges, while those of summer were already in bud: I was undisturbed by
 thoughts which during the preceding year had pressed upon me,
 notwithstanding my endeavours to throw them off, with an invincible
 burden.
 
 Henry rejoiced in my gaiety, and sincerely sympathized in my feelings:
 he exerted himself to amuse me, while he expressed the sensations that
 filled his soul. The resources of his mind on this occasion were truly
 astonishing: his conversation was full of imagination; and very often,
 in imitation of the Persian and Arabic writers, he invented tales of
 wonderful fancy and passion. At other times he repeated my favourite
 poems, or drew me out into arguments, which he supported with great
 ingenuity.
 
 We returned to our college on a Sunday afternoon: the peasants were
 dancing, and every one we met appeared gay and happy. My own spirits
 were high, and I bounded along with feelings of unbridled joy and
 hilarity.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 On my return, I found the following letter from my father:--
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 "_To_ V. FRANKENSTEIN.
 
 "MY DEAR VICTOR,
 
 "You have probably waited impatiently for a letter to fix the date of
 your return to us; and I was at first tempted to write only a few lines,
 merely mentioning the day on which I should expect you. But that would
 be a cruel kindness, and I dare not do it. What would be your surprise,
 my son, when you expected a happy and gay welcome, to behold, on the
 contrary, tears and wretchedness? And how, Victor, can I relate our
 misfortune? Absence cannot have rendered you callous to our joys and
 griefs; and how shall I inflict pain on an absent child? I wish to
 prepare you for the woeful news, but I know it is impossible; even now
 your eye skims over the page, to seek the words which are to convey to
 you the horrible tidings.
 
 "William is dead!--that sweet child, whose smiles delighted and warmed
 my heart, who was so gentle, yet so gay! Victor, he is murdered!
 
 "I will not attempt to console you; but will simply relate the
 circumstances of the transaction.
 
 "Last Thursday (May 7th) I, my niece, and your two brothers, went to
 walk in Plainpalais. The evening was warm and serene, and we prolonged
 our walk farther than usual. It was already dusk before we thought of
 returning; and then we discovered that William and Ernest, who had gone
 on before, were not to be found. We accordingly rested on a seat until
 they should return. Presently Ernest came, and inquired if we had seen
 his brother: he said, that they had been playing together, that William
 had run away to hide himself, and that he vainly sought for him, and
 afterwards waited for him a long time, but that he did not return.
 
 "This account rather alarmed us, and we continued to search for him
 until night fell, when Elizabeth conjectured that he might have returned
 to the house. He was not there. We returned again, with torches; for I
 could not rest, when I thought that my sweet boy had lost himself, and
 was exposed to all the damps and dews of night: Elizabeth also suffered
 extreme anguish. About five in the morning I discovered my lovely boy,
 whom the night before I had seen blooming and active in health,
 stretched on the grass livid and motionless: the print of the murderer's
 finger was on his neck.
 
 "He was conveyed home, and the anguish that was visible in my
 countenance betrayed the secret to Elizabeth. She was very earnest to
 see the corpse. At first I attempted to prevent her; but she persisted,
 and entering the room where it lay, hastily examined the neck of the
 victim, and clasping her hands exclaimed, 'O God! I have murdered my
 darling infant!'
 
 "She fainted, and was restored with extreme difficulty. When she again
 lived, it was only to weep and sigh. She told me, that that same evening
 William had teazed her to let him wear a very valuable miniature that
 she possessed of your mother. This picture is gone, and was doubtless
 the temptation which urged the murderer to the deed. We have no trace of
 him at present, although our exertions to discover him are unremitted;
 but they will not restore my beloved William.
 
 "Come, dearest Victor; you alone can console Elizabeth. She weeps
 continually, and accuses herself unjustly as the cause of his death; her
 words pierce my heart. We are all unhappy; but will not that be an
 additional motive for you, my son, to return and be our comforter? Your
 dear mother! Alas, Victor! I now say, Thank God she did not live to
 witness the cruel, miserable death of her youngest darling!
 
 "Come, Victor; not brooding thoughts of vengeance against the assassin,
 but with feelings of peace and gentleness, that will heal, instead of
 festering the wounds of our minds. Enter the house of mourning, my
 friend, but with kindness and affection for those who love you, and not
 with hatred for your enemies.
 
 "Your affectionate and afflicted father,
 
 "ALPHONSE FRANKENSTEIN.
 
 "Geneva, May 12th, 17--."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Clerval, who had watched my countenance as I read this letter, was
 surprised to observe the despair that succeeded to the joy I at first
 expressed on receiving news from my friends. I threw the letter on the
 table, and covered my face with my hands.
 
 "My dear Frankenstein," exclaimed Henry, when he perceived me weep with
 bitterness, "are you always to be unhappy? My dear friend, what has
 happened?"
 
 I motioned to him to take up the letter, while I walked up and down the
 room in the extremest agitation. Tears also gushed from the eyes of
 Clerval, as he read the account of my misfortune.
 
 "I can offer you no consolation, my friend," said he; "your disaster is
 irreparable. What do you intend to do?"
 
 "To go instantly to Geneva: come with me, Henry, to order the horses."
 
 During our walk, Clerval endeavoured to raise my spirits. He did not do
 this by common topics of consolation, but by exhibiting the truest
 sympathy. "Poor William!" said he, "that dear child; he now sleeps with
 his angel mother. His friends mourn and weep, but he is at rest: he does
 not now feel the murderer's grasp; a sod covers his gentle form, and he
 knows no pain. He can no longer be a fit subject for pity; the survivors
 are the greatest sufferers, and for them time is the only consolation.
 Those maxims of the Stoics, that death was no evil, and that the mind of
 man ought to be superior to despair on the eternal absence of a beloved
 object, ought not to be urged. Even Cato wept over the dead body of his
 brother."
 
 Clerval spoke thus as we hurried through the streets; the words
 impressed themselves on my mind, and I remembered them afterwards in
 solitude. But now, as soon as the horses arrived, I hurried into a
 cabriole, and bade farewell to my friend.
 
 My journey was very melancholy. At first I wished to hurry on, for I
 longed to console and sympathize with my loved and sorrowing friends;
 but when I drew near my native town, I slackened my progress. I could
 hardly sustain the multitude of feelings that crowded into my mind. I
 passed through scenes familiar to my youth, but which I had not seen for
 nearly six years. How altered every thing might be during that time? One
 sudden and desolating change had taken place; but a thousand little
 circumstances might have by degrees worked other alterations which,
 although they were done more tranquilly, might not be the less decisive.
 Fear overcame me; I dared not advance, dreading a thousand nameless
 evils that made me tremble, although I was unable to define them.
 
 I remained two days at Lausanne, in this painful state of mind. I
 contemplated the lake: the waters were placid; all around was calm, and
 the snowy mountains, "the palaces of nature," were not changed. By
 degrees the calm and heavenly scene restored me, and I continued my
 journey towards Geneva.
 
 The road ran by the side of the lake, which became narrower as I
 approached my native town. I discovered more distinctly the black sides
 of Jura, and the bright summit of Mont Blanc; I wept like a child: "Dear
 mountains! my own beautiful lake! how do you welcome your wanderer? Your
 summits are clear; the sky and lake are blue and placid. Is this to
 prognosticate peace, or to mock at my unhappiness?"
 
 I fear, my friend, that I shall render myself tedious by dwelling on
 these preliminary circumstances; but they were days of comparative
 happiness, and I think of them with pleasure. My country, my beloved
 country! who but a native can tell the delight I took in again beholding
 thy streams, thy mountains, and, more than all, thy lovely lake.
 
 Yet, as I drew nearer home, grief and fear again overcame me. Night also
 closed around; and when I could hardly see the dark mountains, I felt
 still more gloomily. The picture appeared a vast and dim scene of evil,
 and I foresaw obscurely that I was destined to become the most wretched
 of human beings. Alas! I prophesied truly, and failed only in one single
 circumstance, that in all the misery I imagined and dreaded, I did not
 conceive the hundredth part of the anguish I was destined to endure.
 
 It was completely dark when I arrived in the environs of Geneva; the
 gates of the town were already shut; and I was obliged to pass the night
 at Secheron, a village half a league to the east of the city. The sky
 was serene; and, as I was unable to rest, I resolved to visit the spot
 where my poor William had been murdered. As I could not pass through the
 town, I was obliged to cross the lake in a boat to arrive at
 Plainpalais. During this short voyage I saw the lightnings playing on
 the summit of Mont Blanc in the most beautiful figures. The storm
 appeared to approach rapidly; and, on landing, I ascended a low hill,
 that I might observe its progress. It advanced; the heavens were
 clouded, and I soon felt the rain coming slowly in large drops, but its
 violence quickly increased.
 
 I quitted my seat, and walked on, although the darkness and storm
 increased every minute, and the thunder burst with a terrific crash
 over my head. It was echoed from Saleve, the Juras, and the Alps of
 Savoy; vivid flashes of lightning dazzled my eyes, illuminating the
 lake, making it appear like a vast sheet of fire; then for an instant
 every thing seemed of a pitchy darkness, until the eye recovered itself
 from the preceding flash. The storm, as is often the case in
 Switzerland, appeared at once in various parts of the heavens. The most
 violent storm hung exactly north of the town, over that part of the lake
 which lies between the promontory of Belrive and the village of Copet.
 Another storm enlightened Jura with faint flashes; and another darkened
 and sometimes disclosed the Mole, a peaked mountain to the east of the
 lake.
 
 While I watched the storm, so beautiful yet terrific, I wandered on with
 a hasty step. This noble war in the sky elevated my spirits; I clasped
 my hands, and exclaimed aloud, "William, dear angel! this is thy
 funeral, this thy dirge!" As I said these words, I perceived in the
 gloom a figure which stole from behind a clump of trees near me; I stood
 fixed, gazing intently: I could not be mistaken. A flash of lightning
 illuminated the object, and discovered its shape plainly to me; its
 gigantic stature, and the deformity of its aspect, more hideous than
 belongs to humanity, instantly informed me that it was the wretch, the
 filthy daemon to whom I had given life. What did he there? Could he be (I
 shuddered at the conception) the murderer of my brother? No sooner did
 that idea cross my imagination, than I became convinced of its truth; my
 teeth chattered, and I was forced to lean against a tree for support.
 The figure passed me quickly, and I lost it in the gloom. Nothing in
 human shape could have destroyed that fair child. _He_ was the murderer!
 I could not doubt it. The mere presence of the idea was an irresistible
 proof of the fact. I thought of pursuing the devil; but it would have
 been in vain, for another flash discovered him to me hanging among the
 rocks of the nearly perpendicular ascent of Mont Saleve, a hill that
 bounds Plainpalais on the south. He soon reached the summit, and
 disappeared.
 
 I remained motionless. The thunder ceased; but the rain still continued,
 and the scene was enveloped in an impenetrable darkness. I revolved in
 my mind the events which I had until now sought to forget: the whole
 train of my progress towards the creation; the appearance of the work of
 my own hands alive at my bed side; its departure. Two years had now
 nearly elapsed since the night on which he first received life; and was
 this his first crime? Alas! I had turned loose into the world a depraved
 wretch, whose delight was in carnage and misery; had he not murdered my
 brother?
 
 No one can conceive the anguish I suffered during the remainder of the
 night, which I spent, cold and wet, in the open air. But I did not feel
 the inconvenience of the weather; my imagination was busy in scenes of
 evil and despair. I considered the being whom I had cast among mankind,
 and endowed with the will and power to effect purposes of horror, such
 as the deed which he had now done, nearly in the light of my own
 vampire, my own spirit let loose from the grave, and forced to destroy
 all that was dear to me.
 
 Day dawned; and I directed my steps towards the town. The gates were
 open; and I hastened to my father's house. My first thought was to
 discover what I knew of the murderer, and cause instant pursuit to be
 made. But I paused when I reflected on the story that I had to tell. A
 being whom I myself had formed, and endued with life, had met me at
 midnight among the precipices of an inaccessible mountain. I remembered
 also the nervous fever with which I had been seized just at the time
 that I dated my creation, and which would give an air of delirium to a
 tale otherwise so utterly improbable. I well knew that if any other had
 communicated such a relation to me, I should have looked upon it as the
 ravings of insanity. Besides, the strange nature of the animal would
 elude all pursuit, even if I were so far credited as to persuade my
 relatives to commence it. Besides, of what use would be pursuit? Who
 could arrest a creature capable of scaling the overhanging sides of Mont
 Saleve? These reflections determined me, and I resolved to remain
 silent.
 
 It was about five in the morning when I entered my father's house. I
 told the servants not to disturb the family, and went into the library
 to attend their usual hour of rising.
 
 Six years had elapsed, passed as a dream but for one indelible trace,
 and I stood in the same place where I had last embraced my father before
 my departure for Ingolstadt. Beloved and respectable parent! He still
 remained to me. I gazed on the picture of my mother, which stood over
 the mantle-piece. It was an historical subject, painted at my father's
 desire, and represented Caroline Beaufort in an agony of despair,
 kneeling by the coffin of her dead father. Her garb was rustic, and her
 cheek pale; but there was an air of dignity and beauty, that hardly
 permitted the sentiment of pity. Below this picture was a miniature of
 William; and my tears flowed when I looked upon it. While I was thus
 engaged, Ernest entered: he had heard me arrive, and hastened to welcome
 me. He expressed a sorrowful delight to see me: "Welcome, my dearest
 Victor," said he. "Ah! I wish you had come three months ago, and then
 you would have found us all joyous and delighted. But we are now
 unhappy; and, I am afraid, tears instead of smiles will be your welcome.
 Our father looks so sorrowful: this dreadful event seems to have revived
 in his mind his grief on the death of Mamma. Poor Elizabeth also is
 quite inconsolable." Ernest began to weep as he said these words.
 
 "Do not," said I, "welcome me thus; try to be more calm, that I may not
 be absolutely miserable the moment I enter my father's house after so
 long an absence. But, tell me, how does my father support his
 misfortunes? and how is my poor Elizabeth?"
 
 "She indeed requires consolation; she accused herself of having caused
 the death of my brother, and that made her very wretched. But since the
 murderer has been discovered----"
 
 "The murderer discovered! Good God! how can that be? who could attempt
 to pursue him? It is impossible; one might as well try to overtake the
 winds, or confine a mountain-stream with a straw."
 
 "I do not know what you mean; but we were all very unhappy when she was
 discovered. No one would believe it at first; and even now Elizabeth
 will not be convinced, notwithstanding all the evidence. Indeed, who
 would credit that Justine Moritz, who was so amiable, and fond of all
 the family, could all at once become so extremely wicked?"
 
 "Justine Moritz! Poor, poor girl, is she the accused? But it is
 wrongfully; every one knows that; no one believes it, surely, Ernest?"
 
 "No one did at first; but several circumstances came out, that have
 almost forced conviction upon us: and her own behaviour has been so
 confused, as to add to the evidence of facts a weight that, I fear,
 leaves no hope for doubt. But she will be tried to-day, and you will
 then hear all."
 
 He related that, the morning on which the murder of poor William had
 been discovered, Justine had been taken ill, and confined to her bed;
 and, after several days, one of the servants, happening to examine the
 apparel she had worn on the night of the murder, had discovered in her
 pocket the picture of my mother, which had been judged to be the
 temptation of the murderer. The servant instantly shewed it to one of
 the others, who, without saying a word to any of the family, went to a
 magistrate; and, upon their deposition, Justine was apprehended. On
 being charged with the fact, the poor girl confirmed the suspicion in a
 great measure by her extreme confusion of manner.
 
 This was a strange tale, but it did not shake my faith; and I replied
 earnestly, "You are all mistaken; I know the murderer. Justine, poor,
 good Justine, is innocent."
 
 At that instant my father entered. I saw unhappiness deeply impressed on
 his countenance, but he endeavoured to welcome me cheerfully; and, after
 we had exchanged our mournful greeting, would have introduced some other
 topic than that of our disaster, had not Ernest exclaimed, "Good God,
 Papa! Victor says that he knows who was the murderer of poor William."
 
 "We do also, unfortunately," replied my father; "for indeed I had rather
 have been for ever ignorant than have discovered so much depravity and
 ingratitude in one I valued so highly."
 
 "My dear father, you are mistaken; Justine is innocent."
 
 "If she is, God forbid that she should suffer as guilty. She is to be
 tried to-day, and I hope, I sincerely hope, that she will be acquitted."
 
 This speech calmed me. I was firmly convinced in my own mind that
 Justine, and indeed every human being, was guiltless of this murder. I
 had no fear, therefore, that any circumstantial evidence could be
 brought forward strong enough to convict her; and, in this assurance, I
 calmed myself, expecting the trial with eagerness, but without
 prognosticating an evil result.
 
 We were soon joined by Elizabeth. Time had made great alterations in her
 form since I had last beheld her. Six years before she had been a
 pretty, good-humoured girl, whom every one loved and caressed. She was
 now a woman in stature and expression of countenance, which was
 uncommonly lovely. An open and capacious forehead gave indications of a
 good understanding, joined to great frankness of disposition. Her eyes
 were hazel, and expressive of mildness, now through recent affliction
 allied to sadness. Her hair was of a rich, dark auburn, her complexion
 fair, and her figure slight and graceful. She welcomed me with the
 greatest affection. "Your arrival, my dear cousin," said she, "fills me
 with hope. You perhaps will find some means to justify my poor guiltless
 Justine. Alas! who is safe, if she be convicted of crime? I rely on her
 innocence as certainly as I do upon my own. Our misfortune is doubly
 hard to us; we have not only lost that lovely darling boy, but this poor
 girl, whom I sincerely love, is to be torn away by even a worse fate. If
 she is condemned, I never shall know joy more. But she will not, I am
 sure she will not; and then I shall be happy again, even after the sad
 death of my little William."
 
 "She is innocent, my Elizabeth," said I, "and that shall be proved;
 fear nothing, but let your spirits be cheered by the assurance of her
 acquittal."
 
 "How kind you are! every one else believes in her guilt, and that made
 me wretched; for I knew that it was impossible: and to see every one
 else prejudiced in so deadly a manner, rendered me hopeless and
 despairing." She wept.
 
 "Sweet niece," said my father, "dry your tears. If she is, as you
 believe, innocent, rely on the justice of our judges, and the activity
 with which I shall prevent the slightest shadow of partiality."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 We passed a few sad hours, until eleven o'clock, when the trial was to
 commence. My father and the rest of the family being obliged to attend
 as witnesses, I accompanied them to the court. During the whole of this
 wretched mockery of justice, I suffered living torture. It was to be
 decided, whether the result of my curiosity and lawless devices would
 cause the death of two of my fellow-beings: one a smiling babe, full of
 innocence and joy; the other far more dreadfully murdered, with every
 aggravation of infamy that could make the murder memorable in horror.
 Justine also was a girl of merit, and possessed qualities which promised
 to render her life happy: now all was to be obliterated in an
 ignominious grave; and I the cause! A thousand times rather would I have
 confessed myself guilty of the crime ascribed to Justine; but I was
 absent when it was committed, and such a declaration would have been
 considered as the ravings of a madman, and would not have exculpated her
 who suffered through me.
 
 The appearance of Justine was calm. She was dressed in mourning; and her
 countenance, always engaging, was rendered, by the solemnity of her
 feelings, exquisitely beautiful. Yet she appeared confident in
 innocence, and did not tremble, although gazed on and execrated by
 thousands; for all the kindness which her beauty might otherwise have
 excited, was obliterated in the minds of the spectators by the
 imagination of the enormity she was supposed to have committed. She was
 tranquil, yet her tranquillity was evidently constrained; and as her
 confusion had before been adduced as a proof of her guilt, she worked up
 her mind to an appearance of courage. When she entered the court, she
 threw her eyes round it, and quickly discovered where we were seated. A
 tear seemed to dim her eye when she saw us; but she quickly recovered
 herself, and a look of sorrowful affection seemed to attest her utter
 guiltlessness.
 
 The trial began; and after the advocate against her had stated the
 charge, several witnesses were called. Several strange facts combined
 against her, which might have staggered any one who had not such proof
 of her innocence as I had. She had been out the whole of the night on
 which the murder had been committed, and towards morning had been
 perceived by a market-woman not far from the spot where the body of the
 murdered child had been afterwards found. The woman asked her what she
 did there; but she looked very strangely, and only returned a confused
 and unintelligible answer. She returned to the house about eight
 o'clock; and when one inquired where she had passed the night, she
 replied, that she had been looking for the child, and demanded
 earnestly, if any thing had been heard concerning him. When shewn the
 body, she fell into violent hysterics, and kept her bed for several
 days. The picture was then produced, which the servant had found in her
 pocket; and when Elizabeth, in a faltering voice, proved that it was the
 same which, an hour before the child had been missed, she had placed
 round his neck, a murmur of horror and indignation filled the court.
 
 Justine was called on for her defence. As the trial had proceeded, her
 countenance had altered. Surprise, horror, and misery, were strongly
 expressed. Sometimes she struggled with her tears; but when she was
 desired to plead, she collected her powers, and spoke in an audible
 although variable voice:--
 
 "God knows," she said, "how entirely I am innocent. But I do not pretend
 that my protestations should acquit me: I rest my innocence on a plain
 and simple explanation of the facts which have been adduced against me;
 and I hope the character I have always borne will incline my judges to a
 favourable interpretation, where any circumstance appears doubtful or
 suspicious."
 
 She then related that, by the permission of Elizabeth, she had passed
 the evening of the night on which the murder had been committed, at the
 house of an aunt at Chene, a village situated at about a league from
 Geneva. On her return, at about nine o'clock, she met a man, who asked
 her if she had seen any thing of the child who was lost. She was alarmed
 by this account, and passed several hours in looking for him, when the
 gates of Geneva were shut, and she was forced to remain several hours of
 the night in a barn belonging to a cottage, being unwilling to call up
 the inhabitants, to whom she was well known. Unable to rest or sleep,
 she quitted her asylum early, that she might again endeavour to find my
 brother. If she had gone near the spot where his body lay, it was
 without her knowledge. That she had been bewildered when questioned by
 the market-woman, was not surprising, since she had passed a sleepless
 night, and the fate of poor William was yet uncertain. Concerning the
 picture she could give no account.
 
 "I know," continued the unhappy victim, "how heavily and fatally this
 one circumstance weighs against me, but I have no power of explaining
 it; and when I have expressed my utter ignorance, I am only left to
 conjecture concerning the probabilities by which it might have been
 placed in my pocket. But here also I am checked. I believe that I have
 no enemy on earth, and none surely would have been so wicked as to
 destroy me wantonly. Did the murderer place it there? I know of no
 opportunity afforded him for so doing; or if I had, why should he have
 stolen the jewel, to part with it again so soon?
 
 "I commit my cause to the justice of my judges, yet I see no room for
 hope. I beg permission to have a few witnesses examined concerning my
 character; and if their testimony shall not overweigh my supposed guilt,
 I must be condemned, although I would pledge my salvation on my
 innocence."
 
 Several witnesses were called, who had known her for many years, and
 they spoke well of her; but fear, and hatred of the crime of which they
 supposed her guilty, rendered them timorous, and unwilling to come
 forward. Elizabeth saw even this last resource, her excellent
 dispositions and irreproachable conduct, about to fail the accused,
 when, although violently agitated, she desired permission to address the
 court.
 
 "I am," said she, "the cousin of the unhappy child who was murdered, or
 rather his sister, for I was educated by and have lived with his parents
 ever since and even long before his birth. It may therefore be judged
 indecent in me to come forward on this occasion; but when I see a
 fellow-creature about to perish through the cowardice of her pretended
 friends, I wish to be allowed to speak, that I may say what I know of
 her character. I am well acquainted with the accused. I have lived in
 the same house with her, at one time for five, and at another for nearly
 two years. During all that period she appeared to me the most amiable
 and benevolent of human creatures. She nursed Madame Frankenstein, my
 aunt, in her last illness with the greatest affection and care; and
 afterwards attended her own mother during a tedious illness, in a manner
 that excited the admiration of all who knew her. After which she again
 lived in my uncle's house, where she was beloved by all the family. She
 was warmly attached to the child who is now dead, and acted towards him
 like a most affectionate mother. For my own part, I do not hesitate to
 say, that, notwithstanding all the evidence produced against her, I
 believe and rely on her perfect innocence. She had no temptation for
 such an action: as to the bauble on which the chief proof rests, if she
 had earnestly desired it, I should have willingly given it to her; so
 much do I esteem and value her."
 
 Excellent Elizabeth! A murmur of approbation was heard; but it was
 excited by her generous interference, and not in favour of poor Justine,
 on whom the public indignation was turned with renewed violence,
 charging her with the blackest ingratitude. She herself wept as
 Elizabeth spoke, but she did not answer. My own agitation and anguish
 was extreme during the whole trial. I believed in her innocence; I knew
 it. Could the daemon, who had (I did not for a minute doubt) murdered my
 brother, also in his hellish sport have betrayed the innocent to death
 and ignominy. I could not sustain the horror of my situation; and when I
 perceived that the popular voice, and the countenances of the judges,
 had already condemned my unhappy victim, I rushed out of the court in
 agony. The tortures of the accused did not equal mine; she was sustained
 by innocence, but the fangs of remorse tore my bosom, and would not
 forego their hold.
 
 I passed a night of unmingled wretchedness. In the morning I went to the
 court; my lips and throat were parched. I dared not ask the fatal
 question; but I was known, and the officer guessed the cause of my
 visit. The ballots had been thrown; they were all black, and Justine was
 condemned.
 
 I cannot pretend to describe what I then felt. I had before experienced
 sensations of horror; and I have endeavoured to bestow upon them
 adequate expressions, but words cannot convey an idea of the
 heart-sickening despair that I then endured. The person to whom I
 addressed myself added, that Justine had already confessed her guilt.
 "That evidence," he observed, "was hardly required in so glaring a case,
 but I am glad of it; and, indeed, none of our judges like to condemn a
 criminal upon circumstantial evidence, be it ever so decisive."
 
 When I returned home, Elizabeth eagerly demanded the result.
 
 "My cousin," replied I, "it is decided as you may have expected; all
 judges had rather that ten innocent should suffer, than that one guilty
 should escape. But she has confessed."
 
 This was a dire blow to poor Elizabeth, who had relied with firmness
 upon Justine's innocence. "Alas!" said she, "how shall I ever again
 believe in human benevolence? Justine, whom I loved and esteemed as my
 sister, how could she put on those smiles of innocence only to betray;
 her mild eyes seemed incapable of any severity or ill-humour, and yet
 she has committed a murder."
 
 Soon after we heard that the poor victim had expressed a wish to see my
 cousin. My father wished her not to go; but said, that he left it to her
 own judgment and feelings to decide. "Yes," said Elizabeth, "I will go,
 although she is guilty; and you, Victor, shall accompany me: I cannot go
 alone." The idea of this visit was torture to me, yet I could not
 refuse.
 
 We entered the gloomy prison-chamber, and beheld Justine sitting on some
 straw at the further end; her hands were manacled, and her head rested
 on her knees. She rose on seeing us enter; and when we were left alone
 with her, she threw herself at the feet of Elizabeth, weeping bitterly.
 My cousin wept also.
 
 "Oh, Justine!" said she, "why did you rob me of my last consolation. I
 relied on your innocence; and although I was then very wretched, I was
 not so miserable as I am now."
 
 "And do you also believe that I am so very, very wicked? Do you also
 join with my enemies to crush me?" Her voice was suffocated with sobs.
 
 "Rise, my poor girl," said Elizabeth, "why do you kneel, if you are
 innocent? I am not one of your enemies; I believed you guiltless,
 notwithstanding every evidence, until I heard that you had yourself
 declared your guilt. That report, you say, is false; and be assured,
 dear Justine, that nothing can shake my confidence in you for a moment,
 but your own confession."
 
 "I did confess; but I confessed a lie. I confessed, that I might obtain
 absolution; but now that falsehood lies heavier at my heart than all my
 other sins. The God of heaven forgive me! Ever since I was condemned, my
 confessor has besieged me; he threatened and menaced, until I almost
 began to think that I was the monster that he said I was. He threatened
 excommunication and hell fire in my last moments, if I continued
 obdurate. Dear lady, I had none to support me; all looked on me as a
 wretch doomed to ignominy and perdition. What could I do? In an evil
 hour I subscribed to a lie; and now only am I truly miserable."
 
 She paused, weeping, and then continued--"I thought with horror, my
 sweet lady, that you should believe your Justine, whom your blessed aunt
 had so highly honoured, and whom you loved, was a creature capable of a
 crime which none but the devil himself could have perpetrated. Dear
 William! dearest blessed child! I soon shall see you again in heaven,
 where we shall all be happy; and that consoles me, going as I am to
 suffer ignominy and death."
 
 "Oh, Justine! forgive me for having for one moment distrusted you. Why
 did you confess? But do not mourn, my dear girl; I will every where
 proclaim your innocence, and force belief. Yet you must die; you, my
 playfellow, my companion, my more than sister. I never can survive so
 horrible a misfortune."
 
 "Dear, sweet Elizabeth, do not weep. You ought to raise me with thoughts
 of a better life, and elevate me from the petty cares of this world of
 injustice and strife. Do not you, excellent friend, drive me to
 despair."
 
 "I will try to comfort you; but this, I fear, is an evil too deep and
 poignant to admit of consolation, for there is no hope. Yet heaven
 bless thee, my dearest Justine, with resignation, and a confidence
 elevated beyond this world. Oh! how I hate its shews and mockeries! when
 one creature is murdered, another is immediately deprived of life in a
 slow torturing manner; then the executioners, their hands yet reeking
 with the blood of innocence, believe that they have done a great deed.
 They call this _retribution_. Hateful name! When that word is
 pronounced, I know greater and more horrid punishments are going to be
 inflicted than the gloomiest tyrant has ever invented to satiate his
 utmost revenge. Yet this is not consolation for you, my Justine, unless
 indeed that you may glory in escaping from so miserable a den. Alas! I
 would I were in peace with my aunt and my lovely William, escaped from a
 world which is hateful to me, and the visages of men which I abhor."
 
 Justine smiled languidly. "This, dear lady, is despair, and not
 resignation. I must not learn the lesson that you would teach me. Talk
 of something else, something that will bring peace, and not increase of
 misery."
 
 During this conversation I had retired to a corner of the prison-room,
 where I could conceal the horrid anguish that possessed me. Despair! Who
 dared talk of that? The poor victim, who on the morrow was to pass the
 dreary boundary between life and death, felt not as I did, such deep and
 bitter agony. I gnashed my teeth, and ground them together, uttering a
 groan that came from my inmost soul. Justine started. When she saw who
 it was, she approached me, and said, "Dear Sir, you are very kind to
 visit me; you, I hope, do not believe that I am guilty."
 
 I could not answer. "No, Justine," said Elizabeth; "he is more convinced
 of your innocence than I was; for even when he heard that you had
 confessed, he did not credit it."
 
 "I truly thank him. In these last moments I feel the sincerest gratitude
 towards those who think of me with kindness. How sweet is the affection
 of others to such a wretch as I am! It removes more than half my
 misfortune; and I feel as if I could die in peace, now that my innocence
 is acknowledged by you, dear lady, and your cousin."
 
 Thus the poor sufferer tried to comfort others and herself. She indeed
 gained the resignation she desired. But I, the true murderer, felt the
 never-dying worm alive in my bosom, which allowed of no hope or
 consolation. Elizabeth also wept, and was unhappy; but her's also was
 the misery of innocence, which, like a cloud that passes over the fair
 moon, for a while hides, but cannot tarnish its brightness. Anguish and
 despair had penetrated into the core of my heart; I bore a hell within
 me, which nothing could extinguish. We staid several hours with Justine;
 and it was with great difficulty that Elizabeth could tear herself away.
 "I wish," cried she, "that I were to die with you; I cannot live in this
 world of misery."
 
 Justine assumed an air of cheerfulness, while she with difficulty
 repressed her bitter tears. She embraced Elizabeth, and said, in a voice
 of half-suppressed emotion, "Farewell, sweet lady, dearest Elizabeth, my
 beloved and only friend; may heaven in its bounty bless and preserve
 you; may this be the last misfortune that you will ever suffer. Live,
 and be happy, and make others so."
 
 As we returned, Elizabeth said, "You know not, my dear Victor, how much
 I am relieved, now that I trust in the innocence of this unfortunate
 girl. I never could again have known peace, if I had been deceived in my
 reliance on her. For the moment that I did believe her guilty, I felt an
 anguish that I could not have long sustained. Now my heart is lightened.
 The innocent suffers; but she whom I thought amiable and good has not
 betrayed the trust I reposed in her, and I am consoled."
 
 Amiable cousin! such were your thoughts, mild and gentle as your own
 dear eyes and voice. But I--I was a wretch, and none ever conceived of
 the misery that I then endured.
 
 
 END OF VOL. I.
 
 
 
 
 FRANKENSTEIN;
 
 OR,
 
 THE MODERN PROMETHEUS.
 
 
     IN THREE VOLUMES.
     VOL. II.
 
     London:
 
     _PRINTED FOR_
     LACKINGTON, HUGHES, HARDING, MAVOR, & JONES,
     FINSBURY SQUARE.
 
     1818.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
     Did I request thee, Maker, from my clay
     To mould me man? Did I solicit thee
     From darkness to promote me?----
 
     Paradise Lost.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 Nothing is more painful to the human mind, than, after the feelings have
 been worked up by a quick succession of events, the dead calmness of
 inaction and certainty which follows, and deprives the soul both of hope
 and fear. Justine died; she rested; and I was alive. The blood flowed
 freely in my veins, but a weight of despair and remorse pressed on my
 heart, which nothing could remove. Sleep fled from my eyes; I wandered
 like an evil spirit, for I had committed deeds of mischief beyond
 description horrible, and more, much more, (I persuaded myself) was yet
 behind. Yet my heart overflowed with kindness, and the love of virtue. I
 had begun life with benevolent intentions, and thirsted for the moment
 when I should put them in practice, and make myself useful to my
 fellow-beings. Now all was blasted: instead of that serenity of
 conscience, which allowed me to look back upon the past with
 self-satisfaction, and from thence to gather promise of new hopes, I
 was seized by remorse and the sense of guilt, which hurried me away to
 a hell of intense tortures, such as no language can describe.
 
 This state of mind preyed upon my health, which had entirely recovered
 from the first shock it had sustained. I shunned the face of man; all
 sound of joy or complacency was torture to me; solitude was my only
 consolation--deep, dark, death-like solitude.
 
 My father observed with pain the alteration perceptible in my
 disposition and habits, and endeavoured to reason with me on the folly
 of giving way to immoderate grief. "Do you think, Victor," said he,
 "that I do not suffer also? No one could love a child more than I loved
 your brother;" (tears came into his eyes as he spoke); "but is it not a
 duty to the survivors, that we should refrain from augmenting their
 unhappiness by an appearance of immoderate grief? It is also a duty owed
 to yourself; for excessive sorrow prevents improvement or enjoyment, or
 even the discharge of daily usefulness, without which no man is fit for
 society."
 
 This advice, although good, was totally inapplicable to my case; I
 should have been the first to hide my grief, and console my friends, if
 remorse had not mingled its bitterness with my other sensations. Now I
 could only answer my father with a look of despair, and endeavour to
 hide myself from his view.
 
 About this time we retired to our house at Belrive. This change was
 particularly agreeable to me. The shutting of the gates regularly at ten
 o'clock, and the impossibility of remaining on the lake after that
 hour, had rendered our residence within the walls of Geneva very irksome
 to me. I was now free. Often, after the rest of the family had retired
 for the night, I took the boat, and passed many hours upon the water.
 Sometimes, with my sails set, I was carried by the wind; and sometimes,
 after rowing into the middle of the lake, I left the boat to pursue its
 own course, and gave way to my own miserable reflections. I was often
 tempted, when all was at peace around me, and I the only unquiet thing
 that wandered restless in a scene so beautiful and heavenly, if I except
 some bat, or the frogs, whose harsh and interrupted croaking was heard
 only when I approached the shore--often, I say, I was tempted to plunge
 into the silent lake, that the waters might close over me and my
 calamities for ever. But I was restrained, when I thought of the heroic
 and suffering Elizabeth, whom I tenderly loved, and whose existence was
 bound up in mine. I thought also of my father, and surviving brother:
 should I by my base desertion leave them exposed and unprotected to the
 malice of the fiend whom I had let loose among them?
 
 At these moments I wept bitterly, and wished that peace would revisit my
 mind only that I might afford them consolation and happiness. But that
 could not be. Remorse extinguished every hope. I had been the author of
 unalterable evils; and I lived in daily fear, lest the monster whom I
 had created should perpetrate some new wickedness. I had an obscure
 feeling that all was not over, and that he would still commit some
 signal crime, which by its enormity should almost efface the
 recollection of the past. There was always scope for fear, so long as
 any thing I loved remained behind. My abhorrence of this fiend cannot be
 conceived. When I thought of him, I gnashed my teeth, my eyes became
 inflamed, and I ardently wished to extinguish that life which I had so
 thoughtlessly bestowed. When I reflected on his crimes and malice, my
 hatred and revenge burst all bounds of moderation. I would have made a
 pilgrimage to the highest peak of the Andes, could I, when there, have
 precipitated him to their base. I wished to see him again, that I might
 wreak the utmost extent of anger on his head, and avenge the deaths of
 William and Justine.
 
 Our house was the house of mourning. My father's health was deeply
 shaken by the horror of the recent events. Elizabeth was sad and
 desponding; she no longer took delight in her ordinary occupations; all
 pleasure seemed to her sacrilege toward the dead; eternal woe and tears
 she then thought was the just tribute she should pay to innocence so
 blasted and destroyed. She was no longer that happy creature, who in
 earlier youth wandered with me on the banks of the lake, and talked with
 ecstacy of our future prospects. She had become grave, and often
 conversed of the inconstancy of fortune, and the instability of human
 life.
 
 "When I reflect, my dear cousin," said she, "on the miserable death of
 Justine Moritz, I no longer see the world and its works as they before
 appeared to me. Before, I looked upon the accounts of vice and
 injustice, that I read in books or heard from others, as tales of
 ancient days, or imaginary evils; at least they were remote, and more
 familiar to reason than to the imagination; but now misery has come
 home, and men appear to me as monsters thirsting for each other's blood.
 Yet I am certainly unjust. Every body believed that poor girl to be
 guilty; and if she could have committed the crime for which she
 suffered, assuredly she would have been the most depraved of human
 creatures. For the sake of a few jewels, to have murdered the son of her
 benefactor and friend, a child whom she had nursed from its birth, and
 appeared to love as if it had been her own! I could not consent to the
 death of any human being; but certainly I should have thought such a
 creature unfit to remain in the society of men. Yet she was innocent. I
 know, I feel she was innocent; you are of the same opinion, and that
 confirms me. Alas! Victor, when falsehood can look so like the truth,
 who can assure themselves of certain happiness? I feel as if I were
 walking on the edge of a precipice, towards which thousands are
 crowding, and endeavouring to plunge me into the abyss. William and
 Justine were assassinated, and the murderer escapes; he walks about the
 world free, and perhaps respected. But even if I were condemned to
 suffer on the scaffold for the same crimes, I would not change places
 with such a wretch."
 
 I listened to this discourse with the extremest agony. I, not in deed,
 but in effect, was the true murderer. Elizabeth read my anguish in my
 countenance, and kindly taking my hand said, "My dearest cousin, you
 must calm yourself. These events have affected me, God knows how deeply;
 but I am not so wretched as you are. There is an expression of despair,
 and sometimes of revenge, in your countenance, that makes me tremble. Be
 calm, my dear Victor; I would sacrifice my life to your peace. We surely
 shall be happy: quiet in our native country, and not mingling in the
 world, what can disturb our tranquillity?"
 
 She shed tears as she said this, distrusting the very solace that she
 gave; but at the same time she smiled, that she might chase away the
 fiend that lurked in my heart. My father, who saw in the unhappiness
 that was painted in my face only an exaggeration of that sorrow which I
 might naturally feel, thought that an amusement suited to my taste would
 be the best means of restoring to me my wonted serenity. It was from
 this cause that he had removed to the country; and, induced by the same
 motive, he now proposed that we should all make an excursion to the
 valley of Chamounix. I had been there before, but Elizabeth and Ernest
 never had; and both had often expressed an earnest desire to see the
 scenery of this place, which had been described to them as so wonderful
 and sublime. Accordingly we departed from Geneva on this tour about the
 middle of the month of August, nearly two months after the death of
 Justine.
 
 The weather was uncommonly fine; and if mine had been a sorrow to be
 chased away by any fleeting circumstance, this excursion would certainly
 have had the effect intended by my father. As it was, I was somewhat
 interested in the scene; it sometimes lulled, although it could not
 extinguish my grief. During the first day we travelled in a carriage. In
 the morning we had seen the mountains at a distance, towards which we
 gradually advanced. We perceived that the valley through which we wound,
 and which was formed by the river Arve, whose course we followed, closed
 in upon us by degrees; and when the sun had set, we beheld immense
 mountains and precipices overhanging us on every side, and heard the
 sound of the river raging among rocks, and the dashing of water-falls
 around.
 
 The next day we pursued our journey upon mules; and as we ascended still
 higher, the valley assumed a more magnificent and astonishing character.
 Ruined castles hanging on the precipices of piny mountains; the
 impetuous Arve, and cottages every here and there peeping forth from
 among the trees, formed a scene of singular beauty. But it was augmented
 and rendered sublime by the mighty Alps, whose white and shining
 pyramids and domes towered above all, as belonging to another earth, the
 habitations of another race of beings.
 
 We passed the bridge of Pelissier, where the ravine, which the river
 forms, opened before us, and we began to ascend the mountain that
 overhangs it. Soon after we entered the valley of Chamounix. This valley
 is more wonderful and sublime, but not so beautiful and picturesque as
 that of Servox, through which we had just passed. The high and snowy
 mountains were its immediate boundaries; but we saw no more ruined
 castles and fertile fields. Immense glaciers approached the road; we
 heard the rumbling thunder of the falling avalanche, and marked the
 smoke of its passage. Mont Blanc, the supreme and magnificent Mont
 Blanc, raised itself from the surrounding _aiguilles_, and its
 tremendous _dome_ overlooked the valley.
 
 During this journey, I sometimes joined Elizabeth, and exerted myself to
 point out to her the various beauties of the scene. I often suffered my
 mule to lag behind, and indulged in the misery of reflection. At other
 times I spurred on the animal before my companions, that I might forget
 them, the world, and, more than all, myself. When at a distance, I
 alighted, and threw myself on the grass, weighed down by horror and
 despair. At eight in the evening I arrived at Chamounix. My father and
 Elizabeth were very much fatigued; Ernest, who accompanied us, was
 delighted, and in high spirits: the only circumstance that detracted
 from his pleasure was the south wind, and the rain it seemed to promise
 for the next day.
 
 We retired early to our apartments, but not to sleep; at least I did
 not. I remained many hours at the window, watching the pallid lightning
 that played above Mont Blanc, and listening to the rushing of the Arve,
 which ran below my window.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 The next day, contrary to the prognostications of our guides, was fine,
 although clouded. We visited the source of the Arveiron, and rode about
 the valley until evening. These sublime and magnificent scenes afforded
 me the greatest consolation that I was capable of receiving. They
 elevated me from all littleness of feeling; and although they did not
 remove my grief, they subdued and tranquillized it. In some degree,
 also, they diverted my mind from the thoughts over which it had brooded
 for the last month. I returned in the evening, fatigued, but less
 unhappy, and conversed with my family with more cheerfulness than had
 been my custom for some time. My father was pleased, and Elizabeth
 overjoyed. "My dear cousin," said she, "you see what happiness you
 diffuse when you are happy; do not relapse again!"
 
 The following morning the rain poured down in torrents, and thick mists
 hid the summits of the mountains. I rose early, but felt unusually
 melancholy. The rain depressed me; my old feelings recurred, and I was
 miserable. I knew how disappointed my father would be at this sudden
 change, and I wished to avoid him until I had recovered myself so far as
 to be enabled to conceal those feelings that overpowered me. I knew
 that they would remain that day at the inn; and as I had ever inured
 myself to rain, moisture, and cold, I resolved to go alone to the summit
 of Montanvert. I remembered the effect that the view of the tremendous
 and ever-moving glacier had produced upon my mind when I first saw it.
 It had then filled me with a sublime ecstacy that gave wings to the
 soul, and allowed it to soar from the obscure world to light and joy.
 The sight of the awful and majestic in nature had indeed always the
 effect of solemnizing my mind, and causing me to forget the passing
 cares of life. I determined to go alone, for I was well acquainted with
 the path, and the presence of another would destroy the solitary
 grandeur of the scene.
 
 The ascent is precipitous, but the path is cut into continual and short
 windings, which enable you to surmount the perpendicularity of the
 mountain. It is a scene terrifically desolate. In a thousand spots the
 traces of the winter avalanche may be perceived, where trees lie broken
 and strewed on the ground; some entirely destroyed, others bent, leaning
 upon the jutting rocks of the mountain, or transversely upon other
 trees. The path, as you ascend higher, is intersected by ravines of
 snow, down which stones continually roll from above; one of them is
 particularly dangerous, as the slightest sound, such as even speaking in
 a loud voice, produces a concussion of air sufficient to draw
 destruction upon the head of the speaker. The pines are not tall or
 luxuriant, but they are sombre, and add an air of severity to the scene.
 I looked on the valley beneath; vast mists were rising from the rivers
 which ran through it, and curling in thick wreaths around the opposite
 mountains, whose summits were hid in the uniform clouds, while rain
 poured from the dark sky, and added to the melancholy impression I
 received from the objects around me. Alas! why does man boast of
 sensibilities superior to those apparent in the brute; it only renders
 them more necessary beings. If our impulses were confined to hunger,
 thirst, and desire, we might be nearly free; but now we are moved by
 every wind that blows, and a chance word or scene that that word may
 convey to us.
 
     We rest; a dream has power to poison sleep.
       We rise; one wand'ring thought pollutes the day.
     We feel, conceive, or reason; laugh, or weep,
       Embrace fond woe, or cast our cares away;
     It is the same: for, be it joy or sorrow,
       The path of its departure still is free.
     Man's yesterday may ne'er be like his morrow;
       Nought may endure but mutability!
 
 It was nearly noon when I arrived at the top of the ascent. For some
 time I sat upon the rock that overlooks the sea of ice. A mist covered
 both that and the surrounding mountains. Presently a breeze dissipated
 the cloud, and I descended upon the glacier. The surface is very uneven,
 rising like the waves of a troubled sea, descending low, and
 interspersed by rifts that sink deep. The field of ice is almost a
 league in width, but I spent nearly two hours in crossing it. The
 opposite mountain is a bare perpendicular rock. From the side where I
 now stood Montanvert was exactly opposite, at the distance of a league;
 and above it rose Mont Blanc, in awful majesty. I remained in a recess
 of the rock, gazing on this wonderful and stupendous scene. The sea, or
 rather the vast river of ice, wound among its dependent mountains, whose
 aerial summits hung over its recesses. Their icy and glittering peaks
 shone in the sunlight over the clouds. My heart, which was before
 sorrowful, now swelled with something like joy; I exclaimed--"Wandering
 spirits, if indeed ye wander, and do not rest in your narrow beds, allow
 me this faint happiness, or take me, as your companion, away from the
 joys of life."
 
 As I said this, I suddenly beheld the figure of a man, at some distance,
 advancing towards me with superhuman speed. He bounded over the crevices
 in the ice, among which I had walked with caution; his stature also, as
 he approached, seemed to exceed that of man. I was troubled: a mist came
 over my eyes, and I felt a faintness seize me; but I was quickly
 restored by the cold gale of the mountains. I perceived, as the shape
 came nearer, (sight tremendous and abhorred!) that it was the wretch
 whom I had created. I trembled with rage and horror, resolving to wait
 his approach, and then close with him in mortal combat. He approached;
 his countenance bespoke bitter anguish, combined with disdain and
 malignity, while its unearthly ugliness rendered it almost too horrible
 for human eyes. But I scarcely observed this; anger and hatred had at
 first deprived me of utterance, and I recovered only to overwhelm him
 with words expressive of furious detestation and contempt.
 
 "Devil!" I exclaimed, "do you dare approach me? and do not you fear the
 fierce vengeance of my arm wreaked on your miserable head? Begone, vile
 insect! or rather stay, that I may trample you to dust! and, oh, that I
 could, with the extinction of your miserable existence, restore those
 victims whom you have so diabolically murdered!"
 
 "I expected this reception," said the daemon. "All men hate the wretched;
 how then must I be hated, who am miserable beyond all living things! Yet
 you, my creator, detest and spurn me, thy creature, to whom thou art
 bound by ties only dissoluble by the annihilation of one of us. You
 purpose to kill me. How dare you sport thus with life? Do your duty
 towards me, and I will do mine towards you and the rest of mankind. If
 you will comply with my conditions, I will leave them and you at peace;
 but if you refuse, I will glut the maw of death, until it be satiated
 with the blood of your remaining friends."
 
 "Abhorred monster! fiend that thou art! the tortures of hell are too
 mild a vengeance for thy crimes. Wretched devil! you reproach me with
 your creation; come on then, that I may extinguish the spark which I so
 negligently bestowed."
 
 My rage was without bounds; I sprang on him, impelled by all the
 feelings which can arm one being against the existence of another.
 
 He easily eluded me, and said,
 
 "Be calm! I entreat you to hear me, before you give vent to your hatred
 on my devoted head. Have I not suffered enough, that you seek to
 increase my misery? Life, although it may only be an accumulation of
 anguish, is dear to me, and I will defend it. Remember, thou hast made
 me more powerful than thyself; my height is superior to thine; my joints
 more supple. But I will not be tempted to set myself in opposition to
 thee. I am thy creature, and I will be even mild and docile to my
 natural lord and king, if thou wilt also perform thy part, the which
 thou owest me. Oh, Frankenstein, be not equitable to every other, and
 trample upon me alone, to whom thy justice, and even thy clemency and
 affection, is most due. Remember, that I am thy creature: I ought to be
 thy Adam; but I am rather the fallen angel, whom thou drivest from joy
 for no misdeed. Every where I see bliss, from which I alone am
 irrevocably excluded. I was benevolent and good; misery made me a fiend.
 Make me happy, and I shall again be virtuous."
 
 "Begone! I will not hear you. There can be no community between you and
 me; we are enemies. Begone, or let us try our strength in a fight, in
 which one must fall."
 
 "How can I move thee? Will no entreaties cause thee to turn a favourable
 eye upon thy creature, who implores thy goodness and compassion? Believe
 me, Frankenstein: I was benevolent; my soul glowed with love and
 humanity: but am I not alone, miserably alone? You, my creator, abhor
 me; what hope can I gather from your fellow-creatures, who owe me
 nothing? they spurn and hate me. The desert mountains and dreary
 glaciers are my refuge. I have wandered here many days; the caves of
 ice, which I only do not fear, are a dwelling to me, and the only one
 which man does not grudge. These bleak skies I hail, for they are kinder
 to me than your fellow-beings. If the multitude of mankind knew of my
 existence, they would do as you do, and arm themselves for my
 destruction. Shall I not then hate them who abhor me? I will keep no
 terms with my enemies. I am miserable, and they shall share my
 wretchedness. Yet it is in your power to recompense me, and deliver them
 from an evil which it only remains for you to make so great, that not
 only you and your family, but thousands of others, shall be swallowed
 up in the whirlwinds of its rage. Let your compassion be moved, and do
 not disdain me. Listen to my tale: when you have heard that, abandon or
 commiserate me, as you shall judge that I deserve. But hear me. The
 guilty are allowed, by human laws, bloody as they may be, to speak in
 their own defence before they are condemned. Listen to me, Frankenstein.
 You accuse me of murder; and yet you would, with a satisfied conscience,
 destroy your own creature. Oh, praise the eternal justice of man! Yet I
 ask you not to spare me: listen to me; and then, if you can, and if you
 will, destroy the work of your hands."
 
 "Why do you call to my remembrance circumstances of which I shudder to
 reflect, that I have been the miserable origin and author? Cursed be the
 day, abhorred devil, in which you first saw light! Cursed (although I
 curse myself) be the hands that formed you! You have made me wretched
 beyond expression. You have left me no power to consider whether I am
 just to you, or not. Begone! relieve me from the sight of your detested
 form."
 
 "Thus I relieve thee, my creator," he said, and placed his hated hands
 before my eyes, which I flung from me with violence; "thus I take from
 thee a sight which you abhor. Still thou canst listen to me, and grant
 me thy compassion. By the virtues that I once possessed, I demand this
 from you. Hear my tale; it is long and strange, and the temperature of
 this place is not fitting to your fine sensations; come to the hut upon
 the mountain. The sun is yet high in the heavens; before it descends to
 hide itself behind yon snowy precipices, and illuminate another world,
 you will have heard my story, and can decide. On you it rests, whether I
 quit for ever the neighbourhood of man, and lead a harmless life, or
 become the scourge of your fellow-creatures, and the author of your own
 speedy ruin."
 
 As he said this, he led the way across the ice: I followed. My heart was
 full, and I did not answer him; but, as I proceeded, I weighed the
 various arguments that he had used, and determined at least to listen to
 his tale. I was partly urged by curiosity, and compassion confirmed my
 resolution. I had hitherto supposed him to be the murderer of my
 brother, and I eagerly sought a confirmation or denial of this opinion.
 For the first time, also, I felt what the duties of a creator towards
 his creature were, and that I ought to render him happy before I
 complained of his wickedness. These motives urged me to comply with his
 demand. We crossed the ice, therefore, and ascended the opposite rock.
 The air was cold, and the rain again began to descend: we entered the
 hut, the fiend with an air of exultation, I with a heavy heart, and
 depressed spirits. But I consented to listen; and, seating myself by the
 fire which my odious companion had lighted, he thus began his tale.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 "It is with considerable difficulty that I remember the original aera of
 my being: all the events of that period appear confused and indistinct.
 A strange multiplicity of sensations seized me, and I saw, felt, heard,
 and smelt, at the same time; and it was, indeed, a long time before I
 learned to distinguish between the operations of my various senses. By
 degrees, I remember, a stronger light pressed upon my nerves, so that I
 was obliged to shut my eyes. Darkness then came over me, and troubled
 me; but hardly had I felt this, when, by opening my eyes, as I now
 suppose, the light poured in upon me again. I walked, and, I believe,
 descended; but I presently found a great alteration in my sensations.
 Before, dark and opaque bodies had surrounded me, impervious to my touch
 or sight; but I now found that I could wander on at liberty, with no
 obstacles which I could not either surmount or avoid. The light became
 more and more oppressive to me; and, the heat wearying me as I walked, I
 sought a place where I could receive shade. This was the forest near
 Ingolstadt; and here I lay by the side of a brook resting from my
 fatigue, until I felt tormented by hunger and thirst. This roused me
 from my nearly dormant state, and I ate some berries which I found
 hanging on the trees, or lying on the ground. I slaked my thirst at the
 brook; and then lying down, was overcome by sleep.
 
 "It was dark when I awoke; I felt cold also, and half-frightened as it
 were instinctively, finding myself so desolate. Before I had quitted
 your apartment, on a sensation of cold, I had covered myself with some
 clothes; but these were insufficient to secure me from the dews of
 night. I was a poor, helpless, miserable wretch; I knew, and could
 distinguish, nothing; but, feeling pain invade me on all sides, I sat
 down and wept.
 
 "Soon a gentle light stole over the heavens, and gave me a sensation of
 pleasure. I started up, and beheld a radiant form rise from among the
 trees. I gazed with a kind of wonder. It moved slowly, but it
 enlightened my path; and I again went out in search of berries. I was
 still cold, when under one of the trees I found a huge cloak, with which
 I covered myself, and sat down upon the ground. No distinct ideas
 occupied my mind; all was confused. I felt light, and hunger, and
 thirst, and darkness; innumerable sounds rung in my ears, and on all
 sides various scents saluted me: the only object that I could
 distinguish was the bright moon, and I fixed my eyes on that with
 pleasure.
 
 "Several changes of day and night passed, and the orb of night had
 greatly lessened when I began to distinguish my sensations from each
 other. I gradually saw plainly the clear stream that supplied me with
 drink, and the trees that shaded me with their foliage. I was delighted
 when I first discovered that a pleasant sound, which often saluted my
 ears, proceeded from the throats of the little winged animals who had
 often intercepted the light from my eyes. I began also to observe, with
 greater accuracy, the forms that surrounded me, and to perceive the
 boundaries of the radiant roof of light which canopied me. Sometimes I
 tried to imitate the pleasant songs of the birds, but was unable.
 Sometimes I wished to express my sensations in my own mode, but the
 uncouth and inarticulate sounds which broke from me frightened me into
 silence again.
 
 "The moon had disappeared from the night, and again, with a lessened
 form, shewed itself, while I still remained in the forest. My sensations
 had, by this time, become distinct, and my mind received every day
 additional ideas. My eyes became accustomed to the light, and to
 perceive objects in their right forms; I distinguished the insect from
 the herb, and, by degrees, one herb from another. I found that the
 sparrow uttered none but harsh notes, whilst those of the blackbird and
 thrush were sweet and enticing.
 
 "One day, when I was oppressed by cold, I found a fire which had been
 left by some wandering beggars, and was overcome with delight at the
 warmth I experienced from it. In my joy I thrust my hand into the live
 embers, but quickly drew it out again with a cry of pain. How strange, I
 thought, that the same cause should produce such opposite effects! I
 examined the materials of the fire, and to my joy found it to be
 composed of wood. I quickly collected some branches; but they were wet,
 and would not burn. I was pained at this, and sat still watching the
 operation of the fire. The wet wood which I had placed near the heat
 dried, and itself became inflamed. I reflected on this; and, by touching
 the various branches, I discovered the cause, and busied myself in
 collecting a great quantity of wood, that I might dry it, and have a
 plentiful supply of fire. When night came on, and brought sleep with it,
 I was in the greatest fear lest my fire should be extinguished. I
 covered it carefully with dry wood and leaves, and placed wet branches
 upon it; and then, spreading my cloak, I lay on the ground, and sunk
 into sleep.
 
 "It was morning when I awoke, and my first care was to visit the fire. I
 uncovered it, and a gentle breeze quickly fanned it into a flame. I
 observed this also, and contrived a fan of branches, which roused the
 embers when they were nearly extinguished. When night came again, I
 found, with pleasure, that the fire gave light as well as heat; and that
 the discovery of this element was useful to me in my food; for I found
 some of the offals that the travellers had left had been roasted, and
 tasted much more savoury than the berries I gathered from the trees. I
 tried, therefore, to dress my food in the same manner, placing it on the
 live embers. I found that the berries were spoiled by this operation,
 and the nuts and roots much improved.
 
 "Food, however, became scarce; and I often spent the whole day searching
 in vain for a few acorns to assuage the pangs of hunger. When I found
 this, I resolved to quit the place that I had hitherto inhabited, to
 seek for one where the few wants I experienced would be more easily
 satisfied. In this emigration, I exceedingly lamented the loss of the
 fire which I had obtained through accident, and knew not how to
 re-produce it. I gave several hours to the serious consideration of
 this difficulty; but I was obliged to relinquish all attempt to supply
 it; and, wrapping myself up in my cloak, I struck across the wood
 towards the setting sun. I passed three days in these rambles, and at
 length discovered the open country. A great fall of snow had taken place
 the night before, and the fields were of one uniform white; the
 appearance was disconsolate, and I found my feet chilled by the cold
 damp substance that covered the ground.
 
 "It was about seven in the morning, and I longed to obtain food and
 shelter; at length I perceived a small hut, on a rising ground, which
 had doubtless been built for the convenience of some shepherd. This was
 a new sight to me; and I examined the structure with great curiosity.
 Finding the door open, I entered. An old man sat in it, near a fire,
 over which he was preparing his breakfast. He turned on hearing a noise;
 and, perceiving me, shrieked loudly, and, quitting the hut, ran across
 the fields with a speed of which his debilitated form hardly appeared
 capable. His appearance, different from any I had ever before seen, and
 his flight, somewhat surprised me. But I was enchanted by the appearance
 of the hut: here the snow and rain could not penetrate; the ground was
 dry; and it presented to me then as exquisite and divine a retreat as
 Pandaemonium appeared to the daemons of hell after their sufferings in the
 lake of fire. I greedily devoured the remnants of the shepherd's
 breakfast, which consisted of bread, cheese, milk, and wine; the
 latter, however, I did not like. Then overcome by fatigue, I lay down
 among some straw, and fell asleep.
 
 "It was noon when I awoke; and, allured by the warmth of the sun, which
 shone brightly on the white ground, I determined to recommence my
 travels; and, depositing the remains of the peasant's breakfast in a
 wallet I found, I proceeded across the fields for several hours, until
 at sunset I arrived at a village. How miraculous did this appear! the
 huts, the neater cottages, and stately houses, engaged my admiration by
 turns. The vegetables in the gardens, the milk and cheese that I saw
 placed at the windows of some of the cottages, allured my appetite. One
 of the best of these I entered; but I had hardly placed my foot within
 the door, before the children shrieked, and one of the women fainted.
 The whole village was roused; some fled, some attacked me, until,
 grievously bruised by stones and many other kinds of missile weapons, I
 escaped to the open country, and fearfully took refuge in a low hovel,
 quite bare, and making a wretched appearance after the palaces I had
 beheld in the village. This hovel, however, joined a cottage of a neat
 and pleasant appearance; but, after my late dearly-bought experience, I
 dared not enter it. My place of refuge was constructed of wood, but so
 low, that I could with difficulty sit upright in it. No wood, however,
 was placed on the earth, which formed the floor, but it was dry; and
 although the wind entered it by innumerable chinks, I found it an
 agreeable asylum from the snow and rain.
 
 "Here then I retreated, and lay down, happy to have found a shelter,
 however miserable, from the inclemency of the season, and still more
 from the barbarity of man.
 
 "As soon as morning dawned, I crept from my kennel, that I might view
 the adjacent cottage, and discover if I could remain in the habitation I
 had found. It was situated against, the back of the cottage, and
 surrounded on the sides which were exposed by a pig-stye and a clear
 pool of water. One part was open, and by that I had crept in; but now I
 covered every crevice by which I might be perceived with stones and
 wood, yet in such a manner that I might move them on occasion to pass
 out: all the light I enjoyed came through the stye, and that was
 sufficient for me.
 
 "Having thus arranged my dwelling, and carpeted it with clean straw, I
 retired; for I saw the figure of a man at a distance, and I remembered
 too well my treatment the night before, to trust myself in his power. I
 had first, however, provided for my sustenance for that day, by a loaf
 of coarse bread, which I purloined, and a cup with which I could drink,
 more conveniently than from my hand, of the pure water which flowed by
 my retreat. The floor was a little raised, so that it was kept perfectly
 dry, and by its vicinity to the chimney of the cottage it was tolerably
 warm.
 
 "Being thus provided, I resolved to reside in this hovel, until
 something should occur which might alter my determination. It was indeed
 a paradise, compared to the bleak forest, my former residence, the
 rain-dropping branches, and dank earth. I ate my breakfast with
 pleasure, and was about to remove a plank to procure myself a little
 water, when I heard a step, and, looking through a small chink, I beheld
 a young creature, with a pail on her head, passing before my hovel. The
 girl was young and of gentle demeanour, unlike what I have since found
 cottagers and farm-house servants to be. Yet she was meanly dressed, a
 coarse blue petticoat and a linen jacket being her only garb; her fair
 hair was plaited, but not adorned; she looked patient, yet sad. I lost
 sight of her; and in about a quarter of an hour she returned, bearing
 the pail, which was now partly filled with milk. As she walked along,
 seemingly incommoded by the burden, a young man met her, whose
 countenance expressed a deeper despondence. Uttering a few sounds with
 an air of melancholy, he took the pail from her head, and bore it to the
 cottage himself. She followed, and they disappeared. Presently I saw the
 young man again, with some tools in his hand, cross the field behind the
 cottage; and the girl was also busied, sometimes in the house, and
 sometimes in the yard.
 
 "On examining my dwelling, I found that one of the windows of the
 cottage had formerly occupied a part of it, but the panes had been
 filled up with wood. In one of these was a small and almost
 imperceptible chink, through which the eye could just penetrate. Through
 this crevice, a small room was visible, white-washed and clean, but very
 bare of furniture. In one corner, near a small fire, sat an old man,
 leaning his head on his hands in a disconsolate attitude. The young girl
 was occupied in arranging the cottage; but presently she took something
 out of a drawer, which employed her hands, and she sat down beside the
 old man, who, taking up an instrument, began to play, and to produce
 sounds, sweeter than the voice of the thrush or the nightingale. It was
 a lovely sight, even to me, poor wretch! who had never beheld aught
 beautiful before. The silver hair and benevolent countenance of the aged
 cottager, won my reverence; while the gentle manners of the girl enticed
 my love. He played a sweet mournful air, which I perceived drew tears
 from the eyes of his amiable companion, of which the old man took no
 notice, until she sobbed audibly; he then pronounced a few sounds, and
 the fair creature, leaving her work, knelt at his feet. He raised her,
 and smiled with such kindness and affection, that I felt sensations of a
 peculiar and over-powering nature: they were a mixture of pain and
 pleasure, such as I had never before experienced, either from hunger or
 cold, warmth or food; and I withdrew from the window, unable to bear
 these emotions.
 
 "Soon after this the young man returned, bearing on his shoulders a load
 of wood. The girl met him at the door, helped to relieve him of his
 burden, and, taking some of the fuel into the cottage, placed it on the
 fire; then she and the youth went apart into a nook of the cottage, and
 he shewed her a large loaf and a piece of cheese. She seemed pleased;
 and went into the garden for some roots and plants, which she placed in
 water, and then upon the fire. She afterwards continued her work, whilst
 the young man went into the garden, and appeared busily employed in
 digging and pulling up roots. After he had been employed thus about an
 hour, the young woman joined him, and they entered the cottage together.
 
 "The old man had, in the mean time, been pensive; but, on the appearance
 of his companions, he assumed a more cheerful air, and they sat down to
 eat. The meal was quickly dispatched. The young woman was again occupied
 in arranging the cottage; the old man walked before the cottage in the
 sun for a few minutes, leaning on the arm of the youth. Nothing could
 exceed in beauty the contrast between these two excellent creatures. One
 was old, with silver hairs and a countenance beaming with benevolence
 and love: the younger was slight and graceful in his figure, and his
 features were moulded with the finest symmetry; yet his eyes and
 attitude expressed the utmost sadness and despondency. The old man
 returned to the cottage; and the youth, with tools different from those
 he had used in the morning, directed his steps across the fields.
 
 "Night quickly shut in; but, to my extreme wonder, I found that the
 cottagers had a means of prolonging light, by the use of tapers, and was
 delighted to find, that the setting of the sun did not put an end to the
 pleasure I experienced in watching my human neighbours. In the evening,
 the young girl and her companion were employed in various occupations
 which I did not understand; and the old man again took up the
 instrument, which produced the divine sounds that had enchanted me in
 the morning. So soon as he had finished, the youth began, not to play,
 but to utter sounds that were monotonous, and neither resembling the
 harmony of the old man's instrument or the songs of the birds; I since
 found that he read aloud, but at that time I knew nothing of the science
 of words or letters.
 
 "The family, after having been thus occupied for a short time,
 extinguished their lights, and retired, as I conjectured, to rest."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 "I lay on my straw, but I could not sleep. I thought of the occurrences
 of the day. What chiefly struck me was the gentle manners of these
 people; and I longed to join them, but dared not. I remembered too well
 the treatment I had suffered the night before from the barbarous
 villagers, and resolved, whatever course of conduct I might hereafter
 think it right to pursue, that for the present I would remain quietly in
 my hovel, watching, and endeavouring to discover the motives which
 influenced their actions.
 
 "The cottagers arose the next morning before the sun. The young woman
 arranged the cottage, and prepared the food; and the youth departed
 after the first meal.
 
 "This day was passed in the same routine as that which preceded it. The
 young man was constantly employed out of doors, and the girl in various
 laborious occupations within. The old man, whom I soon perceived to be
 blind, employed his leisure hours on his instrument, or in
 contemplation. Nothing could exceed the love and respect which the
 younger cottagers exhibited towards their venerable companion. They
 performed towards him every little office of affection and duty with
 gentleness; and he rewarded them by his benevolent smiles.
 
 "They were not entirely happy. The young man and his companion often
 went apart, and appeared to weep. I saw no cause for their unhappiness;
 but I was deeply affected by it. If such lovely creatures were
 miserable, it was less strange that I, an imperfect and solitary being,
 should be wretched. Yet why were these gentle beings unhappy? They
 possessed a delightful house (for such it was in my eyes), and every
 luxury; they had a fire to warm them when chill, and delicious viands
 when hungry; they were dressed in excellent clothes; and, still more,
 they enjoyed one another's company and speech, interchanging each day
 looks of affection and kindness. What did their tears imply? Did they
 really express pain? I was at first unable to solve these questions; but
 perpetual attention, and time, explained to me many appearances which
 were at first enigmatic.
 
 "A considerable period elapsed before I discovered one of the causes of
 the uneasiness of this amiable family; it was poverty: and they suffered
 that evil in a very distressing degree. Their nourishment consisted
 entirely of the vegetables of their garden, and the milk of one cow, who
 gave very little during the winter, when its masters could scarcely
 procure food to support it. They often, I believe, suffered the pangs of
 hunger very poignantly, especially the two younger cottagers; for
 several times they placed food before the old man, when they reserved
 none for themselves.
 
 "This trait of kindness moved me sensibly. I had been accustomed,
 during the night, to steal a part of their store for my own consumption;
 but when I found that in doing this I inflicted pain on the cottagers, I
 abstained, and satisfied myself with berries, nuts, and roots, which I
 gathered from a neighbouring wood.
 
 "I discovered also another means through which I was enabled to assist
 their labours. I found that the youth spent a great part of each day in
 collecting wood for the family fire; and, during the night, I often took
 his tools, the use of which I quickly discovered, and brought home
 firing sufficient for the consumption of several days.
 
 "I remember, the first time that I did this, the young woman, when she
 opened the door in the morning, appeared greatly astonished on seeing a
 great pile of wood on the outside. She uttered some words in a loud
 voice, and the youth joined her, who also expressed surprise. I
 observed, with pleasure, that he did not go to the forest that day, but
 spent it in repairing the cottage, and cultivating the garden.
 
 "By degrees I made a discovery of still greater moment. I found that
 these people possessed a method of communicating their experience and
 feelings to one another by articulate sounds. I perceived that the words
 they spoke sometimes produced pleasure or pain, smiles or sadness, in
 the minds and countenances of the hearers. This was indeed a godlike
 science, and I ardently desired to become acquainted with it. But I was
 baffled in every attempt I made for this purpose. Their pronunciation
 was quick; and the words they uttered, not having any apparent connexion
 with visible objects, I was unable to discover any clue by which I could
 unravel the mystery of their reference. By great application, however,
 and after having remained during the space of several revolutions of the
 moon in my hovel, I discovered the names that were given to some of the
 most familiar objects of discourse: I learned and applied the words
 _fire_, _milk_, _bread_, and _wood_. I learned also the names of the
 cottagers themselves. The youth and his companion had each of them
 several names, but the old man had only one, which was _father_. The
 girl was called _sister_, or _Agatha_; and the youth _Felix_, _brother_,
 or _son_. I cannot describe the delight I felt when I learned the ideas
 appropriated to each of these sounds, and was able to pronounce them. I
 distinguished several other words, without being able as yet to
 understand or apply them; such as _good_, _dearest_, _unhappy_.
 
 "I spent the winter in this manner. The gentle manners and beauty of the
 cottagers greatly endeared them to me: when they were unhappy, I felt
 depressed; when they rejoiced, I sympathized in their joys. I saw few
 human beings beside them; and if any other happened to enter the
 cottage, their harsh manners and rude gait only enhanced to me the
 superior accomplishments of my friends. The old man, I could perceive,
 often endeavoured to encourage his children, as sometimes I found that
 he called them, to cast off their melancholy. He would talk in a
 cheerful accent, with an expression of goodness that bestowed pleasure
 even upon me. Agatha listened with respect, her eyes sometimes filled
 with tears, which she endeavoured to wipe away unperceived; but I
 generally found that her countenance and tone were more cheerful after
 having listened to the exhortations of her father. It was not thus with
 Felix. He was always the saddest of the groupe; and, even to my
 unpractised senses, he appeared to have suffered more deeply than his
 friends. But if his countenance was more sorrowful, his voice was more
 cheerful than that of his sister, especially when he addressed the old
 man.
 
 "I could mention innumerable instances, which, although slight, marked
 the dispositions of these amiable cottagers. In the midst of poverty and
 want, Felix carried with pleasure to his sister the first little white
 flower that peeped out from beneath the snowy ground. Early in the
 morning before she had risen, he cleared away the snow that obstructed
 her path to the milk-house, drew water from the well, and brought the
 wood from the out-house, where, to his perpetual astonishment, he found
 his store always replenished by an invisible hand. In the day, I
 believe, he worked sometimes for a neighbouring farmer, because he often
 went forth, and did not return until dinner, yet brought no wood with
 him. At other times he worked in the garden; but, as there was little to
 do in the frosty season, he read to the old man and Agatha.
 
 "This reading had puzzled me extremely at first; but, by degrees, I
 discovered that he uttered many of the same sounds when he read as when
 he talked. I conjectured, therefore, that he found on the paper signs
 for speech which he understood, and I ardently longed to comprehend
 these also; but how was that possible, when I did not even understand
 the sounds for which they stood as signs? I improved, however, sensibly
 in this science, but not sufficiently to follow up any kind of
 conversation, although I applied my whole mind to the endeavour: for I
 easily perceived that, although I eagerly longed to discover myself to
 the cottagers, I ought not to make the attempt until I had first become
 master of their language; which knowledge might enable me to make them
 overlook the deformity of my figure; for with this also the contrast
 perpetually presented to my eyes had made me acquainted.
 
 "I had admired the perfect forms of my cottagers--their grace, beauty,
 and delicate complexions: but how was I terrified, when I viewed myself
 in a transparent pool! At first I started back, unable to believe that
 it was indeed I who was reflected in the mirror; and when I became fully
 convinced that I was in reality the monster that I am, I was filled with
 the bitterest sensations of despondence and mortification. Alas! I did
 not yet entirely know the fatal effects of this miserable deformity.
 
 "As the sun became warmer, and the light of day longer, the snow
 vanished, and I beheld the bare trees and the black earth. From this
 time Felix was more employed; and the heart-moving indications of
 impending famine disappeared. Their food, as I afterwards found, was
 coarse, but it was wholesome; and they procured a sufficiency of it.
 Several new kinds of plants sprung up in the garden, which they dressed;
 and these signs of comfort increased daily as the season advanced.
 
 "The old man, leaning on his son, walked each day at noon, when it did
 not rain, as I found it was called when the heavens poured forth its
 waters. This frequently took place; but a high wind quickly dried the
 earth, and the season became far more pleasant than it had been.
 
 "My mode of life in my hovel was uniform. During the morning I attended
 the motions of the cottagers; and when they were dispersed in various
 occupations, I slept: the remainder of the day was spent in observing my
 friends. When they had retired to rest, if there was any moon, or the
 night was star-light, I went into the woods, and collected my own food
 and fuel for the cottage. When I returned, as often as it was necessary,
 I cleared their path from the snow, and performed those offices that I
 had seen done by Felix. I afterwards found that these labours, performed
 by an invisible hand, greatly astonished them; and once or twice I heard
 them, on these occasions, utter the words _good spirit_, _wonderful_;
 but I did not then understand the signification of these terms.
 
 "My thoughts now became more active, and I longed to discover the
 motives and feelings of these lovely creatures; I was inquisitive to
 know why Felix appeared so miserable, and Agatha so sad. I thought
 (foolish wretch!) that it might be in my power to restore happiness to
 these deserving people. When I slept, or was absent, the forms of the
 venerable blind father, the gentle Agatha, and the excellent Felix,
 flitted before me. I looked upon them as superior beings, who would be
 the arbiters of my future destiny. I formed in my imagination a thousand
 pictures of presenting myself to them, and their reception of me. I
 imagined that they would be disgusted, until, by my gentle demeanour and
 conciliating words, I should first win their favour, and afterwards
 their love.
 
 "These thoughts exhilarated me, and led me to apply with fresh ardour to
 the acquiring the art of language. My organs were indeed harsh, but
 supple; and although my voice was very unlike the soft music of their
 tones, yet I pronounced such words as I understood with tolerable ease.
 It was as the ass and the lap-dog; yet surely the gentle ass, whose
 intentions were affectionate, although his manners were rude, deserved
 better treatment than blows and execration.
 
 "The pleasant showers and genial warmth of spring greatly altered the
 aspect of the earth. Men, who before this change seemed to have been hid
 in caves, dispersed themselves, and were employed in various arts of
 cultivation. The birds sang in more cheerful notes, and the leaves
 began to bud forth on the trees. Happy, happy earth! fit habitation for
 gods, which, so short a time before, was bleak, damp, and unwholesome.
 My spirits were elevated by the enchanting appearance of nature; the
 past was blotted from my memory, the present was tranquil, and the
 future gilded by bright rays of hope, and anticipations of joy."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 "I now hasten to the more moving part of my story. I shall relate events
 that impressed me with feelings which, from what I was, have made me
 what I am.
 
 "Spring advanced rapidly; the weather became fine, and the skies
 cloudless. It surprised me, that what before was desert and gloomy
 should now bloom with the most beautiful flowers and verdure. My senses
 were gratified and refreshed by a thousand scents of delight, and a
 thousand sights of beauty.
 
 "It was on one of these days, when my cottagers periodically rested from
 labour--the old man played on his guitar, and the children listened to
 him--I observed that the countenance of Felix was melancholy beyond
 expression: he sighed frequently; and once his father paused in his
 music, and I conjectured by his manner that he inquired the cause of his
 son's sorrow. Felix replied in a cheerful accent, and the old man was
 recommencing his music, when some one tapped at the door.
 
 "It was a lady on horseback, accompanied by a countryman as a guide. The
 lady was dressed in a dark suit, and covered with a thick black veil.
 Agatha asked a question; to which the stranger only replied by
 pronouncing, in a sweet accent, the name of Felix. Her voice was
 musical, but unlike that of either of my friends. On hearing this word,
 Felix came up hastily to the lady; who, when she saw him, threw up her
 veil, and I beheld a countenance of angelic beauty and expression. Her
 hair of a shining raven black, and curiously braided; her eyes were
 dark, but gentle, although animated; her features of a regular
 proportion, and her complexion wondrously fair, each cheek tinged with a
 lovely pink.
 
 "Felix seemed ravished with delight when he saw her, every trait of
 sorrow vanished from his face, and it instantly expressed a degree of
 ecstatic joy, of which I could hardly have believed it capable; his eyes
 sparkled, as his cheek flushed with pleasure; and at that moment I
 thought him as beautiful as the stranger. She appeared affected by
 different feelings; wiping a few tears from her lovely eyes, she held
 out her hand to Felix, who kissed it rapturously, and called her, as
 well as I could distinguish, his sweet Arabian. She did not appear to
 understand him, but smiled. He assisted her to dismount, and, dismissing
 her guide, conducted her into the cottage. Some conversation took place
 between him and his father; and the young stranger knelt at the old
 man's feet, and would have kissed his hand, but he raised her, and
 embraced her affectionately.
 
 "I soon perceived, that although the stranger uttered articulate sounds,
 and appeared to have a language of her own, she was neither understood
 by, or herself understood, the cottagers. They made many signs which I
 did not comprehend; but I saw that her presence diffused gladness
 through the cottage, dispelling their sorrow as the sun dissipates the
 morning mists. Felix seemed peculiarly happy, and with smiles of delight
 welcomed his Arabian. Agatha, the ever-gentle Agatha, kissed the hands
 of the lovely stranger; and, pointing to her brother, made signs which
 appeared to me to mean that he had been sorrowful until she came. Some
 hours passed thus, while they, by their countenances, expressed joy, the
 cause of which I did not comprehend. Presently I found, by the frequent
 recurrence of one sound which the stranger repeated after them, that she
 was endeavouring to learn their language; and the idea instantly
 occurred to me, that I should make use of the same instructions to the
 same end. The stranger learned about twenty words at the first lesson,
 most of them indeed were those which I had before understood, but I
 profited by the others.
 
 "As night came on, Agatha and the Arabian retired early. When they
 separated, Felix kissed the hand of the stranger, and said, 'Good night,
 sweet Safie.' He sat up much longer, conversing with his father; and, by
 the frequent repetition of her name, I conjectured that their lovely
 guest was the subject of their conversation. I ardently desired to
 understand them, and bent every faculty towards that purpose, but found
 it utterly impossible.
 
 "The next morning Felix went out to his work; and, after the usual
 occupations of Agatha were finished, the Arabian sat at the feet of the
 old man, and, taking his guitar, played some airs so entrancingly
 beautiful, that they at once drew tears of sorrow and delight from my
 eyes. She sang, and her voice flowed in a rich cadence, swelling or
 dying away, like a nightingale of the woods.
 
 "When she had finished, she gave the guitar to Agatha, who at first
 declined it. She played a simple air, and her voice accompanied it in
 sweet accents, but unlike the wondrous strain of the stranger. The old
 man appeared enraptured, and said some words, which Agatha endeavoured
 to explain to Safie, and by which he appeared to wish to express that
 she bestowed on him the greatest delight by her music.
 
 "The days now passed as peaceably as before, with the sole alteration,
 that joy had taken place of sadness in the countenances of my friends.
 Safie was always gay and happy; she and I improved rapidly in the
 knowledge of language, so that in two months I began to comprehend most
 of the words uttered by my protectors.
 
 "In the meanwhile also the black ground was covered with herbage, and
 the green banks interspersed with innumerable flowers, sweet to the
 scent and the eyes, stars of pale radiance among the moonlight woods;
 the sun became warmer, the nights clear and balmy; and my nocturnal
 rambles were an extreme pleasure to me, although they were considerably
 shortened by the late setting and early rising of the sun; for I never
 ventured abroad during daylight, fearful of meeting with the same
 treatment as I had formerly endured in the first village which I
 entered.
 
 "My days were spent in close attention, that I might more speedily
 master the language; and I may boast that I improved more rapidly than
 the Arabian, who understood very little, and conversed in broken
 accents, whilst I comprehended and could imitate almost every word that
 was spoken.
 
 "While I improved in speech, I also learned the science of letters, as it
 was taught to the stranger; and this opened before me a wide field for
 wonder and delight.
 
 "The book from which Felix instructed Safie was Volney's _Ruins of
 Empires_. I should not have understood the purport of this book, had not
 Felix, in reading it, given very minute explanations. He had chosen this
 work, he said, because the declamatory style was framed in imitation of
 the eastern authors. Through this work I obtained a cursory knowledge of
 history, and a view of the several empires at present existing in the
 world; it gave me an insight into the manners, governments, and
 religions of the different nations of the earth. I heard of the slothful
 Asiatics; of the stupendous genius and mental activity of the Grecians;
 of the wars and wonderful virtue of the early Romans--of their
 subsequent degeneration--of the decline of that mighty empire; of
 chivalry, Christianity, and kings. I heard of the discovery of the
 American hemisphere, and wept with Safie over the hapless fate of its
 original inhabitants.
 
 "These wonderful narrations inspired me with strange feelings. Was man,
 indeed, at once so powerful, so virtuous, and magnificent, yet so
 vicious and base? He appeared at one time a mere scion of the evil
 principle, and at another as all that can be conceived of noble and
 godlike. To be a great and virtuous man appeared the highest honour that
 can befall a sensitive being; to be base and vicious, as many on record
 have been, appeared the lowest degradation, a condition more abject than
 that of the blind mole or harmless worm. For a long time I could not
 conceive how one man could go forth to murder his fellow, or even why
 there were laws and governments; but when I heard details of vice and
 bloodshed, my wonder ceased, and I turned away with disgust and
 loathing.
 
 "Every conversation of the cottagers now opened new wonders to me. While
 I listened to the instructions which Felix bestowed upon the Arabian,
 the strange system of human society was explained to me. I heard of the
 division of property, of immense wealth and squalid poverty; of rank,
 descent, and noble blood.
 
 "The words induced me to turn towards myself. I learned that the
 possessions most esteemed by your fellow-creatures were, high and
 unsullied descent united with riches. A man might be respected with only
 one of these acquisitions; but without either he was considered, except
 in very rare instances, as a vagabond and a slave, doomed to waste his
 powers for the profit of the chosen few. And what was I? Of my creation
 and creator I was absolutely ignorant; but I knew that I possessed no
 money, no friends, no kind of property. I was, besides, endowed with a
 figure hideously deformed and loathsome; I was not even of the same
 nature as man. I was more agile than they, and could subsist upon
 coarser diet; I bore the extremes of heat and cold with less injury to
 my frame; my stature far exceeded their's. When I looked around, I saw
 and heard of none like me. Was I then a monster, a blot upon the earth,
 from which all men fled, and whom all men disowned?
 
 "I cannot describe to you the agony that these reflections inflicted
 upon me; I tried to dispel them, but sorrow only increased with
 knowledge. Oh, that I had for ever remained in my native wood, nor known
 or felt beyond the sensations of hunger, thirst, and heat!
 
 "Of what a strange nature is knowledge! It clings to the mind, when it
 has once seized on it, like a lichen on the rock. I wished sometimes to
 shake off all thought and feeling; but I learned that there was but one
 means to overcome the sensation of pain, and that was death--a state
 which I feared yet did not understand. I admired virtue and good
 feelings, and loved the gentle manners and amiable qualities of my
 cottagers; but I was shut out from intercourse with them, except through
 means which I obtained by stealth, when I was unseen and unknown, and
 which rather increased than satisfied the desire I had of becoming one
 among my fellows. The gentle words of Agatha, and the animated smiles of
 the charming Arabian, were not for me. The mild exhortations of the old
 man, and the lively conversation of the loved Felix, were not for me.
 Miserable, unhappy wretch!
 
 "Other lessons were impressed upon me even more deeply. I heard of the
 difference of sexes; of the birth and growth of children; how the father
 doated on the smiles of the infant, and the lively sallies of the older
 child; how all the life and cares of the mother were wrapt up in the
 precious charge; how the mind of youth expanded and gained knowledge; of
 brother, sister, and all the various relationships which bind one human
 being to another in mutual bonds.
 
 "But where were my friends and relations? No father had watched my
 infant days, no mother had blessed me with smiles and caresses; or if
 they had, all my past life was now a blot, a blind vacancy in which I
 distinguished nothing. From my earliest remembrance I had been as I then
 was in height and proportion. I had never yet seen a being resembling
 me, or who claimed any intercourse with me. What was I? The question
 again recurred, to be answered only with groans.
 
 "I will soon explain to what these feelings tended; but allow me now to
 return to the cottagers, whose story excited in me such various feelings
 of indignation, delight, and wonder, but which all terminated in
 additional love and reverence for my protectors (for so I loved, in an
 innocent, half painful self-deceit, to call them)."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 "Some time elapsed before I learned the history of my friends. It was
 one which could not fail to impress itself deeply on my mind, unfolding
 as it did a number of circumstances each interesting and wonderful to
 one so utterly inexperienced as I was.
 
 "The name of the old man was De Lacey. He was descended from a good
 family in France, where he had lived for many years in affluence,
 respected by his superiors, and beloved by his equals. His son was bred
 in the service of his country; and Agatha had ranked with ladies of the
 highest distinction. A few months before my arrival, they had lived in a
 large and luxurious city, called Paris, surrounded by friends, and
 possessed of every enjoyment which virtue, refinement of intellect, or
 taste, accompanied by a moderate fortune, could afford.
 
 "The father of Safie had been the cause of their ruin. He was a Turkish
 merchant, and had inhabited Paris for many years, when, for some reason
 which I could not learn, he became obnoxious to the government. He was
 seized and cast into prison the very day that Safie arrived from
 Constantinople to join him. He was tried, and condemned to death. The
 injustice of his sentence was very flagrant; all Paris was indignant;
 and it was judged that his religion and wealth, rather than the crime
 alleged against him, had been the cause of his condemnation.
 
 "Felix had been present at the trial; his horror and indignation were
 uncontrollable, when he heard the decision of the court. He made, at
 that moment, a solemn vow to deliver him, and then looked around for the
 means. After many fruitless attempts to gain admittance to the prison,
 he found a strongly grated window in an unguarded part of the building,
 which lighted the dungeon of the unfortunate Mahometan; who, loaded with
 chains, waited in despair the execution of the barbarous sentence. Felix
 visited the grate at night, and made known to the prisoner his
 intentions in his favour. The Turk, amazed and delighted, endeavoured to
 kindle the zeal of his deliverer by promises of reward and wealth. Felix
 rejected his offers with contempt; yet when he saw the lovely Safie, who
 was allowed to visit her father, and who, by her gestures, expressed her
 lively gratitude, the youth could not help owning to his own mind, that
 the captive possessed a treasure which would fully reward his toil and
 hazard.
 
 "The Turk quickly perceived the impression that his daughter had made on
 the heart of Felix, and endeavoured to secure him more entirely in his
 interests by the promise of her hand in marriage, so soon as he should
 be conveyed to a place of safety. Felix was too delicate to accept this
 offer; yet he looked forward to the probability of that event as to the
 consummation of his happiness.
 
 "During the ensuing days, while the preparations were going forward for
 the escape of the merchant, the zeal of Felix was warmed by several
 letters that he received from this lovely girl, who found means to
 express her thoughts in the language of her lover by the aid of an old
 man, a servant of her father's, who understood French. She thanked him
 in the most ardent terms for his intended services towards her father;
 and at the same time she gently deplored her own fate.
 
 "I have copies of these letters; for I found means, during my residence
 in the hovel, to procure the implements of writing; and the letters were
 often in the hands of Felix or Agatha. Before I depart, I will give them
 to you, they will prove the truth of my tale; but at present, as the
 sun is already far declined, I shall only have time to repeat the
 substance of them to you.
 
 "Safie related, that her mother was a Christian Arab, seized and made a
 slave by the Turks; recommended by her beauty, she had won the heart of
 the father of Safie, who married her. The young girl spoke in high and
 enthusiastic terms of her mother, who, born in freedom spurned the
 bondage to which she was now reduced. She instructed her daughter in the
 tenets of her religion, and taught her to aspire to higher powers of
 intellect, and an independence of spirit, forbidden to the female
 followers of Mahomet. This lady died; but her lessons were indelibly
 impressed on the mind of Safie, who sickened at the prospect of again
 returning to Asia, and the being immured within the walls of a haram,
 allowed only to occupy herself with puerile amusements, ill suited to
 the temper of her soul, now accustomed to grand ideas and a noble
 emulation for virtue. The prospect of marrying a Christian, and
 remaining in a country where women were allowed to take a rank in
 society, was enchanting to her.
 
 "The day for the execution of the Turk was fixed; but, on the night
 previous to it, he had quitted prison, and before morning was distant
 many leagues from Paris. Felix had procured passports in the name of his
 father, sister, and himself. He had previously communicated his plan to
 the former, who aided the deceit by quitting his house, under the
 pretence of a journey, and concealed himself, with his daughter, in an
 obscure part of Paris.
 
 "Felix conducted the fugitives through France to Lyons, and across Mont
 Cenis to Leghorn, where the merchant had decided to wait a favourable
 opportunity of passing into some part of the Turkish dominions.
 
 "Safie resolved to remain with her father until the moment of his
 departure, before which time the Turk renewed his promise that she
 should be united to his deliverer; and Felix remained with them in
 expectation of that event; and in the mean time he enjoyed the society
 of the Arabian, who exhibited towards him the simplest and tenderest
 affection. They conversed with one another through the means of an
 interpreter, and sometimes with the interpretation of looks; and Safie
 sang to him the divine airs of her native country.
 
 "The Turk allowed this intimacy to take place, and encouraged the hopes
 of the youthful lovers, while in his heart he had formed far other
 plans. He loathed the idea that his daughter should be united to a
 Christian; but he feared the resentment of Felix if he should appear
 lukewarm; for he knew that he was still in the power of his deliverer,
 if he should choose to betray him to the Italian state which they
 inhabited. He revolved a thousand plans by which he should be enabled to
 prolong the deceit until it might be no longer necessary, and secretly
 to take his daughter with him when he departed. His plans were greatly
 facilitated by the news which arrived from Paris.
 
 "The government of France were greatly enraged at the escape of their
 victim, and spared no pains to detect and punish his deliverer. The plot
 of Felix was quickly discovered, and De Lacey and Agatha were thrown
 into prison. The news reached Felix, and roused him from his dream of
 pleasure. His blind and aged father, and his gentle sister, lay in a
 noisome dungeon, while he enjoyed the free air, and the society of her
 whom he loved. This idea was torture to him. He quickly arranged with
 the Turk, that if the latter should find a favourable opportunity for
 escape before Felix could return to Italy, Safie should remain as a
 boarder at a convent at Leghorn; and then, quitting the lovely Arabian,
 he hastened to Paris, and delivered himself up to the vengeance of the
 law, hoping to free De Lacey and Agatha by this proceeding.
 
 "He did not succeed. They remained confined for five months before the
 trial took place; the result of which deprived them of their fortune,
 and condemned them to a perpetual exile from their native country.
 
 "They found a miserable asylum in the cottage in Germany, where I
 discovered them. Felix soon learned that the treacherous Turk, for whom
 he and his family endured such unheard-of oppression, on discovering
 that his deliverer was thus reduced to poverty and impotence, became a
 traitor to good feeling and honour, and had quitted Italy with his
 daughter, insultingly sending Felix a pittance of money to aid him, as
 he said, in some plan of future maintenance.
 
 "Such were the events that preyed on the heart of Felix, and rendered
 him, when I first saw him, the most miserable of his family. He could
 have endured poverty, and when this distress had been the meed of his
 virtue, he would have gloried in it: but the ingratitude of the Turk,
 and the loss of his beloved Safie, were misfortunes more bitter and
 irreparable. The arrival of the Arabian now infused new life into his
 soul.
 
 "When the news reached Leghorn, that Felix was deprived of his wealth
 and rank, the merchant commanded his daughter to think no more of her
 lover, but to prepare to return with him to her native country. The
 generous nature of Safie was outraged by this command; she attempted to
 expostulate with her father, but he left her angrily, reiterating his
 tyrannical mandate.
 
 "A few days after, the Turk entered his daughter's apartment, and told
 her hastily, that he had reason to believe that his residence at Leghorn
 had been divulged, and that he should speedily be delivered up to the
 French government; he had, consequently, hired a vessel to convey him
 to Constantinople, for which city he should sail in a few hours. He
 intended to leave his daughter under the care of a confidential servant,
 to follow at her leisure with the greater part of his property, which
 had not yet arrived at Leghorn.
 
 "When alone, Safie resolved in her own mind the plan of conduct that it
 would become her to pursue in this emergency. A residence in Turkey was
 abhorrent to her; her religion and feelings were alike adverse to it. By
 some papers of her father's, which fell into her hands, she heard of the
 exile of her lover, and learnt the name of the spot where he then
 resided. She hesitated some time, but at length she formed her
 determination. Taking with her some jewels that belonged to her, and a
 small sum of money, she quitted Italy, with an attendant, a native of
 Leghorn, but who understood the common language of Turkey, and departed
 for Germany.
 
 "She arrived in safety at a town about twenty leagues from the cottage
 of De Lacey, when her attendant fell dangerously ill. Safie nursed her
 with the most devoted affection; but the poor girl died, and the Arabian
 was left alone, unacquainted with the language of the country, and
 utterly ignorant of the customs of the world. She fell, however, into
 good hands. The Italian had mentioned the name of the spot for which
 they were bound; and, after her death, the woman of the house in which
 they had lived took care that Safie should arrive in safety at the
 cottage of her lover."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 "Such was the history of my beloved cottagers. It impressed me deeply. I
 learned, from the views of social life which it developed, to admire
 their virtues, and to deprecate the vices of mankind.
 
 "As yet I looked upon crime as a distant evil; benevolence and
 generosity were ever present before me, inciting within me a desire to
 become an actor in the busy scene where so many admirable qualities were
 called forth and displayed. But, in giving an account of the progress of
 my intellect, I must not omit a circumstance which occurred in the
 beginning of the month of August of the same year.
 
 "One night, during my accustomed visit to the neighbouring wood, where I
 collected my own food, and brought home firing for my protectors, I
 found on the ground a leathern portmanteau, containing several articles
 of dress and some books. I eagerly seized the prize, and returned with
 it to my hovel. Fortunately the books were written in the language the
 elements of which I had acquired at the cottage; they consisted of
 _Paradise Lost_, a volume of _Plutarch's Lives_, and the _Sorrows of
 Werter_. The possession of these treasures gave me extreme delight; I
 now continually studied and exercised my mind upon these histories,
 whilst my friends were employed in their ordinary occupations.
 
 "I can hardly describe to you the effect of these books. They produced
 in me an infinity of new images and feelings, that sometimes raised me
 to ecstacy, but more frequently sunk me into the lowest dejection. In
 the _Sorrows of Werter_, besides the interest of its simple and
 affecting story, so many opinions are canvassed, and so many lights
 thrown upon what had hitherto been to me obscure subjects, that I found
 in it a never-ending source of speculation and astonishment. The gentle
 and domestic manners it described, combined with lofty sentiments and
 feelings, which had for their object something out of self, accorded
 well with my experience among my protectors, and with the wants which
 were for ever alive in my own bosom. But I thought Werter himself a more
 divine being than I had ever beheld or imagined; his character contained
 no pretension, but it sunk deep. The disquisitions upon death and
 suicide were calculated to fill me with wonder. I did not pretend to
 enter into the merits of the case, yet I inclined towards the opinions
 of the hero, whose extinction I wept, without precisely understanding
 it.
 
 "As I read, however, I applied much personally to my own feelings and
 condition. I found myself similar, yet at the same time strangely unlike
 the beings concerning whom I read, and to whose conversation I was a
 listener. I sympathized with, and partly understood them, but I was
 unformed in mind; I was dependent on none, and related to none. 'The
 path of my departure was free;' and there was none to lament my
 annihilation. My person was hideous, and my stature gigantic: what did
 this mean? Who was I? What was I? Whence did I come? What was my
 destination? These questions continually recurred, but I was unable to
 solve them.
 
 "The volume of _Plutarch's Lives_ which I possessed, contained the
 histories of the first founders of the ancient republics. This book had
 a far different effect upon me from the _Sorrows of Werter_. I learned
 from Werter's imaginations despondency and gloom: but Plutarch taught me
 high thoughts; he elevated me above the wretched sphere of my own
 reflections, to admire and love the heroes of past ages. Many things I
 read surpassed my understanding and experience. I had a very confused
 knowledge of kingdoms, wide extents of country, mighty rivers, and
 boundless seas. But I was perfectly unacquainted with towns, and large
 assemblages of men. The cottage of my protectors had been the only
 school in which I had studied human nature; but this book developed new
 and mightier scenes of action. I read of men concerned in public affairs
 governing or massacring their species. I felt the greatest ardour for
 virtue rise within me, and abhorrence for vice, as far as I understood
 the signification of those terms, relative as they were, as I applied
 them, to pleasure and pain alone. Induced by these feelings, I was of
 course led to admire peaceable law-givers, Numa, Solon, and Lycurgus,
 in preference to Romulus and Theseus. The patriarchal lives of my
 protectors caused these impressions to take a firm hold on my mind;
 perhaps, if my first introduction to humanity had been made by a young
 soldier, burning for glory and slaughter, I should have been imbued with
 different sensations.
 
 "But _Paradise Lost_ excited different and far deeper emotions. I read
 it, as I had read the other volumes which had fallen into my hands, as a
 true history. It moved every feeling of wonder and awe, that the picture
 of an omnipotent God warring with his creatures was capable of exciting.
 I often referred the several situations, as their similarity struck me,
 to my own. Like Adam, I was created apparently united by no link to any
 other being in existence; but his state was far different from mine in
 every other respect. He had come forth from the hands of God a perfect
 creature, happy and prosperous, guarded by the especial care of his
 Creator; he was allowed to converse with, and acquire knowledge from
 beings of a superior nature: but I was wretched, helpless, and alone.
 Many times I considered Satan as the fitter emblem of my condition; for
 often, like him, when I viewed the bliss of my protectors, the bitter
 gall of envy rose within me.
 
 "Another circumstance strengthened and confirmed these feelings. Soon
 after my arrival in the hovel, I discovered some papers in the pocket of
 the dress which I had taken from your laboratory. At first I had
 neglected them; but now that I was able to decypher the characters in
 which they were written, I began to study them with diligence. It was
 your journal of the four months that preceded my creation. You minutely
 described in these papers every step you took in the progress of your
 work; this history was mingled with accounts of domestic occurrences.
 You, doubtless, recollect these papers. Here they are. Every thing is
 related in them which bears reference to my accursed origin; the whole
 detail of that series of disgusting circumstances which produced it is
 set in view; the minutest description of my odious and loathsome person
 is given, in language which painted your own horrors, and rendered mine
 ineffaceable. I sickened as I read. 'Hateful day when I received life!'
 I exclaimed in agony. 'Cursed creator! Why did you form a monster so
 hideous that even you turned from me in disgust? God in pity made man
 beautiful and alluring, after his own image; but my form is a filthy
 type of your's, more horrid from its very resemblance. Satan had his
 companions, fellow-devils, to admire and encourage him; but I am
 solitary and detested.'
 
 "These were the reflections of my hours of despondency and solitude; but
 when I contemplated the virtues of the cottagers, their amiable and
 benevolent dispositions, I persuaded myself that when they should become
 acquainted with my admiration of their virtues, they would compassionate
 me, and overlook my personal deformity. Could they turn from their door
 one, however monstrous, who solicited their compassion and friendship?
 I resolved, at least, not to despair, but in every way to fit myself for
 an interview with them which would decide my fate. I postponed this
 attempt for some months longer; for the importance attached to its
 success inspired me with a dread lest I should fail. Besides, I found
 that my understanding improved so much with every day's experience, that
 I was unwilling to commence this undertaking until a few more months
 should have added to my wisdom.
 
 "Several changes, in the mean time, took place in the cottage. The
 presence of Safie diffused happiness among its inhabitants; and I also
 found that a greater degree of plenty reigned there. Felix and Agatha
 spent more time in amusement and conversation, and were assisted in
 their labours by servants. They did not appear rich, but they were
 contented and happy; their feelings were serene and peaceful, while mine
 became every day more tumultuous. Increase of knowledge only discovered
 to me more clearly what a wretched outcast I was. I cherished hope, it
 is true; but it vanished, when I beheld my person reflected in water, or
 my shadow in the moon-shine, even as that frail image and that
 inconstant shade.
 
 "I endeavoured to crush these fears, and to fortify myself for the trial
 which in a few months I resolved to undergo; and sometimes I allowed my
 thoughts, unchecked by reason, to ramble in the fields of Paradise, and
 dared to fancy amiable and lovely creatures sympathizing with my
 feelings and cheering my gloom; their angelic countenances breathed
 smiles of consolation. But it was all a dream: no Eve soothed my
 sorrows, or shared my thoughts; I was alone. I remembered Adam's
 supplication to his Creator; but where was mine? he had abandoned me,
 and, in the bitterness of my heart, I cursed him.
 
 "Autumn passed thus. I saw, with surprise and grief, the leaves decay
 and fall, and nature again assume the barren and bleak appearance it had
 worn when I first beheld the woods and the lovely moon. Yet I did not
 heed the bleakness of the weather; I was better fitted by my
 conformation for the endurance of cold than heat. But my chief delights
 were the sight of the flowers, the birds, and all the gay apparel of
 summer; when those deserted me, I turned with more attention towards the
 cottagers. Their happiness was not decreased by the absence of summer.
 They loved, and sympathized with one another; and their joys, depending
 on each other, were not interrupted by the casualties that took place
 around them. The more I saw of them, the greater became my desire to
 claim their protection and kindness; my heart yearned to be known and
 loved by these amiable creatures: to see their sweet looks turned
 towards me with affection, was the utmost limit of my ambition. I dared
 not think that they would turn them from me with disdain and horror. The
 poor that stopped at their door were never driven away. I asked, it is
 true, for greater treasures than a little food or rest; I required
 kindness and sympathy; but I did not believe myself utterly unworthy of
 it.
 
 "The winter advanced, and an entire revolution of the seasons had taken
 place since I awoke into life. My attention, at this time, was solely
 directed towards my plan of introducing myself into the cottage of my
 protectors. I revolved many projects; but that on which I finally fixed
 was, to enter the dwelling when the blind old man should be alone. I had
 sagacity enough to discover, that the unnatural hideousness of my person
 was the chief object of horror with those who had formerly beheld me. My
 voice, although harsh, had nothing terrible in it; I thought, therefore,
 that if, in the absence of his children, I could gain the good-will and
 mediation of the old De Lacy, I might, by his means, be tolerated by my
 younger protectors.
 
 "One day, when the sun shone on the red leaves that strewed the ground,
 and diffused cheerfulness, although it denied warmth, Safie, Agatha, and
 Felix, departed on a long country walk, and the old man, at his own
 desire, was left alone in the cottage. When his children had departed,
 he took up his guitar, and played several mournful, but sweet airs, more
 sweet and mournful than I had ever heard him play before. At first his
 countenance was illuminated with pleasure, but, as he continued,
 thoughtfulness and sadness succeeded; at length, laying aside the
 instrument, he sat absorbed in reflection.
 
 "My heart beat quick; this was the hour and moment of trial, which
 would decide my hopes, or realize my fears. The servants were gone to a
 neighbouring fair. All was silent in and around the cottage: it was an
 excellent opportunity; yet, when I proceeded to execute my plan, my
 limbs failed me, and I sunk to the ground. Again I rose; and, exerting
 all the firmness of which I was master, removed the planks which I had
 placed before my hovel to conceal my retreat. The fresh air revived me,
 and, with renewed determination, I approached the door of their cottage.
 
 "I knocked. 'Who is there?' said the old man--'Come in.'
 
 "I entered; 'Pardon this intrusion,' said I, 'I am a traveller in want
 of a little rest; you would greatly oblige me, if you would allow me to
 remain a few minutes before the fire.'
 
 "'Enter,' said De Lacy; 'and I will try in what manner I can relieve
 your wants; but, unfortunately, my children are from home, and, as I am
 blind, I am afraid I shall find it difficult to procure food for you.'
 
 "'Do not trouble yourself, my kind host, I have food; it is warmth and
 rest only that I need.'
 
 "I sat down, and a silence ensued. I knew that every minute was precious
 to me, yet I remained irresolute in what manner to commence the
 interview; when the old man addressed me--
 
 "'By your language, stranger, I suppose you are my countryman;--are you
 French?'
 
 "'No; but I was educated by a French family, and understand that
 language only. I am now going to claim the protection of some friends,
 whom I sincerely love, and of whose favour I have some hopes.'
 
 "'Are these Germans?'
 
 "'No, they are French. But let us change the subject. I am an
 unfortunate and deserted creature; I look around, and I have no relation
 or friend upon earth. These amiable people to whom I go have never seen
 me, and know little of me. I am full of fears; for if I fail there, I am
 an outcast in the world for ever.'
 
 "'Do not despair. To be friendless is indeed to be unfortunate; but the
 hearts of men, when unprejudiced by any obvious self-interest, are full
 of brotherly love and charity. Rely, therefore, on your hopes; and if
 these friends are good and amiable, do not despair.'
 
 "'They are kind--they are the most excellent creatures in the world;
 but, unfortunately, they are prejudiced against me. I have good
 dispositions; my life has been hitherto harmless, and, in some degree,
 beneficial; but a fatal prejudice clouds their eyes, and where they
 ought to see a feeling and kind friend, they behold only a detestable
 monster.'
 
 "'That is indeed unfortunate; but if you are really blameless, cannot
 you undeceive them?'
 
 "'I am about to undertake that task; and it is on that account that I
 feel so many overwhelming terrors. I tenderly love these friends; I
 have, unknown to them, been for many months in the habits of daily
 kindness towards them; but they believe that I wish to injure them, and
 it is that prejudice which I wish to overcome.'
 
 "'Where do these friends reside?'
 
 "'Near this spot.'
 
 "The old man paused, and then continued, 'If you will unreservedly
 confide to me the particulars of your tale, I perhaps may be of use in
 undeceiving them. I am blind, and cannot judge of your countenance, but
 there is something in your words which persuades me that you are
 sincere. I am poor, and an exile; but it will afford me true pleasure to
 be in any way serviceable to a human creature.'
 
 "'Excellent man! I thank you, and accept your generous offer. You raise
 me from the dust by this kindness; and I trust that, by your aid, I
 shall not be driven from the society and sympathy of your
 fellow-creatures.'
 
 "'Heaven forbid! even if you were really criminal; for that can only
 drive you to desperation, and not instigate you to virtue. I also am
 unfortunate; I and my family have been condemned, although innocent:
 judge, therefore, if I do not feel for your misfortunes.'
 
 "'How can I thank you, my best and only benefactor? from your lips first
 have I heard the voice of kindness directed towards me; I shall be for
 ever grateful; and your present humanity assures me of success with
 those friends whom I am on the point of meeting.'
 
 "'May I know the names and residence of those friends?'
 
 "I paused. This, I thought, was the moment of decision, which was to rob
 me of, or bestow happiness on me for ever. I struggled vainly for
 firmness sufficient to answer him, but the effort destroyed all my
 remaining strength; I sank on the chair, and sobbed aloud. At that
 moment I heard the steps of my younger protectors. I had not a moment to
 lose; but, seizing the hand of the old man, I cried, 'Now is the
 time!--save and protect me! You and your family are the friends whom I
 seek. Do not you desert me in the hour of trial!'
 
 "'Great God!' exclaimed the old man, 'who are you?'
 
 "At that instant the cottage door was opened, and Felix, Safie, and
 Agatha entered. Who can describe their horror and consternation on
 beholding me? Agatha fainted; and Safie, unable to attend to her friend,
 rushed out of the cottage. Felix darted forward, and with supernatural
 force tore me from his father, to whose knees I clung: in a transport of
 fury, he dashed me to the ground, and struck me violently with a stick.
 I could have torn him limb from limb, as the lion rends the antelope.
 But my heart sunk within me as with bitter sickness, and I refrained. I
 saw him on the point of repeating his blow, when, overcome by pain and
 anguish, I quitted the cottage, and in the general tumult escaped
 unperceived to my hovel."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 "Cursed, cursed creator! Why did I live? Why, in that instant, did I not
 extinguish the spark of existence which you had so wantonly bestowed? I
 know not; despair had not yet taken possession of me; my feelings were
 those of rage and revenge. I could with pleasure have destroyed the
 cottage and its inhabitants, and have glutted myself with their shrieks
 and misery.
 
 "When night came, I quitted my retreat, and wandered in the wood; and
 now, no longer restrained by the fear of discovery, I gave vent to my
 anguish in fearful howlings. I was like a wild beast that had broken the
 toils; destroying the objects that obstructed me, and ranging through
 the wood with a stag-like swiftness. Oh! what a miserable night I
 passed! the cold stars shone in mockery, and the bare trees waved their
 branches above me: now and then the sweet voice of a bird burst forth
 amidst the universal stillness. All, save I, were at rest or in
 enjoyment: I, like the arch fiend, bore a hell within me; and, finding
 myself unsympathized with, wished to tear up the trees, spread havoc and
 destruction around me, and then to have sat down and enjoyed the ruin.
 
 "But this was a luxury of sensation that could not endure; I became
 fatigued with excess of bodily exertion, and sank on the damp grass in
 the sick impotence of despair. There was none among the myriads of men
 that existed who would pity or assist me; and should I feel kindness
 towards my enemies? No: from that moment I declared everlasting war
 against the species, and, more than all, against him who had formed me,
 and sent me forth to this insupportable misery.
 
 "The sun rose; I heard the voices of men, and knew that it was
 impossible to return to my retreat during that day. Accordingly I hid
 myself in some thick underwood, determining to devote the ensuing hours
 to reflection on my situation.
 
 "The pleasant sunshine, and the pure air of day, restored me to some
 degree of tranquillity; and when I considered what had passed at the
 cottage, I could not help believing that I had been too hasty in my
 conclusions. I had certainly acted imprudently. It was apparent that my
 conversation had interested the father in my behalf, and I was a fool in
 having exposed my person to the horror of his children. I ought to have
 familiarized the old De Lacy to me, and by degrees have discovered
 myself to the rest of his family, when they should have been prepared
 for my approach. But I did not believe my errors to be irretrievable;
 and, after much consideration, I resolved to return to the cottage, seek
 the old man, and by my representations win him to my party.
 
 "These thoughts calmed me, and in the afternoon I sank into a profound
 sleep; but the fever of my blood did not allow me to be visited by
 peaceful dreams. The horrible scene of the preceding day was for ever
 acting before my eyes; the females were flying, and the enraged Felix
 tearing me from his father's feet. I awoke exhausted; and, finding that
 it was already night, I crept forth from my hiding-place, and went in
 search of food.
 
 "When my hunger was appeased, I directed my steps towards the well-known
 path that conducted to the cottage. All there was at peace. I crept into
 my hovel, and remained in silent expectation of the accustomed hour when
 the family arose. That hour past, the sun mounted high in the heavens,
 but the cottagers did not appear. I trembled violently, apprehending
 some dreadful misfortune. The inside of the cottage was dark, and I
 heard no motion; I cannot describe the agony of this suspence.
 
 "Presently two countrymen passed by; but, pausing near the cottage, they
 entered into conversation, using violent gesticulations; but I did not
 understand what they said, as they spoke the language of the country,
 which differed from that of my protectors. Soon after, however, Felix
 approached with another man: I was surprised, as I knew that he had not
 quitted the cottage that morning, and waited anxiously to discover, from
 his discourse, the meaning of these unusual appearances.
 
 "'Do you consider,' said his companion to him, 'that you will be obliged
 to pay three months' rent, and to lose the produce of your garden? I do
 not wish to take any unfair advantage, and I beg therefore that you will
 take some days to consider of your determination.'
 
 "'It is utterly useless,' replied Felix, 'we can never again inhabit
 your cottage. The life of my father is in the greatest danger, owing to
 the dreadful circumstance that I have related. My wife and my sister
 will never recover their horror. I entreat you not to reason with me any
 more. Take possession of your tenement, and let me fly from this place.'
 
 "Felix trembled violently as he said this. He and his companion entered
 the cottage, in which they remained for a few minutes, and then
 departed. I never saw any of the family of De Lacy more.
 
 "I continued for the remainder of the day in my hovel in a state of
 utter and stupid despair. My protectors had departed, and had broken the
 only link that held me to the world. For the first time the feelings of
 revenge and hatred filled my bosom, and I did not strive to controul
 them; but, allowing myself to be borne away by the stream, I bent my
 mind towards injury and death. When I thought of my friends, of the mild
 voice of De Lacy, the gentle eyes of Agatha, and the exquisite beauty of
 the Arabian, these thoughts vanished, and a gush of tears somewhat
 soothed me. But again, when I reflected that they had spurned and
 deserted me, anger returned, a rage of anger; and, unable to injure any
 thing human, I turned my fury towards inanimate objects. As night
 advanced, I placed a variety of combustibles around the cottage; and,
 after having destroyed every vestige of cultivation in the garden, I
 waited with forced impatience until the moon had sunk to commence my
 operations.
 
 "As the night advanced, a fierce wind arose from the woods, and quickly
 dispersed the clouds that had loitered in the heavens: the blast tore
 along like a mighty avalanche, and produced a kind of insanity in my
 spirits, that burst all bounds of reason and reflection. I lighted the
 dry branch of a tree, and danced with fury around the devoted cottage,
 my eyes still fixed on the western horizon, the edge of which the moon
 nearly touched. A part of its orb was at length hid, and I waved my
 brand; it sunk, and, with a loud scream, I fired the straw, and heath,
 and bushes, which I had collected. The wind fanned the fire, and the
 cottage was quickly enveloped by the flames, which clung to it, and
 licked it with their forked and destroying tongues.
 
 "As soon as I was convinced that no assistance could save any part of
 the habitation, I quitted the scene, and sought for refuge in the woods.
 
 "And now, with the world before me, whither should I bend my steps? I
 resolved to fly far from the scene of my misfortunes; but to me, hated
 and despised, every country must be equally horrible. At length the
 thought of you crossed my mind. I learned from your papers that you were
 my father, my creator; and to whom could I apply with more fitness than
 to him who had given me life? Among the lessons that Felix had bestowed
 upon Safie geography had not been omitted: I had learned from these the
 relative situations of the different countries of the earth. You had
 mentioned Geneva as the name of your native town; and towards this place
 I resolved to proceed.
 
 "But how was I to direct myself? I knew that I must travel in a
 south-westerly direction to reach my destination; but the sun was my
 only guide. I did not know the names of the towns that I was to pass
 through, nor could I ask information from a single human being; but I
 did not despair. From you only could I hope for succour, although
 towards you I felt no sentiment but that of hatred. Unfeeling, heartless
 creator! you had endowed me with perceptions and passions, and then cast
 me abroad an object for the scorn and horror of mankind. But on you only
 had I any claim for pity and redress, and from you I determined to seek
 that justice which I vainly attempted to gain from any other being that
 wore the human form.
 
 "My travels were long, and the sufferings I endured intense. It was late
 in autumn when I quitted the district where I had so long resided. I
 travelled only at night, fearful of encountering the visage of a human
 being. Nature decayed around me, and the sun became heatless; rain and
 snow poured around me; mighty rivers were frozen; the surface of the
 earth was hard, and chill, and bare, and I found no shelter. Oh, earth!
 how often did I imprecate curses on the cause of my being! The mildness
 of my nature had fled, and all within me was turned to gall and
 bitterness. The nearer I approached to your habitation, the more deeply
 did I feel the spirit of revenge enkindled in my heart. Snow fell, and
 the waters were hardened, but I rested not. A few incidents now and then
 directed me, and I possessed a map of the country; but I often wandered
 wide from my path. The agony of my feelings allowed me no respite: no
 incident occurred from which my rage and misery could not extract its
 food; but a circumstance that happened when I arrived on the confines of
 Switzerland, when the sun had recovered its warmth, and the earth again
 began to look green, confirmed in an especial manner the bitterness and
 horror of my feelings.
 
 "I generally rested during the day, and travelled only when I was
 secured by night from the view of man. One morning, however, finding
 that my path lay through a deep wood, I ventured to continue my journey
 after the sun had risen; the day, which was one of the first of spring,
 cheered even me by the loveliness of its sunshine and the balminess of
 the air. I felt emotions of gentleness and pleasure, that had long
 appeared dead, revive within me. Half surprised by the novelty of these
 sensations, I allowed myself to be borne away by them; and, forgetting
 my solitude and deformity, dared to be happy. Soft tears again bedewed
 my cheeks, and I even raised my humid eyes with thankfulness towards the
 blessed sun which bestowed such joy upon me.
 
 "I continued to wind among the paths of the wood, until I came to its
 boundary, which was skirted by a deep and rapid river, into which many
 of the trees bent their branches, now budding with the fresh spring.
 Here I paused, not exactly knowing what path to pursue, when I heard the
 sound of voices, that induced me to conceal myself under the shade of a
 cypress. I was scarcely hid, when a young girl came running towards the
 spot where I was concealed, laughing as if she ran from some one in
 sport. She continued her course along the precipitous sides of the
 river, when suddenly her foot slipt, and she fell into the rapid stream.
 I rushed from my hiding place, and, with extreme labour from the force
 of the current, saved her, and dragged her to shore. She was senseless;
 and I endeavoured, by every means in my power, to restore animation,
 when I was suddenly interrupted by the approach of a rustic, who was
 probably the person from whom she had playfully fled. On seeing me, he
 darted towards me, and, tearing the girl from my arms, hastened towards
 the deeper parts of the wood. I followed speedily, I hardly knew why;
 but when the man saw me draw near, he aimed a gun, which he carried, at
 my body, and fired. I sunk to the ground, and my injurer, with increased
 swiftness, escaped into the wood.
 
 "This was then the reward of my benevolence! I had saved a human being
 from destruction, and, as a recompence, I now writhed under the
 miserable pain of a wound, which shattered the flesh and bone. The
 feelings of kindness and gentleness, which I had entertained but a few
 moments before, gave place to hellish rage and gnashing of teeth.
 Inflamed by pain, I vowed eternal hatred and vengeance to all mankind.
 But the agony of my wound overcame me; my pulses paused, and I fainted.
 
 "For some weeks I led a miserable life in the woods, endeavouring to
 cure the wound which I had received. The ball had entered my shoulder,
 and I knew not whether it had remained there or passed through; at any
 rate I had no means of extracting it. My sufferings were augmented also
 by the oppressive sense of the injustice and ingratitude of their
 infliction. My daily vows rose for revenge--a deep and deadly revenge,
 such as would alone compensate for the outrages and anguish I had
 endured.
 
 "After some weeks my wound healed, and I continued my journey. The
 labours I endured were no longer to be alleviated by the bright sun or
 gentle breezes of spring; all joy was but a mockery, which insulted my
 desolate state, and made me feel more painfully that I was not made for
 the enjoyment of pleasure.
 
 "But my toils now drew near a close and, two months from this time, I
 reached the environs of Geneva.
 
 "It was evening when I arrived, and I retired to a hiding-place among
 the fields that surround it, to meditate in what manner I should apply
 to you. I was oppressed by fatigue and hunger, and far too unhappy to
 enjoy the gentle breezes of evening, or the prospect of the sun setting
 behind the stupendous mountains of Jura.
 
 "At this time a slight sleep relieved me from the pain of reflection,
 which was disturbed by the approach of a beautiful child, who came
 running into the recess I had chosen with all the sportiveness of
 infancy. Suddenly, as I gazed on him, an idea seized me, that this
 little creature was unprejudiced, and had lived too short a time to have
 imbibed a horror of deformity. If, therefore, I could seize him, and
 educate him as my companion and friend, I should not be so desolate in
 this peopled earth.
 
 "Urged by this impulse, I seized on the boy as he passed, and drew him
 towards me. As soon as he beheld my form, he placed his hands before his
 eyes, and uttered a shrill scream: I drew his hand forcibly from his
 face, and said, 'Child, what is the meaning of this? I do not intend to
 hurt you; listen to me.'
 
 "He struggled violently; 'Let me go,' he cried; 'monster! ugly wretch!
 you wish to eat me, and tear me to pieces--You are an ogre--Let me go,
 or I will tell my papa.'
 
 "'Boy, you will never see your father again; you must come with me.'
 
 "'Hideous monster! let me go; My papa is a Syndic--he is M.
 Frankenstein--he would punish you. You dare not keep me.'
 
 "'Frankenstein! you belong then to my enemy--to him towards whom I have
 sworn eternal revenge; you shall be my first victim.'
 
 "The child still struggled, and loaded me with epithets which carried
 despair to my heart: I grasped his throat to silence him, and in a
 moment he lay dead at my feet.
 
 "I gazed on my victim, and my heart swelled with exultation and hellish
 triumph: clapping my hands, I exclaimed, 'I, too, can create desolation;
 my enemy is not impregnable; this death will carry despair to him, and a
 thousand other miseries shall torment and destroy him.'
 
 "As I fixed my eyes on the child, I saw something glittering on his
 breast. I took it; it was a portrait of a most lovely woman. In spite of
 my malignity, it softened and attracted me. For a few moments I gazed
 with delight on her dark eyes, fringed by deep lashes, and her lovely
 lips; but presently my rage returned: I remembered that I was for ever
 deprived of the delights that such beautiful creatures could bestow; and
 that she whose resemblance I contemplated would, in regarding me, have
 changed that air of divine benignity to one expressive of disgust and
 affright.
 
 "Can you wonder that such thoughts transported me with rage? I only
 wonder that at that moment, instead of venting my sensations in
 exclamations and agony, I did not rush among mankind, and perish in the
 attempt to destroy them.
 
 "While I was overcome by these feelings, I left the spot where I had
 committed the murder, and was seeking a more secluded hiding-place, when
 I perceived a woman passing near me. She was young, not indeed so
 beautiful as her whose portrait I held, but of an agreeable aspect, and
 blooming in the loveliness of youth and health. Here, I thought, is one
 of those whose smiles are bestowed on all but me; she shall not escape:
 thanks to the lessons of Felix, and the sanguinary laws of man, I have
 learned how to work mischief. I approached her unperceived, and placed
 the portrait securely in one of the folds of her dress.
 
 "For some days I haunted the spot where these scenes had taken place;
 sometimes wishing to see you, sometimes resolved to quit the world and
 its miseries for ever. At length I wandered towards these mountains, and
 have ranged through their immense recesses, consumed by a burning
 passion which you alone can gratify. We may not part until you have
 promised to comply with my requisition. I am alone, and miserable; man
 will not associate with me; but one as deformed and horrible as myself
 would not deny herself to me. My companion must be of the same species,
 and have the same defects. This being you must create."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 The being finished speaking, and fixed his looks upon me in expectation
 of a reply. But I was bewildered, perplexed, and unable to arrange my
 ideas sufficiently to understand the full extent of his proposition. He
 continued--
 
 "You must create a female for me, with whom I can live in the
 interchange of those sympathies necessary for my being. This you alone
 can do; and I demand it of you as a right which you must not refuse."
 
 The latter part of his tale had kindled anew in me the anger that had
 died away while he narrated his peaceful life among the cottagers, and,
 as he said this, I could no longer suppress the rage that burned within
 me.
 
 "I do refuse it," I replied; "and no torture shall ever extort a consent
 from me. You may render me the most miserable of men, but you shall
 never make me base in my own eyes. Shall I create another like yourself,
 whose joint wickedness might desolate the world. Begone! I have answered
 you; you may torture me, but I will never consent."
 
 "You are in the wrong," replied the fiend; "and, instead of threatening,
 I am content to reason with you. I am malicious because I am miserable;
 am I not shunned and hated by all mankind? You, my creator, would tear
 me to pieces, and triumph; remember that, and tell me why I should pity
 man more than he pities me? You would not call it murder, if you could
 precipitate me into one of those ice-rifts, and destroy my frame, the
 work of your own hands. Shall I respect man, when he contemns me? Let
 him live with me in the interchange of kindness, and, instead of injury,
 I would bestow every benefit upon him with tears of gratitude at his
 acceptance. But that cannot be; the human senses are insurmountable
 barriers to our union. Yet mine shall not be the submission of abject
 slavery. I will revenge my injuries: if I cannot inspire love, I will
 cause fear; and chiefly towards you my arch-enemy, because my creator,
 do I swear inextinguishable hatred. Have a care: I will work at your
 destruction, nor finish until I desolate your heart, so that you curse
 the hour of your birth."
 
 A fiendish rage animated him as he said this; his face was wrinkled into
 contortions too horrible for human eyes to behold; but presently he
 calmed himself, and proceeded--
 
 "I intended to reason. This passion is detrimental to me; for you do not
 reflect that you are the cause of its excess. If any being felt emotions
 of benevolence towards me, I should return them an hundred and an
 hundred fold; for that one creature's sake, I would make peace with the
 whole kind! But I now indulge in dreams of bliss that cannot be
 realized. What I ask of you is reasonable and moderate; I demand a
 creature of another sex, but as hideous as myself: the gratification is
 small, but it is all that I can receive, and it shall content me. It is
 true, we shall be monsters, cut off from all the world; but on that
 account we shall be more attached to one another. Our lives will not be
 happy, but they will be harmless, and free from the misery I now feel.
 Oh! my creator, make me happy; let me feel gratitude towards you for one
 benefit! Let me see that I excite the sympathy of some existing thing;
 do not deny me my request!"
 
 I was moved. I shuddered when I thought of the possible consequences of
 my consent; but I felt that there was some justice in his argument. His
 tale, and the feelings he now expressed, proved him to be a creature of
 fine sensations; and did I not, as his maker, owe him all the portion of
 happiness that it was in my power to bestow? He saw my change of
 feeling, and continued--
 
 "If you consent, neither you nor any other human being shall ever see us
 again: I will go to the vast wilds of South America. My food is not that
 of man; I do not destroy the lamb and the kid, to glut my appetite;
 acorns and berries afford me sufficient nourishment. My companion will
 be of the same nature as myself, and will be content with the same fare.
 We shall make our bed of dried leaves; the sun will shine on us as on
 man, and will ripen our food. The picture I present to you is peaceful
 and human, and you must feel that you could deny it only in the
 wantonness of power and cruelty. Pitiless as you have been towards me, I
 now see compassion in your eyes: let me seize the favourable moment, and
 persuade you to promise what I so ardently desire."
 
 "You propose," replied I, "to fly from the habitations of man, to dwell
 in those wilds where the beasts of the field will be your only
 companions. How can you, who long for the love and sympathy of man,
 persevere in this exile? You will return, and again seek their kindness,
 and you will meet with their detestation; your evil passions will be
 renewed, and you will then have a companion to aid you in the task of
 destruction. This may not be; cease to argue the point, for I cannot
 consent."
 
 "How inconstant are your feelings! but a moment ago you were moved by my
 representations, and why do you again harden yourself to my complaints?
 I swear to you, by the earth which I inhabit, and by you that made me,
 that, with the companion you bestow, I will quit the neighbourhood of
 man, and dwell, as it may chance, in the most savage of places. My evil
 passions will have fled, for I shall meet with sympathy; my life will
 flow quietly away, and, in my dying moments, I shall not curse my
 maker."
 
 His words had a strange effect upon me. I compassionated him, and
 sometimes felt a wish to console him; but when I looked upon him, when I
 saw the filthy mass that moved and talked, my heart sickened, and my
 feelings were altered to those of horror and hatred. I tried to stifle
 these sensations; I thought, that as I could not sympathize with him, I
 had no right to withhold from him the small portion of happiness which
 was yet in my power to bestow.
 
 "You swear," I said, "to be harmless; but have you not already shewn a
 degree of malice that should reasonably make me distrust you? May not
 even this be a feint that will increase your triumph by affording a
 wider scope for your revenge?"
 
 "How is this? I thought I had moved your compassion, and yet you still
 refuse to bestow on me the only benefit that can soften my heart, and
 render me harmless. If I have no ties and no affections, hatred and vice
 must be my portion; the love of another will destroy the cause of my
 crimes, and I shall become a thing, of whose existence every one will be
 ignorant. My vices are the children of a forced solitude that I abhor;
 and my virtues will necessarily arise when I live in communion with an
 equal. I shall feel the affections of a sensitive being, and become
 linked to the chain of existence and events, from which I am now
 excluded."
 
 I paused some time to reflect on all he had related, and the various
 arguments which he had employed. I thought of the promise of virtues
 which he had displayed on the opening of his existence, and the
 subsequent blight of all kindly feeling by the loathing and scorn which
 his protectors had manifested towards him. His power and threats were
 not omitted in my calculations: a creature who could exist in the ice
 caves of the glaciers, and hide himself from pursuit among the ridges of
 inaccessible precipices, was a being possessing faculties it would be
 vain to cope with. After a long pause of reflection, I concluded, that
 the justice due both to him and my fellow-creatures demanded of me that
 I should comply with his request. Turning to him, therefore, I said--
 
 "I consent to your demand, on your solemn oath to quit Europe for ever,
 and every other place in the neighbourhood of man, as soon as I shall
 deliver into your hands a female who will accompany you in your exile."
 
 "I swear," he cried, "by the sun, and by the blue sky of heaven, that if
 you grant my prayer, while they exist you shall never behold me again.
 Depart to your home, and commence your labours: I shall watch their
 progress with unutterable anxiety; and fear not but that when you are
 ready I shall appear."
 
 Saying this, he suddenly quitted me, fearful, perhaps, of any change in
 my sentiments. I saw him descend the mountain with greater speed than
 the flight of an eagle, and quickly lost him among the undulations of
 the sea of ice.
 
 His tale had occupied the whole day; and the sun was upon the verge of
 the horizon when he departed. I knew that I ought to hasten my descent
 towards the valley, as I should soon be encompassed in darkness; but my
 heart was heavy, and my steps slow. The labour of winding among the
 little paths of the mountains, and fixing my feet firmly as I advanced,
 perplexed me, occupied as I was by the emotions which the occurrences of
 the day had produced. Night was far advanced, when I came to the
 half-way resting-place, and seated myself beside the fountain. The stars
 shone at intervals, as the clouds passed from over them; the dark pines
 rose before me, and every here and there a broken tree lay on the
 ground: it was a scene of wonderful solemnity, and stirred strange
 thoughts within me. I wept bitterly; and, clasping my hands in agony, I
 exclaimed, "Oh! stars, and clouds, and winds, ye are all about to mock
 me: if ye really pity me, crush sensation and memory; let me become as
 nought; but if not, depart, depart and leave me in darkness."
 
 These were wild and miserable thoughts; but I cannot describe to you how
 the eternal twinkling of the stars weighed upon me, and how I listened
 to every blast of wind, as if it were a dull ugly siroc on its way to
 consume me.
 
 Morning dawned before I arrived at the village of Chamounix; but my
 presence, so haggard and strange, hardly calmed the fears of my family,
 who had waited the whole night in anxious expectation of my return.
 
 The following day we returned to Geneva. The intention of my father in
 coming had been to divert my mind, and to restore me to my lost
 tranquillity; but the medicine had been fatal. And, unable to account
 for the excess of misery I appeared to suffer, he hastened to return
 home, hoping the quiet and monotony of a domestic life would by degrees
 alleviate my sufferings from whatsoever cause they might spring.
 
 For myself, I was passive in all their arrangements; and the gentle
 affection of my beloved Elizabeth was inadequate to draw me from the
 depth of my despair. The promise I had made to the daemon weighed upon my
 mind, like Dante's iron cowl on the heads of the hellish hypocrites. All
 pleasures of earth and sky passed before me like a dream, and that
 thought only had to me the reality of life. Can you wonder, that
 sometimes a kind of insanity possessed me, or that I saw continually
 about me a multitude of filthy animals inflicting on me incessant
 torture, that often extorted screams and bitter groans?
 
 By degrees, however, these feelings became calmed. I entered again into
 the every-day scene of life, if not with interest, at least with some
 degree of tranquillity.
 
 
 END OF VOL. II.
 
 
 
 
 FRANKENSTEIN;
 
 OR,
 
 THE MODERN PROMETHEUS.
 
 
     IN THREE VOLUMES.
     VOL. III.
 
     London:
 
     _PRINTED FOR_
     LACKINGTON, HUGHES, HARDING, MAVOR, & JONES,
     FINSBURY SQUARE.
 
     1818.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
     Did I request thee, Maker, from my clay
     To mould me man? Did I solicit thee
     From darkness to promote me?----
 
     Paradise Lost.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 Day after day, week after week, passed away on my return to Geneva; and
 I could not collect the courage to recommence my work. I feared the
 vengeance of the disappointed fiend, yet I was unable to overcome my
 repugnance to the task which was enjoined me. I found that I could not
 compose a female without again devoting several months to profound study
 and laborious disquisition. I had heard of some discoveries having been
 made by an English philosopher, the knowledge of which was material to
 my success, and I sometimes thought of obtaining my father's consent to
 visit England for this purpose; but I clung to every pretence of delay,
 and could not resolve to interrupt my returning tranquillity. My health,
 which had hitherto declined, was now much restored; and my spirits, when
 unchecked by the memory of my unhappy promise, rose proportionably. My
 father saw this change with pleasure, and he turned his thoughts towards
 the best method of eradicating the remains of my melancholy, which
 every now and then would return by fits, and with a devouring blackness
 overcast the approaching sunshine. At these moments I took refuge in the
 most perfect solitude. I passed whole days on the lake alone in a little
 boat, watching the clouds, and listening to the rippling of the waves,
 silent and listless. But the fresh air and bright sun seldom failed to
 restore me to some degree of composure; and, on my return, I met the
 salutations of my friends with a readier smile and a more cheerful
 heart.
 
 It was after my return from one of these rambles that my father, calling
 me aside, thus addressed me:--
 
 "I am happy to remark, my dear son, that you have resumed your former
 pleasures, and seem to be returning to yourself. And yet you are still
 unhappy, and still avoid our society. For some time I was lost in
 conjecture as to the cause of this; but yesterday an idea struck me, and
 if it is well founded, I conjure you to avow it. Reserve on such a point
 would be not only useless, but draw down treble misery on us all."
 
 I trembled violently at this exordium, and my father continued--
 
 "I confess, my son, that I have always looked forward to your marriage
 with your cousin as the tie of our domestic comfort, and the stay of my
 declining years. You were attached to each other from your earliest
 infancy; you studied together, and appeared, in dispositions and tastes,
 entirely suited to one another. But so blind is the experience of man,
 that what I conceived to be the best assistants to my plan may have
 entirely destroyed it. You, perhaps, regard her as your sister, without
 any wish that she might become your wife. Nay, you may have met with
 another whom you may love; and, considering yourself as bound in honour
 to your cousin, this struggle may occasion the poignant misery which you
 appear to feel."
 
 "My dear father, re-assure yourself. I love my cousin tenderly and
 sincerely. I never saw any woman who excited, as Elizabeth does, my
 warmest admiration and affection. My future hopes and prospects are
 entirely bound up in the expectation of our union."
 
 "The expression of your sentiments on this subject, my dear Victor,
 gives me more pleasure than I have for some time experienced. If you
 feel thus, we shall assuredly be happy, however present events may cast
 a gloom over us. But it is this gloom, which appears to have taken so
 strong a hold of your mind, that I wish to dissipate. Tell me,
 therefore, whether you object to an immediate solemnization of the
 marriage. We have been unfortunate, and recent events have drawn us from
 that every-day tranquillity befitting my years and infirmities. You are
 younger; yet I do not suppose, possessed as you are of a competent
 fortune, that an early marriage would at all interfere with any future
 plans of honour and utility that you may have formed. Do not suppose,
 however, that I wish to dictate happiness to you, or that a delay on
 your part would cause me any serious uneasiness. Interpret my words
 with candour, and answer me, I conjure you, with confidence and
 sincerity."
 
 I listened to my father in silence, and remained for some time incapable
 of offering any reply. I revolved rapidly in my mind a multitude of
 thoughts, and endeavoured to arrive at some conclusion. Alas! to me the
 idea of an immediate union with my cousin was one of horror and dismay.
 I was bound by a solemn promise, which I had not yet fulfilled, and
 dared not break; or, if I did, what manifold miseries might not impend
 over me and my devoted family! Could I enter into a festival with this
 deadly weight yet hanging round my neck, and bowing me to the ground. I
 must perform my engagement, and let the monster depart with his mate,
 before I allowed myself to enjoy the delight of an union from which I
 expected peace.
 
 I remembered also the necessity imposed upon me of either journeying to
 England, or entering into a long correspondence with those philosophers
 of that country, whose knowledge and discoveries were of indispensable
 use to me in my present undertaking. The latter method of obtaining the
 desired intelligence was dilatory and unsatisfactory: besides, any
 variation was agreeable to me, and I was delighted with the idea of
 spending a year or two in change of scene and variety of occupation, in
 absence from my family; during which period some event might happen
 which would restore me to them in peace and happiness: my promise might
 be fulfilled, and the monster have departed; or some accident might
 occur to destroy him, and put an end to my slavery for ever.
 
 These feelings dictated my answer to my father. I expressed a wish to
 visit England; but, concealing the true reasons of this request, I
 clothed my desires under the guise of wishing to travel and see the
 world before I sat down for life within the walls of my native town.
 
 I urged my entreaty with earnestness, and my father was easily induced
 to comply; for a more indulgent and less dictatorial parent did not
 exist upon earth. Our plan was soon arranged. I should travel to
 Strasburgh, where Clerval would join me. Some short time would be spent
 in the towns of Holland, and our principal stay would be in England. We
 should return by France; and it was agreed that the tour should occupy
 the space of two years.
 
 My father pleased himself with the reflection, that my union with
 Elizabeth should take place immediately on my return to Geneva. "These
 two years," said he, "will pass swiftly, and it will be the last delay
 that will oppose itself to your happiness. And, indeed, I earnestly
 desire that period to arrive, when we shall all be united, and neither
 hopes or fears arise to disturb our domestic calm."
 
 "I am content," I replied, "with your arrangement. By that time we shall
 both have become wiser, and I hope happier, than we at present are." I
 sighed; but my father kindly forbore to question me further concerning
 the cause of my dejection. He hoped that new scenes, and the amusement
 of travelling, would restore my tranquillity.
 
 I now made arrangements for my journey; but one feeling haunted me,
 which filled me with fear and agitation. During my absence I should
 leave my friends unconscious of the existence of their enemy, and
 unprotected from his attacks, exasperated as he might be by my
 departure. But he had promised to follow me wherever I might go; and
 would he not accompany me to England? This imagination was dreadful in
 itself, but soothing, inasmuch as it supposed the safety of my friends.
 I was agonized with the idea of the possibility that the reverse of this
 might happen. But through the whole period during which I was the slave
 of my creature, I allowed myself to be governed by the impulses of the
 moment; and my present sensations strongly intimated that the fiend
 would follow me, and exempt my family from the danger of his
 machinations.
 
 It was in the latter end of August that I departed, to pass two years of
 exile. Elizabeth approved of the reasons of my departure, and only
 regretted that she had not the same opportunities of enlarging her
 experience, and cultivating her understanding. She wept, however, as she
 bade me farewell, and entreated me to return happy and tranquil. "We
 all," said she, "depend upon you; and if you are miserable, what must be
 our feelings?"
 
 I threw myself into the carriage that was to convey me away, hardly
 knowing whither I was going, and careless of what was passing around. I
 remembered only, and it was with a bitter anguish that I reflected on
 it, to order that my chemical instruments should be packed to go with
 me: for I resolved to fulfil my promise while abroad, and return, if
 possible, a free man. Filled with dreary imaginations, I passed through
 many beautiful and majestic scenes; but my eyes were fixed and
 unobserving. I could only think of the bourne of my travels, and the
 work which was to occupy me whilst they endured.
 
 After some days spent in listless indolence, during which I traversed
 many leagues, I arrived at Strasburgh, where I waited two days for
 Clerval. He came. Alas, how great was the contrast between us! He was
 alive to every new scene; joyful when he saw the beauties of the setting
 sun, and more happy when he beheld it rise, and recommence a new day. He
 pointed out to me the shifting colours of the landscape, and the
 appearances of the sky. "This is what it is to live;" he cried, "now I
 enjoy existence! But you, my dear Frankenstein, wherefore are you
 desponding and sorrowful?" In truth, I was occupied by gloomy thoughts,
 and neither saw the descent of the evening star, nor the golden sun-rise
 reflected in the Rhine.--And you, my friend, would be far more amused
 with the journal of Clerval, who observed the scenery with an eye of
 feeling and delight, than to listen to my reflections. I, a miserable
 wretch, haunted by a curse that shut up every avenue to enjoyment.
 
 We had agreed to descend the Rhine in a boat from Strasburgh to
 Rotterdam, whence we might take shipping for London. During this voyage,
 we passed by many willowy islands, and saw several beautiful towns. We
 staid a day at Manheim, and, on the fifth from our departure from
 Strasburgh, arrived at Mayence. The course of the Rhine below Mayence
 becomes much more picturesque. The river descends rapidly, and winds
 between hills, not high, but steep, and of beautiful forms. We saw many
 ruined castles standing on the edges of precipices, surrounded by black
 woods, high and inaccessible. This part of the Rhine, indeed, presents a
 singularly variegated landscape. In one spot you view rugged hills,
 ruined castles overlooking tremendous precipices, with the dark Rhine
 rushing beneath; and, on the sudden turn of a promontory, flourishing
 vineyards, with green sloping banks, and a meandering river, and
 populous towns, occupy the scene.
 
 We travelled at the time of the vintage, and heard the song of the
 labourers, as we glided down the stream. Even I, depressed in mind, and
 my spirits continually agitated by gloomy feelings, even I was pleased.
 I lay at the bottom of the boat, and, as I gazed on the cloudless blue
 sky, I seemed to drink in a tranquillity to which I had long been a
 stranger. And if these were my sensations, who can describe those of
 Henry? He felt as if he had been transported to Fairy-land, and enjoyed
 a happiness seldom tasted by man. "I have seen," he said, "the most
 beautiful scenes of my own country; I have visited the lakes of Lucerne
 and Uri, where the snowy mountains descend almost perpendicularly to the
 water, casting black and impenetrable shades, which would cause a gloomy
 and mournful appearance, were it not for the most verdant islands that
 relieve the eye by their gay appearance; I have seen this lake agitated
 by a tempest, when the wind tore up whirlwinds of water, and gave you an
 idea of what the water-spout must be on the great ocean, and the waves
 dash with fury the base of the mountain, where the priest and his
 mistress were overwhelmed by an avalanche, and where their dying voices
 are still said to be heard amid the pauses of the nightly wind; I have
 seen the mountains of La Valais, and the Pays de Vaud: but this country,
 Victor, pleases me more than all those wonders. The mountains of
 Switzerland are more majestic and strange; but there is a charm in the
 banks of this divine river, that I never before saw equalled. Look at
 that castle which overhangs yon precipice; and that also on the island,
 almost concealed amongst the foliage of those lovely trees; and now that
 group of labourers coming from among their vines; and that village
 half-hid in the recess of the mountain. Oh, surely, the spirit that
 inhabits and guards this place has a soul more in harmony with man, than
 those who pile the glacier, or retire to the inaccessible peaks of the
 mountains of our own country."
 
 Clerval! beloved friend! even now it delights me to record your words,
 and to dwell on the praise of which you are so eminently deserving. He
 was a being formed in the "very poetry of nature." His wild and
 enthusiastic imagination was chastened by the sensibility of his heart.
 His soul overflowed with ardent affections, and his friendship was of
 that devoted and wondrous nature that the worldly-minded teach us to
 look for only in the imagination. But even human sympathies were not
 sufficient to satisfy his eager mind. The scenery of external nature,
 which others regard only with admiration, he loved with ardour:
 
     ---- ----"The sounding cataract
     Haunted _him_ like a passion: the tall rock,
     The mountain, and the deep and gloomy wood,
     Their colours and their forms, were then to him
     An appetite; a feeling, and a love,
     That had no need of a remoter charm,
     By thought supplied, or any interest
     Unborrowed from the eye."
 
 And where does he now exist? Is this gentle and lovely being lost for
 ever? Has this mind so replete with ideas, imaginations fanciful and
 magnificent, which formed a world, whose existence depended on the life
 of its creator; has this mind perished? Does it now only exist in my
 memory? No, it is not thus; your form so divinely wrought, and beaming
 with beauty, has decayed, but your spirit still visits and consoles your
 unhappy friend.
 
 Pardon this gush of sorrow; these ineffectual words are but a slight
 tribute to the unexampled worth of Henry, but they soothe my heart,
 overflowing with the anguish which his remembrance creates. I will
 proceed with my tale.
 
 Beyond Cologne we descended to the plains of Holland; and we resolved to
 post the remainder of our way; for the wind was contrary, and the stream
 of the river was too gentle to aid us.
 
 Our journey here lost the interest arising from beautiful scenery; but
 we arrived in a few days at Rotterdam, whence we proceeded by sea to
 England. It was on a clear morning, in the latter days of December, that
 I first saw the white cliffs of Britain. The banks of the Thames
 presented a new scene; they were flat, but fertile, and almost every
 town was marked by the remembrance of some story. We saw Tilbury Fort,
 and remembered the Spanish armada; Gravesend, Woolwich, and Greenwich,
 places which I had heard of even in my country.
 
 At length we saw the numerous steeples of London, St. Paul's towering
 above all, and the Tower famed in English history.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 London was our present point of rest; we determined to remain several
 months in this wonderful and celebrated city. Clerval desired the
 intercourse of the men of genius and talent who flourished at this time;
 but this was with me a secondary object; I was principally occupied with
 the means of obtaining the information necessary for the completion of
 my promise, and quickly availed myself of the letters of introduction
 that I had brought with me, addressed to the most distinguished natural
 philosophers.
 
 If this journey had taken place during my days of study and happiness,
 it would have afforded me inexpressible pleasure. But a blight had come
 over my existence, and I only visited these people for the sake of the
 information they might give me on the subject in which my interest was
 so terribly profound. Company was irksome to me; when alone, I could
 fill my mind with the sights of heaven and earth; the voice of Henry
 soothed me, and I could thus cheat myself into a transitory peace. But
 busy uninteresting joyous faces brought back despair to my heart. I saw
 an insurmountable barrier placed between me and my fellow-men; this
 barrier was sealed with the blood of William and Justine; and to reflect
 on the events connected with those names filled my soul with anguish.
 
 But in Clerval I saw the image of my former self; he was inquisitive,
 and anxious to gain experience and instruction. The difference of
 manners which he observed was to him an inexhaustible source of
 instruction and amusement. He was for ever busy; and the only check to
 his enjoyments was my sorrowful and dejected mien. I tried to conceal
 this as much as possible, that I might not debar him from the pleasures
 natural to one who was entering on a new scene of life, undisturbed by
 any care or bitter recollection. I often refused to accompany him,
 alleging another engagement, that I might remain alone. I now also began
 to collect the materials necessary for my new creation, and this was to
 me like the torture of single drops of water continually falling on the
 head. Every thought that was devoted to it was an extreme anguish, and
 every word that I spoke in allusion to it caused my lips to quiver, and
 my heart to palpitate.
 
 After passing some months in London, we received a letter from a person
 in Scotland, who had formerly been our visitor at Geneva. He mentioned
 the beauties of his native country, and asked us if those were not
 sufficient allurements to induce us to prolong our journey as far north
 as Perth, where he resided. Clerval eagerly desired to accept this
 invitation; and I, although I abhorred society, wished to view again
 mountains and streams, and all the wondrous works with which Nature
 adorns her chosen dwelling-places.
 
 We had arrived in England at the beginning of October, and it was now
 February. We accordingly determined to commence our journey towards the
 north at the expiration of another month. In this expedition we did not
 intend to follow the great road to Edinburgh, but to visit Windsor,
 Oxford, Matlock, and the Cumberland lakes, resolving to arrive at the
 completion of this tour about the end of July. I packed my chemical
 instruments, and the materials I had collected, resolving to finish my
 labours in some obscure nook in the northern highlands of Scotland.
 
 We quitted London on the 27th of March, and remained a few days at
 Windsor, rambling in its beautiful forest. This was a new scene to us
 mountaineers; the majestic oaks, the quantity of game, and the herds of
 stately deer, were all novelties to us.
 
 From thence we proceeded to Oxford. As we entered this city, our minds
 were filled with the remembrance of the events that had been transacted
 there more than a century and a half before. It was here that Charles I.
 had collected his forces. This city had remained faithful to him, after
 the whole nation had forsaken his cause to join the standard of
 parliament and liberty. The memory of that unfortunate king, and his
 companions, the amiable Falkland, the insolent Gower, his queen, and
 son, gave a peculiar interest to every part of the city, which they
 might be supposed to have inhabited. The spirit of elder days found a
 dwelling here, and we delighted to trace its footsteps. If these
 feelings had not found an imaginary gratification, the appearance of the
 city had yet in itself sufficient beauty to obtain our admiration. The
 colleges are ancient and picturesque; the streets are almost
 magnificent; and the lovely Isis, which flows beside it through meadows
 of exquisite verdure, is spread forth into a placid expanse of waters,
 which reflects its majestic assemblage of towers, and spires, and domes,
 embosomed among aged trees.
 
 I enjoyed this scene; and yet my enjoyment was embittered both by the
 memory of the past, and the anticipation of the future. I was formed for
 peaceful happiness. During my youthful days discontent never visited my
 mind; and if I was ever overcome by _ennui_, the sight of what is
 beautiful in nature, or the study of what is excellent and sublime in
 the productions of man, could always interest my heart, and communicate
 elasticity to my spirits. But I am a blasted tree; the bolt has entered
 my soul; and I felt then that I should survive to exhibit, what I shall
 soon cease to be--a miserable spectacle of wrecked humanity, pitiable to
 others, and abhorrent to myself.
 
 We passed a considerable period at Oxford, rambling among its environs,
 and endeavouring to identify every spot which might relate to the most
 animating epoch of English history. Our little voyages of discovery were
 often prolonged by the successive objects that presented themselves. We
 visited the tomb of the illustrious Hampden, and the field on which that
 patriot fell. For a moment my soul was elevated from its debasing and
 miserable fears to contemplate the divine ideas of liberty and
 self-sacrifice, of which these sights were the monuments and the
 remembrancers. For an instant I dared to shake off my chains, and look
 around me with a free and lofty spirit; but the iron had eaten into my
 flesh, and I sank again, trembling and hopeless, into my miserable self.
 
 We left Oxford with regret, and proceeded to Matlock, which was our next
 place of rest. The country in the neighbourhood of this village
 resembled, to a greater degree, the scenery of Switzerland; but every
 thing is on a lower scale, and the green hills want the crown of distant
 white Alps, which always attend on the piny mountains of my native
 country. We visited the wondrous cave, and the little cabinets of
 natural history, where the curiosities are disposed in the same manner
 as in the collections at Servox and Chamounix. The latter name made me
 tremble, when pronounced by Henry; and I hastened to quit Matlock, with
 which that terrible scene was thus associated.
 
 From Derby still journeying northward, we passed two months in
 Cumberland and Westmoreland. I could now almost fancy myself among the
 Swiss mountains. The little patches of snow which yet lingered on the
 northern sides of the mountains, the lakes, and the dashing of the rocky
 streams, were all familiar and dear sights to me. Here also we made some
 acquaintances, who almost contrived to cheat me into happiness. The
 delight of Clerval was proportionably greater than mine; his mind
 expanded in the company of men of talent, and he found in his own nature
 greater capacities and resources than he could have imagined himself to
 have possessed while he associated with his inferiors. "I could pass my
 life here," said he to me; "and among these mountains I should scarcely
 regret Switzerland and the Rhine."
 
 But he found that a traveller's life is one that includes much pain
 amidst its enjoyments. His feelings are for ever on the stretch; and
 when he begins to sink into repose, he finds himself obliged to quit
 that on which he rests in pleasure for something new, which again
 engages his attention, and which also he forsakes for other novelties.
 
 We had scarcely visited the various lakes of Cumberland and
 Westmoreland, and conceived an affection for some of the inhabitants,
 when the period of our appointment with our Scotch friend approached,
 and we left them to travel on. For my own part I was not sorry. I had
 now neglected my promise for some time, and I feared the effects of the
 daemon's disappointment. He might remain in Switzerland, and wreak his
 vengeance on my relatives. This idea pursued me, and tormented me at
 every moment from which I might otherwise have snatched repose and
 peace. I waited for my letters with feverish impatience: if they were
 delayed, I was miserable, and overcome by a thousand fears; and when
 they arrived, and I saw the superscription of Elizabeth or my father, I
 hardly dared to read and ascertain my fate. Sometimes I thought that the
 fiend followed me, and might expedite my remissness by murdering my
 companion. When these thoughts possessed me, I would not quit Henry for
 a moment, but followed him as his shadow, to protect him from the
 fancied rage of his destroyer. I felt as if I had committed some great
 crime, the consciousness of which haunted me. I was guiltless, but I had
 indeed drawn down a horrible curse upon my head, as mortal as that of
 crime.
 
 I visited Edinburgh with languid eyes and mind; and yet that city might
 have interested the most unfortunate being. Clerval did not like it so
 well as Oxford; for the antiquity of the latter city was more pleasing
 to him. But the beauty and regularity of the new town of Edinburgh, its
 romantic castle, and its environs, the most delightful in the world,
 Arthur's Seat, St. Bernard's Well, and the Pentland Hills, compensated
 him for the change, and filled him with cheerfulness and admiration. But
 I was impatient to arrive at the termination of my journey.
 
 We left Edinburgh in a week, passing through Coupar, St. Andrews, and
 along the banks of the Tay, to Perth, where our friend expected us. But
 I was in no mood to laugh and talk with strangers, or enter into their
 feelings or plans with the good humour expected from a guest; and
 accordingly I told Clerval that I wished to make the tour of Scotland
 alone. "Do you," said I, "enjoy yourself, and let this be our
 rendezvous. I may be absent a month or two; but do not interfere with my
 motions, I entreat you: leave me to peace and solitude for a short time;
 and when I return, I hope it will be with a lighter heart, more
 congenial to your own temper."
 
 Henry wished to dissuade me; but, seeing me bent on this plan, ceased to
 remonstrate. He entreated me to write often. "I had rather be with you,"
 he said, "in your solitary rambles, than with these Scotch people, whom
 I do not know: hasten then, my dear friend, to return, that I may again
 feel myself somewhat at home, which I cannot do in your absence."
 
 Having parted from my friend, I determined to visit some remote spot of
 Scotland, and finish my work in solitude. I did not doubt but that the
 monster followed me, and would discover himself to me when I should have
 finished, that he might receive his companion.
 
 With this resolution I traversed the northern highlands, and fixed on
 one of the remotest of the Orkneys as the scene labours. It was a place
 fitted for such a work, being hardly more than a rock, whose high sides
 were continually beaten upon by the waves. The soil was barren, scarcely
 affording pasture for a few miserable cows, and oatmeal for its
 inhabitants, which consisted of five persons, whose gaunt and scraggy
 limbs gave tokens of their miserable fare. Vegetables and bread, when
 they indulged in such luxuries, and even fresh water, was to be procured
 from the main land, which was about five miles distant.
 
 On the whole island there were but three miserable huts, and one of
 these was vacant when I arrived. This I hired. It contained but two
 rooms, and these exhibited all the squalidness of the most miserable
 penury. The thatch had fallen in, the walls were unplastered, and the
 door was off its hinges. I ordered it to be repaired, bought some
 furniture, and took possession; an incident which would, doubtless, have
 occasioned some surprise, had not all the senses of the cottagers been
 benumbed by want and squalid poverty. As it was, I lived ungazed at and
 unmolested, hardly thanked for the pittance of food and clothes which I
 gave; so much does suffering blunt even the coarsest sensations of men.
 
 In this retreat I devoted the morning to labour; but in the evening,
 when the weather permitted, I walked on the stony beach of the sea, to
 listen to the waves as they roared, and dashed at my feet. It was a
 monotonous, yet ever-changing scene. I thought of Switzerland; it was
 far different from this desolate and appalling landscape. Its hills are
 covered with vines, and its cottages are scattered thickly in the
 plains. Its fair lakes reflect a blue and gentle sky; and, when troubled
 by the winds, their tumult is but as the play of a lively infant, when
 compared to the roarings of the giant ocean.
 
 In this manner I distributed my occupations when I first arrived; but,
 as I proceeded in my labour, it became every day more horrible and
 irksome to me. Sometimes I could not prevail on myself to enter my
 laboratory for several days; and at other times I toiled day and night
 in order to complete my work. It was indeed a filthy process in which I
 was engaged. During my first experiment, a kind of enthusiastic frenzy
 had blinded me to the horror of my employment; my mind was intently
 fixed on the sequel of my labour, and my eyes were shut to the horror of
 my proceedings. But now I went to it in cold blood, and my heart often
 sickened at the work of my hands.
 
 Thus situated, employed in the most detestable occupation, immersed in a
 solitude where nothing could for an instant call my attention from the
 actual scene in which I was engaged, my spirits became unequal; I grew
 restless and nervous. Every moment I feared to meet my persecutor.
 Sometimes I sat with my eyes fixed on the ground, fearing to raise them
 lest they should encounter the object which I so much dreaded to behold.
 I feared to wander from the sight of my fellow-creatures, lest when
 alone he should come to claim his companion.
 
 In the mean time I worked on, and my labour was already considerably
 advanced. I looked towards its completion with a tremulous and eager
 hope, which I dared not trust myself to question, but which was
 intermixed with obscure forebodings of evil, that made my heart sicken
 in my bosom.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 I sat one evening in my laboratory; the sun had set, and the moon was
 just rising from the sea; I had not sufficient light for my employment,
 and I remained idle, in a pause of consideration of whether I should
 leave my labour for the night, or hasten its conclusion by an
 unremitting attention to it. As I sat, a train of reflection occurred to
 me, which led me to consider the effects of what I was now doing. Three
 years before I was engaged in the same manner, and had created a fiend
 whose unparalleled barbarity had desolated my heart, and filled it for
 ever with the bitterest remorse. I was now about to form another being,
 of whose dispositions I was alike ignorant; she might become ten
 thousand times more malignant than her mate, and delight, for its own
 sake, in murder and wretchedness. He had sworn to quit the neighbourhood
 of man, and hide himself in deserts; but she had not; and she, who in
 all probability was to become a thinking and reasoning animal, might
 refuse to comply with a compact made before her creation. They might
 even hate each other; the creature who already lived loathed his own
 deformity, and might he not conceive a greater abhorence for it when it
 came before his eyes in the female form? She also might turn with
 disgust from him to the superior beauty of man; she might quit him, and
 he be again alone, exasperated by the fresh provocation of being
 deserted by one of his own species.
 
 Even if they were to leave Europe, and inhabit the deserts of the new
 world, yet one of the first results of those sympathies for which the
 daemon thirsted would be children, and a race of devils would be
 propagated upon the earth, who might make the very existence of the
 species of man a condition precarious and full of terror. Had I a right,
 for my own benefit, to inflict this curse upon everlasting generations?
 I had before been moved by the sophisms of the being I had created; I
 had been struck senseless by his fiendish threats: but now, for the
 first time, the wickedness of my promise burst upon me; I shuddered to
 think that future ages might curse me as their pest, whose selfishness
 had not hesitated to buy its own peace at the price perhaps of the
 existence of the whole human race.
 
 I trembled, and my heart failed within me; when, on looking up, I saw,
 by the light of the moon, the daemon at the casement. A ghastly grin
 wrinkled his lips as he gazed on me, where I sat fulfilling the task
 which he had allotted to me. Yes, he had followed me in my travels; he
 had loitered in forests, hid himself in caves, or taken refuge in wide
 and desert heaths; and he now came to mark my progress, and claim the
 fulfilment of my promise.
 
 As I looked on him, his countenance expressed the utmost extent of
 malice and treachery. I thought with a sensation of madness on my
 promise of creating another like to him, and, trembling with passion,
 tore to pieces the thing on which I was engaged. The wretch saw me
 destroy the creature on whose future existence he depended for
 happiness, and, with a howl of devilish despair and revenge, withdrew.
 
 I left the room, and, locking the door, made a solemn vow in my own
 heart never to resume my labours; and then, with trembling steps, I
 sought my own apartment. I was alone; none were near me to dissipate the
 gloom, and relieve me from the sickening oppression of the most terrible
 reveries.
 
 Several hours past, and I remained near my window gazing on the sea; it
 was almost motionless, for the winds were hushed, and all nature reposed
 under the eye of the quiet moon. A few fishing vessels alone specked the
 water, and now and then the gentle breeze wafted the sound of voices, as
 the fishermen called to one another. I felt the silence, although I was
 hardly conscious of its extreme profundity until my ear was suddenly
 arrested by the paddling of oars near the shore, and a person landed
 close to my house.
 
 In a few minutes after, I heard the creaking of my door, as if some one
 endeavoured to open it softly. I trembled from head to foot; I felt a
 presentiment of who it was, and wished to rouse one of the peasants who
 dwelt in a cottage not far from mine; but I was overcome by the
 sensation of helplessness, so often felt in frightful dreams, when you
 in vain endeavour to fly from an impending danger, and was rooted to the
 spot.
 
 Presently I heard the sound of footsteps along the passage; the door
 opened, and the wretch whom I dreaded appeared. Shutting the door, he
 approached me, and said, in a smothered voice--
 
 "You have destroyed the work which you began; what is it that you
 intend? Do you dare to break your promise? I have endured toil and
 misery: I left Switzerland with you; I crept along the shores of the
 Rhine, among its willow islands, and over the summits of its hills. I
 have dwelt many months in the heaths of England, and among the deserts
 of Scotland. I have endured incalculable fatigue, and cold, and hunger;
 do you dare destroy my hopes?"
 
 "Begone! I do break my promise; never will I create another like
 yourself, equal in deformity and wickedness."
 
 "Slave, I before reasoned with you, but you have proved yourself
 unworthy of my condescension. Remember that I have power; you believe
 yourself miserable, but I can make you so wretched that the light of day
 will be hateful to you. You are my creator, but I am your
 master;--obey!"
 
 "The hour of my weakness is past, and the period of your power is
 arrived. Your threats cannot move me to do an act of wickedness; but
 they confirm me in a resolution of not creating you a companion in vice.
 Shall I, in cool blood, set loose upon the earth a daemon, whose delight
 is in death and wretchedness. Begone! I am firm, and your words will
 only exasperate my rage."
 
 The monster saw my determination in my face, and gnashed his teeth in
 the impotence of anger. "Shall each man," cried he, "find a wife for his
 bosom, and each beast have his mate, and I be alone? I had feelings of
 affection, and they were requited by detestation and scorn. Man, you may
 hate; but beware! Your hours will pass in dread and misery, and soon the
 bolt will fall which must ravish from you your happiness for ever. Are
 you to be happy, while I grovel in the intensity of my wretchedness? You
 can blast my other passions; but revenge remains--revenge, henceforth
 dearer than light or food! I may die; but first you, my tyrant and
 tormentor, shall curse the sun that gazes on your misery. Beware; for I
 am fearless, and therefore powerful. I will watch with the wiliness of a
 snake, that I may sting with its venom. Man, you shall repent of the
 injuries you inflict."
 
 "Devil, cease; and do not poison the air with these sounds of malice. I
 have declared my resolution to you, and I am no coward to bend beneath
 words. Leave me; I am inexorable."
 
 "It is well. I go; but remember, I shall be with you on your
 wedding-night."
 
 I started forward, and exclaimed, "Villain! before you sign my
 death-warrant, be sure that you are yourself safe."
 
 I would have seized him; but he eluded me, and quitted the house with
 precipitation: in a few moments I saw him in his boat, which shot across
 the waters with an arrowy swiftness, and was soon lost amidst the waves.
 
 All was again silent; but his words rung in my ears. I burned with rage
 to pursue the murderer of my peace, and precipitate him into the ocean.
 I walked up and down my room hastily and perturbed, while my imagination
 conjured up a thousand images to torment and sting me. Why had I not
 followed him, and closed with him in mortal strife? But I had suffered
 him to depart, and he had directed his course towards the main land. I
 shuddered to think who might be the next victim sacrificed to his
 insatiate revenge. And then I thought again of his words--"_I will be
 with you on your wedding-night._" That then was the period fixed for the
 fulfilment of my destiny. In that hour I should die, and at once satisfy
 and extinguish his malice. The prospect did not move me to fear; yet
 when I thought of my beloved Elizabeth,--of her tears and endless
 sorrow, when she should find her lover so barbarously snatched from
 her,--tears, the first I had shed for many months, streamed from my
 eyes, and I resolved not to fall before my enemy without a bitter
 struggle.
 
 The night passed away, and the sun rose from the ocean; my feelings
 became calmer, if it may be called calmness, when the violence of rage
 sinks into the depths of despair. I left the house, the horrid scene of
 the last night's contention, and walked on the beach of the sea, which I
 almost regarded as an insuperable barrier between me and my
 fellow-creatures; nay, a wish that such should prove the fact stole
 across me. I desired that I might pass my life on that barren rock,
 wearily it is true, but uninterrupted by any sudden shock of misery. If
 I returned, it was to be sacrificed, or to see those whom I most loved
 die under the grasp of a daemon whom I had myself created.
 
 I walked about the isle like a restless spectre, separated from all it
 loved, and miserable in the separation. When it became noon, and the sun
 rose higher, I lay down on the grass, and was overpowered by a deep
 sleep. I had been awake the whole of the preceding night, my nerves were
 agitated, and my eyes inflamed by watching and misery. The sleep into
 which I now sunk refreshed me; and when I awoke, I again felt as if I
 belonged to a race of human beings like myself, and I began to reflect
 upon what had passed with greater composure; yet still the words of the
 fiend rung in my ears like a death-knell, they appeared like a dream,
 yet distinct and oppressive as a reality.
 
 The sun had far descended, and I still sat on the shore, satisfying my
 appetite, which had become ravenous, with an oaten cake, when I saw a
 fishing-boat land close to me, and one of the men brought me a packet;
 it contained letters from Geneva, and one from Clerval, entreating me to
 join him. He said that nearly a year had elapsed since we had quitted
 Switzerland, and France was yet unvisited. He entreated me, therefore,
 to leave my solitary isle, and meet him at Perth, in a week from that
 time, when we might arrange the plan of our future proceedings. This
 letter in a degree recalled me to life, and I determined to quit my
 island at the expiration of two days.
 
 Yet, before I departed, there was a task to perform, on which I
 shuddered to reflect: I must pack my chemical instruments; and for that
 purpose I must enter the room which had been the scene of my odious
 work, and I must handle those utensils, the sight of which was sickening
 to me. The next morning, at day-break, I summoned sufficient courage,
 and unlocked the door of my laboratory. The remains of the half-finished
 creature, whom I had destroyed, lay scattered on the floor, and I almost
 felt as if I had mangled the living flesh of a human being. I paused to
 collect myself, and then entered the chamber. With trembling hand I
 conveyed the instruments out of the room; but I reflected that I ought
 not to leave the relics of my work to excite the horror and suspicion of
 the peasants, and I accordingly put them into a basket, with a great
 quantity of stones, and laying them up, determined to throw them into
 the sea that very night; and in the mean time I sat upon the beach,
 employed in cleaning and arranging my chemical apparatus.
 
 Nothing could be more complete than the alteration that had taken place
 in my feelings since the night of the appearance of the daemon. I had
 before regarded my promise with a gloomy despair, as a thing that, with
 whatever consequences, must be fulfilled; but I now felt as if a film
 had been taken from before my eyes, and that I, for the first time, saw
 clearly. The idea of renewing my labours did not for one instant occur
 to me; the threat I had heard weighed on my thoughts, but I did not
 reflect that a voluntary act of mine could avert it. I had resolved in
 my own mind, that to create another like the fiend I had first made
 would be an act of the basest and most atrocious selfishness; and I
 banished from my mind every thought that could lead to a different
 conclusion.
 
 Between two and three in the morning the moon rose; and I then, putting
 my basket aboard a little skiff, sailed out about four miles from the
 shore. The scene was perfectly solitary: a few boats were returning
 towards land, but I sailed away from them. I felt as if I was about the
 commission of a dreadful crime, and avoided with shuddering anxiety any
 encounter with my fellow-creatures. At one time the moon, which had
 before been clear, was suddenly overspread by a thick cloud, and I took
 advantage of the moment of darkness, and cast my basket into the sea; I
 listened to the gurgling sound as it sunk, and then sailed away from the
 spot. The sky became clouded; but the air was pure, although chilled by
 the north-east breeze that was then rising. But it refreshed me, and
 filled me with such agreeable sensations, that I resolved to prolong my
 stay on the water, and fixing the rudder in a direct position, stretched
 myself at the bottom of the boat. Clouds hid the moon, every thing was
 obscure, and I heard only the sound of the boat, as its keel cut through
 the waves; the murmur lulled me, and in a short time I slept soundly.
 
 I do not know how long I remained in this situation, but when I awoke I
 found that the sun had already mounted considerably. The wind was high,
 and the waves continually threatened the safety of my little skiff. I
 found that the wind was north-east, and must have driven me far from the
 coast from which I had embarked. I endeavoured to change my course, but
 quickly found that if I again made the attempt the boat would be
 instantly filled with water. Thus situated, my only resource was to
 drive before the wind. I confess that I felt a few sensations of terror.
 I had no compass with me, and was so little acquainted with the
 geography of this part of the world that the sun was of little benefit
 to me. I might be driven into the wide Atlantic, and feel all the
 tortures of starvation, or be swallowed up in the immeasurable waters
 that roared and buffeted around me. I had already been out many hours,
 and felt the torment of a burning thirst, a prelude to my other
 sufferings. I looked on the heavens, which were covered by clouds that
 flew before the wind only to be replaced by others: I looked upon the
 sea, it was to be my grave. "Fiend," I exclaimed, "your task is already
 fulfilled!" I thought of Elizabeth, of my father, and of Clerval; and
 sunk into a reverie, so despairing and frightful, that even now, when
 the scene is on the point of closing before me for ever, I shudder to
 reflect on it.
 
 Some hours passed thus; but by degrees, as the sun declined towards the
 horizon, the wind died away into a gentle breeze, and the sea became
 free from breakers. But these gave place to a heavy swell; I felt sick,
 and hardly able to hold the rudder, when suddenly I saw a line of high
 land towards the south.
 
 Almost spent, as I was, by fatigue, and the dreadful suspense I endured
 for several hours, this sudden certainty of life rushed like a flood of
 warm joy to my heart, and tears gushed from my eyes.
 
 How mutable are our feelings, and how strange is that clinging love we
 have of life even in the excess of misery! I constructed another sail
 with a part of my dress, and eagerly steered my course towards the land.
 It had a wild and rocky appearance; but as I approached nearer, I easily
 perceived the traces of cultivation. I saw vessels near the shore, and
 found myself suddenly transported back to the neighbourhood of civilized
 man. I eagerly traced the windings of the land, and hailed a steeple
 which I at length saw issuing from behind a small promontory. As I was
 in a state of extreme debility, I resolved to sail directly towards the
 town as a place where I could most easily procure nourishment.
 Fortunately I had money with me. As I turned the promontory, I perceived
 a small neat town and a good harbour, which I entered, my heart bounding
 with joy at my unexpected escape.
 
 As I was occupied in fixing the boat and arranging the sails, several
 people crowded towards the spot. They seemed very much surprised at my
 appearance; but, instead of offering me any assistance, whispered
 together with gestures that at any other time might have produced in me
 a slight sensation of alarm. As it was, I merely remarked that they
 spoke English; and I therefore addressed them in that language: "My good
 friends," said I, "will you be so kind as to tell me the name of this
 town, and inform me where I am?"
 
 "You will know that soon enough," replied a man with a gruff voice. "May
 be you are come to a place that will not prove much to your taste; but
 you will not be consulted as to your quarters, I promise you."
 
 I was exceedingly surprised on receiving so rude an answer from a
 stranger; and I was also disconcerted on perceiving the frowning and
 angry countenances of his companions. "Why do you answer me so roughly?"
 I replied: "surely it is not the custom of Englishmen to receive
 strangers so inhospitably."
 
 "I do not know," said the man, "what the custom of the English may be;
 but it is the custom of the Irish to hate villains."
 
 While this strange dialogue continued, I perceived the crowd rapidly
 increase. Their faces expressed a mixture of curiosity and anger, which
 annoyed, and in some degree alarmed me. I inquired the way to the inn;
 but no one replied. I then moved forward, and a murmuring sound arose
 from the crowd as they followed and surrounded me; when an ill-looking
 man approaching, tapped me on the shoulder, and said, "Come, Sir, you
 must follow me to Mr. Kirwin's, to give an account of yourself."
 
 "Who is Mr. Kirwin? Why am I to give an account of myself? Is not this a
 free country?"
 
 "Aye, Sir, free enough for honest folks. Mr. Kirwin is a magistrate; and
 you are to give an account of the death of a gentleman who was found
 murdered here last night."
 
 This answer startled me; but I presently recovered myself. I was
 innocent; that could easily be proved: accordingly I followed my
 conductor in silence, and was led to one of the best houses in the town.
 I was ready to sink from fatigue and hunger; but, being surrounded by a
 crowd, I thought it politic to rouse all my strength, that no physical
 debility might be construed into apprehension or conscious guilt. Little
 did I then expect the calamity that was in a few moments to overwhelm
 me, and extinguish in horror and despair all fear of ignominy or death.
 
 I must pause here; for it requires all my fortitude to recall the memory
 of the frightful events which I am about to relate, in proper detail, to
 my recollection.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 I was soon introduced into the presence of the magistrate, an old
 benevolent man, with calm and mild manners. He looked upon me, however,
 with some degree of severity; and then, turning towards my conductors,
 he asked who appeared as witnesses on this occasion.
 
 About half a dozen men came forward; and one being selected by the
 magistrate, he deposed, that he had been out fishing the night before
 with his son and brother-in-law, Daniel Nugent, when, about ten o'clock,
 they observed a strong northerly blast rising, and they accordingly put
 in for port. It was a very dark night, as the moon had not yet risen;
 they did not land at the harbour, but, as they had been accustomed, at a
 creek about two miles below. He walked on first, carrying a part of the
 fishing tackle, and his companions followed him at some distance. As he
 was proceeding along the sands, he struck his foot against something,
 and fell all his length on the ground. His companions came up to assist
 him; and, by the light of their lantern, they found that he had fallen
 on the body of a man, who was to all appearance dead. Their first
 supposition was, that it was the corpse of some person who had been
 drowned, and was thrown on shore by the waves; but, upon examination,
 they found that the clothes were not wet, and even that the body was not
 then cold. They instantly carried it to the cottage of an old woman near
 the spot, and endeavoured, but in vain, to restore it to life. He
 appeared to be a handsome young man, about five and twenty years of age.
 He had apparently been strangled; for there was no sign of any violence,
 except the black mark of fingers on his neck.
 
 The first part of this deposition did not in the least interest me; but
 when the mark of the fingers was mentioned, I remembered the murder of
 my brother, and felt myself extremely agitated; my limbs trembled, and a
 mist came over my eyes, which obliged me to lean on a chair for support.
 The magistrate observed me with a keen eye, and of course drew an
 unfavourable augury from my manner.
 
 The son confirmed his father's account: but when Daniel Nugent was
 called, he swore positively that, just before the fall of his companion,
 he saw a boat, with a single man in it, at a short distance from the
 shore; and, as far as he could judge by the light of a few stars, it was
 the same boat in which I had just landed.
 
 A woman deposed, that she lived near the beach, and was standing at the
 door of her cottage, waiting for the return of the fishermen, about an
 hour before she heard of the discovery of the body, when she saw a boat,
 with only one man in it, push off from that part of the shore where the
 corpse was afterwards found.
 
 Another woman confirmed the account of the fishermen having brought the
 body into her house; it was not cold. They put it into a bed, and rubbed
 it; and Daniel went to the town for an apothecary, but life was quite
 gone.
 
 Several other men were examined concerning my landing; and they agreed,
 that, with the strong north wind that had arisen during the night, it
 was very probable that I had beaten about for many hours, and had been
 obliged to return nearly to the same spot from which I had departed.
 Besides, they observed that it appeared that I had brought the body from
 another place, and it was likely, that as I did not appear to know the
 shore, I might have put into the harbour ignorant of the distance of the
 town of ---- from the place where I had deposited the corpse.
 
 Mr. Kirwin, on hearing this evidence, desired that I should be taken
 into the room where the body lay for interment that it might be observed
 what effect the sight of it would produce upon me. This idea was
 probably suggested by the extreme agitation I had exhibited when the
 mode of the murder had been described. I was accordingly conducted, by
 the magistrate and several other persons, to the inn. I could not help
 being struck by the strange coincidences that had taken place during
 this eventful night; but, knowing that I had been conversing with
 several persons in the island I had inhabited about the time that the
 body had been found, I was perfectly tranquil as to the consequences of
 the affair.
 
 I entered the room where the corpse lay, and was led up to the coffin.
 How can I describe my sensations on beholding it? I feel yet parched
 with horror, nor can I reflect on that terrible moment without
 shuddering and agony, that faintly reminds me of the anguish of the
 recognition. The trial, the presence of the magistrate and witnesses,
 passed like a dream from my memory, when I saw the lifeless form of
 Henry Clerval stretched before me. I gasped for breath; and, throwing
 myself on the body, I exclaimed, "Have my murderous machinations
 deprived you also, my dearest Henry, of life? Two I have already
 destroyed; other victims await their destiny: but you, Clerval, my
 friend, my benefactor"----
 
 The human frame could no longer support the agonizing suffering that I
 endured, and I was carried out of the room in strong convulsions.
 
 A fever succeeded to this. I lay for two months on the point of death:
 my ravings, as I afterwards heard, were frightful; I called myself the
 murderer of William, of Justine, and of Clerval. Sometimes I entreated
 my attendants to assist me in the destruction of the fiend by whom I was
 tormented; and, at others, I felt the fingers of the monster already
 grasping my neck, and screamed aloud with agony and terror. Fortunately,
 as I spoke my native language, Mr. Kirwin alone understood me; but my
 gestures and bitter cries were sufficient to affright the other
 witnesses.
 
 Why did I not die? More miserable than man ever was before, why did I
 not sink into forgetfulness and rest? Death snatches away many blooming
 children, the only hopes of their doating parents: how many brides and
 youthful lovers have been one day in the bloom of health and hope, and
 the next a prey for worms and the decay of the tomb! Of what materials
 was I made, that I could thus resist so many shocks, which, like the
 turning of the wheel, continually renewed the torture.
 
 But I was doomed to live; and, in two months, found myself as awaking
 from a dream, in a prison, stretched on a wretched bed, surrounded by
 gaolers, turnkeys, bolts, and all the miserable apparatus of a dungeon.
 It was morning, I remember, when I thus awoke to understanding: I had
 forgotten the particulars of what had happened, and only felt as if some
 great misfortune had suddenly overwhelmed me; but when I looked around,
 and saw the barred windows, and the squalidness of the room in which I
 was, all flashed across my memory, and I groaned bitterly.
 
 This sound disturbed an old woman who was sleeping in a chair beside me.
 She was a hired nurse, the wife of one of the turnkeys, and her
 countenance expressed all those bad qualities which often characterize
 that class. The lines of her face were hard and rude, like that of
 persons accustomed to see without sympathizing in sights of misery. Her
 tone expressed her entire indifference; she addressed me in English, and
 the voice struck me as one that I had heard during my sufferings:
 
 "Are you better now, Sir?" said she.
 
 I replied in the same language, with a feeble voice, "I believe I am;
 but if it be all true, if indeed I did not dream, I am sorry that I am
 still alive to feel this misery and horror."
 
 "For that matter," replied the old woman, "if you mean about the
 gentleman you murdered, I believe that it were better for you if you
 were dead, for I fancy it will go hard with you; but you will be hung
 when the next sessions come on. However, that's none of my business, I
 am sent to nurse you, and get you well; I do my duty with a safe
 conscience, it were well if every body did the same."
 
 I turned with loathing from the woman who could utter so unfeeling a
 speech to a person just saved, on the very edge of death; but I felt
 languid, and unable to reflect on all that had passed. The whole series
 of my life appeared to me as a dream; I sometimes doubted if indeed it
 were all true, for it never presented itself to my mind with the force
 of reality.
 
 As the images that floated before me became more distinct, I grew
 feverish; a darkness pressed around me; no one was near me who soothed
 me with the gentle voice of love; no dear hand supported me. The
 physician came and prescribed medicines, and the old woman prepared them
 for me; but utter carelessness was visible in the first, and the
 expression of brutality was strongly marked in the visage of the second.
 Who could be interested in the fate of a murderer, but the hangman who
 would gain his fee?
 
 These were my first reflections; but I soon learned that Mr. Kirwin had
 shewn me extreme kindness. He had caused the best room in the prison to
 be prepared for me (wretched indeed was the best); and it was he who had
 provided a physician and a nurse. It is true, he seldom came to see me;
 for, although he ardently desired to relieve the sufferings of every
 human creature, he did not wish to be present at the agonies and
 miserable ravings of a murderer. He came, therefore, sometimes to see
 that I was not neglected; but his visits were short, and at long
 intervals.
 
 One day, when I was gradually recovering, I was seated in a chair, my
 eyes half open, and my cheeks livid like those in death, I was overcome
 by gloom and misery, and often reflected I had better seek death than
 remain miserably pent up only to be let loose in a world replete with
 wretchedness. At one time I considered whether I should not declare
 myself guilty, and suffer the penalty of the law, less innocent than
 poor Justine had been. Such were my thoughts, when the door of my
 apartment was opened, and Mr. Kirwin entered. His countenance expressed
 sympathy and compassion; he drew a chair close to mine, and addressed me
 in French--
 
 "I fear that this place is very shocking to you; can I do any thing to
 make you more comfortable?"
 
 "I thank you; but all that you mention is nothing to me: on the whole
 earth there is no comfort which I am capable of receiving."
 
 "I know that the sympathy of a stranger can be but of little relief to
 one borne down as you are by so strange a misfortune. But you will, I
 hope, soon quit this melancholy abode; for, doubtless, evidence can
 easily be brought to free you from the criminal charge."
 
 "That is my least concern: I am, by a course of strange events, become
 the most miserable of mortals. Persecuted and tortured as I am and have
 been, can death be any evil to me?"
 
 "Nothing indeed could be more unfortunate and agonizing than the strange
 chances that have lately occurred. You were thrown, by some surprising
 accident, on this shore, renowned for its hospitality: seized
 immediately, and charged with murder. The first sight that was presented
 to your eyes was the body of your friend, murdered in so unaccountable a
 manner, and placed, as it were, by some fiend across your path."
 
 As Mr. Kirwin said this, notwithstanding the agitation I endured on this
 retrospect of my sufferings, I also felt considerable surprise at the
 knowledge he seemed to possess concerning me. I suppose some
 astonishment was exhibited in my countenance; for Mr. Kirwin hastened to
 say--
 
 "It was not until a day or two after your illness that I thought of
 examining your dress, that I might discover some trace by which I could
 send to your relations an account of your misfortune and illness. I
 found several letters, and, among others, one which I discovered from
 its commencement to be from your father. I instantly wrote to Geneva:
 nearly two months have elapsed since the departure of my letter.--But
 you are ill; even now you tremble: you are unfit for agitation of any
 kind."
 
 "This suspense is a thousand times worse than the most horrible event:
 tell me what new scene of death has been acted, and whose murder I am
 now to lament."
 
 "Your family is perfectly well," said Mr. Kirwin, with gentleness; "and
 some one, a friend, is come to visit you."
 
 I know not by what chain of thought the idea presented itself, but it
 instantly darted into my mind that the murderer had come to mock at my
 misery, and taunt me with the death of Clerval, as a new incitement for
 me to comply with his hellish desires. I put my hand before my eyes, and
 cried out in agony--
 
 "Oh! take him away! I cannot see him; for God's sake, do not let him
 enter!"
 
 Mr. Kirwin regarded me with a troubled countenance. He could not help
 regarding my exclamation as a presumption of my guilt, and said, in
 rather a severe tone--
 
 "I should have thought, young man, that the presence of your father
 would have been welcome, instead of inspiring such violent repugnance."
 
 "My father!" cried I, while every feature and every muscle was relaxed
 from anguish to pleasure. "Is my father, indeed, come? How kind, how
 very kind. But where is he, why does he not hasten to me?"
 
 My change of manner surprised and pleased the magistrate; perhaps he
 thought that my former exclamation was a momentary return of delirium,
 and now he instantly resumed his former benevolence. He rose, and
 quitted the room with my nurse, and in a moment my father entered it.
 
 Nothing, at this moment, could have given me greater pleasure than the
 arrival of my father. I stretched out my hand to him, and cried--
 
 "Are you then safe--and Elizabeth--and Ernest?"
 
 My father calmed me with assurances of their welfare, and endeavoured,
 by dwelling on these subjects so interesting to my heart, to raise my
 desponding spirits; but he soon felt that a prison cannot be the abode
 of cheerfulness. "What a place is this that you inhabit, my son!" said
 he, looking mournfully at the barred windows, and wretched appearance of
 the room. "You travelled to seek happiness, but a fatality seems to
 pursue you. And poor Clerval--"
 
 The name of my unfortunate and murdered friend was an agitation too
 great to be endured in my weak state; I shed tears.
 
 "Alas! yes, my father," replied I; "some destiny of the most horrible
 kind hangs over me, and I must live to fulfil it, or surely I should
 have died on the coffin of Henry."
 
 We were not allowed to converse for any length of time, for the
 precarious state of my health rendered every precaution necessary that
 could insure tranquillity. Mr. Kirwin came in, and insisted that my
 strength should not be exhausted by too much exertion. But the
 appearance of my father was to me like that of my good angel, and I
 gradually recovered my health.
 
 As my sickness quitted me, I was absorbed by a gloomy and black
 melancholy, that nothing could dissipate. The image of Clerval was for
 ever before me, ghastly and murdered. More than once the agitation into
 which these reflections threw me made my friends dread a dangerous
 relapse. Alas! why did they preserve so miserable and detested a life?
 It was surely that I might fulfil my destiny, which is now drawing to a
 close. Soon, oh, very soon, will death extinguish these throbbings, and
 relieve me from the mighty weight of anguish that bears me to the dust;
 and, in executing the award of justice, I shall also sink to rest. Then
 the appearance of death was distant, although the wish was ever present
 to my thoughts; and I often sat for hours motionless and speechless,
 wishing for some mighty revolution that might bury me and my destroyer
 in its ruins.
 
 The season of the assizes approached. I had already been three months
 in prison; and although I was still weak, and in continual danger of a
 relapse, I was obliged to travel nearly a hundred miles to the
 county-town, where the court was held. Mr. Kirwin charged himself with
 every care of collecting witnesses, and arranging my defence. I was
 spared the disgrace of appearing publicly as a criminal, as the case was
 not brought before the court that decides on life and death. The grand
 jury rejected the bill, on its being proved that I was on the Orkney
 Islands at the hour the body of my friend was found, and a fortnight
 after my removal I was liberated from prison.
 
 My father was enraptured on finding me freed from the vexations of a
 criminal charge, that I was again allowed to breathe the fresh
 atmosphere, and allowed to return to my native country. I did not
 participate in these feelings; for to me the walls of a dungeon or a
 palace were alike hateful. The cup of life was poisoned for ever; and
 although the sun shone upon me, as upon the happy and gay of heart, I
 saw around me nothing but a dense and frightful darkness, penetrated by
 no light but the glimmer of two eyes that glared upon me. Sometimes they
 were the expressive eyes of Henry, languishing in death, the dark orbs
 nearly covered by the lids, and the long black lashes that fringed them;
 sometimes it was the watery clouded eyes of the monster, as I first saw
 them in my chamber at Ingolstadt.
 
 My father tried to awaken in me the feelings of affection. He talked of
 Geneva, which I should soon visit--of Elizabeth, and Ernest; but these
 words only drew deep groans from me. Sometimes, indeed, I felt a wish
 for happiness; and thought, with melancholy delight, of my beloved
 cousin; or longed, with a devouring _maladie du pays_, to see once more
 the blue lake and rapid Rhone, that had been so dear to me in early
 childhood: but my general state of feeling was a torpor, in which a
 prison was as welcome a residence as the divinest scene in nature; and
 these fits were seldom interrupted, but by paroxysms of anguish and
 despair. At these moments I often endeavoured to put an end to the
 existence I loathed; and it required unceasing attendance and vigilance
 to restrain me from committing some dreadful act of violence.
 
 I remember, as I quitted the prison, I heard one of the men say, "He may
 be innocent of the murder, but he has certainly a bad conscience." These
 words struck me. A bad conscience! yes, surely I had one. William,
 Justine, and Clerval, had died through my infernal machinations; "And
 whose death," cried I, "is to finish the tragedy? Ah! my father, do not
 remain in this wretched country; take me where I may forget myself, my
 existence, and all the world."
 
 My father easily acceded to my desire; and, after having taken leave of
 Mr. Kirwin, we hastened to Dublin. I felt as if I was relieved from a
 heavy weight, when the packet sailed with a fair wind from Ireland, and
 I had quitted for ever the country which had been to me the scene of so
 much misery.
 
 It was midnight. My father slept in the cabin; and I lay on the deck,
 looking at the stars, and listening to the dashing of the waves. I
 hailed the darkness that shut Ireland from my sight, and my pulse beat
 with a feverish joy, when I reflected that I should soon see Geneva. The
 past appeared to me in the light of a frightful dream; yet the vessel in
 which I was, the wind that blew me from the detested shore of Ireland,
 and the sea which surrounded me, told me too forcibly that I was
 deceived by no vision, and that Clerval, my friend and dearest
 companion, had fallen a victim to me and the monster of my creation. I
 repassed, in my memory, my whole life; my quiet happiness while residing
 with my family in Geneva, the death of my mother, and my departure for
 Ingolstadt. I remembered shuddering at the mad enthusiasm that hurried
 me on to the creation of my hideous enemy, and I called to mind the
 night during which he first lived. I was unable to pursue the train of
 thought; a thousand feelings pressed upon me, and I wept bitterly.
 
 Ever since my recovery from the fever I had been in the custom of taking
 every night a small quantity of laudanum; for it was by means of this
 drug only that I was enabled to gain the rest necessary for the
 preservation of life. Oppressed by the recollection of my various
 misfortunes, I now took a double dose, and soon slept profoundly. But
 sleep did not afford me respite from thought and misery; my dreams
 presented a thousand objects that scared me. Towards morning I was
 possessed by a kind of night-mare; I felt the fiend's grasp in my neck,
 and could not free myself from it; groans and cries rung in my ears. My
 father, who was watching over me, perceiving my restlessness, awoke me,
 and pointed to the port of Holyhead, which we were now entering.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 We had resolved not to go to London, but to cross the country to
 Portsmouth, and thence to embark for Havre. I preferred this plan
 principally because I dreaded to see again those places in which I had
 enjoyed a few moments of tranquillity with my beloved Clerval. I thought
 with horror of seeing again those persons whom we had been accustomed to
 visit together, and who might make inquiries concerning an event, the
 very remembrance of which made me again feel the pang I endured when I
 gazed on his lifeless form in the inn at ----.
 
 As for my father, his desires and exertions were bounded to the again
 seeing me restored to health and peace of mind. His tenderness and
 attentions were unremitting; my grief and gloom was obstinate, but he
 would not despair. Sometimes he thought that I felt deeply the
 degradation of being obliged to answer a charge of murder, and he
 endeavoured to prove to me the futility of pride.
 
 "Alas! my father," said I, "how little do you know me. Human beings,
 their feelings and passions, would indeed be degraded, if such a wretch
 as I felt pride. Justine, poor unhappy Justine, was as innocent as I,
 and she suffered the same charge; she died for it; and I am the cause
 of this--I murdered her. William, Justine, and Henry--they all died by
 my hands."
 
 My father had often, during my imprisonment, heard me make the same
 assertion; when I thus accused myself, he sometimes seemed to desire an
 explanation, and at others he appeared to consider it as caused by
 delirium, and that, during my illness, some idea of this kind had
 presented itself to my imagination, the remembrance of which I preserved
 in my convalescence. I avoided explanation, and maintained a continual
 silence concerning the wretch I had created. I had a feeling that I
 should be supposed mad, and this for ever chained my tongue, when I
 would have given the whole world to have confided the fatal secret.
 
 Upon this occasion my father said, with an expression of unbounded
 wonder, "What do you mean, Victor? are you mad? My dear son, I entreat
 you never to make such an assertion again."
 
 "I am not mad," I cried energetically; "the sun and the heavens, who
 have viewed my operations, can bear witness of my truth. I am the
 assassin of those most innocent victims; they died by my machinations. A
 thousand times would I have shed my own blood, drop by drop, to have
 saved their lives; but I could not, my father, indeed I could not
 sacrifice the whole human race."
 
 The conclusion of this speech convinced my father that my ideas were
 deranged, and he instantly changed the subject of our conversation, and
 endeavoured to alter the course of my thoughts. He wished as much as
 possible to obliterate the memory of the scenes that had taken place in
 Ireland, and never alluded to them, or suffered me to speak of my
 misfortunes.
 
 As time passed away I became more calm: misery had her dwelling in my
 heart, but I no longer talked in the same incoherent manner of my own
 crimes; sufficient for me was the consciousness of them. By the utmost
 self-violence, I curbed the imperious voice of wretchedness, which
 sometimes desired to declare itself to the whole world; and my manners
 were calmer and more composed than they had ever been since my journey
 to the sea of ice.
 
 We arrived at Havre on the 8th of May, and instantly proceeded to Paris,
 where my father had some business which detained us a few weeks. In this
 city, I received the following letter from Elizabeth:--
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 "_To_ VICTOR FRANKENSTEIN.
 
 "MY DEAREST FRIEND,
 
 "It gave me the greatest pleasure to receive a letter from my uncle
 dated at Paris; you are no longer at a formidable distance, and I may
 hope to see you in less than a fortnight. My poor cousin, how much you
 must have suffered! I expect to see you looking even more ill than when
 you quitted Geneva. This winter has been passed most miserably, tortured
 as I have been by anxious suspense; yet I hope to see peace in your
 countenance, and to find that your heart is not totally devoid of
 comfort and tranquillity.
 
 "Yet I fear that the same feelings now exist that made you so miserable
 a year ago, even perhaps augmented by time. I would not disturb you at
 this period, when so many misfortunes weigh upon you; but a conversation
 that I had with my uncle previous to his departure renders some
 explanation necessary before we meet.
 
 "Explanation! you may possibly say; what can Elizabeth have to explain?
 If you really say this, my questions are answered, and I have no more to
 do than to sign myself your affectionate cousin. But you are distant
 from me, and it is possible that you may dread, and yet be pleased with
 this explanation; and, in a probability of this being the case, I dare
 not any longer postpone writing what, during your absence, I have often
 wished to express to you, but have never had the courage to begin.
 
 "You well know, Victor, that our union had been the favourite plan of
 your parents ever since our infancy. We were told this when young, and
 taught to look forward to it as an event that would certainly take
 place. We were affectionate playfellows during childhood, and, I
 believe, dear and valued friends to one another as we grew older. But as
 brother and sister often entertain a lively affection towards each
 other, without desiring a more intimate union, may not such also be our
 case? Tell me, dearest Victor. Answer me, I conjure you, by our mutual
 happiness, with simple truth--Do you not love another?
 
 "You have travelled; you have spent several years of your life at
 Ingolstadt; and I confess to you, my friend, that when I saw you last
 autumn so unhappy, flying to solitude, from the society of every
 creature, I could not help supposing that you might regret our
 connexion, and believe yourself bound in honour to fulfil the wishes of
 your parents, although they opposed themselves to your inclinations. But
 this is false reasoning. I confess to you, my cousin, that I love you,
 and that in my airy dreams of futurity you have been my constant friend
 and companion. But it is your happiness I desire as well as my own, when
 I declare to you, that our marriage would render me eternally miserable,
 unless it were the dictate of your own free choice. Even now I weep to
 think, that, borne down as you are by the cruelest misfortunes, you may
 stifle; by the word _honour_, all hope of that love and happiness which
 would alone restore you to yourself. I, who have so interested an
 affection for you, may increase your miseries ten-fold, by being an
 obstacle to your wishes. Ah, Victor, be assured that your cousin and
 playmate has too sincere a love for you not to be made miserable by this
 supposition. Be happy, my friend; and if you obey me in this one
 request, remain satisfied that nothing on earth will have the power to
 interrupt my tranquillity.
 
 "Do not let this letter disturb you; do not answer it to-morrow, or the
 next day, or even until you come, if it will give you pain. My uncle
 will send me news of your health; and if I see but one smile on your
 lips when we meet, occasioned by this or any other exertion of mine, I
 shall need no other happiness.
 
 "ELIZABETH LAVENZA.
 
 "Geneva, May 18th. 17--."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 This letter revived in my memory what I had before forgotten, the threat
 of the fiend--"_I will be with you on your wedding-night!_" Such was my
 sentence, and on that night would the daemon employ every art to destroy
 me, and tear me from the glimpse of happiness which promised partly to
 console my sufferings. On that night he had determined to consummate his
 crimes by my death. Well, be it so; a deadly struggle would then
 assuredly take place, in which if he was victorious, I should be at
 peace, and his power over me be at an end. If he were vanquished, I
 should be a free man. Alas! what freedom? such as the peasant enjoys
 when his family have been massacred before his eyes, his cottage burnt,
 his lands laid waste, and he is turned adrift, homeless, pennyless, and
 alone, but free. Such would be my liberty, except that in my Elizabeth I
 possessed a treasure; alas! balanced by those horrors of remorse and
 guilt, which would pursue me until death.
 
 Sweet and beloved Elizabeth! I read and re-read her letter, and some
 softened feelings stole into my heart, and dared to whisper paradisaical
 dreams of love and joy; but the apple was already eaten, and the
 angel's arm bared to drive me from all hope. Yet I would die to make her
 happy. If the monster executed his threat, death was inevitable; yet,
 again, I considered whether my marriage would hasten my fate. My
 destruction might indeed arrive a few months sooner; but if my torturer
 should suspect that I postponed it, influenced by his menaces, he would
 surely find other, and perhaps more dreadful means of revenge. He had
 vowed _to be with me on my wedding-night_, yet he did not consider that
 threat as binding him to peace in the mean time; for, as if to shew me
 that he was not yet satiated with blood, he had murdered Clerval
 immediately after the enunciation of his threats. I resolved, therefore,
 that if my immediate union with my cousin would conduce either to her's
 or my father's happiness, my adversary's designs against my life should
 not retard it a single hour.
 
 In this state of mind I wrote to Elizabeth. My letter was calm and
 affectionate. "I fear, my beloved girl," I said, "little happiness
 remains for us on earth; yet all that I may one day enjoy is concentered
 in you. Chase away your idle fears; to you alone do I consecrate my
 life, and my endeavours for contentment. I have one secret, Elizabeth, a
 dreadful one; when revealed to you, it will chill your frame with
 horror, and then, far from being surprised at my misery, you will only
 wonder that I survive what I have endured. I will confide this tale of
 misery and terror to you the day after our marriage shall take place;
 for, my sweet cousin, there must be perfect confidence between us. But
 until then, I conjure you, do not mention or allude to it. This I most
 earnestly entreat, and I know you will comply."
 
 In about a week after the arrival of Elizabeth's letter, we returned to
 Geneva. My cousin welcomed me with warm affection; yet tears were in her
 eyes, as she beheld my emaciated frame and feverish cheeks. I saw a
 change in her also. She was thinner, and had lost much of that heavenly
 vivacity that had before charmed me; but her gentleness, and soft looks
 of compassion, made her a more fit companion for one blasted and
 miserable as I was.
 
 The tranquillity which I now enjoyed did not endure. Memory brought
 madness with it; and when I thought on what had passed, a real insanity
 possessed me; sometimes I was furious, and burnt with rage, sometimes
 low and despondent. I neither spoke or looked, but sat motionless,
 bewildered by the multitude of miseries that overcame me.
 
 Elizabeth alone had the power to draw me from these fits; her gentle
 voice would soothe me when transported by passion, and inspire me with
 human feelings when sunk in torpor. She wept with me, and for me. When
 reason returned, she would remonstrate, and endeavour to inspire me with
 resignation. Ah! it is well for the unfortunate to be resigned, but for
 the guilty there is no peace. The agonies of remorse poison the luxury
 there is otherwise sometimes found in indulging the excess of grief.
 
 Soon after my arrival my father spoke of my immediate marriage with my
 cousin. I remained silent.
 
 "Have you, then, some other attachment?"
 
 "None on earth. I love Elizabeth, and look forward to our union with
 delight. Let the day therefore be fixed; and on it I will consecrate
 myself, in life or death, to the happiness of my cousin."
 
 "My dear Victor, do not speak thus. Heavy misfortunes have befallen us;
 but let us only cling closer to what remains, and transfer our love for
 those whom we have lost to those who yet live. Our circle will be small,
 but bound close by the ties of affection and mutual misfortune. And when
 time shall have softened your despair, new and dear objects of care will
 be born to replace those of whom we have been so cruelly deprived."
 
 Such were the lessons of my father. But to me the remembrance of the
 threat returned: nor can you wonder, that, omnipotent as the fiend had
 yet been in his deeds of blood, I should almost regard him as
 invincible; and that when he had pronounced the words, "_I shall be with
 you on your wedding-night_," I should regard the threatened fate as
 unavoidable. But death was no evil to me, if the loss of Elizabeth were
 balanced with it; and I therefore, with a contented and even cheerful
 countenance, agreed with my father, that if my cousin would consent, the
 ceremony should take place in ten days, and thus put, as I imagined, the
 seal to my fate.
 
 Great God! if for one instant I had thought what might be the hellish
 intention of my fiendish adversary, I would rather have banished myself
 for ever from my native country, and wandered a friendless outcast over
 the earth, than have consented to this miserable marriage. But, as if
 possessed of magic powers, the monster had blinded me to his real
 intentions; and when I thought that I prepared only my own death, I
 hastened that of a far dearer victim.
 
 As the period fixed for our marriage drew nearer, whether from cowardice
 or a prophetic feeling, I felt my heart sink within me. But I concealed
 my feelings by an appearance of hilarity, that brought smiles and joy to
 the countenance of my father, but hardly deceived the ever-watchful and
 nicer eye of Elizabeth. She looked forward to our union with placid
 contentment, not unmingled with a little fear, which past misfortunes
 had impressed, that what now appeared certain and tangible happiness,
 might soon dissipate into an airy dream, and leave no trace but deep and
 everlasting regret.
 
 Preparations were made for the event; congratulatory visits were
 received; and all wore a smiling appearance. I shut up, as well as I
 could, in my own heart the anxiety that preyed there, and entered with
 seeming earnestness into the plans of my father, although they might
 only serve as the decorations of my tragedy. A house was purchased for
 us near Cologny, by which we should enjoy the pleasures of the country,
 and yet be so near Geneva as to see my father every day; who would
 still reside within the walls, for the benefit of Ernest, that he might
 follow his studies at the schools.
 
 In the mean time I took every precaution to defend my person, in case
 the fiend should openly attack me. I carried pistols and a dagger
 constantly about me, and was ever on the watch to prevent artifice; and
 by these means gained a greater degree of tranquillity. Indeed, as the
 period approached, the threat appeared more as a delusion, not to be
 regarded as worthy to disturb my peace, while the happiness I hoped for
 in my marriage wore a greater appearance of certainty, as the day fixed
 for its solemnization drew nearer, and I heard it continually spoken of
 as an occurrence which no accident could possibly prevent.
 
 Elizabeth seemed happy; my tranquil demeanour contributed greatly to
 calm her mind. But on the day that was to fulfil my wishes and my
 destiny, she was melancholy, and a presentiment of evil pervaded her;
 and perhaps also she thought of the dreadful secret, which I had
 promised to reveal to her the following day. My father was in the mean
 time overjoyed, and, in the bustle of preparation, only observed in the
 melancholy of his niece the diffidence of a bride.
 
 After the ceremony was performed, a large party assembled at my
 father's; but it was agreed that Elizabeth and I should pass the
 afternoon and night at Evian, and return to Cologny the next morning. As
 the day was fair, and the wind favourable, we resolved to go by water.
 
 Those were the last moments of my life during which I enjoyed the
 feeling of happiness. We passed rapidly along: the sun was hot, but we
 were sheltered from its rays by a kind of canopy, while we enjoyed the
 beauty of the scene, sometimes on one side of the lake, where we saw
 Mont Saleve, the pleasant banks of Montalegre, and at a distance,
 surmounting all, the beautiful Mont Blanc, and the assemblage of snowy
 mountains that in vain endeavour to emulate her; sometimes coasting the
 opposite banks, we saw the mighty Jura opposing its dark side to the
 ambition that would quit its native country, and an almost
 insurmountable barrier to the invader who should wish to enslave it.
 
 I took the hand of Elizabeth: "You are sorrowful, my love. Ah! if you
 knew what I have suffered, and what I may yet endure, you would
 endeavour to let me taste the quiet, and freedom from despair, that this
 one day at least permits me to enjoy."
 
 "Be happy, my dear Victor," replied Elizabeth; "there is, I hope,
 nothing to distress you; and be assured that if a lively joy is not
 painted in my face, my heart is contented. Something whispers to me not
 to depend too much on the prospect that is opened before us; but I will
 not listen to such a sinister voice. Observe how fast we move along, and
 how the clouds which sometimes obscure, and sometimes rise above the
 dome of Mont Blanc, render this scene of beauty still more interesting.
 Look also at the innumerable fish that are swimming in the clear
 waters, where we can distinguish every pebble that lies at the bottom.
 What a divine day! how happy and serene all nature appears!"
 
 Thus Elizabeth endeavoured to divert her thoughts and mine from all
 reflection upon melancholy subjects. But her temper was fluctuating; joy
 for a few instants shone in her eyes, but it continually gave place to
 distraction and reverie.
 
 The sun sunk lower in the heavens; we passed the river Drance, and
 observed its path through the chasms of the higher, and the glens of the
 lower hills. The Alps here come closer to the lake, and we approached
 the amphitheatre of mountains which forms its eastern boundary. The
 spire of Evian shone under the woods that surrounded it, and the range
 of mountain above mountain by which it was overhung.
 
 The wind, which had hitherto carried us along with amazing rapidity,
 sunk at sunset to a light breeze; the soft air just ruffled the water,
 and caused a pleasant motion among the trees as we approached the shore,
 from which it wafted the most delightful scent of flowers and hay. The
 sun sunk beneath the horizon as we landed; and as I touched the shore, I
 felt those cares and fears revive, which soon were to clasp me, and
 cling to me for ever.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 It was eight o'clock when we landed; we walked for a short time on the
 shore, enjoying the transitory light, and then retired to the inn, and
 contemplated the lovely scene of waters, woods, and mountains, obscured
 in darkness, yet still displaying their black outlines.
 
 The wind, which had fallen in the south, now rose with great violence in
 the west. The moon had reached her summit in the heavens, and was
 beginning to descend; the clouds swept across it swifter than the flight
 of the vulture, and dimmed her rays, while the lake reflected the scene
 of the busy heavens, rendered still busier by the restless waves that
 were beginning to rise. Suddenly a heavy storm of rain descended.
 
 I had been calm during the day; but so soon as night obscured the shapes
 of objects, a thousand fears arose in my mind. I was anxious and
 watchful, while my right hand grasped a pistol which was hidden in my
 bosom; every sound terrified me; but I resolved that I would sell my
 life dearly, and not relax the impending conflict until my own life, or
 that of my adversary, were extinguished.
 
 Elizabeth observed my agitation for some time in timid and fearful
 silence; at length she said, "What is it that agitates you, my dear
 Victor? What is it you fear?"
 
 "Oh! peace, peace, my love," replied I, "this night, and all will be
 safe: but this night is dreadful, very dreadful."
 
 I passed an hour in this state of mind, when suddenly I reflected how
 dreadful the combat which I momentarily expected would be to my wife,
 and I earnestly entreated her to retire, resolving not to join her until
 I had obtained some knowledge as to the situation of my enemy.
 
 She left me, and I continued some time walking up and down the passages
 of the house, and inspecting every corner that might afford a retreat to
 my adversary. But I discovered no trace of him, and was beginning to
 conjecture that some fortunate chance had intervened to prevent the
 execution of his menaces; when suddenly I heard a shrill and dreadful
 scream. It came from the room into which Elizabeth had retired. As I
 heard it, the whole truth rushed into my mind, my arms dropped, the
 motion of every muscle and fibre was suspended; I could feel the blood
 trickling in my veins, and tingling in the extremities of my limbs. This
 state lasted but for an instant; the scream was repeated, and I rushed
 into the room.
 
 Great God! why did I not then expire! Why am I here to relate the
 destruction of the best hope, and the purest creature of earth. She was
 there, lifeless and inanimate, thrown across the bed, her head hanging
 down, and her pale and distorted features half covered by her hair.
 Every where I turn I see the same figure--her bloodless arms and relaxed
 form flung by the murderer on its bridal bier. Could I behold this, and
 live? Alas! life is obstinate, and clings closest where it is most
 hated. For a moment only did I lose recollection; I fainted.
 
 When I recovered, I found myself surrounded by the people of the inn;
 their countenances expressed a breathless terror: but the horror of
 others appeared only as a mockery, a shadow of the feelings that
 oppressed me. I escaped from them to the room where lay the body of
 Elizabeth, my love, my wife, so lately living, so dear, so worthy. She
 had been moved from the posture in which I had first beheld her; and
 now, as she lay, her head upon her arm, and a handkerchief thrown across
 her face and neck, I might have supposed her asleep. I rushed towards
 her, and embraced her with ardour; but the deathly languor and coldness
 of the limbs told me, that what I now held in my arms had ceased to be
 the Elizabeth whom I had loved and cherished. The murderous mark of the
 fiend's grasp was on her neck, and the breath had ceased to issue from
 her lips.
 
 While I still hung over her in the agony of despair, I happened to look
 up. The windows of the room had before been darkened; and I felt a kind
 of panic on seeing the pale yellow light of the moon illuminate the
 chamber. The shutters had been thrown back; and, with a sensation of
 horror not to be described, I saw at the open window a figure the most
 hideous and abhorred. A grin was on the face of the monster; he seemed
 to jeer, as with his fiendish finger he pointed towards the corpse of my
 wife. I rushed towards the window, and drawing a pistol from my bosom,
 shot; but he eluded me, leaped from his station, and, running with the
 swiftness of lightning, plunged into the lake.
 
 The report of the pistol brought a crowd into the room. I pointed to the
 spot where he had disappeared, and we followed the track with boats;
 nets were cast, but in vain. After passing several hours, we returned
 hopeless, most of my companions believing it to have been a form
 conjured by my fancy. After having landed, they proceeded to search the
 country, parties going in different directions among the woods and
 vines.
 
 I did not accompany them; I was exhausted: a film covered my eyes, and
 my skin was parched with the heat of fever. In this state I lay on a
 bed, hardly conscious of what had happened; my eyes wandered round the
 room, as if to seek something that I had lost.
 
 At length I remembered that my father would anxiously expect the return
 of Elizabeth and myself, and that I must return alone. This reflection
 brought tears into my eyes, and I wept for a long time; but my thoughts
 rambled to various subjects, reflecting on my misfortunes, and their
 cause. I was bewildered in a cloud of wonder and horror. The death of
 William, the execution of Justine, the murder of Clerval, and lastly of
 my wife; even at that moment I knew not that my only remaining friends
 were safe from the malignity of the fiend; my father even now might be
 writhing under his grasp, and Ernest might be dead at his feet. This
 idea made me shudder, and recalled me to action. I started up, and
 resolved to return to Geneva with all possible speed.
 
 There were no horses to be procured, and I must return by the lake; but
 the wind was unfavourable, and the rain fell in torrents. However, it
 was hardly morning, and I might reasonably hope to arrive by night. I
 hired men to row, and took an oar myself, for I had always experienced
 relief from mental torment in bodily exercise. But the overflowing
 misery I now felt, and the excess of agitation that I endured, rendered
 me incapable of any exertion. I threw down the oar; and, leaning my head
 upon my hands, gave way to every gloomy idea that arose. If I looked up,
 I saw the scenes which were familiar to me in my happier time, and which
 I had contemplated but the day before in the company of her who was now
 but a shadow and a recollection. Tears streamed from my eyes. The rain
 had ceased for a moment, and I saw the fish play in the waters as they
 had done a few hours before; they had then been observed by Elizabeth.
 Nothing is so painful to the human mind as a great and sudden change.
 The sun might shine, or the clouds might lour; but nothing could appear
 to me as it had done the day before. A fiend had snatched from me every
 hope of future happiness: no creature had ever been so miserable as I
 was; so frightful an event is single in the history of man.
 
 But why should I dwell upon the incidents that followed this last
 overwhelming event. Mine has been a tale of horrors; I have reached
 their _acme_, and what I must now relate can but be tedious to you. Know
 that, one by one, my friends were snatched away; I was left desolate. My
 own strength is exhausted; and I must tell, in a few words, what remains
 of my hideous narration.
 
 I arrived at Geneva. My father and Ernest yet lived; but the former sunk
 under the tidings that I bore. I see him now, excellent and venerable
 old man! his eyes wandered in vacancy, for they had lost their charm and
 their delight--his niece, his more than daughter, whom he doated on with
 all that affection which a man feels, who, in the decline of life,
 having few affections, clings more earnestly to those that remain.
 Cursed, cursed be the fiend that brought misery on his grey hairs, and
 doomed him to waste in wretchedness! He could not live under the horrors
 that were accumulated around him; an apoplectic fit was brought on, and
 in a few days he died in my arms.
 
 What then became of me? I know not; I lost sensation, and chains and
 darkness were the only objects that pressed upon me. Sometimes, indeed,
 I dreamt that I wandered in flowery meadows and pleasant vales with the
 friends of my youth; but awoke, and found myself in a dungeon.
 Melancholy followed, but by degrees I gained a clear conception of my
 miseries and situation, and was then released from my prison. For they
 had called me mad; and during many months, as I understood, a solitary
 cell had been my habitation.
 
 But liberty had been a useless gift to me had I not, as I awakened to
 reason, at the same time awakened to revenge. As the memory of past
 misfortunes pressed upon me, I began to reflect on their cause--the
 monster whom I had created, the miserable daemon whom I had sent abroad
 into the world for my destruction. I was possessed by a maddening rage
 when I thought of him, and desired and ardently prayed that I might have
 him within my grasp to wreak a great and signal revenge on his cursed
 head.
 
 Nor did my hate long confine itself to useless wishes; I began to
 reflect on the best means of securing him; and for this purpose, about a
 month after my release, I repaired to a criminal judge in the town, and
 told him that I had an accusation to make; that I knew the destroyer of
 my family; and that I required him to exert his whole authority for the
 apprehension of the murderer.
 
 The magistrate listened to me with attention and kindness: "Be assured,
 sir," said he, "no pains or exertions on my part shall be spared to
 discover the villain."
 
 "I thank you," replied I; "listen, therefore, to the deposition that I
 have to make. It is indeed a tale so strange, that I should fear you
 would not credit it, were there not something in truth which, however
 wonderful, forces conviction. The story is too connected to be mistaken
 for a dream, and I have no motive for falsehood." My manner, as I thus
 addressed him, was impressive, but calm; I had formed in my own heart a
 resolution to pursue my destroyer to death; and this purpose quieted my
 agony, and provisionally reconciled me to life. I now related my history
 briefly, but with firmness and precision, marking the dates with
 accuracy, and never deviating into invective or exclamation.
 
 The magistrate appeared at first perfectly incredulous, but as I
 continued he became more attentive and interested; I saw him sometimes
 shudder with horror, at others a lively surprise, unmingled with
 disbelief, was painted on his countenance.
 
 When I had concluded my narration, I said. "This is the being whom I
 accuse, and for whose detection and punishment I call upon you to exert
 your whole power. It is your duty as a magistrate, and I believe and
 hope that your feelings as a man will not revolt from the execution of
 those functions on this occasion."
 
 This address caused a considerable change in the physiognomy of my
 auditor. He had heard my story with that half kind of belief that is
 given to a tale of spirits and supernatural events; but when he was
 called upon to act officially in consequence, the whole tide of his
 incredulity returned. He, however, answered mildly, "I would willingly
 afford you every aid in your pursuit; but the creature of whom you
 speak appears to have powers which would put all my exertions to
 defiance. Who can follow an animal which can traverse the sea of ice,
 and inhabit caves and dens, where no man would venture to intrude?
 Besides, some months have elapsed since the commission of his crimes,
 and no one can conjecture to what place he has wandered, or what region
 he may now inhabit."
 
 "I do not doubt that he hovers near the spot which I inhabit; and if he
 has indeed taken refuge in the Alps, he may be hunted like the chamois,
 and destroyed as a beast of prey. But I perceive your thoughts: you do
 not credit my narrative, and do not intend to pursue my enemy with the
 punishment which is his desert."
 
 As I spoke, rage sparkled in my eyes; the magistrate was intimidated;
 "You are mistaken," said he, "I will exert myself; and if it is in my
 power to seize the monster, be assured that he shall suffer punishment
 proportionate to his crimes. But I fear, from what you have yourself
 described to be his properties, that this will prove impracticable, and
 that, while every proper measure is pursued, you should endeavour to
 make up your mind to disappointment."
 
 "That cannot be; but all that I can say will be of little avail. My
 revenge is of no moment to you; yet, while I allow it to be a vice, I
 confess that it is the devouring and only passion of my soul. My rage is
 unspeakable, when I reflect that the murderer, whom I have turned loose
 upon society, still exists. You refuse my just demand: I have but one
 resource; and I devote myself, either in my life or death, to his
 destruction."
 
 I trembled with excess of agitation as I said this; there was a phrenzy
 in my manner, and something, I doubt not, of that haughty fierceness,
 which the martyrs of old are said to have possessed. But to a Genevan
 magistrate, whose mind was occupied by far other ideas than those of
 devotion and heroism, this elevation of mind had much the appearance of
 madness. He endeavoured to soothe me as a nurse does a child, and
 reverted to my tale as the effects of delirium.
 
 "Man," I cried, "how ignorant art thou in thy pride of wisdom! Cease;
 you know not what it is you say."
 
 I broke from the house angry and disturbed, and retired to meditate on
 some other mode of action.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 My present situation was one in which all voluntary thought was
 swallowed up and lost. I was hurried away by fury; revenge alone endowed
 me with strength and composure; it modelled my feelings, and allowed me
 to be calculating and calm, at periods when otherwise delirium or death
 would have been my portion.
 
 My first resolution was to quit Geneva for ever; my country, which, when
 I was happy and beloved, was dear to me, now, in my adversity, became
 hateful. I provided myself with a sum of money, together with a few
 jewels which had belonged to my mother, and departed.
 
 And now my wanderings began, which are to cease but with life. I have
 traversed a vast portion of the earth, and have endured all the
 hardships which travellers, in deserts and barbarous countries, are wont
 to meet. How I have lived I hardly know; many times have I stretched my
 failing limbs upon the sandy plain, and prayed for death. But revenge
 kept me alive; I dared not die, and leave my adversary in being.
 
 When I quitted Geneva, my first labour was to gain some clue by which I
 might trace the steps of my fiendish enemy. But my plan was unsettled;
 and I wandered many hours around the confines of the town, uncertain
 what path I should pursue. As night approached, I found myself at the
 entrance of the cemetery where William, Elizabeth, and my father,
 reposed. I entered it, and approached the tomb which marked their
 graves. Every thing was silent, except the leaves of the trees, which
 were gently agitated by the wind; the night was nearly dark; and the
 scene would have been solemn and affecting even to an uninterested
 observer. The spirits of the departed seemed to flit around, and to cast
 a shadow, which was felt but seen not, around the head of the mourner.
 
 The deep grief which this scene had at first excited quickly gave way to
 rage and despair. They were dead, and I lived; their murderer also
 lived, and to destroy him I must drag out my weary existence. I knelt on
 the grass, and kissed the earth, and with quivering lips exclaimed, "By
 the sacred earth on which I kneel, by the shades that wander near me, by
 the deep and eternal grief that I feel, I swear; and by thee, O Night,
 and by the spirits that preside over thee, I swear to pursue the daemon,
 who caused this misery, until he or I shall perish in mortal conflict.
 For this purpose I will preserve my life: to execute this dear revenge,
 will I again behold the sun, and tread the green herbage of earth, which
 otherwise should vanish from my eyes for ever. And I call on you,
 spirits of the dead; and on you, wandering ministers of vengeance, to
 aid and conduct me in my work. Let the cursed and hellish monster drink
 deep of agony; let him feel the despair that now torments me."
 
 I had begun my adjuration with solemnity, and an awe which almost
 assured me that the shades of my murdered friends heard and approved my
 devotion; but the furies possessed me as I concluded, and rage choaked
 my utterance.
 
 I was answered through the stillness of night by a loud and fiendish
 laugh. It rung on my ears long and heavily; the mountains re-echoed it,
 and I felt as if all hell surrounded me with mockery and laughter.
 Surely in that moment I should have been possessed by phrenzy, and have
 destroyed my miserable existence, but that my vow was heard, and that I
 was reserved for vengeance. The laughter died away: when a well-known
 and abhorred voice, apparently close to my ear, addressed me in an
 audible whisper--"I am satisfied: miserable wretch! you have determined
 to live, and I am satisfied."
 
 I darted towards the spot from which the sound proceeded; but the devil
 eluded my grasp. Suddenly the broad disk of the moon arose, and shone
 full upon his ghastly and distorted shape, as he fled with more than
 mortal speed.
 
 I pursued him; and for many months this has been my task. Guided by a
 slight clue, I followed the windings of the Rhone, but vainly. The blue
 Mediterranean appeared; and, by a strange chance, I saw the fiend enter
 by night, and hide himself in a vessel bound for the Black Sea. I took
 my passage in the same ship; but he escaped, I know not how.
 
 Amidst the wilds of Tartary and Russia, although he still evaded me, I
 have ever followed in his track. Sometimes the peasants, scared by this
 horrid apparition, informed me of his path; sometimes he himself, who
 feared that if I lost all trace I should despair and die, often left
 some mark to guide me. The snows descended on my head, and I saw the
 print of his huge step on the white plain. To you first entering on
 life, to whom care is new, and agony unknown, how can you understand
 what I have felt, and still feel? Cold, want, and fatigue, were the least
 pains which I was destined to endure; I was cursed by some devil, and
 carried about with me my eternal hell; yet still a spirit of good
 followed and directed my steps, and, when I most murmured, would
 suddenly extricate me from seemingly insurmountable difficulties.
 Sometimes, when nature, overcome by hunger, sunk under the exhaustion, a
 repast was prepared for me in the desert, that restored and inspirited
 me. The fare was indeed coarse, such as the peasants of the country ate;
 but I may not doubt that it was set there by the spirits that I had
 invoked to aid me. Often, when all was dry, the heavens cloudless, and I
 was parched by thirst, a slight cloud would bedim the sky, shed the few
 drops that revived me, and vanish.
 
 I followed, when I could, the courses of the rivers; but the daemon
 generally avoided these, as it was here that the population of the
 country chiefly collected. In other places human beings were seldom
 seen; and I generally subsisted on the wild animals that crossed my
 path. I had money with me, and gained the friendship of the villagers by
 distributing it, or bringing with me some food that I had killed, which,
 after taking a small part, I always presented to those who had provided
 me with fire and utensils for cooking.
 
 My life, as it passed thus, was indeed hateful to me, and it was during
 sleep alone that I could taste joy. O blessed sleep! often, when most
 miserable, I sank to repose, and my dreams lulled me even to rapture.
 The spirits that guarded me had provided these moments, or rather hours,
 of happiness, that I might retain strength to fulfil my pilgrimage.
 Deprived of this respite, I should have sunk under my hardships. During
 the day I was sustained and inspirited by the hope of night: for in
 sleep I saw my friends, my wife, and my beloved country; again I saw the
 benevolent countenance of my father, heard the silver tones of my
 Elizabeth's voice, and beheld Clerval enjoying health and youth. Often,
 when wearied by a toilsome march, I persuaded myself that I was dreaming
 until night should come, and that I should then enjoy reality in the
 arms of my dearest friends. What agonizing fondness did I feel for them!
 how did I cling to their dear forms, as sometimes they haunted even my
 waking hours, and persuade myself that they still lived! At such
 moments vengeance, that burned within me, died in my heart, and I
 pursued my path towards the destruction of the daemon, more as a task
 enjoined by heaven, as the mechanical impulse of some power of which I
 was unconscious, than as the ardent desire of my soul.
 
 What his feelings were whom I pursued, I cannot know. Sometimes, indeed,
 he left marks in writing on the barks of the trees, or cut in stone,
 that guided me, and instigated my fury. "My reign is not yet over,"
 (these words were legible in one of these inscriptions); "you live, and
 my power is complete. Follow me; I seek the everlasting ices of the
 north, where you will feel the misery of cold and frost, to which I am
 impassive. You will find near this place, if you follow not too tardily,
 a dead hare; eat, and be refreshed. Come on, my enemy; we have yet to
 wrestle for our lives; but many hard and miserable hours must you
 endure, until that period shall arrive."
 
 Scoffing devil! Again do I vow vengeance; again do I devote thee,
 miserable fiend, to torture and death. Never will I omit my search,
 until he or I perish; and then with what ecstacy shall I join my
 Elizabeth, and those who even now prepare for me the reward of my
 tedious toil and horrible pilgrimage.
 
 As I still pursued my journey to the northward, the snows thickened, and
 the cold increased in a degree almost too severe to support. The
 peasants were shut up in their hovels, and only a few of the most hardy
 ventured forth to seize the animals whom starvation had forced from
 their hiding-places to seek for prey. The rivers were covered with ice,
 and no fish could be procured; and thus I was cut off from my chief
 article of maintenance.
 
 The triumph of my enemy increased with the difficulty of my labours. One
 inscription that he left was in these words: "Prepare! your toils only
 begin: wrap yourself in furs, and provide food, for we shall soon enter
 upon a journey where your sufferings will satisfy my everlasting
 hatred."
 
 My courage and perseverance were invigorated by these scoffing words; I
 resolved not to fail in my purpose; and, calling on heaven to support
 me, I continued with unabated fervour to traverse immense deserts, until
 the ocean appeared at a distance, and formed the utmost boundary of the
 horizon. Oh! how unlike it was to the blue seas of the south! Covered
 with ice, it was only to be distinguished from land by its superior
 wildness and ruggedness. The Greeks wept for joy when they beheld the
 Mediterranean from the hills of Asia, and hailed with rapture the
 boundary of their toils. I did not weep; but I knelt down, and, with a
 full heart, thanked my guiding spirit for conducting me in safety to the
 place where I hoped, notwithstanding my adversary's gibe, to meet and
 grapple with him.
 
 Some weeks before this period I had procured a sledge and dogs, and thus
 traversed the snows with inconceivable speed. I know not whether the
 fiend possessed the same advantages; but I found that, as before I had
 daily lost ground in the pursuit, I now gained on him; so much so, that
 when I first saw the ocean, he was but one day's journey in advance, and
 I hoped to intercept him before he should reach the beach. With new
 courage, therefore, I pressed on, and in two days arrived at a wretched
 hamlet on the seashore. I inquired of the inhabitants concerning the
 fiend, and gained accurate information. A gigantic monster, they said,
 had arrived the night before, armed with a gun and many pistols; putting
 to flight the inhabitants of a solitary cottage, through fear of his
 terrific appearance. He had carried off their store of winter food, and,
 placing it in a sledge, to draw which he had seized on a numerous drove
 of trained dogs, he had harnessed them, and the same night, to the joy
 of the horror-struck villagers, had pursued his journey across the sea
 in a direction that led to no land; and they conjectured that he must
 speedily be destroyed by the breaking of the ice, or frozen by the
 eternal frosts.
 
 On hearing this information, I suffered a temporary access of despair.
 He had escaped me; and I must commence a destructive and almost endless
 journey across the mountainous ices of the ocean,--amidst cold that few
 of the inhabitants could long endure, and which I, the native of a
 genial and sunny climate, could not hope to survive. Yet at the idea
 that the fiend should live and be triumphant, my rage and vengeance
 returned, and, like a mighty tide, overwhelmed every other feeling.
 After a slight repose, during which the spirits of the dead hovered
 round, and instigated me to toil and revenge, I prepared for my
 journey.
 
 I exchanged my land sledge for one fashioned for the inequalities of the
 frozen ocean; and, purchasing a plentiful stock of provisions, I
 departed from land.
 
 I cannot guess how many days have passed since then; but I have endured
 misery, which nothing but the eternal sentiment of a just retribution
 burning within my heart could have enabled me to support. Immense and
 rugged mountains of ice often barred up my passage, and I often heard
 the thunder of the ground sea, which threatened my destruction. But
 again the frost came, and made the paths of the sea secure.
 
 By the quantity of provision which I had consumed I should guess that I
 had passed three weeks in this journey; and the continual protraction of
 hope, returning back upon the heart, often wrung bitter drops of
 despondency and grief from my eyes. Despair had indeed almost secured
 her prey, and I should soon have sunk beneath this misery; when once,
 after the poor animals that carried me had with incredible toil gained
 the summit of a sloping ice mountain, and one sinking under his fatigue
 died, I viewed the expanse before me with anguish, when suddenly my eye
 caught a dark speck upon the dusky plain. I strained my sight to
 discover what it could be, and uttered a wild cry of ecstacy when I
 distinguished a sledge, and the distorted proportions of a well-known
 form within. Oh! with what a burning gush did hope revisit my heart!
 warm tears filled my eyes, which I hastily wiped away, that they might
 not intercept the view I had of the daemon; but still my sight was dimmed
 by the burning drops, until, giving way to the emotions that oppressed
 me, I wept aloud.
 
 But this was not the time for delay; I disencumbered the dogs of their
 dead companion, gave them a plentiful portion of food; and, after an
 hour's rest, which was absolutely necessary, and yet which was bitterly
 irksome to me, I continued my route. The sledge was still visible; nor
 did I again lose sight of it, except at the moments when for a short
 time some ice rock concealed it with its intervening crags. I indeed
 perceptibly gained on it; and when, after nearly two days' journey, I
 beheld my enemy at no more than a mile distant, my heart bounded within
 me.
 
 But now, when I appeared almost within grasp of my enemy, my hopes were
 suddenly extinguished, and I lost all trace of him more utterly than I
 had ever done before. A ground sea was heard; the thunder of its
 progress, as the waters rolled and swelled beneath me, became every
 moment more ominous and terrific. I pressed on, but in vain. The wind
 arose; the sea roared; and, as with the mighty shock of an earthquake,
 it split, and cracked with a tremendous and overwhelming sound. The work
 was soon finished: in a few minutes a tumultuous sea rolled between me
 and my enemy, and I was left drifting on a scattered piece of ice, that
 was continually lessening, and thus preparing for me a hideous death.
 
 In this manner many appalling hours passed; several of my dogs died; and
 I myself was about to sink under the accumulation of distress, when I
 saw your vessel riding at anchor, and holding forth to me hopes of
 succour and life. I had no conception that vessels ever came so far
 north, and was astounded at the sight. I quickly destroyed part of my
 sledge to construct oars; and by these means was enabled, with infinite
 fatigue, to move my ice-raft in the direction of your ship. I had
 determined, if you were going southward, still to trust myself to the
 mercy of the seas, rather than abandon my purpose. I hoped to induce you
 to grant me a boat with which I could still pursue my enemy. But your
 direction was northward. You took me on board when my vigour was
 exhausted, and I should soon have sunk under my multiplied hardships
 into a death, which I still dread,--for my task is unfulfilled.
 
 Oh! when will my guiding spirit, in conducting me to the daemon, allow me
 the rest I so much desire; or must I die, and he yet live? If I do,
 swear to me, Walton, that he shall not escape; that you will seek him,
 and satisfy my vengeance in his death. Yet, do I dare ask you to
 undertake my pilgrimage, to endure the hardships that I have undergone?
 No; I am not so selfish. Yet, when I am dead, if he should appear; if
 the ministers of vengeance should conduct him to you, swear that he
 shall not live--swear that he shall not triumph over my accumulated
 woes, and live to make another such a wretch as I am. He is eloquent
 and persuasive; and once his words had even power over my heart: but
 trust him not. His soul is as hellish as his form, full of treachery and
 fiend-like malice. Hear him not; call on the manes of William, Justine,
 Clerval, Elizabeth, my father, and of the wretched Victor, and thrust
 your sword into his heart. I will hover near, and direct the steel
 aright.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 WALTON, _in continuation_.
 
 August 26th, 17--.
 
 You have read this strange and terrific story, Margaret; and do you not
 feel your blood congealed with horror, like that which even now curdles
 mine? Sometimes, seized with sudden agony, he could not continue his
 tale; at others, his voice broken, yet piercing, uttered with difficulty
 the words so replete with agony. His fine and lovely eyes were now
 lighted up with indignation, now subdued to downcast sorrow, and
 quenched in infinite wretchedness. Sometimes he commanded his
 countenance and tones, and related the most horrible incidents with a
 tranquil voice, suppressing every mark of agitation; then, like a
 volcano bursting forth, his face would suddenly change to an expression
 of the wildest rage, as he shrieked out imprecations on his persecutor.
 
 His tale is connected, and told with an appearance of the simplest
 truth; yet I own to you that the letters of Felix and Safie, which he
 shewed me, and the apparition of the monster, seen from our ship,
 brought to me a greater conviction of the truth of his narrative than
 his asseverations, however earnest and connected. Such a monster has
 then really existence; I cannot doubt it; yet I am lost in surprise and
 admiration. Sometimes I endeavoured to gain from Frankenstein the
 particulars of his creature's formation; but on this point he was
 impenetrable.
 
 "Are you mad, my friend?" said he, "or whither does your senseless
 curiosity lead you? Would you also create for yourself and the world a
 demoniacal enemy? Or to what do your questions tend? Peace, peace! learn
 my miseries, and do not seek to increase your own."
 
 Frankenstein discovered that I made notes concerning his history: he
 asked to see them, and then himself corrected and augmented them in many
 places; but principally in giving the life and spirit to the
 conversations he held with his enemy. "Since you have preserved my
 narration," said he, "I would not that a mutilated one should go down to
 posterity."
 
 Thus has a week passed away, while I have listened to the strangest tale
 that ever imagination formed. My thoughts, and every feeling of my soul,
 have been drunk up by the interest for my guest, which this tale, and
 his own elevated and gentle manners have created. I wish to soothe him;
 yet can I counsel one so infinitely miserable, so destitute of every
 hope of consolation, to live? Oh, no! the only joy that he can now know
 will be when he composes his shattered feelings to peace and death. Yet
 he enjoys one comfort, the offspring of solitude and delirium: he
 believes, that, when in dreams he holds converse with his friends, and
 derives from that communion consolation for his miseries, or excitements
 to his vengeance, that they are not the creations of his fancy, but the
 real beings who visit him from the regions of a remote world. This faith
 gives a solemnity to his reveries that render them to me almost as
 imposing and interesting as truth.
 
 Our conversations are not always confined to his own history and
 misfortunes. On every point of general literature he displays unbounded
 knowledge, and a quick and piercing apprehension. His eloquence is
 forcible and touching; nor can I hear him, when he relates a pathetic
 incident, or endeavours to move the passions of pity or love, without
 tears. What a glorious creature must he have been in the days of his
 prosperity, when he is thus noble and godlike in ruin. He seems to feel
 his own worth, and the greatness of his fall.
 
 "When younger," said he, "I felt as if I were destined for some great
 enterprise. My feelings are profound; but I possessed a coolness of
 judgment that fitted me for illustrious achievements. This sentiment of
 the worth of my nature supported me, when others would have been
 oppressed; for I deemed it criminal to throw away in useless grief those
 talents that might be useful to my fellow-creatures. When I reflected on
 the work I had completed, no less a one than the creation of a
 sensitive and rational animal, I could not rank myself with the herd of
 common projectors. But this feeling, which supported me in the
 commencement of my career, now serves only to plunge me lower in the
 dust. All my speculations and hopes are as nothing; and, like the
 archangel who aspired to omnipotence, I am chained in an eternal hell.
 My imagination was vivid, yet my powers of analysis and application were
 intense; by the union of these qualities I conceived the idea, and
 executed the creation of a man. Even now I cannot recollect, without
 passion, my reveries while the work was incomplete. I trod heaven in my
 thoughts, now exulting in my powers, now burning with the idea of their
 effects. From my infancy I was imbued with high hopes and a lofty
 ambition; but how am I sunk! Oh! my friend, if you had known me as I
 once was, you would not recognize me in this state of degradation.
 Despondency rarely visited my heart; a high destiny seemed to bear me
 on, until I fell, never, never again to rise."
 
 Must I then lose this admirable being? I have longed for a friend; I
 have sought one who would sympathize with and love me. Behold, on these
 desert seas I have found such a one; but, I fear, I have gained him only
 to know his value, and lose him. I would reconcile him to life, but he
 repulses the idea.
 
 "I thank you, Walton," he said, "for your kind intentions towards so
 miserable a wretch; but when you speak of new ties, and fresh
 affections, think you that any can replace those who are gone? Can any
 man be to me as Clerval was; or any woman another Elizabeth? Even where
 the affections are not strongly moved by any superior excellence, the
 companions of our childhood always possess a certain power over our
 minds, which hardly any later friend can obtain. They know our infantine
 dispositions, which, however they may be afterwards modified, are never
 eradicated; and they can judge of our actions with more certain
 conclusions as to the integrity of our motives. A sister or a brother
 can never, unless indeed such symptoms have been shewn early, suspect
 the other of fraud or false dealing, when another friend, however
 strongly he may be attached, may, in spite of himself, be invaded with
 suspicion. But I enjoyed friends, dear not only through habit and
 association, but from their own merits; and, wherever I am, the soothing
 voice of my Elizabeth, and the conversation of Clerval, will be ever
 whispered in my ear. They are dead; and but one feeling in such a
 solitude can persuade me to preserve my life. If I were engaged in any
 high undertaking or design, fraught with extensive utility to my
 fellow-creatures, then could I live to fulfil it. But such is not my
 destiny; I must pursue and destroy the being to whom I gave existence;
 then my lot on earth will be fulfilled, and I may die."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 September 2d.
 
 MY BELOVED SISTER,
 
 I write to you, encompassed by peril, and ignorant whether I am ever
 doomed to see again dear England, and the dearer friends that inhabit
 it. I am surrounded by mountains of ice, which admit of no escape, and
 threaten every moment to crush my vessel. The brave fellows, whom I have
 persuaded to be my companions, look towards me for aid; but I have none
 to bestow. There is something terribly appalling in our situation, yet
 my courage and hopes do not desert me. We may survive; and if we do not,
 I will repeat the lessons of my Seneca, and die with a good heart.
 
 Yet what, Margaret, will be the state of your mind? You will not hear of
 my destruction, and you will anxiously await my return. Years will pass,
 and you will have visitings of despair, and yet be tortured by hope. Oh!
 my beloved sister, the sickening failings of your heart-felt
 expectations are, in prospect, more terrible to me than my own death.
 But you have a husband, and lovely children; you may be happy: heaven
 bless you, and make you so!
 
 My unfortunate guest regards me with the tenderest compassion. He
 endeavours to fill me with hope; and talks as if life were a possession
 which he valued. He reminds me how often the same accidents have
 happened to other navigators, who have attempted this sea, and, in spite
 of myself, he fills me with cheerful auguries. Even the sailors feel the
 power of his eloquence: when he speaks, they no longer despair: he
 rouses their energies, and, while they hear his voice, they believe
 these vast mountains of ice are mole-hills, which will vanish before the
 resolutions of man. These feelings are transitory; each day's
 expectation delayed fills them with fear, and I almost dread a mutiny
 caused by this despair.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 September 5th.
 
 A scene has just passed of such uncommon interest, that although it is
 highly probable that these papers may never reach you, yet I cannot
 forbear recording it.
 
 We are still surrounded by mountains of ice, still in imminent danger of
 being crushed in their conflict. The cold is excessive, and many of my
 unfortunate comrades have already found a grave amidst this scene of
 desolation. Frankenstein has daily declined in health: a feverish fire
 still glimmers in his eyes; but he is exhausted, and, when suddenly
 roused to any exertion, he speedily sinks again into apparent
 lifelessness.
 
 I mentioned in my last letter the fears I entertained of a mutiny. This
 morning, as I sat watching the wan countenance of my friend--his eyes
 half closed, and his limbs hanging listlessly,--I was roused by half a
 dozen of the sailors, who desired admission into the cabin. They
 entered; and their leader addressed me. He told me that he and his
 companions had been chosen by the other sailors to come in deputation to
 me, to make me a demand, which, in justice, I could not refuse. We were
 immured in ice, and should probably never escape; but they feared that
 if, as was possible, the ice should dissipate, and a free passage be
 opened, I should be rash enough to continue my voyage, and lead them
 into fresh dangers, after they might happily have surmounted this. They
 desired, therefore, that I should engage with a solemn promise, that if
 the vessel should be freed, I would instantly direct my coarse
 southward.
 
 This speech troubled me. I had not despaired; nor had I yet conceived
 the idea of returning, if set free. Yet could I, in justice, or even in
 possibility, refuse this demand? I hesitated before I answered; when
 Frankenstein, who had at first been silent, and, indeed, appeared hardly
 to have force enough to attend, now roused himself; his eyes sparkled,
 and his cheeks flushed with momentary vigour. Turning towards the men,
 he said--
 
 "What do you mean? What do you demand of your captain? Are you then so
 easily turned from your design? Did you not call this a glorious
 expedition? and wherefore was it glorious? Not because the way was
 smooth and placid as a southern sea, but because it was full of dangers
 and terror; because, at every new incident, your fortitude was to be
 called forth, and your courage exhibited; because danger and death
 surrounded, and these dangers you were to brave and overcome. For this
 was it a glorious, for this was it an honourable undertaking. You were
 hereafter to be hailed as the benefactors of your species; your name
 adored, as belonging to brave men who encountered death for honour and
 the benefit of mankind. And now, behold, with the first imagination of
 danger, or, if you will, the first mighty and terrific trial of your
 courage, you shrink away, and are content to be handed down as men who
 had not strength enough to endure cold and peril; and so, poor souls,
 they were chilly, and returned to their warm fire-sides. Why, that
 requires not this preparation; ye need not have come thus far, and
 dragged your captain to the shame of a defeat, merely to prove
 yourselves cowards. Oh! be men, or be more than men. Be steady to your
 purposes, and firm as a rock. This ice is not made of such stuff as your
 hearts might be; it is mutable, cannot withstand you, if you say that it
 shall not. Do not return to your families with the stigma of disgrace
 marked on your brows. Return as heroes who have fought and conquered,
 and who know not what it is to turn their backs on the foe."
 
 He spoke this with a voice so modulated to the different feelings
 expressed in his speech, with an eye so full of lofty design and
 heroism, that can you wonder that these men were moved. They looked at
 one another, and were unable to reply. I spoke; I told them to retire,
 and consider of what had been said: that I would not lead them further
 north, if they strenuously desired the contrary; but that I hoped that,
 with reflection, their courage would return.
 
 They retired, and I turned towards my friend; but he was sunk in
 languor, and almost deprived of life.
 
 How all this will terminate, I know not; but I had rather die, than
 return shamefully,--my purpose unfulfilled. Yet I fear such will be my
 fate; the men, unsupported by ideas of glory and honour, can never
 willingly continue to endure their present hardships.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 September 7th.
 
 The die is cast; I have consented to return, if we are not destroyed.
 Thus are my hopes blasted by cowardice and indecision; I come back
 ignorant and disappointed. It requires more philosophy than I possess,
 to bear this injustice with patience.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 September 12th.
 
 It is past; I am returning to England. I have lost my hopes of utility
 and glory;--I have lost my friend. But I will endeavour to detail these
 bitter circumstances to you, my dear sister; and, while I am wafted
 towards England, and towards you, I will not despond.
 
 September 19th, the ice began to move, and roarings like thunder were
 heard at a distance, as the islands split and cracked in every
 direction. We were in the most imminent peril; but, as we could only
 remain passive, my chief attention was occupied by my unfortunate guest,
 whose illness increased in such a degree, that he was entirely confined
 to his bed. The ice cracked behind us, and was driven with force towards
 the north; a breeze sprung from the west, and on the 11th the passage
 towards the south became perfectly free. When the sailors saw this, and
 that their return to their native country was apparently assured, a
 shout of tumultuous joy broke from, them, loud and long-continued.
 Frankenstein, who was dozing, awoke, and asked the cause of the tumult.
 "They shout," I said, "because they will soon return to England."
 
 "Do you then really return?"
 
 "Alas! yes; I cannot withstand their demands. I cannot lead them
 unwillingly to danger, and I must return."
 
 "Do so, if you will; but I will not. You may give up your purpose; but
 mine is assigned to me by heaven, and I dare not. I am weak; but surely
 the spirits who assist my vengeance will endow me with sufficient
 strength." Saying this, he endeavoured to spring from the bed, but the
 exertion was too great for him; he fell back, and fainted.
 
 It was long before he was restored; and I often thought that life was
 entirely extinct. At length he opened his eyes, but he breathed with
 difficulty, and was unable to speak. The surgeon gave him a composing
 draught, and ordered us to leave him undisturbed. In the mean time he
 told me, that my friend had certainly not many hours to live.
 
 His sentence was pronounced; and I could only grieve, and be patient. I
 sat by his bed watching him; his eyes were closed, and I thought he
 slept; but presently he called to me in a feeble voice, and, bidding me
 come near, said--"Alas! the strength I relied on is gone; I feel that I
 shall soon die, and he, my enemy and persecutor, may still be in being.
 Think not, Walton, that in the last moments of my existence I feel that
 burning hatred, and ardent desire of revenge, I once expressed, but I
 feel myself justified in desiring the death of my adversary. During
 these last days I have been occupied in examining my past conduct; nor
 do I find it blameable. In a fit of enthusiastic madness I created a
 rational creature, and was bound towards him, to assure, as far as was
 in my power, his happiness and well-being. This was my duty; but there
 was another still paramount to that. My duties towards my
 fellow-creatures had greater claims to my attention, because they
 included a greater proportion of happiness or misery. Urged by this
 view, I refused, and I did right in refusing, to create a companion for
 the first creature. He shewed unparalleled malignity and selfishness, in
 evil: he destroyed my friends; he devoted to destruction beings who
 possessed exquisite sensations, happiness, and wisdom; nor do I know
 where this thirst for vengeance may end. Miserable himself, that he may
 render no other wretched, he ought to die. The task of his destruction
 was mine, but I have failed. When actuated by selfish and vicious
 motives, I asked you to undertake my unfinished work; and I renew this
 request now, when I am only induced by reason and virtue.
 
 "Yet I cannot ask you to renounce your country and friends, to fulfil
 this task; and now, that you are returning to England, you will have
 little chance of meeting with him. But the consideration of these
 points, and the well-balancing of what you may esteem your duties, I
 leave to you; my judgment and ideas are already disturbed by the near
 approach of death. I dare not ask you to do what I think right, for I
 may still be misled by passion.
 
 "That he should live to be an instrument of mischief disturbs me; in
 other respects this hour, when I momentarily expect my release, is the
 only happy one which I have enjoyed for several years. The forms of the
 beloved dead flit before me, and I hasten to their arms. Farewell,
 Walton! Seek happiness in tranquillity, and avoid ambition, even if it
 be only the apparently innocent one of distinguishing yourself in
 science and discoveries. Yet why do I say this? I have myself been
 blasted in these hopes, yet another may succeed."
 
 His voice became fainter as he spoke; and at length, exhausted by his
 effort, he sunk into silence. About half an hour afterwards he attempted
 again to speak, but was unable; he pressed my hand feebly, and his eyes
 closed for ever, while the irradiation of a gentle smile passed away
 from his lips.
 
 Margaret, what comment can I make on the untimely extinction of this
 glorious spirit? What can I say, that will enable you to understand the
 depth of my sorrow? All that I should express would be inadequate and
 feeble. My tears flow; my mind is overshadowed by a cloud of
 disappointment. But I journey towards England, and I may there find
 consolation.
 
 I am interrupted. What do these sounds portend? It is midnight; the
 breeze blows fairly, and the watch on deck scarcely stir. Again; there
 is a sound as of a human voice, but hoarser; it comes from the cabin
 where the remains of Frankenstein still lie. I must arise, and examine.
 Good night, my sister.
 
 Great God! what a scene has just taken place! I am yet dizzy with the
 remembrance of it. I hardly know whether I shall have the power to
 detail it; yet the tale which I have recorded would be incomplete
 without this final and wonderful catastrophe.
 
 I entered the cabin, where lay the remains of my ill-fated and admirable
 friend. Over him hung a form which I cannot find words to describe;
 gigantic in stature, yet uncouth and distorted in its proportions. As he
 hung over the coffin, his face was concealed by long locks of ragged
 hair; but one vast hand was extended, in colour and apparent texture
 like that of a mummy. When he heard the sound of my approach, he ceased
 to utter exclamations of grief and horror, and sprung towards the
 window. Never did I behold a vision so horrible as his face, of such
 loathsome, yet appalling hideousness. I shut my eyes involuntarily, and
 endeavoured to recollect what were my duties with regard to this
 destroyer. I called on him to stay.
 
 He paused, looking on me with wonder; and, again turning towards the
 lifeless form of his creator, he seemed to forget my presence, and every
 feature and gesture seemed instigated by the wildest rage of some
 uncontrollable passion.
 
 "That is also my victim!" he exclaimed; "in his murder my crimes are
 consummated; the miserable series of my being is wound to its close! Oh,
 Frankenstein! generous and self-devoted being! what does it avail that I
 now ask thee to pardon me? I, who irretrievably destroyed thee by
 destroying all thou lovedst. Alas! he is cold; he may not answer me."
 
 His voice seemed suffocated; and my first impulses, which had suggested
 to me the duty of obeying the dying request of my friend, in destroying
 his enemy, were now suspended by a mixture of curiosity and compassion.
 I approached this tremendous being; I dared not again raise my looks
 upon his face, there was something so scaring and unearthly in his
 ugliness. I attempted to speak, but the words died away on my lips. The
 monster continued to utter wild and incoherent self-reproaches. At
 length I gathered resolution to address him, in a pause of the tempest
 of his passion: "Your repentance," I said, "is now superfluous. If you
 had listened to the voice of conscience, and heeded the stings of
 remorse, before you had urged your diabolical vengeance to this
 extremity, Frankenstein would yet have lived."
 
 "And do you dream?" said the daemon; "do you think that I was then dead
 to agony and remorse?--He," he continued, pointing to the corpse, "he
 suffered not more in the consummation of the deed;--oh! not the
 ten-thousandth portion of the anguish that was mine during the lingering
 detail of its execution. A frightful selfishness hurried me on, while
 my heart was poisoned with remorse. Think ye that the groans of Clerval
 were music to my ears? My heart was fashioned to be susceptible of love
 and sympathy; and, when wrenched by misery to vice and hatred, it did
 not endure the violence of the change without torture such as you cannot
 even imagine.
 
 "After the murder of Clerval, I returned to Switzerland, heart-broken
 and overcome. I pitied Frankenstein; my pity amounted to horror: I
 abhorred myself. But when I discovered that he, the author at once of my
 existence and of its unspeakable torments, dared to hope for happiness;
 that while he accumulated wretchedness and despair upon me, he sought
 his own enjoyment in feelings and passions from the indulgence of which
 I was for ever barred, then impotent envy and bitter indignation filled
 me with an insatiable thirst for vengeance. I recollected my threat, and
 resolved that it should be accomplished. I knew that I was preparing for
 myself a deadly torture; but I was the slave, not the master of an
 impulse, which I detested, yet could not disobey. Yet when she
 died!--nay, then I was not miserable. I had cast off all feeling,
 subdued all anguish to riot in the excess of my despair. Evil
 thenceforth became my good. Urged thus far, I had no choice but to adapt
 my nature to an element which I had willingly chosen. The completion of
 my demoniacal design became an insatiable passion. And now it is ended;
 there is my last victim!"
 
 I was at first touched by the expressions of his misery; yet when I
 called to mind what Frankenstein had said of his powers of eloquence and
 persuasion, and when I again cast my eyes on the lifeless form of my
 friend, indignation was re-kindled within me. "Wretch!" I said, "it is
 well that you come here to whine over the desolation that you have made.
 You throw a torch into a pile of buildings, and when they are consumed
 you sit among the ruins, and lament the fall. Hypocritical fiend! if he
 whom you mourn still lived, still would he be the object, again would he
 become the prey of your accursed vengeance. It is not pity that you
 feel; you lament only because the victim of your malignity is withdrawn
 from your power."
 
 "Oh, it is not thus--not thus," interrupted the being; "yet such must be
 the impression conveyed to you by what appears to be the purport of my
 actions. Yet I seek not a fellow-feeling in my misery. No sympathy may I
 ever find. When I first sought it, it was the love of virtue, the
 feelings of happiness and affection with which my whole being
 overflowed, that I wished to be participated. But now, that virtue has
 become to me a shadow, and that happiness and affection are turned into
 bitter and loathing despair, in what should I seek for sympathy? I am
 content to suffer alone, while my sufferings shall endure: when I die, I
 am well satisfied that abhorrence and opprobrium should load my memory.
 Once my fancy was soothed with dreams of virtue, of fame, and of
 enjoyment. Once I falsely hoped to meet with beings, who, pardoning my
 outward form, would love me for the excellent qualities which I was
 capable of bringing forth. I was nourished with high thoughts of honour
 and devotion. But now vice has degraded me beneath the meanest animal.
 No crime, no mischief, no malignity, no misery, can be found comparable
 to mine. When I call over the frightful catalogue of my deeds, I cannot
 believe that I am he whose thoughts were once filled with sublime and
 transcendant visions of the beauty and the majesty of goodness. But it
 is even so; the fallen angel becomes a malignant devil. Yet even that
 enemy of God and man had friends and associates in his desolation; I am
 quite alone.
 
 "You, who call Frankenstein your friend, seem to have a knowledge of my
 crimes and his misfortunes. But, in the detail which he gave you of
 them, he could not sum up the hours and months of misery which I
 endured, wasting in impotent passions. For whilst I destroyed his hopes,
 I did not satisfy my own desires. They were for ever ardent and craving;
 still I desired love and fellowship, and I was still spurned. Was there
 no injustice in this? Am I to be thought the only criminal, when all
 human kind sinned against me? Why do you not hate Felix, who drove his
 friend from his door with contumely? Why do you not execrate the rustic
 who sought to destroy the saviour of his child? Nay, these are virtuous
 and immaculate beings! I, the miserable and the abandoned, am an
 abortion, to be spurned at, and kicked, and trampled on. Even now my
 blood boils at the recollection of this injustice.
 
 "But it is true that I am a wretch. I have murdered the lovely and the
 helpless; I have strangled the innocent as they slept, and grasped to
 death his throat who never injured me or any other living thing. I have
 devoted my creator, the select specimen of all that is worthy of love
 and admiration among men, to misery; I have pursued him even to that
 irremediable ruin. There he lies, white and cold in death. You hate me;
 but your abhorrence cannot equal that with which I regard myself. I look
 on the hands which executed the deed; I think on the heart in which the
 imagination of it was conceived, and long for the moment when they will
 meet my eyes, when it will haunt my thoughts, no more.
 
 "Fear not that I shall be the instrument of future mischief. My work is
 nearly complete. Neither your's nor any man's death is needed to
 consummate the series of my being, and accomplish that which must be
 done; but it requires my own. Do not think that I shall be slow to
 perform this sacrifice. I shall quit your vessel on the ice-raft which
 brought me hither, and shall seek the most northern extremity of the
 globe; I shall collect my funeral pile, and consume to ashes this
 miserable frame, that its remains may afford no light to any curious and
 unhallowed wretch, who would create such another as I have been. I shall
 die. I shall no longer feel the agonies which now consume me, or be the
 prey of feelings unsatisfied, yet unquenched. He is dead who called me
 into being; and when I shall be no more, the very remembrance of us both
 will speedily vanish. I shall no longer see the sun or stars, or feel
 the winds play on my cheeks. Light, feeling, and sense, will pass away;
 and in this condition must I find my happiness. Some years ago, when the
 images which this world affords first opened upon me, when I felt the
 cheering warmth of summer, and heard the rustling of the leaves and the
 chirping of the birds, and these were all to me, I should have wept to
 die; now it is my only consolation. Polluted by crimes, and torn by the
 bitterest remorse, where can I find rest but in death?
 
 "Farewell! I leave you, and in you the last of human kind whom these
 eyes will ever behold. Farewell, Frankenstein! If thou wert yet alive,
 and yet cherished a desire of revenge against me, it would be better
 satiated in my life than in my destruction. But it was not so; thou
 didst seek my extinction, that I might not cause greater wretchedness;
 and if yet, in some mode unknown to me, thou hast not yet ceased to
 think and feel, thou desirest not my life for my own misery. Blasted as
 thou wert, my agony was still superior to thine; for the bitter sting of
 remorse may not cease to rankle in my wounds until death shall close
 them for ever.
 
 "But soon," he cried, with sad and solemn enthusiasm, "I shall die, and
 what I now feel be no longer felt. Soon these burning miseries will be
 extinct. I shall ascend my funeral pile triumphantly, and exult in the
 agony of the torturing flames. The light of that conflagration will fade
 away; my ashes will be swept into the sea by the winds. My spirit will
 sleep in peace; or if it thinks, it will not surely think thus.
 Farewell."
 
 He sprung from the cabin-window, as he said this, upon the ice-raft
 which lay close to the vessel. He was soon borne away by the waves, and
 lost in darkness and distance.
 
 
 THE END.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by S. Goodman and David Starner
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 PROSERPINE
 
 &
 
 MIDAS
 
 Two unpublished Mythological Dramas
 
 by
 
 MARY SHELLEY
 
 Edited with Introduction
 
 by
 
 A. KOSZUL
 
 
 
 
 PREFATORY NOTE.
 
 
 The editor came across the unpublished texts included in this volume
 as early as 1905. Perhaps he ought to apologize for delaying their
 appearance in print. The fact is he has long been afraid of overrating
 their intrinsic value. But as the great Shelley centenary year has
 come, perhaps this little monument of his wife's collaboration may
 take its modest place among the tributes which will be paid to his
 memory. For Mary Shelley's mythological dramas can at least claim to
 be the proper setting for some of the most beautiful lyrics of the
 poet, which so far have been read in undue isolation. And even as a
 literary sign of those times, as an example of that classical
 renaissance which the romantic period fostered, they may not be
 altogether negligible.
 
 These biographical and literary points have been dealt with in an
 introduction for which the kindest help was long ago received from the
 late Dr. Garnett and the late Lord Abinger. Sir Walter Raleigh was
 also among the first to give both encouragement and guidance. My
 friends M. Emile Pons and Mr. Roger Ingpen have read the book in
 manuscript. The authorities of the Bodleian Library and of the
 Clarendon Press have been as generously helpful as is their well-known
 wont. To all the editor wishes to record his acknowledgements and
 thanks.
 
 STRASBOURG.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 
 
 I.
 
 
 'The compositions published in Mrs. Shelley's lifetime afford but an
 inadequate conception of the intense sensibility and mental vigour of
 this extraordinary woman.'
 
 Thus wrote Dr. Garnett, in 1862 (Preface to his _Relics of Shelley_).
 The words of praise may have sounded unexpectedly warm at that date.
 Perhaps the present volume will make the reader more willing to
 subscribe, or less inclined to demur.
 
 Mary Godwin in her younger days certainly possessed a fair share of
 that nimbleness of invention which generally characterizes women of
 letters. Her favourite pastime as a child, she herself testifies,
 [Footnote: Preface to the 1831 edition of _Frankenstein_.] had been to
 write stories. And a dearer pleasure had been--to use her own
 characteristic abstract and elongated way of putting it--'the
 following up trains of thought which had for their subject the
 formation of a succession of imaginary incidents'. All readers of
 Shelley's life remember how later on, as a girl of nineteen--and a two
 years' wife--she was present, 'a devout but nearly silent listener',
 at the long symposia held by her husband and Byron in Switzerland
 (June 1816), and how the pondering over 'German horrors', and a common
 resolve to perpetrate ghost stories of their own, led her to imagine
 that most unwomanly of all feminine romances, _Frankenstein._ The
 paradoxical effort was paradoxically successful, and, as publishers'
 lists aver to this day, Frankenstein's monster has turned out to be
 the hardest-lived specimen of the 'raw-head-and-bloody-bones' school
 of romantic tales. So much, no doubt, to the credit of Mary Shelley.
 But more creditable, surely, is the fact that she was not tempted, as
 'Monk' Lewis had been, to persevere in those lugubrious themes.
 
 Although her publishers--_et pour cause_--insisted on styling her 'the
 author of Frankenstein', an entirely different vein appears in her
 later productions. Indeed, a quiet reserve of tone, a slow, sober, and
 sedate bearing, are henceforth characteristic of all her literary
 attitudes. It is almost a case of running from one to the other
 extreme. The force of style which even adverse critics acknowledged in
 _Frankenstein_ was sometimes perilously akin to the most disputable
 kinds of romantic rant. But in the historical or society novels which
 followed, in the contributions which graced the 'Keepsakes' of the
 thirties, and even--alas--in the various prefaces and commentaries
 which accompanied the publication of so many poems of Shelley, his
 wife succumbed to an increasing habit of almost Victorian reticence
 and dignity. And those later novels and tales, though they sold well
 in their days and were kindly reviewed, can hardly boast of any
 reputation now. Most of them are pervaded by a brooding spirit of
 melancholy of the 'moping' rather than the 'musical' sort, and
 consequently rather ineffective as an artistic motive. Students of
 Shelley occasionally scan those pages with a view to pick some obscure
 'hints and indirections', some veiled reminiscences, in the stories of
 the adventures and misfortunes of _The Last Man_ or _Lodore_. And the
 books may be good biography at times--they are never life.
 
 Altogether there is a curious contrast between the two aspects,
 hitherto revealed, of Mary Shelley's literary activities. It is as if
 the pulse which had been beating so wildly, so frantically, in
 _Frankenstein_ (1818), had lapsed, with _Valperga_ (1823) and the
 rest, into an increasingly sluggish flow.
 
 The following pages may be held to bridge the gap between those two
 extremes in a felicitous way. A more purely artistic mood, instinct
 with the serene joy and clear warmth of Italian skies, combining a
 good deal of youthful buoyancy with a sort of quiet and unpretending
 philosophy, is here represented. And it is submitted that the little
 classical fancies which Mrs. Shelley never ventured to publish are
 quite as worthy of consideration as her more ambitious prose works.
 
 For one thing they give us the longest poetical effort of the writer.
 The moon of _Epipsychidion_ never seems to have been thrilled with the
 music of the highest spheres. Yet there were times when Shelley's
 inspiration and example fired her into something more than her usual
 calm and cold brilliancy.
 
 One of those periods--perhaps the happiest period in Mary's life--was
 during the early months in Italy of the English 'exiles'. 'She never
 was more strongly impelled to write than at this time; she felt her
 powers fresh and strong within her; all she wanted was some motive,
 some suggestion to guide her in the choice of a subject.' [Footnote:
 Mrs. Marshall, _The Life and Letters of Mary W. Shelley_, i. 216.]
 
 Shelley then expected her to try her hand at a drama, perhaps on the
 terrible story of the Cenci, or again on the catastrophes of Charles
 the First. Her _Frankenstein_ was attracting more attention than had
 ever been granted to his own works. And Shelley, with that touching
 simplicity which characterized his loving moments, showed the greatest
 confidence in the literary career of his wife. He helped her and
 encouraged her in every way. He then translated for her Plato's
 _Symposium_. He led her on in her Latin and Italian studies. He wanted
 her--probably as a sort of preliminary exercise before her flight into
 tragedy--to translate Alfieri's _Myrrha_. 'Remember _Charles the
 First_, and do you be prepared to bring at least some of _Myrrha_
 translated,' he wrote; 'remember, remember _Charles the First_ and
 _Myrrha_,' he insisted; and he quoted, for her benefit, the
 presumptuous aphorism of Godwin, in _St. Leon_, 'There is nothing
 which the human mind can conceive which it may not execute'.
 [Footnote: Letter from Padua, 22 September 1818.]
 
 But in the year that followed these auspicious days, the strain and
 stress of her life proved more powerful on Mary Shelley than the
 inspiration of literature. The loss of her little girl Clara, at
 Venice, on the 24th of September 1818, was cruel enough. However, she
 tried hard not to show the 'pusillanimous disposition' which, Godwin
 assured his daughter, characterizes the persons 'that sink long under
 a calamity of this nature'. [Footnote: 27 October 1818] But the death
 of her boy, William, at Rome, on the 4th of June 1819, reduced her to
 a 'kind of despair'. Whatever it could be to her husband, Italy no
 longer was for her a 'paradise of exiles'. The flush and excitement of
 the early months, the 'first fine careless rapture', were for ever
 gone. 'I shall never recover that blow,' Mary wrote on the 27th of
 June 1819; 'the thought never leaves me for a single moment;
 everything on earth has lost its interest for me,' This time her
 imperturbable father 'philosophized' in vain. With a more sympathetic
 and acuter intelligence of her case, Leigh Hunt insisted (July 1819)
 that she should try and give her paralysing sorrow some literary
 expression, 'strike her pen into some... genial subject... and bring
 up a fountain of gentle tears for us'. But the poor childless mother
 could only rehearse her complaint--'to have won, and thus cruelly to
 have lost' (4 August 1819). In fact she had, on William's death,
 discontinued her diary.
 
 Yet on the date just mentioned, as Shelley reached his twenty-seven
 years, she plucked up courage and resumed the task. Shelley, however
 absorbed by the creative ardour of his _Annus mirabilis_, could not
 but observe that his wife's 'spirits continued wretchedly depressed'
 (5 August 1819); and though masculine enough to resent the fact at
 times more than pity it, he was human enough to persevere in that
 habit of co-operative reading and writing which is one of the finest
 traits of his married life. 'I write in the morning,' his wife
 testifies, 'read Latin till 2, when we dine; then I read some English
 book, and two cantos of Dante with Shelley [Footnote: Letter to Mrs.
 Hunt, 28 August 1819.]--a fair average, no doubt, of the homely aspect
 of the great days which produced _The Cenci_ and _Prometheus_.
 
 On the 12th November, in Florence, the birth of a second son, Percy
 Florence Shelley, helped Mary out of her sense of bereavement.
 Subsequent letters still occasionally admit 'low spirits'. But the
 entries in the Journal make it clear that the year 1819-20 was one of
 the most pleasantly industrious of her life. Not Dante only, but a
 motley series of books, great and small, ancient and modern, English
 and foreign, bespoke her attention. Not content with Latin, and the
 extemporized translations which Shelley could give her of Plato's
 _Republic_, she started Greek in 1820, and soon came to delight in it.
 And again she thought of original composition. 'Write', 'work,'--the
 words now occur daily in her Journal. These must mainly refer to the
 long historical novel, which she had planned, as early as 1819,
 [Footnote: She had 'thought of it' at Marlow, as appears from her
 letter to Mrs. Gisborne, 30 June 1821 (in Mrs. Marshall, i. p. 291);
 but the materials for it were not found before the stay at Naples, and
 it was not actually begun 'till a year afterwards, at Pisa' (ibid.).]
 under the title of _Castruccio_, _Prince of Lucca_, and which was not
 published until 1823, as _Valperga_. It was indeed a laborious task.
 The novel 'illustrative of the manners of the Middle Ages in Italy'
 had to be 'raked out of fifty old books', as Shelley said. [Footnote:
 Letter to T. L. Peacock, November 1820.]
 
 But heavy as the undertaking must have been, it certainly did not
 engross all the activities of Shelley's wife in this period. And it
 seems highly probable that the two little mythological dramas which we
 here publish belong to this same year 1820.
 
 The evidence for this date is as follows. Shelley's lyrics, which
 these dramas include, were published by his wife (_Posthumous Poems_,
 1824) among the 'poems written in 1820'. Another composition, in blank
 verse, curiously similar to Mary's own work, entitled _Orpheus_, has
 been allotted by Dr. Garnett (_Relics of Shelley_, 1862) to the same
 category. [Footnote: Dr. Garnett, in his prefatory note, states that
 Orpheus 'exists only in a transcript by Mrs. Shelley, who has written
 in playful allusion to her toils as amanuensis _Aspetto fin che il
 diluvio cala, ed allora cerco di posare argine alle sue parole_'. The
 poem is thus supposed to have been Shelley's attempt at improvisation,
 if not indeed a translation from the Italian of the 'improvvisatore'
 Sgricci. The Shelleys do not seem to have come to know and hear
 Sgricci before the end of December 1820. The Italian note after all
 has no very clear import. And Dr. Garnett in 1905 inclined to the view
 that _Orpheus_ was the work not of Shelley, but of his wife. A
 comparison of that fragment and the dramas here published seems to me
 to suggest the same conclusion, though in both cases Mary Shelley must
 have been helped by her husband.] Again, it may well be more than a
 coincidence, that the Proserpine motive occurs in that passage from
 Dante's _Purgatorio_, canto 28, on 'Matilda gathering flowers', which
 Shelley is known to have translated shortly before Medwin's visit in
 the late autumn of 1820.
 
           O come, that I may hear
   Thy song: like Proserpine, in Enna's glen,
   Thou seemest to my fancy,--singing here,
   And gathering flowers, as that fair maiden, when
   She lost the spring and Ceres her more dear.
     [Footnote: As published by Medwin, 1834 and 1847.]
 
 But we have a far more important, because a direct, testimony in a
 manuscript addition made by Thomas Medwin in the margin of a copy of
 his _Life of Shelley_ (1847). [Footnote: The copy, 2 vols., was sold
 at Sotheby's on the 6th December 1906: Mr. H. Buxton Forman (who was,
 I think, the buyer) published the contents in _The Life of Percy
 Bysshe Shelley, By Thomas Medwin, A New Edition printed from a copy
 copiously amended and extended by the Author_ . . . Milford, 1913. The
 passage here quoted appears on p. 27 of the 2nd vol. of the 1847
 edition (Forman ed., p. 252)] The passage is clearly intended--though
 chronology is no more than any other exact science the 'forte' of that
 most tantalizing of biographers--to refer to the year 1820.
 
 'Mrs. Shelley had at this time been writing some little Dramas on
 classical subjects, one of which was the Rape of Proserpine, a very
 graceful composition which she has never published. Shelley
 contributed to this the exquisite fable of Arethusa and the Invocation
 to Ceres.--Among the Nymphs gathering flowers on Enna were two whom
 she called Ino and Uno, names which I remember in the Dialogue were
 irresistibly ludicrous. She also wrote one on Midas, into which were
 introduced by Shelley, in the Contest between Pan and Apollo, the
 Sublime Effusion of the latter, and Pan's characterised Ode.'
 
 This statement of Medwin finally settles the question. The 'friend' at
 whose request, Mrs. Shelley says, [Footnote: The Hymns of Pan and
 Apollo were first published by Mrs. Shelley in _the Posthumous Poems_,
 1824, with a note saying that they had been 'written at the request of
 a friend to be inserted in a drama on the subject of Midas'.
 _Arethusa_ appeared in the same volume, dated 'Pisa, 1820'.
 Proserpine's song was not published before the first collected edition
 of 1839.] the lyrics were written by her husband, was herself. And she
 was the author of the dramas. [Footnote: Not E. E. Williams (Buxton
 Forman, ed. 1882, vol. iv, p. 34). The manuscript of the poetical play
 composed about 1822 by the latter, 'The Promise', with Shelley's
 autograph poem ('Night! with all thine eyes look down'), was given to
 the Bodleian Library in 1914.]
 
 The manuscript (Bodleian Library, MS. Shelley, d. 2) looks like a
 cheap exercise-book, originally of 40, now of 36 leaves, 8 1/4 x 6
 inches, in boards. The contents are the dramas here presented, written
 in a clear legible hand--the equable hand of Mrs. Shelley. [Footnote:
 Shelley's lyrics are also in his wife's writing--Mr. Locock is surely
 mistaken in assuming two different hands to this manuscript (_The
 Poems of Percy Bysshe Shelley_, Methuen, 1909, vol. iii, p. xix).]
 There are very few words corrected or cancelled. It is obviously a
 fair copy. Mr. C. D. Locock, in his _Examination of the Shelley
 Manuscripts in the Bodleian Library_ (Clarendon Press, Oxford, 1903,
 pp. 24-25), has already pointed out the valuable emendations of the
 'received' text of Shelley's lyrics which are found here. In fact the
 only mystery is why neither Shelley, nor Mary in the course of her
 long widowed years, should have published these curious, and surely
 not contemptible, by-products of their co-operation in the fruitful
 year 1820.
 
 
 
 
 II.
 
 For indeed there is more than a personal interest attached to these
 writings of Mrs. Shelley's. The fact that the same mind which had
 revelled, a few years earlier, in the fantastical horrors of
 Frankenstein's abortive creation, could now dwell on the melancholy
 fate of Proserpine or the humorous disappointment of Midas, and
 delight in their subtle poetical or moral symbolism--this fact has its
 significance. It is one of the earliest indications of the revival, in
 the heart of Romanticism, of the old love of classical myths and
 classical beauty.
 
 The subject is a wide one, and cannot be adequately dealt with in this
 place. But a few words may not be superfluous for a correct historical
 appreciation of Mrs. Shelley's attempt.
 
 How deficient had been the sense of classical beauty in the so-called
 classical age of English literature, is a trite consideration of
 criticism. The treatment of mythology is particularly conclusive on
 this point. Throughout the 'Augustan' era, mythology was approached as
 a mere treasure-house of pleasant fancies, artificial decorations,
 'motives', whether sumptuous or meretricious. Allusions to Jove and
 Venus, Mercury, Apollo, or Bacchus, are of course found in every other
 page of Dryden, Pope, Prior, Swift, Gay, and Parnell. But no fresh
 presentation, no loving interpretation, of the old myths occur
 anywhere. The immortal stories were then part and parcel of a sort of
 poetical curriculum through which the whole school must be taken by
 the stern masters Tradition and Propriety. There is little to be
 wondered at, if this matter of curriculum was treated by the more
 passive scholars as a matter of course, and by the sharper and less
 reverent disciples as a matter of fun. Indeed, if any personality is
 then evinced in the adaptation of these old world themes, it is
 generally connected with a more or less emphatic disparagement or
 grotesque distortion of their real meaning.
 
 When Dryden, for example, makes use of the legend of Midas, in his
 _Wife of Bath's Tale_, he makes, not Midas's minister, but his queen,
 tell the mighty secret--and thus secures another hit at woman's
 loquacity.
 
 Prior's _Female Phaeton_ is a younger sister, who, jealous of her
 elder's success, thus pleads with her 'mamma':
 
   I'll have my earl as well as she
     Or know the reason why.
 
 And she wants to flaunt it accordingly.
 
 Finally,
 
   Fondness prevailed; mamma gave way;
     Kitty, at heart's desire,
   Obtained the chariot for a day,
     And set the world on fire.
 
 Pandora, in Parnell's _Hesiod or the Rise of Woman_, is only a
 
               'shining vengeance...
   A pleasing bosom-cheat, a specious ill'
 
 sent by the gods upon earth to punish the race of Prometheus.
 
 The most poetical fables of Greece are desecrated by Gay into mere
 miniatures for the decoration of his _Fan_.
 
 Similar instances abound later on. When Armstrong brings in an
 apostrophe to the Naiads, it is in the course of a _Poetical Essay on
 the Art of Preserving Health_. And again, when Cowper stirs himself to
 intone an _Ode to Apollo_, it is in the same mock-heroic vein:
 
   Patron of all those luckless brains,
     That to the wrong side leaning
   Indite much metre with much pains
     And little or no meaning...
 
 Even in Gray's--'Pindaric Gray's'--treatment of classical themes,
 there is a sort of pervading _ennui_, or the forced appreciativeness
 of a gouty, disappointed man. The daughter of Jove to whom he
 dedicates his hymns too often is 'Adversity'. And classical
 reminiscences have, even with him, a dull musty tinge which recalls
 the antiquarian in his Cambridge college-rooms rather than the visitor
 to Florence and Rome. For one thing, his allusions are too many, and
 too transitory, to appear anything but artistic tricks and verse-making
 tools. The 'Aegean deep', and 'Delphi's steep', and 'Meander's
 amber waves', and the 'rosy-crowned Loves', are too cursorily
 summoned, and dismissed, to suggest that they have been brought in for
 their own sweet sakes.
 
 It was thus with all the fine quintessences of ancient lore, with all
 the pearl-like accretions of the faiths and fancies of the old world:
 they were handled about freely as a kind of curious but not so very
 rare coins, which found no currency in the deeper thoughts of our
 modern humanity, and could therefore be used as a mere badge of the
 learning and taste of a literary 'coterie'.
 
 The very names of the ancient gods and heroes were in fact assuming
 that abstract anaemic look which common nouns have in everyday
 language. Thus, when Garrick, in his verses _Upon a Lady's
 Embroidery_, mentions 'Arachne', it is obvious that he does not expect
 the reader to think of the daring challenger of Minerva's art, or the
 Princess of Lydia, but just of a plain spider. And again, when
 Falconer, in his early _Monody on the death of the Prince of Wales_,
 expresses a rhetorical wish
 
   'to aid hoarse howling Boreas with his sighs,'
 
 that particular son of Astraeus, whose love for the nymph Orithyia was
 long unsuccessful, because he could not 'sigh', is surely far from the
 poet's mind; and 'to swell the wind', or 'the gale', would have served
 his turn quite as well, though less 'elegantly'.
 
 Even Gibbon, with all his partiality for whatever was pre- or post-
 Christian, had indeed no better word than 'elegant' for the ancient
 mythologies of Greece and Rome, and he surely reflected no
 particularly advanced opinion when he praised and damned, in one
 breath, 'the pleasant and absurd system of Paganism.' [Footnote: Essay
 on the Study of Literature, Section 56.] No wonder if in his days, and
 for a long time after, the passionate giants of the Ages of Fable had
 dwindled down to the pretty puppets with which the daughters of the
 gentry had to while away many a school hour.
 
 But the days of this rhetorical--or satirical, didactic--or
 perfunctory, treatment of classical themes were doomed. It is the
 glory of Romanticism to have opened 'magic casements' not only on 'the
 foam of perilous seas' in the West, but also on
 
          the chambers of the East,
   The chambers of the Sun, that now
     From ancient melody had ceased.
       [Footnote: Blake, _Poetical Sketches_, 1783.]
 
 Romanticism, as a freshening up of all the sources of life, a general
 rejuvenescence of the soul, a ubiquitous visiting of the spirit of
 delight and wonder, could not confine itself to the fields of
 mediaeval romance. Even the records of the Greek and Roman thought
 assumed a new beauty; the classical sense was let free from its
 antiquarian trammels, and the perennial fanes resounded to the songs
 of a more impassioned worship.
 
 The change, however, took some time. And it must be admitted that in
 England, especially, the Romantic movement was slow to go back to
 classical themes. Winckelmann and Goethe, and Chenier--the last,
 indeed, practically all unknown to his contemporaries--had long
 rediscovered Antiquity, and felt its pulse anew, and praised its
 enduring power, when English poetry had little, if anything, to show
 in answer to the plaintive invocation of Blake to the Ancient Muses.
 
 The first generation of English Romantics either shunned the subject
 altogether, or simply echoed Blake's isolated lines in isolated
 passages as regretful and almost as despondent. From Persia to
 Paraguay Southey could wander and seek after exotic themes; his days
 could be 'passed among the dead'--but neither the classic lands nor
 the classic heroes ever seem to have detained him. Walter Scott's
 'sphere of sensation may be almost exactly limited by the growth of
 heather', as Ruskin says; [Footnote: _Modern Painters_, iii. 317] and
 when he came to Rome, his last illness prevented him from any attempt
 he might have wished to make to enlarge his field of vision.
 Wordsworth was even less far-travelled, and his home-made poetry never
 thought of the 'Pagan' and his 'creed outworn', but as a distinct
 _pis-aller_ in the way of inspiration. [Footnote: _Sonnet_ 'The world
 is too much with us'; cf. _The Excursion_, iv. 851-57.] And again,
 though Coleridge has a few magnificent lines about them, he seems to
 have even less willingly than Wordsworth hearkened after
 
   The intelligible forms of ancient poets,
   The fair humanities of old religion.
     [Footnote: _The Piccolomini_, II, iv.]
 
 It was to be otherwise with the later English Romantic poets. They
 lived and worked at a time when the whole atmosphere and even the
 paraphernalia of literary composition had just undergone a
 considerable change. After a period of comparative seclusion and
 self-concentration, England at the Peace of Amiens once more found its way
 to Europe--and vice versa. And from our point of view this widening of
 prospects is especially noticeable. For the classical revival in
 Romanticism appears to be closely connected with it.
 
 It is an alluring subject to investigate. How the progress of
 scholarship, the recent 'finds' of archaeology, the extension of
 travelling along Mediterranean shores, the political enthusiasms
 evoked by the stirrings of young Italy and young Greece, all combined
 to reawaken in the poetical imagination of the times the dormant
 memories of antiquity has not yet been told by the historians of
 literature. [Footnote: At least as far as England is concerned. For
 France, cf. Canat, _La renaissance de la Grece antique_, Hachette,
 Paris, 1911.]
 
 But--and this is sufficient for our purpose--every one knows what the
 Elgin Marbles have done for Keats and Shelley; and what inspirations
 were derived from their pilgrimages in classic lands by all the poets
 of this and the following generation, from Byron to Landor. Such
 experiences could not but react on the common conception of mythology.
 A knowledge of the great classical sculpture of Greece could not but
 invest with a new dignity and chastity the notions which so far had
 been nurtured on the Venus de' Medici and the Belvedere Apollo--even
 Shelley lived and possibly died under their spell. And 'returning to
 the nature which had inspired the ancient myths', the Romantic poets
 must have felt with a keener sense 'their exquisite vitality'.
 [Footnote: J. A, Symonds, _Studies of the Greek Poets_, ii, p. 258.]
 The whole tenor of English Romanticism may be said to have been
 affected thereby.
 
 For English Romanticism--and this is one of its most distinctive
 merits--had no exclusiveness about it. It was too spontaneous, one
 would almost say, too unconscious, ever to be clannish. It grew,
 untrammelled by codes, uncrystallized into formulas, a living thing
 always, not a subject-matter for grandiloquent manifestoes and more or
 less dignified squabbles. It could therefore absorb and turn to
 account elements which seemed antagonistic to it in the more
 sophisticated forms it assumed in other literatures. Thus, whilst
 French Romanticism--in spite of what it may or may not have owed to
 Chenier--became often distinctly, deliberately, wilfully anti-classical,
 whilst for example [Footnote: As pointed out by Brunetiere,
 _Evolution de la Poesie lyrique_, ii, p. 147.] Victor Hugo in that
 all-comprehending _Legende des Siecles_ could find room for the Hegira
 and for Zim-Zizimi, but did not consecrate a single line to the
 departed glories of mythical Greece, the Romantic poets of England may
 claim to have restored in freshness and purity the religion of
 antiquity. Indeed their voice was so convincing that even the great
 Christian chorus that broke out afresh in the Victorian era could not
 entirely drown it, and Elizabeth Barrett had an apologetic way of
 dismissing 'the dead Pan', and all the 'vain false gods of Hellas',
 with an acknowledgement of
 
            your beauty which confesses
   Some chief Beauty conquering you.
 
 This may be taken to have been the average attitude, in the forties,
 towards classical mythology. That twenty years before, at least in the
 Shelley circle, it was far less grudging, we now have definite proof.
 
 Not only was Shelley prepared to admit, with the liberal opinion of
 the time, that ancient mythology 'was a system of nature concealed
 under the veil of allegory', a system in which 'a thousand fanciful
 fables contained a secret and mystic meaning': [Footnote: _Edinb.
 Rev._, July 1808.] he was prepared to go a considerable step farther,
 and claim that there was no essential difference between ancient
 mythology and the theology of the Christians, that both were
 interpretations, in more or less figurative language, of the great
 mysteries of being, and indeed that the earlier interpretation,
 precisely because it was more frankly figurative and poetical than the
 later one, was better fitted to stimulate and to allay the sense of
 wonder which ought to accompany a reverent and high-souled man
 throughout his life-career.
 
 In the earlier phase of Shelley's thought, this identification of the
 ancient and the modern faiths was derogatory to both. The letter which
 he had written in 1812 for the edification of Lord Ellenborough
 revelled in the contemplation of a time 'when the Christian religion
 shall have faded from the earth, when its memory like that of
 Polytheism now shall remain, but remain only as the subject of
 ridicule and wonder'. But as time went on, Shelley's views became less
 purely negative. Instead of ruling the adversaries back to back out of
 court, he bethought himself of venturing a plea in favour of the older
 and weaker one. It may have been in 1817 that he contemplated an
 'Essay in favour of polytheism'.[Footnote: Cf. our _Shelley's Prose in
 the Bodleian MSS_., 1910, p. 124.] He was then living on the fringe of
 a charmed circle of amateur and adventurous Hellenists who could have
 furthered the scheme. His great friend, Thomas Love Peacock, 'Greeky
 Peaky', was a personal acquaintance of Thomas Taylor 'the Platonist',
 alias 'Pagan Taylor'. And Taylor's translations and commentaries of
 Plato had been favourites of Shelley in his college days. Something at
 least of Taylor's queer mixture of flaming enthusiasm and tortuous
 ingenuity may be said to appear in the unexpected document we have now
 to examine.
 
 It is a little draft of an Essay, which occurs, in Mrs. Shelley's
 handwriting, as an insertion in her Journal for the Italian period.
 The fragment--for it is no more--must be quoted in full. [Footnote:
 From the 'Boscombe' MSS. Unpublished.]
 
   The necessity of a Belief in the
   Heathen Mythology
   to a Christian
 
 If two facts are related not contradictory of equal probability & with
 equal evidence, if we believe one we must believe the other.
 
 1st. There is as good proof of the Heathen Mythology as of the
 Christian Religion.
 
 2ly. that they [do] not contradict one another.
 
 Con[clusion]. If a man believes in one he must believe in both.
 
 Examination of the proofs of the Xtian religion--the Bible & its
 authors. The twelve stones that existed in the time of the writer
 prove the miraculous passage of the river Jordan. [Footnote: Josh. iv.
 8.--These notes are _not_ Shelley's.] The immoveability of the Island
 of Delos proves the accouchement of Latona [Footnote: _Theogn_. 5
 foll.; Homer's _Hymn to Apollo_, i. 25.]--the Bible of the Greek
 religion consists in Homer, Hesiod & the Fragments of Orpheus &c.--All
 that came afterwards to be considered apocryphal--Ovid = Josephus--of
 each of these writers we may believe just what we cho[o]se.
 
 To seek in these Poets for the creed & proofs of mythology which are
 as follows--Examination of these--1st with regard to proof--2 in
 contradiction or conformity to the Bible--various apparitions of God
 in that Book [--] Jupiter considered by himself--his
 attributes--disposition [--] acts--whether as God revealed himself as
 the Almighty to the Patriarchs & as Jehovah to the Jews he did not
 reveal himself as Jupiter to the Greeks--the possibility of various
 revelations--that he revealed himself to Cyrus. [Footnote: Probably
 Xenophon, _Cyrop_. VIII. vii. 2.]
 
 The inferior deities--the sons of God & the Angels--the difficulty of
 Jupiter's children explained away--the imagination of the poets--of
 the prophets--whether the circumstance of the sons of God living with
 women [Footnote: Gen. vi.] being related in one sentence makes it more
 probable than the details of Greek--Various messages of the Angels--of
 the deities--Abraham, Lot or Tobit. Raphael [--]Mercury to Priam
 [Footnote: _Iliad_, xxiv.]--Calypso & Ulysses--the angel wd then play
 the better part of the two whereas he now plays the worse. The ass of
 Balaam--Oracles--Prophets. The revelation of God as Jupiter to the
 Greeks---a more successful revelation than that as Jehovah to the
 Jews--Power, wisdom, beauty, & obedience of the Greeks--greater & of
 longer continuance--than those of the Jews. Jehovah's promises worse
 kept than Jupiter's--the Jews or Prophets had not a more consistent or
 decided notion concerning after life & the Judgements of God than the
 Greeks [--] Angels disappear at one time in the Bible & afterwards
 appear again. The revelation to the Greeks more complete than to the
 Jews--prophesies of Christ by the heathens more incontrovertible than
 those of the Jews. The coming of X. a confirmation of both religions.
 The cessation of oracles a proof of this. The Xtians better off than
 any but the Jews as blind as the Heathens--Much more conformable to an
 idea of [the] goodness of God that he should have revealed himself to
 the Greeks than that he left them in ignorance. Vergil & Ovid not
 truth of the heathen Mythology, but the interpretation of a
 heathen--as Milton's Paradise Lost is the interpretation of a Christian
 religion of the Bible. The interpretation of the mythology of Vergil &
 the interpretation of the Bible by Milton compared--whether one is
 more inconsistent than the other--In what they are contradictory.
 Prometheus desmotes quoted by Paul [Footnote: Shelley may refer to the
 proverbial phrase 'to kick against the pricks' (Acts xxvi. 14), which,
 however, is found in Pindar and Euripides as well as in Aeschylus
 (_Prom._ 323).] [--] all religion false except that which is
 revealed--revelation depends upon a certain degree of
 civilization--writing necessary--no oral tradition to be a part of
 faith--the worship of the Sun no revelation--Having lost the books
 [of] the Egyptians we have no knowledge of their peculiar revelations.
 If the revelation of God to the Jews on Mt Sinai had been more
 peculiar & impressive than some of those to the Greeks they wd not
 immediately after have worshiped a calf--A latitude in revelation--How
 to judge of prophets--the proof [of] the Jewish Prophets being prophets.
 
 The only public revelation that Jehovah ever made of himself was on Mt
 Sinai--Every other depended upon the testimony of a very few & usually
 of a single individual--We will first therefore consider the
 revelation of Mount Sinai. Taking the fact plainly it happened thus.
 The Jews were told by a man whom they believed to have supernatural
 powers that they were to prepare for that God wd reveal himself in
 three days on the mountain at the sound of a trumpet. On the 3rd day
 there was a cloud & lightning on the mountain & the voice of a trumpet
 extremely loud. The people were ordered to stand round the foot of the
 mountain & not on pain of death to infringe upon the bounds--The man
 in whom they confided went up the mountain & came down again bringing
 them word
 
 
 The draft unfortunately leaves off here, and we are unable to know for
 certain whether this Shelleyan paradox, greatly daring, meant to
 minimize the importance of the 'only public revelation' granted to the
 chosen people. But we have enough to understand the general trend of
 the argument. It did not actually intend to sap the foundations of
 Scriptural authority. But it was bold enough to risk a little shaking
 in order to prove that the Sacred Books of the Greeks and Romans did
 not, after all, present us with a much more rickety structure. This
 was a task of conciliation rather than destruction. And yet even this
 conservative view of the Shelleys' exegesis cannot--and will
 not--detract from the value of the above document. Surely, this curious
 theory of the equal 'inspiration' of Polytheism and the Jewish or
 Christian religions, whether it was invented or simply espoused by
 Mrs. Shelley, evinces in her--for the time being at least--a very
 considerable share of that adventurous if somewhat uncritical alacrity
 of mind which carried the poet through so many religious and political
 problems. It certainly vindicates her, more completely perhaps than
 anything hitherto published, against the strictures of those who knew
 her chiefly or exclusively in later years, and could speak of her as a
 'most conventional slave', who 'even affected the pious dodge', and
 'was not a suitable companion for the poet'. [Footnote: Trelawny's
 letter, 3 April 1870; in Mr. H. Buxton Forman's edition, 1910, p.
 229.] Mrs. Shelley--at twenty-three years of age--had not yet run the
 full 'career of her humour'; and her enthusiasm for classical
 mythology may well have, later on, gone the way of her admiration for
 Spinoza, whom she read with Shelley that winter (1820-1), as Medwin
 notes, [Footnote: I. e. ed. H. Buxton Forman, p. 253.] and 'whose
 arguments she then thought irrefutable--_tempora mutantur!_'
 
 However that may be, the two little mythological dramas on
 _Proserpine_ and _Midas_ assume, in the light of that enthusiasm, a
 special interest. They stand--or fall--both as a literary, and to a
 certain extent as an intellectual effort. They are more than an
 attitude, and not much less than an avowal. Not only do they claim our
 attention as the single poetical work of any length which seems to
 have been undertaken by Mrs. Shelley; they are a unique and touching
 monument of that intimate co-operation which at times, especially in
 the early years in Italy, could make the union of 'the May' and 'the
 Elf' almost unreservedly delightful. It would undoubtedly be fatuous
 exaggeration to ascribe a very high place in literature to these
 little Ovidian fancies of Mrs. Shelley. The scenes, after all, are
 little better than adaptations--fairly close adaptations--of the Latin
 poet's well-known tales.
 
 Even _Proserpine_, though clearly the more successful of the two, both
 more strongly knit as drama, and less uneven in style and
 versification, cannot for a moment compare with the far more original
 interpretations of Tennyson, Swinburne, or Meredith. [Footnote:
 _Demeter and Persephone_, 1889; _The Garden of Proserpine_, 1866; _The
 Appeasement of Demeter_, 1888.] But it is hardly fair to draw in the
 great names of the latter part of the century. The parallel would be
 more illuminating--and the final award passed on Mrs. Shelley's
 attempt more favourable--if we were to think of a contemporary
 production like 'Barry Cornwall's' _Rape of Proserpine_, which, being
 published in 1820, it is just possible that the Shelleys should have
 known. B. W. Procter's poem is also a dramatic 'scene', written 'in
 imitation of the mode originated by the Greek Tragic Writers'. In fact
 those hallowed models seem to have left far fewer traces in Barry
 Cornwall's verse than the Alexandrian--or pseudo-Alexandrian--tradition
 of meretricious graces and coquettish fancies, which the
 eighteenth century had already run to death. [Footnote: To adduce an
 example--in what is probably not an easily accessible book to-day:
 Proserpine, distributing her flowers, thus addresses one of her
 nymphs:
 
             For this lily,
   Where can it hang but at Cyane's breast!
   And yet 'twill wither on so white a bed,
   If flowers have sense for envy.]
 
 And, more damnable still, the poetical essence of the legend, the
 identification of Proserpine's twofold existence with the grand
 alternation of nature's seasons, has been entirely neglected by the
 author. Surely his work, though published, is quite as deservedly
 obscure as Mrs. Shelley's derelict manuscript. _Midas_ has the
 privilege, if it be one, of not challenging any obvious comparison.
 The subject, since Lyly's and Dryden's days, has hardly attracted the
 attention of the poets. It was so eminently fit for the lighter kinds
 of presentation that the agile bibliographer who aimed at completeness
 would have to go through a fairly long list of masques, [Footnote:
 There is one by poor Christopher Smart.] comic operas, or 'burlettas',
 all dealing with the ludicrous misfortunes of the Phrygian king. But
 an examination of these would be sheer pedantry in this place. Here
 again Mrs. Shelley has stuck to her Latin source as closely as she
 could. [Footnote: Perhaps her somewhat wearying second act, on the
 effects of the gold-transmuting gift, would have been shorter, if Ovid
 (_Metam._ xi. 108-30) had not himself gone into such details on the
 subject.] She has made a gallant attempt to connect the two stories
 with which Midas has ever since Ovid's days been associated, and a
 distinct--indeed a too perceptible--effort to press out a moral
 meaning in this, as she had easily extricated a cosmological meaning
 in the other tale.
 
 Perhaps we have said too much to introduce these two little
 unpretending poetical dramas. They might indeed have been allowed to
 speak for themselves. A new frame often makes a new face; and some of
 the best known and most exquisite of Shelley's lyrics, when restored
 to the surroundings for which the poet intended them, needed no other
 set-off to appeal to the reader with a fresh charm of quiet classical
 grace and beauty. But the charm will operate all the more unfailingly,
 if we remember that this clear classical mood was by no means such a
 common element in the literary atmosphere of the times--not even a
 permanent element in the authors' lives. We have here none of the
 feverish ecstasy that lifts _Prometheus_ and _Hellas_ far above the
 ordinary range of philosophical or political poetry. But Shelley's
 encouragement, probably his guidance and supervision, have raised his
 wife's inspiration to a place considerably higher than that of
 _Frankenstein_ or _Valperga_. With all their faults these pages
 reflect some of that irradiation which Shelley cast around his own
 life--the irradiation of a dream beauteous and generous, beauteous in
 its theology (or its substitute for theology) and generous even in its
 satire of human weaknesses.
 
 
 
 
 MYTHOLOGICAL DRAMAS.
 
 Unless otherwise pointed out--by brackets, or in the notes--the text,
 spelling, and punctuation of the MS. have been strictly adhered to.
 
 
 
 
 PROSERPINE.
 
 A DRAMA IN TWO ACTS.
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
 CERES.
 PROSERPINE.
 INO, EUNOE. Nymphs attendant upon Proserpine.
 IRIS.
 ARETHUSA, Naiad of a Spring.
 
 Shades from Hell, among which Ascalaphus.
 
 Scene; the plain of Enna, in Sicily.
 
 
 PROSERPINE.
 
 ACT I.
 
 
 _Scene; a beautiful plain, shadowed on one side by an
 overhanging rock, on the other a chesnut wood. Etna
 at a distance._
 
 _Enter Ceres, Proserpine, Ino and Eunoe._
 
 _Pros._ Dear Mother, leave me not! I love to rest
   Under the shadow of that hanging cave
   And listen to your tales. Your Proserpine
   Entreats you stay; sit on this shady bank,
   And as I twine a wreathe tell once again
   The combat of the Titans and the Gods;
   Or how the Python fell beneath the dart
   Of dread Apollo; or of Daphne's change,--
   That coyest Grecian maid, whose pointed leaves
   Now shade her lover's brow. And I the while
   Gathering the starry flowers of this fair plain
   Will weave a chaplet, Mother, for thy hair.
   But without thee, the plain I think is vacant,
   Its [Footnote: There is an apostrophe _on_ the s.]
       blossoms fade,--its tall fresh grasses droop,
   Nodding their heads like dull things half asleep;--
   Go not, dear Mother, from your Proserpine.
 
 _Cer._ My lovely child, it is high Jove's command:-- [2]
   The golden self-moved seats surround his throne,
   The nectar is poured out by Ganymede,
   And the ambrosia fills the golden baskets;
   They drink, for Bacchus is already there,
   But none will eat till I dispense the food.
   I must away--dear Proserpine, farewel!--
   Eunoe can tell thee how the giants fell;
   Or dark-eyed Ino sing the saddest change
   Of Syrinx or of Daphne, or the doom
   Of impious Prometheus, and the boy
   Of fair Pandora, Mother of mankind.
   This only charge I leave thee and thy nymphs,--
   Depart not from each other; be thou circled
   By that fair guard, and then no earth-born Power
   Would tempt my wrath, and steal thee from their sight[.]
   But wandering alone, by feint or force,
   You might be lost, and I might never know
   Thy hapless fate. Farewel, sweet daughter mine,
   Remember my commands.
 
 _Pros._           --Mother, farewel!
   Climb the bright sky with rapid wings; and swift
   As a beam shot from great Apollo's bow
   Rebounds from the calm mirror of the sea
   Back to his quiver in the Sun, do thou
   Return again to thy loved Proserpine.
 
   (_Exit Ceres._)
 
   And now, dear Nymphs, while the hot sun is high [3]
   Darting his influence right upon the plain,
   Let us all sit beneath the narrow shade
   That noontide Etna casts.--And, Ino, sweet,
   Come hither; and while idling thus we rest,
   Repeat in verses sweet the tale which says
   How great Prometheus from Apollo's car
   Stole heaven's fire--a God-like gift for Man!
   Or the more pleasing tale of Aphrodite;
   How she arose from the salt Ocean's foam,
   And sailing in her pearly shell, arrived
   On Cyprus sunny shore, where myrtles
       [Footnote: MS. _mytles._] bloomed
   And sweetest flowers, to welcome Beauty's Queen;
   And ready harnessed on the golden sands
   Stood milk-white doves linked to a sea-shell car,
   With which she scaled the heavens, and took her seat
   Among the admiring Gods.
 
 _Eun._               Proserpine's tale
   Is sweeter far than Ino's sweetest aong.
 
 _Pros._ Ino, you knew erewhile a River-God,
   Who loved you well and did you oft entice
   To his transparent waves and flower-strewn banks.
   He loved high poesy and wove sweet sounds,
   And would sing to you as you sat reclined
   On the fresh grass beside his shady cave,
   From which clear waters bubbled, dancing forth,
   And spreading freshness in the noontide air. [4]
   When you returned you would enchant our ears
   With tales and songs which did entice the fauns,
       [Footnote: MS. _fawns_]
   With Pan their King from their green haunts, to hear.
   Tell me one now, for like the God himself,
   Tender they were and fanciful, and wrapt
   The hearer in sweet dreams of shady groves,
   Blue skies, and clearest, pebble-paved streams.
 
 _Ino._ I will repeat the tale which most I loved;
   Which tells how lily-crowned Arethusa,
   Your favourite Nymph, quitted her native Greece,
   Flying the liquid God Alpheus, who followed,
   Cleaving the desarts of the pathless deep,
   And rose in Sicily, where now she flows
   The clearest spring of Enna's gifted plain.
 
 [Sidenote: By Shelley [Footnote: Inserted in a later hand,
   here as p. 18.] ]
       Arethusa arose
       From her couch of snows,
     In the Acroceraunian mountains,--
       From cloud, and from crag,
       With many a jag,
     Shepherding her bright fountains.
       She leapt down the rocks
       With her rainbow locks,
     Streaming among the streams,--
       Her steps paved with green [5]
       The downward ravine,
     Which slopes to the Western gleams:--
       And gliding and springing,
       She went, ever singing
     In murmurs as soft as sleep;
       The Earth seemed to love her
       And Heaven smiled above her,
     As she lingered towards the deep.
 
       Then Alpheus bold
       On his glacier cold,
     With his trident the mountains strook;
       And opened a chasm
       In the rocks;--with the spasm
     All Erymanthus shook.
       And the black south wind
       It unsealed behind
     The urns of the silent snow,
       And earthquake and thunder
       Did rend in sunder
     The bars of the springs below:--
       And the beard and the hair
       Of the river God were
     Seen through the torrent's sweep
       As he followed the light [6]
       Of the fleet nymph's flight
     To the brink of the Dorian deep.
 
       Oh, save me! oh, guide me!
       And bid the deep hide me,
     For he grasps me now by the hair!
       The loud ocean heard,
       To its blue depth stirred,
     And divided at her prayer[,]
       And under the water
       The Earth's white daughter
     Fled like a sunny beam,
       Behind her descended
       Her billows unblended
     With the brackish Dorian stream:--
       Like a gloomy stain
       On the Emerald main
     Alpheus rushed behind,
       As an eagle pursueing
       A dove to its ruin,
     Down the streams of the cloudy wind.
 
       Under the bowers [7]
       Where the Ocean Powers
     Sit on their pearled thrones,
       Through the coral woods
       Of the weltering floods,
     Over heaps of unvalued stones;
       Through the dim beams,
       Which amid the streams
     Weave a network of coloured light,
       And under the caves,
       Where the shadowy waves
     Are as green as the forest's
       [Footnote: The intended place of the apostrophe is not clear.]
                                  night:--
       Outspeeding the shark,
       And the sword fish dark,
     Under the Ocean foam,
       [Footnote: MS. _Ocean' foam_ as if a genitive was meant;
         but cf. _Ocean foam_ in the Song of Apollo
         (_Midas_).]
       And up through the rifts
       Of the mountain clifts,
     They passed to their Dorian Home.
 
       And now from their fountains
       In Enna's mountains,
     Down one vale where the morning basks,
       Like friends once parted,
       Grown single hearted
     They ply their watery tasks.
       At sunrise they leap [8]
       From their cradles steep
     In the cave of the shelving hill[,--]
       At noontide they flow
       Through the woods below
     And the meadows of asphodel,--
       And at night they sleep
       In the rocking deep
     Beneath the Ortygian shore;--
       Like spirits that lie
       In the azure sky,
     When they love, but live no more.
 
 _Pros._ Thanks, Ino dear, you have beguiled an hour
   With poesy that might make pause to list
   The nightingale in her sweet evening song.
   But now no more of ease and idleness,
   The sun stoops to the west, and Enna's plain
   Is overshadowed by the growing form
   Of giant Etna:--Nymphs, let us arise,
   And cull the sweetest flowers of the field,
   And with swift fingers twine a blooming wreathe
   For my dear Mother's rich and waving hair.
 
 _Eunoe._ Violets blue and white anemonies
   Bloom on the plain,--but I will climb the brow [9]
   Of that o'erhanging hill, to gather thence
   That loveliest rose, it will adorn thy crown;
   Ino, guard Proserpine till my return.
 
   (_Exit._)
 
 _Ino._ How lovely is this plain!--Nor Grecian vale,
   Nor bright Ausonia's ilex bearing shores,
   The myrtle bowers of Aphrodite's sweet isle,
   Or Naxos burthened with the luscious vine,
   Can boast such fertile or such verdant fields
   As these, which young Spring sprinkles with her stars;--
   Nor Crete which boasts fair Amalthea's horn
   Can be compared with the bright golden
       [Footnote: MS. _the bright gold fields._]
                                          fields
   Of Ceres, Queen of plenteous Sicily.
 
 _Pros._ Sweet Ino, well I know the love you bear
   My dearest Mother prompts your partial voice,
   And that love makes you doubly dear to me.
   But you are idling,--look[,] my lap is full
   Of sweetest flowers;--haste to gather more,
   That before sunset we may make our crown.
   Last night as we strayed through that glade, methought
   The wind that swept my cheek bore on its wings
   The scent of fragrant violets, hid
   Beneath the straggling underwood; Haste, sweet,
   To gather them; fear not--I will not stray.
 
 _Ino._ Nor fear that I shall loiter in my task.
 
   (_Exit._)
 
 [Sidenote: (By Shelley.)]
 _Pros._ (_sings as she gathers her flowers._) [10]
     Sacred Goddess, Mother Earth,
       Thou from whose immortal bosom
     Gods, and men, and beasts have birth,
       Leaf, and blade, and bud, and blossom,
   Breathe thine influence most divine
   On thine own child Proserpine.
 
     If with mists of evening dew
       Thou dost nourish these young flowers
     Till they grow in scent and hue
       Fairest children of the hours[,]
   Breathe thine influence most divine
   On thine own child Proserpine.
 
   (_she looks around._)
 
   My nymphs have left me, neglecting the commands
   Of my dear Mother. Where can they have strayed?
   Her caution makes me fear to be alone;--
   I'll pass that yawning cave and seek the spring
   Of Arethuse, where water-lilies bloom
   Perhaps the nymph now wakes tending her waves,
   She loves me well and oft desires my stay,--
   The lilies shall adorn my mother's crown. [11]
 
   (_Exit._)
 
   (_After a pause enter Eunoe._)
 
 _Eun._ I've won my prize! look at this fragrant rose!
   But where is Proserpine? Ino has strayed
   Too far I fear, and she will be fatigued,
   As I am now, by my long toilsome search.
 
   _Enter Ino._
 
   Oh! you here, Wanderer! Where is Proserpine?
 
 _Ino._ My lap's heaped up with sweets; dear Proserpine,
   You will not chide me now for idleness;--
   Look here are all the treasures of the field,--
   First these fresh violets, which crouched beneath
   A mossy rock, playing at hide and seek
   With both the sight and sense through the high fern;
   Star-eyed narcissi & the drooping bells
   Of hyacinths; and purple polianthus,
   Delightful flowers are these; but where is she,
   The loveliest of them all, our Mistress dear?
 
 _Eun._ I know not, even now I left her here,
   Guarded by you, oh Ino, while I climbed
   Up yonder steep for this most worthless rose:--
   Know you not where she is? Did you forget
   Ceres' behest, and thus forsake her child?
 
 _Ino._ Chide not, unkind Eunoe, I but went
   Down that dark glade, where underneath the shade [12]
       [Footnote: MS. pages numbered 11, 12, &c., to the end
         instead of 12, 13, &c.]
   Of those high trees the sweetest violets grow,--
   I went at her command. Alas! Alas!
   My heart sinks down; I dread she may be lost;--
   Eunoe, climb the hill, search that ravine,
   Whose close, dark sides may hide her from our view:--
   Oh, dearest, haste! Is that her snow-white robe?
 
 _Eun._ No;--'tis a faun
       [Footnote: MS. _fawn._]
                              beside its sleeping Mother,
   Browsing the grass;--what will thy Mother say,
   Dear Proserpine, what will bright Ceres feel,
   If her return be welcomed not by thee?
 
 _Ino._ These are wild thoughts,--& we are wrong to fear
   That any ill can touch the child of heaven;
   She is not lost,--trust me, she has but strayed
   Up some steep mountain path, or in yon dell,
   Or to the rock where yellow wall-flowers grow,
   Scaling with venturous step the narrow path
   Which the goats fear to tread;--she will return
   And mock our fears.
 
 _Eun._ The sun now dips his beams
   In the bright sea; Ceres descends at eve
   From Jove's high conclave; if her much-loved child
   Should meet her not in yonder golden field,
   Where to the evening wind the ripe grain waves
   Its yellow head, how will her heart misgive. [13]
   Let us adjure the Naiad of yon brook[,]
   She may perchance have seen our Proserpine,
   And tell us to what distant field she's strayed:--
   Wait thou, dear Ino, here, while I repair
   To the tree-shaded source of her swift stream.
 
   (_Exit Eunoe._)
 
 _Ino._ Why does my heart misgive? & scalding tears,
   That should but mourn, now prophecy her loss?
   Oh, Proserpine! Where'er your luckless fate
   Has hurried you,--to wastes of desart sand,
   Or black Cymmerian cave, or dread Hell,
   Yet Ino still will follow! Look where Eunoe
   Comes, with down cast eyes and faltering steps,
   I fear the worst;--
 
   _Re-enter Eunoe._
 
   Has she not then been seen?
 
 _Eun._ Alas, all hope is vanished! Hymera says
   She slept the livelong day while the hot beams
   Of Phoebus drank her waves;--nor did she wake
   Until her reed-crowned head was wet with dew;--
   If she had passed her grot she slept the while.
 
 _Ino._ Alas! Alas! I see the golden car,
   And hear the flapping of the dragons wings,
   Ceres descends to Earth. I dare not stay,
   I dare not meet the sorrow of her look[,]
   The angry glance of her severest eyes. [14]
 
 _Eun._ Quick up the mountain! I will search the dell,
   She must return, or I will never more.
 
   (_Exit._)
 
 _Ino._ And yet I will not fly, though I fear much
   Her angry frown and just reproach, yet shame
   Shall quell this childish fear, all hope of safety
   For her lost child rests but in her high power,
   And yet I tremble as I see her come.
 
   _Enter Ceres._
 
 _Cer._ Where is my daughter? have I aught to dread?
   Where does she stray? Ino, you answer not;--
   She was aye wont to meet me in yon field,--
   Your looks bode ill;--I fear my child is lost.
 
 _Ino._ Eunoe now seeks her track among the woods;
   Fear not, great Ceres, she has only strayed.
 
 _Cer._ Alas! My boding heart,--I dread the worst.
   Oh, careless nymphs! oh, heedless Proserpine!
   And did you leave her wandering by herself?
   She is immortal,--yet unusual fear
   Runs through my veins. Let all the woods be sought,
   Let every dryad, every gamesome faun
       [Footnote: MS. _fawn._]
   Tell where they last beheld her snowy feet
   Tread the soft, mossy paths of the wild wood.
   But that I see the base of Etna firm
   I well might fear that she had fallen a prey
   To Earth-born Typheus, who might have arisen [15]
   And seized her as the fairest child of heaven,
   That in his dreary caverns she lies bound;
   It is not so: all is as safe and calm
   As when I left my child. Oh, fatal day!
   Eunoe does not return: in vain she seeks
   Through the black woods and down the darksome glades,
   And night is hiding all things from our view.
   I will away, and on the highest top
   Of snowy Etna, kindle two clear flames.
   Night shall not hide her from my anxious search,
   No moment will I rest, or sleep, or pause
   Till she returns, until I clasp again
   My only loved one, my lost Proserpine.
 
 END OF ACT FIRST.
 
 
 
 
 ACT II
 
 
 _Scene.
 The Plain of Enna as before.
 Enter Ino & Eunoe._
 
 _Eun._ How weary am I! and the hot sun flushes
   My cheeks that else were white with fear and grief[.]
   E'er since that fatal day, dear sister nymph,
   On which we lost our lovely Proserpine,
   I have but wept and watched the livelong night
   And all the day have wandered through the woods[.]
 
 _Ino._ How all is changed since that unhappy eve!
   Ceres forever weeps, seeking her child,
   And in her rage has struck the land with blight;
   Trinacria mourns with her;--its fertile fields
   Are dry and barren, and all little brooks
   Struggling scarce creep within their altered banks;
   The flowers that erst were wont with bended heads,
   To gaze within the clear and glassy wave,
   Have died, unwatered by the failing stream.--
   And yet their hue but mocks the deeper grief
   Which is the fountain of these bitter tears.
   But who is this, that with such eager looks
   Hastens this way?-- [17]
 
 _Eun._ 'Tis fairest Arethuse,
   A stranger naiad, yet you know her well.
 
 _Ino._ My eyes were blind with tears.
 
   _Enter Arethusa._
 
   Dear Arethuse,
   Methinks I read glad tidings in your eyes,
   Your smiles are the swift messengers that bear
   A tale of coming joy, which we, alas!
   Can answer but with tears, unless you bring
   To our grief solace, Hope to our Despair.
   Have you found Proserpine? or know you where
   The loved nymph wanders, hidden from our search?
 
 _Areth._ Where is corn-crowned Ceres? I have hastened
   To ease her anxious heart.
 
 _Eun._                 Oh! dearest Naiad,
   Herald of joy! Now will great Ceres bless
   Thy welcome coming & more welcome tale.
 
 _Ino._ Since that unhappy day when Ceres lost
   Her much-loved child, she wanders through the isle;
   Dark blight is showered from her looks of sorrow;--
   And where tall corn and all seed-bearing grass
   Rose from beneath her step, they wither now
   Fading under the frown of her bent brows: [18]
   The springs decrease;--the fields whose delicate green
   Was late her chief delight, now please alone,
   Because they, withered, seem to share her grief.
 
 _Areth._ Unhappy Goddess! how I pity thee!
 
 _Ino._ At night upon high Etna's topmost peak
   She lights two flames, that shining through the isle
   Leave dark no wood, or cave, or mountain path,
   Their sunlike splendour makes the moon-beams dim,
   And the bright stars are lost within their day.
   She's in yon field,--she comes towards this plain,
   Her loosened hair has fallen on her neck,
   Uncircled by the coronal of grain:--
   Her cheeks are wan,--her step is faint & slow.
 
   _Enter Ceres._
 
 _Cer._ I faint with weariness: a dreadful thirst
   Possesses me! Must I give up the search?
   Oh! never, dearest Proserpine, until
   I once more clasp thee in my vacant arms!
   Help me, dear Arethuse! fill some deep shell
   With the clear waters of thine ice-cold spring,
   And bring it me;--I faint with heat and thirst.
 
 _Areth._ My words are better than my freshest waves[:]
   I saw your Proserpine-- [19]
 
 _Cer._              Arethusa, where?
   Tell me! my heart beats quick, & hope and fear
   Cause my weak limbs to fail me.--
 
 _Areth._                      Sit, Goddess,
   Upon this mossy bank, beneath the shade
   Of this tall rock, and I will tell my tale.
   The day you lost your child, I left my source.
   With my Alpheus I had wandered down
   The sloping shore into the sunbright sea;
   And at the coast we paused, watching the waves
   Of our mixed waters dance into the main:--
   When suddenly I heard the thundering tread
   Of iron hoofed steeds trampling the ground,
   And a faint shriek that made my blood run cold.
   I saw the King of Hell in his black car,
   And in his arms he bore your fairest child,
   Fair as the moon encircled by the night,--
   But that she strove, and cast her arms aloft,
   And cried, "My Mother!"--When she saw me near
   She would have sprung from his detested arms,
   And with a tone of deepest grief, she cried,
   "Oh, Arethuse!" I hastened at her call--
   But Pluto when he saw that aid was nigh,
   Struck furiously the green earth with his spear,
   Which yawned,--and down the deep Tartarian gulph [20]
   His black car rolled--the green earth closed above.
 
 _Cer._ (_starting up_)
   Is this thy doom, great Jove? & shall Hell's king
   Quitting dark Tartarus, spread grief and tears
   Among the dwellers of your bright abodes?
   Then let him seize the earth itself, the stars,--
   And all your wide dominion be his prey!--
   Your sister calls upon your love, great King!
   As you are God I do demand your help!--
   Restore my child, or let all heaven sink,
   And the fair world be chaos once again!
 
 _Ino._ Look[!] in the East that loveliest bow is formed[;]
   Heaven's single-arched bridge, it touches now
   The Earth, and 'mid the pathless wastes of heaven
   It paves a way for Jove's fair Messenger;--
   Iris descends, and towards this field she comes.
 
 _Areth._ Sovereign of Harvests, 'tis the Messenger
   That will bring joy to thee. Thine eyes light up
   With sparkling hope, thy cheeks are pale with dread.
 
   _Enter Iris._
 
 _Cer._ Speak, heavenly Iris! let thy words be poured
   Into my drooping soul, like dews of eve
   On a too long parched field.--Where is my Proserpine?
 
 _Iris._ Sister of Heaven, as by Joves throne I stood [21]
   The voice of thy deep prayer arose,--it filled
   The heavenly courts with sorrow and dismay:
   The Thunderer frowned, & heaven shook with dread
   I bear his will to thee, 'tis fixed by fate,
   Nor prayer nor murmur e'er can alter it.
   If Proserpine while she has lived in hell
   Has not polluted by Tartarian food
   Her heavenly essence, then she may return,
   And wander without fear on Enna's plain,
   Or take her seat among the Gods above.
   If she has touched the fruits of Erebus,
   She never may return to upper air,
   But doomed to dwell amidst the shades of death,
   The wife of Pluto and the Queen of Hell.
 
 _Cer._ Joy treads upon the sluggish heels of care!
   The child of heaven disdains Tartarian food.
   Pluto[,] give up thy prey! restore my child!
 
 _Iris._ Soon she will see again the sun of Heaven,
   By gloomy shapes, inhabitants of Hell,
   Attended, and again behold the field
   Of Enna, the fair flowers & the streams,
   Her late delight,--& more than all, her Mother.
 
 _Ino._ Our much-loved, long-lost Mistress, do you come?
   And shall once more your nymphs attend your steps? [22]
   Will you again irradiate this isle--
   That drooped when you were lost?
       [Footnote: MS. _this isle?--That drooped when
         you were lost_]
                                    & once again
   Trinacria smile beneath your Mother's eye?
 
   (_Ceres and her companions are ranged on one side in eager
   expectation; from, the cave on the other, enter Proserpine,
   attended by various dark & gloomy shapes bearing
   torches; among which Ascalaphus. Ceres & Proserpine
   embrace;--her nymphs surround her._)
 
 _Cer._ Welcome, dear Proserpine! Welcome to light,
   To this green earth and to your Mother's arms.
   You are too beautiful for Pluto's Queen;
   In the dark Stygian air your blooming cheeks
   Have lost their roseate tint, and your bright form
   Has faded in that night unfit for thee.
 
 _Pros._ Then I again behold thee, Mother dear:--
   Again I tread the flowery plain of Enna,
   And clasp thee, Arethuse, & you, my nymphs;
   I have escaped from hateful Tartarus,
   The abode of furies and all loathed shapes
   That thronged around me, making hell more black.
   Oh! I could worship thee, light giving Sun,
   Who spreadest warmth and radiance o'er the world.
   Look at
       [Footnote: MS. Look at--the branches.]
           the branches of those chesnut trees,
   That wave to the soft breezes, while their stems
   Are tinged with red by the sun's slanting rays. [23]
   And the soft clouds that float 'twixt earth and sky.
   How sweet are all these sights! There all is night!
   No God like that (_pointing to the sun_)
                    smiles on the Elysian plains,
   The air [is] windless, and all shapes are still.
 
 _Iris._ And must I interpose in this deep joy,
   And sternly cloud your hopes? Oh! answer me,
   Art thou still, Proserpine, a child of light?
   Or hast thou dimmed thy attributes of Heaven
   By such Tartarian food as must for ever
   Condemn thee to be Queen of Hell & Night?
 
 _Pros._ No, Iris, no,--I still am pure as thee:
   Offspring of light and air, I have no stain
   Of Hell. I am for ever thine, oh, Mother!
 
 _Cer._ (_to the shades from Hell_)
   Begone, foul visitants to upper air!
   Back to your dens! nor stain the sunny earth
   By shadows thrown from forms so foul--Crouch in!
   Proserpine, child of light, is not your Queen!
 
   (_to the nymphs_)
 
   Quick bring my car,--we will ascend to heaven,
   Deserting Earth, till by decree of Jove,
   Eternal laws shall bind the King of Hell
   To leave in peace the offspring of the sky.
 
 _Ascal._ Stay, Ceres! By the dread decree of Jove
   Your child is doomed to be eternal Queen [24]
   Of Tartarus,--nor may she dare ascend
   The sunbright regions of Olympian Jove,
   Or tread the green Earth 'mid attendant nymphs.
   Proserpine, call to mind your walk last eve,
   When as you wandered in Elysian groves,
   Through bowers for ever green, and mossy walks,
   Where flowers never die, nor wind disturbs
   The sacred calm, whose silence soothes the dead,
   Nor interposing clouds, with dun wings, dim
   Its mild and silver light, you plucked its fruit,
   You ate of a pomegranate's seeds--
 
 _Cer._ Be silent,
   Prophet of evil, hateful to the Gods!
   Sweet Proserpine, my child, look upon me.
   You shrink; your trembling form & pallid cheeks
   Would make his words seem true which are most false[.]
   Thou didst not taste the food of Erebus;--
   Offspring of Gods art thou,--nor Hell, nor Jove
   Shall tear thee from thy Mother's clasping arms.
 
 _Pros._ If fate decrees, can we resist? farewel!
   Oh! Mother, dearer to your child than light,
   Than all the forms of this sweet earth & sky,   [25]
   Though dear are these, and dear are my poor nymphs,
   Whom I must leave;--oh! can immortals weep?
   And can a Goddess die as mortals do,
   Or live & reign where it is death to be?
   Ino, dear Arethuse, again you lose
   Your hapless Proserpine, lost to herself
   When she quits you for gloomy Tartarus.
 
 _Cer._ Is there no help, great Jove? If she depart
   I will descend with her--the Earth shall lose
   Its proud fertility, and Erebus
   Shall bear my gifts throughout th' unchanging year.
   Valued till now by thee, tyrant of Gods!
   My harvests ripening by Tartarian fires
   Shall feed the dead with Heaven's ambrosial food.
   Wilt thou not then repent, brother unkind,
   Viewing the barren earth with vain regret,
   Thou didst not shew more mercy to my child?
 
 _Ino._ We will all leave the light and go with thee,
   In Hell thou shalt be girt by Heaven-born nymphs,
   Elysium shall be Enna,--thou'lt not mourn
   Thy natal plain, which will have lost its worth
   Having lost thee, its nursling and its Queen.
 
 _Areth._ I will sink down with thee;--my lily crown
   Shall bloom in Erebus, portentous loss [26]
   To Earth, which by degrees will fade & fall
   In envy of our happier lot in Hell;--
   And the bright sun and the fresh winds of heaven
   Shall light its depths and fan its stagnant air.
 
   (_They cling round Proserpine; the Shades of Hell seperate
   and stand between them._)
 
 _Ascal._ Depart! She is our Queen! Ye may not come!
   Hark to Jove's thunder! shrink away in fear
   From unknown forms, whose tyranny ye'll feel
   In groans and tears if ye insult their power.
 
 _Iris._ Behold Jove's balance hung in upper sky;
   There are ye weighed,--to that ye must submit.
 
 _Cer._ Oh! Jove, have mercy on a Mother's prayer!
   Shall it be nought to be akin to thee?
   And shall thy sister, Queen of fertile Earth,
   Derided be by these foul shapes of Hell?
   Look at the scales, they're poized with equal weights!
   What can this mean? Leave me not[,] Proserpine[,]
   Cling to thy Mother's side! He shall not dare
   Divide the sucker from the parent stem.
 
   (_embraces her_)
 
 _Ascal._ He is almighty! who shall set the bounds [27]
   To his high will? let him decide our plea!
   Fate is with us, & Proserpine is ours!
 
   (_He endeavours to part Ceres & Proserpine, the nymphs
   prevent him._)
 
 _Cer._ Peace, ominous bird of Hell & Night! Depart!
   Nor with thy skriech disturb a Mother's grief,
   Avaunt! It is to Jove we pray, not thee.
 
 _Iris._ Thy fate, sweet Proserpine, is sealed by Jove,
   When Enna is starred by flowers, and the sun
   Shoots his hot rays strait on the gladsome land,
   When Summer reigns, then thou shalt live on Earth,
   And tread these plains, or sporting with your nymphs,
   Or at your Mother's side, in peaceful joy.
   But when hard frost congeals the bare, black ground,
   The trees have lost their leaves, & painted birds
   Wailing for food sail through the piercing air;
   Then you descend to deepest night and reign
   Great Queen of Tartarus, 'mid
       [Footnote: MS. _mid_]
                                 shadows dire,
   Offspring of Hell,--or in the silent groves
   Of, fair Elysium through which Lethe runs,
   The sleepy river; where the windless air
   Is never struck by flight or song of bird,--
   But all is calm and clear, bestowing rest, [28]
   After the toil of life, to wretched men,
   Whom thus the Gods reward for sufferings
   Gods cannot know; a throng of empty shades!
   The endless circle of the year will bring
   Joy in its turn, and seperation sad;
   Six months to light and Earth,--six months to Hell.
 
 _Pros._ Dear Mother, let me kiss that tear which steals
   Down your pale cheek altered by care and grief.
   This is not misery; 'tis but a slight change
   Prom our late happy lot. Six months with thee,
   Each moment freighted with an age of love:
   And the six short months in saddest Tartarus
   Shall pass in dreams of swift returning joy.
   Six months together we shall dwell on earth,
   Six months in dreams we shall companions be,
   Jove's doom is void; we are forever joined.
 
 _Cer._ Oh, fairest child! sweet summer visitor!
   Thy looks cheer me, so shall they cheer this land
   Which I will fly, thou gone. Nor seed of grass,
   Or corn shall grow, thou absent from the earth;
   But all shall lie beneath in hateful night
   Until at thy return, the fresh green springs, [29]
   The fields are covered o'er with summer plants.
   And when thou goest the heavy grain will droop
   And die under my frown, scattering the seeds,
   That will not reappear till your return.
   Farewel, sweet child, Queen of the nether world,
   There shine as chaste Diana's silver car
   Islanded in the deep circumfluous night.
   Giver of fruits! for such thou shalt be styled,
   Sweet Prophetess of Summer, coming forth
   From the slant shadow of the wintry earth,
   In thy car drawn by snowy-breasted swallows!
   Another kiss, & then again farewel!
   Winter in losing thee has lost its all,
   And will be doubly bare, & hoar, & drear,
   Its bleak winds whistling o'er the cold pinched ground
   Which neither flower or grass will decorate.
   And as my tears fall first, so shall the trees
   Shed their changed leaves upon your six months tomb:
   The clouded air will hide from Phoebus' eye
   The dreadful change your absence operates.
   Thus has black Pluto changed the reign of Jove,
   He seizes half the Earth when he takes thee.
 
 
 THE END
 
 
 
 
 MIDAS.
 
 
 
 
 MIDAS.
 
 A DRAMA IN TWO ACTS.
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE.
 
 _Immortals._
 APOLLO.
 BACCHUS.
 PAN.
 SILENUS.
 TMOLUS, God of a Hill.
 FAUNS, &c.
 
 _Mortals._
 MIDAS, King of Phrygia.
 ZOPYRION, his Prime-Minister.
 ASPHALION, LACON, Courtiers.
 COURTIERS, Attendants, Priests, &c.
 
 
 _Scene, Phrygia._
 
 
 MIDAS.
 
 ACT I.
 
 
 _Scene; a rural spot; on one side, a bare Hill, on the other
   an Ilex wood; a stream with reeds on its banks._
 
 _The Curtain rises and discovers Tmolus seated on a throne
   of turf, on his right hand Apollo with his lyre, attended
   by the Muses; on the left, Pan, fauns, &c._
 
   _Enter Midas and Zopyrion._
 
 _Midas._ The Hours have oped the palace of the dawn
   And through the Eastern gates of Heaven, Aurora
   Comes charioted on light, her wind-swift steeds,
   Winged with roseate clouds, strain up the steep.
   She loosely holds the reins, her golden hair,
   Its strings outspread by the sweet morning breeze[,]
   Blinds the pale stars. Our rural tasks begin;
   The young lambs bleat pent up within the fold,
   The herds low in their stalls, & the blithe cock
   Halloos most loudly to his distant mates.
   But who are these we see? these are not men,
   Divine of form & sple[n]didly arrayed,
   They sit in solemn conclave. Is that Pan, [36]
   Our Country God, surrounded by his Fauns?
   And who is he whose crown of gold & harp
   Are attributes of high Apollo?
 
 _Zopyr._                   Best
   Your majesty retire; we may offend.
 
 _Midas._ Aye, and at the base thought the coward blood
   Deserts your trembling lips; but follow me.
   Oh Gods! for such your bearing is, & sure
   No mortal ever yet possessed the gold
   That glitters on your silken robes; may one,
   Who, though a king, can boast of no descent
   More noble than Deucalion's stone-formed men[,]
   May I demand the cause for which you deign
   To print upon this worthless Phrygian earth
   The vestige of your gold-inwoven sandals,
   Or why that old white-headed man sits there
   Upon that grassy throne, & looks as he
   Were stationed umpire to some weighty cause[?]
 
 _Tmolus._ God Pan with his blithe pipe which the Fauns love
   Has challenged Phoebus of the golden lyre[,]
   Saying his Syrinx can give sweeter notes
   Than the stringed instrument Apollo boasts.
   I judge between the parties. Welcome, King,
   I am old Tmolus, God of that bare Hill, [37]
   You may remain and hear th' Immortals sing.
 
 _Mid._ [_aside_] My judgement is made up before I hear;
   Pan is my guardian God, old-horned Pan,
   The Phrygian's God who watches o'er our flocks;
   No harmony can equal his blithe pipe.
 
 [Sidenote: (Shelley.)]
 _Apollo (sings)._
   The sleepless Hours who watch me as I lie,
     Curtained with star-enwoven tapestries,
   From the broad moonlight of the sky,
     Fanning the busy dreams from my dim eyes
   Waken me when their Mother, the grey Dawn,
   Tells them that dreams & that the moon is gone.
 
   Then I arise, and climbing Heaven's blue dome,
     I walk over the mountains & the waves,
   Leaving my robe upon the Ocean foam,--
     My footsteps pave the clouds with fire; the caves
   Are filled with my bright presence & the air
   Leaves the green Earth to my embraces bare.
 
   The sunbeams are my shafts with which I kill
     Deceit, that loves the night & fears the day;
   All men who do, or even imagine ill
     Fly me, and from the glory of my ray
   Good minds and open actions take new might
   Until diminished by the reign of night.
 
   I feed the clouds, the rainbows & the flowers [38]
     With their etherial colours; the moon's globe
   And the pure stars in their eternal bowers
     Are cinctured with my power as with a robe;
   Whatever lamps on Earth or Heaven may shine
   Are portions of one power, which is mine.
 
   I stand at noon upon the peak of heaven,
     Then with unwilling steps I wander down
   Into the clouds of the Atlantic even--
     For grief that I depart they weep & frown [;]
   What look is more delightful than the smile
   With which I soothe them from the western isle [?]
 
   I am the eye with which the Universe
     Beholds itself & knows it is divine.
   All harmony of instrument or verse,
     All prophecy, all medecine is mine;
   All light of art or nature;--to my song
   Victory and praise, in its own right, belong.
 
 [Sidenote: (Shelley.)]
 _Pan (sings)._
   From the forests and highlands
     We come, we come;
   From the river-girt islands
     W[h]ere loud waves are dumb,
       Listening my sweet pipings;
   The wind in the reeds & the rushes, [39]
     The bees on the bells of thyme,
   The birds on the myrtle bushes[,]
     The cicale above in the lime[,]
   And the lizards below in the grass,
   Were as silent as ever old Tmolus was
        Listening my sweet pipings.
 
   Liquid Peneus was flowing,
     And all dark Tempe lay
   In Pelion's shadow, outgrowing
     The light of the dying day
       Speeded by my sweet pipings.
   The Sileni, & Sylvans, & Fauns
     And the nymphs of the woods & the waves
   To the edge of the moist river-lawns,
     And the brink of the dewy caves[,]
   And all that did then attend & follow
   Were silent with love, as you now, Apollo!
       With envy of my sweet pipings.
 
   I sang of the dancing stars,
     I sang of the daedal Earth---
   And of heaven--& the giant wars--
       And Love, & death, [&] birth,
       And then I changed my pipings, [40]
   Singing how down the vale of Menalus,
     I pursued a maiden & clasped a reed,
   Gods and men, we are all deluded thus!
     It breaks in our bosom & then we bleed!
   All wept, as I think both ye now would
   If envy or age had not frozen your blood,
       At the sorrow of my sweet pipings.
 
 _Tmol._ Phoebus, the palm is thine. The Fauns may dance
   To the blithe tune of ever merry Pan;
   But wisdom, beauty, & the power divine
   Of highest poesy lives within thy strain.
   Named by the Gods the King of melody,
   Receive from my weak hands a second crown.
 
 _Pan._ Old Grey-beard, you say false! you think by this
   To win Apollo with his sultry beams
   To thaw your snowy head, & to renew
   The worn out soil of your bare, ugly hill.
   I do appeal to Phrygian Midas here;
   Let him decide, he is no partial judge.
 
 _Mid._ Immortal Pan, to my poor, mortal ears
   Your sprightly song in melody outweighs
   His drowsy tune; he put me fast asleep,
   As my prime minister, Zopyrion, knows;
   But your gay notes awoke me, & to you, [41]
   If I were Tmolus, would I give the prize.
 
 _Apol._ And who art thou who dar'st among the Gods
   Mingle thy mortal voice? Insensate fool!
   Does not the doom of Marsyas fill with dread
   Thy impious soul? or would'st thou also be
   Another victim to my justest wrath?
   But fear no more;--thy punishment shall be
   But as a symbol of thy blunted sense.
   Have asses' ears! and thus to the whole world
   Wear thou the marks of what thou art,
   Let Pan himself blush at such a judge.
     [Footnote: A syllable here, a whole foot in the previous line,
       appear to be missing.]
 
   (_Exeunt all except Midas & Zopyrion._)
 
 _Mid._ What said he? is it true, Zopyrion?
   Yet if it be; you must not look on me,
   But shut your eyes, nor dare behold my shame.
   Ah! here they are! two long, smooth asses['] ears!
   They stick upright! Ah, I am sick with shame!
 
 _Zopyr._ I cannot tell your Majesty my grief,
   Or how my soul's oppressed with the sad change
   That has, alas! befallen your royal ears.
 
 _Mid._ A truce to your fine speeches now, Zopyrion;
   To you it appertains to find some mode
   Of hiding my sad chance, if not you die.
 
 _Zopyr._ Great King, alas! my thoughts are dull & slow[;]
   Pardon my folly, might they not be cut, [42]
   Rounded off handsomely, like human ears [?]
 
 _Mid._ (_feeling his ears_)
   They're long & thick; I fear 'twould give me pain;
   And then if vengeful Phoebus should command
   Another pair to grow--that will not do.
 
 _Zopyr._ You wear a little crown of carved gold,
   Which just appears to tell you are a king;
   If that were large and had a cowl of silk,
   Studded with gems, which none would dare gainsay,
   Then might you--
 
 _Mid._       Now you have it! friend,
   I will reward you with some princely gift.
   But, hark! Zopyrion, not a word of this;
   If to a single soul you tell my shame
   You die. I'll to the palace the back way
   And manufacture my new diadem,
   The which all other kings shall imitate
   As if they also had my asses['] ears.
 
   (_Exit._)
 
 _Zopyr._ (_watching Midas off_)
   He cannot hear me now, and I may laugh!
   I should have burst had he staid longer here.
   Two long, smooth asses' ears that stick upright;
   Oh, that Apollo had but made him bray!
   I'll to the palace; there I'll laugh my fill
   With--hold! What were the last words that Midas said? [43]
   I may not speak--not to my friends disclose
   The strangest tale? ha! ha! and when I laugh
   I must not tell the cause? none know the truth?
   None know King Midas has--but who comes here?
   It is Asphalion: he knows not this change;
   I must look grave & sad; for now a smile
   If Midas knows it may prove capital.
   Yet when I think of those--oh! I shall die,
   In either way, by silence or by speech.
 
   _Enter Asphalion._
 
 _Asphal._ Know you, Zopyrion?--
 
 _Zopyr._                       What[!] you know it too?
   Then I may laugh;--oh, what relief is this!
   How does he look, the courtiers gathering round?
   Does he hang down his head, & his ears too?
   Oh, I shall die! (_laughs._)
 
 _Asph._ He is a queer old dog,
   Yet not so laughable. 'Tis true, he's drunk,
   And sings and reels under the broad, green leaves,
   And hanging clusters of his crown of grapes.--
 
 _Zopyr._ A crown of grapes! but can that hide his ears[?]
 
 _Asph._ His ears!--Oh, no! they stick upright between.
   When Midas saw him--
 
 _Zopyr._         Whom then do you mean?
   Did you not say-- [44]
 
 _Asph._ I spoke of old Silenus;
   Who having missed his way in these wild woods,
   And lost his tipsey company--was found
   Sucking the juicy clusters of the vines
   That sprung where'er he trod:--and reeling on
   Some shepherds found him in yon ilex wood.
   They brought him to the king, who honouring him
   For Bacchus' sake, has gladly welcomed him,
   And will conduct him with solemnity
   To the disconsolate Fauns from whom he's strayed.
   But have you seen the new-fashioned diadem
     [Footnote: Another halting line. Cf. again, p. [47], 1. 3;
       p. [55], 1. 11; p. [59], 1.1; p. [61], 1. 1; p. [64], 1. 14.]
   That Midas wears?--
 
 _Zopyr._        Ha! he has got it on!--
   Know you the secret cause why with such care
   He hides his royal head? you have not seen--
 
 _Asph._ Seen what?
 
 _Zopyr._ Ah! then, no matter:-- (_turns away agitated._)
   I dare not sneak or stay[;]
   If I remain I shall discover all.
 
 _Asp._ I see the king has trusted to your care
   Some great state secret which you fain would hide.
   I am your friend, trust my fidelity,
   If you're in doubt I'll be your counsellor. [45]
 
 _Zopyr._ (_with great importance._)
   Secret, Asphalion! How came you to know?
   If my great master (which I do not say)
   Should think me a fit friend in whom to pour
   The weighty secrets of his royal heart,
   Shall I betray his trust? It is not so;--
   I am a poor despised slave.--No more!
   Join we the festal band which will conduct
   Silenus to his woods again?
 
 _Asph._                 My friend,
   Wherefore mistrust a faithful heart? Confide
   The whole to me;--I will be still as death.
 
 _Zopyr._ As death! you know not what you say; farewell[!]
   A little will I commune with my soul,
   And then I'll join you at the palace-gate.
 
 _Asph._ Will you then tell me?--
 
 _Zopyr._                        Cease to vex, my friend,
   Your soul and mine with false suspicion, (_aside_) Oh!
   I am choked! I'd give full ten years of my life
   To tell, to laugh--& yet I dare not speak.
 
 _Asph._ Zopyrion, remember that you hurt [46]
   The trusting bosom of a faithful friend
   By your unjust concealment. (_Exit._)
 
 _Zopyr._                Oh, he's gone!
   To him I dare not speak, nor yet to Lacon;
   No human ears may hear what must be told.
   I cannot keep it in, assuredly;
   I shall some night discuss it in my sleep.
   It will not keep! Oh! greenest reeds that sway
   And nod your feathered heads beneath the sun,
   Be you depositaries of my soul,
   Be you my friends in this extremity[:]
   I shall not risk my head when I tell you
   The fatal truth, the heart oppressing fact,
 
   (_stooping down & whispering_)
 
 
   (_Enter Midas, Silenus & others, who fall back during
   the scene; Midas is always anxious about his crown, &
    Zopyrion gets behind him & tries to smother his laughter._)
 
 _Silen._ (_very drunk_) Again I find you, Bacchus, runaway!
   Welcome, my glorious boy! Another time
   Stray not; or leave your poor old foster-father
   In the wild mazes of a wood, in which
   I might have wandered many hundred years,
   Had not some merry fellows helped me out,
   And had not this king kindly welcomed me,
   I might have fared more ill than you erewhile
   In Pentheus' prisons, that death fated rogue.
 
 _Bac._ (_to Midas._) To you I owe great thanks & will reward
   Your hospitality. Tell me your name
   And what this country is.
 
 _Midas._              My name is Midas--
 
 _The Reeds_ (_nodding their heads_).
   Midas, the king, has the ears of an ass. [49]
 
 _Midas._ (_turning round & seizing Zopyrion_).
   Villain, you lie! he dies who shall repeat
   Those traitrous words. Seize on Zopyrion!
 
 _The Reeds._ Midas, the king, has the ears of an ass.
 
 _Mid._ Search through the crowd; it is a woman's voice
   That dares belie her king, & makes her life
   A forfeit to his fury.
 
 _Asph._            There is no woman here.
 
 _Bac._ Calm yourself, Midas; none believe the tale,
   Some impious man or gamesome faun dares feign
   In vile contempt of your most royal ears.
   Off with your crown, & shew the world the lie!
 
 _Mid._ (_holding his crown tight_)
   Never! What[!] shall a vile calumnious slave
   Dictate the actions of a crowned king?
   Zopyrion, this lie springs from you--you perish!
 
 _Zopy._ I, say that Midas has got asses' ears?
   May great Apollo strike me with his shaft
   If to a single soul I ever told
   So false, so foul a calumny!
 
 _Bac._                   Midas! [50]
 
 _The Reeds._ Midas, the king, has the ears of an ass.
 
 _Bac._ Silence! or by my Godhead I strike dead
   Who shall again insult the noble king.
   Midas, you are my friend, for you have saved
   And hospitably welcomed my old faun;
   Choose your reward, for here I swear your wish,
   Whatever it may be, shall be fulfilled.
 
 _Zopyr. (aside)_ Sure he will wish his asses' ears in Styx.
 
 _Midas._ What[!] may I choose from out the deep, rich mine
   Of human fancy, & the wildest thoughts
   That passed till now unheeded through my brain,
   A wish, a hope, to be fulfilled by you?
   Nature shall bend her laws at my command,
   And I possess as my reward one thing
   That I have longed for with unceasing care.
 
 _Bac._ Pause, noble king, ere you express this wish[.]
   Let not an error or rash folly spoil
   My benefaction; pause and then declare,
   For what you ask shall be, as I have sworn.
 
 _Mid._ Let all I touch be gold, most glorious gold!
   Let me be rich! and where I stretch my hands, [51]
   (That like Orion I could touch the stars!)
   Be radiant gold! God Bacchus, you have sworn,
   I claim your word,--my ears are quite forgot!
 
 _The Reeds._ Midas, the king, has the ears of an ass.
 
 _Mid._ You lie, & yet I care not--
 
 _Zopyr._ (_aside to Midas_) Yet might I
   But have advised your Majesty, I would
   Have made one God undo the other's work--
 
 _Midas._ (_aside to Zopyr_).
   Advise yourself, my friend, or you may grow
   Shorter by a head ere night.--I am blessed,
   Happier than ever earthly man could boast.
   Do you fulfil your words?
 
 _Bac._ Yes, thoughtless man!
   And much I fear if you have not the ears
   You have the judgement of an ass. Farewel!
   I found you rich & happy; & I leave you,
   Though you know it not, miserably poor.
   Your boon is granted,--touch! make gold! Some here
   Help carry old Silenus off, who sleeps
   The divine sleep of heavy wine. Farewel!
 
 _Mid._ Bacchus, divine, how shall I pay my thanks[?]
 
   (_Exeunt._)
 
 END OF FIRST ACT.
 
 
 
 
 ACT II.
 
 _Scene; a splendid apartment in the Palace of Midas._
 
   _Enter Midas
   (with a golden rose in his hand)._
 
 _Mid._ Gold! glorious gold! I am made up of gold!
   I pluck a rose, a silly, fading rose,
   Its soft, pink petals change to yellow gold;
   Its stem, its leaves are gold--and what before
   Was fit for a poor peasant's festal dress
   May now adorn a Queen. I lift a stone,
   A heavy, useless mass, a slave would spurn,
   What is more valueless? 'Tis solid gold!
   A king might war on me to win the same.
   And as I pass my hand thus through the air,
   A little shower of sightless dust falls down
   A shower of gold. O, now I am a king!
   I've spread my hands against my palace walls,
   I've set high ladders up, that I may touch
   Each crevice and each cornice with my hands,
   And it will all be gold:--a golden palace,
   Surrounded by a wood of golden trees,
   Which will bear golden fruits.--The very ground
   My naked foot treads on is yellow gold,
   Invaluable gold! my dress is gold! [53]
   Now I am great! Innumerable armies
   Wait till my gold collects them round my throne;
   I see my standard made of woven gold.
   Waving o'er Asia's utmost Citadels,
   Guarded by myriads invincible.
   Or if the toil of war grows wearisome,
   I can buy Empires:--India shall be mine,
   Its blooming beauties, gold-encrusted baths,
   Its aromatic groves and palaces,
   All will be mine! Oh, Midas, ass-eared king!
   I love thee more than any words can tell,
   That thus thy touch, thou man akin to Gods,
   Can change all earth to heaven,--Olympian gold!
   For what makes heaven different from earth!
   Look how my courtiers come! Magnificent!
   None shall dare wait on me but those who bear
   An empire on their backs in sheets of gold.
   Oh, what a slave I was! my flocks & kine,
   My vineyards & my corn were all my wealth
   And men esteemed me rich; but now Great Jove
   Transcends me but by lightning, and who knows
   If my gold win not the Cyclopean Powers,
   And Vulcan, who must hate his father's rule,
   To forge me bolts?--and then--but hush! they come. [54]
 
   _Enter Zopyrion, Asphalion, & Lacon._
 
 _Lac._ Pardon us, mighty king--
 
 _Mid._ What would ye, slaves?
   Oh! I could buy you all with one slight touch
   Of my gold-making hand!
 
 _Asph._             Royal Midas,
   We humbly would petition for relief.
 
 _Mid._ Relief I Bring me your copper coin, your brass,
   Or what ye will--ye'll speedily be rich.
 
 _Zopyr._ 'Tis not for gold, but to be rid of gold,
   That we intrude upon your Majesty.
   I fear that you will suffer by this gift,
   As we do now. Look at our backs bent down
   With the huge weight of the great cloaks of gold.
   Permit us to put on our shabby dress,
   Our poor despised garments of light wool:--
   We walk as porters underneath a load.
   Pity, great king, our human weaknesses,
   Nor force us to expire--
 
 _Mid._               Begone, ye slaves!
   Go clothe your wretched limbs in ragged skins!
   Take an old carpet to wrap round your legs,
   A broad leaf for your feet--ye shall not wear [55]
   That dress--those golden sandals--monarch like.
 
 _Asph._ If you would have us walk a mile a day
   We cannot thus--already we are tired
   With the huge weight of soles of solid gold.
 
 _Mid._ Pitiful wretches! Earth-born, groveling dolts!
   Begone! nor dare reply to my just wrath!
   Never behold me more! or if you stay
   Let not a sigh, a shrug, a stoop betray
   What poor, weak, miserable men you are.
   Not as I--I am a God! Look, dunce!
   I tread or leap beneath this load of gold!
 
   (_Jumps & stops suddenly._)
 
   I've hurt my back:--this cloak is wondrous hard!
   No more of this! my appetite would say
   The hour is come for my noon-day repast.
 
 _Lac._ It comes borne in by twenty lusty slaves,
   Who scarce can lift the mass of solid gold,
   That lately was a table of light wood.
   Here is the heavy golden ewer & bowl,
   In which, before you eat, you wash your hands.
 
 _Mid._ (_lifting up the ewer_)
   This is to be a king! to touch pure gold!
   Would that by touching thee, Zopyrion, [56]
   I could transmute thee to a golden man;
   A crowd of golden slaves to wait on me!
 
   (_Pours the water on his hands._)
 
   But how is this? the water that I touch
   Falls down a stream of yellow liquid gold,
   And hardens as it falls. I cannot wash--
   Pray Bacchus, I may drink! and the soft towel
   With which I'd wipe my hands transmutes itself
   Into a sheet of heavy gold.--No more!
   I'll sit and eat:--I have not tasted food
   For many hours, I have been so wrapt
   In golden dreams of all that I possess,
   I had not time to eat; now hunger calls
   And makes me feel, though not remote in power
   From the immortal Gods, that I need food,
   The only remnant of mortality!
 
   (_In vain attempts to eat of several dishes._)
 
   Alas! my fate! 'tis gold! this peach is gold!
   This bread, these grapes & all I touch! this meat
   Which by its scent quickened my appetite
   Has lost its scent, its taste,--'tis useless gold.
 
 _Zopyr._ (_aside_) He'd better now have followed my advice.
   He starves by gold yet keeps his asses' ears. [57]
 
 _Mid._ Asphalion, put that apple to my mouth;
   If my hands touch it not perhaps I eat.
   Alas! I cannot bite! as it approached
   I felt its fragrance, thought it would be mine,
   But by the touch of my life-killing lips
   'Tis changed from a sweet fruit to tasteless gold,
   Bacchus will not refresh me by his gifts,
   The liquid wine congeals and flies my taste.
   Go, miserable slaves! Oh, wretched king!
   Away with food! Its sight now makes me sick.
   Bring in my couch! I will sleep off my care,
   And when I wake I'll coin some remedy.
   I dare not bathe this sultry day, for fear
   I be enclosed in gold. Begone!
   I will to rest:--oh, miserable king!
 
   (_Exeunt all but Midas. He lies down, turns restlessly
   for some time & then rises._)
 
   Oh! fool! to wish to change all things to gold!
   Blind Ideot that I was! This bed is gold;
   And this hard, weighty pillow, late so soft,
   That of itself invited me to rest,
   Is a hard lump, that if I sleep and turn
   I may beat out my brains against its sides.  [58]
   Oh! what a wretched thing I am! how blind!
   I cannot eat, for all my food is gold;
   Drink flies my parched lips, and my hard couch
   Is worse than rock to my poor bruised sides.
   I cannot walk; the weight of my gold soles
   Pulls me to earth:--my back is broke beneath
   These gorgeous garments--(_throws off his cloak_)
                            Lie there, golden cloak!
   There on thy kindred earth, lie there and rot!
   I dare not touch my forehead with my palm
   For fear my very flesh should turn to gold.
   Oh! let me curse thee, vilest, yellow dirt!
   Here, on my knees, thy martyr lifts his voice,
   A poor, starved wretch who can touch nought but thee[,]
   Wilt thou refresh me in the heat of noon?
   Canst thou be kindled for me when I'm cold?
   May all men, & the immortal Gods,
   Hate & spurn thee as wretched I do now.
 
   (_Kicks the couch, & tries to throw down the pillow
   but cannot lift it._)
 
   I'd dash, thee to the earth, but that thy weight
   Preserves thee, abhorred, Tartarian Gold! [59]
   Bacchus, O pity, pardon, and restore me!
   Who waits?
 
   _Enter Lacon._
 
   Go bid the priests that they prepare
   Most solemn song and richest sacrifise;--
   Which I may not dare touch, lest it should turn
   To most unholy gold.
 
 _Lacon._ Pardon me, oh King,
   But perhaps the God may give that you may eat,
   And yet your touch be magic.
 
 _Mid._ No more, thou slave!
   Gold is my fear, my bane, my death! I hate
   Its yellow glare, its aspect hard and cold.
   I would be rid of all.--Go bid them haste.
 
   (_Exit Lacon._)
 
   Oh, Bacchus I be propitious to their prayer!
   Make me a hind, clothe me in ragged skins--
   And let my food be bread, unsavoury roots,
   But take from me the frightful curse of gold.
   Am I not poor? Alas! how I am changed!
   Poorer than meanest slaves, my piles of wealth
   Cannot buy for me one poor, wretched dish:--
   In summer heat I cannot bathe, nor wear
   A linen dress; the heavy, dull, hard metal
   Clings to me till I pray for poverty.
 
   _Enter Zopyrion, Asphalion & Lacon._ [60]
 
 _Zopyr._ The sacrifice is made, & the great God,
   Pitying your ills, oh King, accepted it,
   Whilst his great oracle gave forth these words.
   "Let poor king Midas bathe in the clear stream
   "Of swift Pactolus, & to those waves tran[s]fer
   "The gold-transmuting power, which he repents."
 
 _Mid._ Oh joy! Oh Bacchus, thanks  for this to thee
   Will I each year offer three sucking lambs--
   Games will I institute--nor Pan himself
   Shall have more honour than thy deity.
   Haste to the stream,--I long to feel the cool
   And liquid touch of its divinest waves.
 
   (_Exeunt all except Zopyrion and Asphalion._)
 
 _Asph._ Off with our golden sandals and our cloaks!
   Oh, I shall ever hate the sight of gold!
   Poor, wealthy Midas runs as if from death
   To rid him quick of this meta[l]lic curse.
 
 _Zopyr._ (_aside_) I wonder if his asses['] ears are gold;
   What would I give to let the secret out?
   Gold! that is trash, we have too much of it,--
   But I would give ten new born lambs to tell
   This most portentous truth--but I must choke.
 
 _Asph._ Now we shall tend our flocks and reap our corn
   As we were wont, and not be killed by gold.
   Golden fleeces threatened our poor sheep, [61]
   The very showers as they fell from heaven
   Could not refresh the earth; the wind blew gold,
   And as we walked [Footnote: MS. _as he walked._]
       the thick sharp-pointed atoms
   Wounded our faces--the navies would have sunk--
 
 _Zopyr._ All strangers would have fled our gold-cursed shore,
   Till we had bound our wealthy king, that he
   Might leave the green and fertile earth unchanged;--
   Then in deep misery he would have shook
   His golden chains & starved.
 
   _Enter Lacon._
 
 _Lacon._ Sluggards, how now I
   Have you not been to gaze upon the sight?
   To see the noble king cast off the gift
   Which he erewhile so earnestly did crave[?]
 
 _Asph._ I am so tired with the weight of gold
   I bore to-day I could not budge a foot
   To see the finest sight Jove could display.
   But tell us, Lacon, what he did and said.
 
 _Lac._ Although he'd fain have run[,] his golden dress
   And heavy sandals made the poor king limp
   As leaning upon mine and the high priest's arm,
   He hastened to Pactolus. When he saw
   The stream--"Thanks to the Gods!" he cried aloud
   In joy; then having cast aside his robes
   He leaped into the waves, and with his palm
   Throwing the waters high--"This is not gold," [62]
   He cried, "I'm free, I have got rid of gold."
   And then he drank, and seizing with delight
   A little leaf that floated down the stream,
   "Thou art not gold," he said--
 
 _Zopyr._ But all this time--
   Did you behold?--Did he take off his crown?--
 
 _Lacon._ No:--It was strange to see him as he plunged
   Hold tight his crown with his left hand the while.
 
 _Zopyr._ (_aside_) Alas, my fate! I thought they had been seen.
 
 _Lac._ He ordered garments to the river side
   Of coarsest texture;--those that erst he wore
   He would not touch, for they were trimmed with gold.
 
 _Zopyr._ And yet he did not throw away his crown?
 
 _Lac._ He ever held it tight as if he thought
   Some charm attached to its remaining there.
   Perhaps he is right;--know you, Zopyrion,
   If that strange voice this morning spoke the truth?
 
 _Zopyr._ Nay guess;--think of what passed & you can judge.
   I dare not--I know nothing of his ears.
 
 _Lac._ I am resolved some night when he sleeps sound
   To get a peep.--No more,'tis he that comes.
   He has now lost the boon that Bacchus gave,
   Having bestowed it on the limpid waves.
   Now over golden sands Pactolus runs, [63]
   And as it flows creates a mine of wealth.
 
   _Enter Midas, (with grapes in his hand)._
 
 _Mid._ I see again the trees and smell the flowers
   With colours lovelier than the rainbow's self;
   I see the gifts of rich-haired Ceres piled
   And eat. (_holding up the grapes_)
           This is not yellow, dirty gold,
   But blooms with precious tints, purple and green.
   I hate this palace and its golden floor,
   Its cornices and rafters all of gold:--
   I'll build a little bower of freshest green,
   Canopied o'er with leaves & floored with moss:--
   I'll dress in skins;--I'll drink from wooden cups
   And eat on wooden platters--sleep on flock;
   None but poor men shall dare attend on me.
   All that is gold I'll banish from my court,
   Gilding shall be high treason to my state,
   The very name of gold shall be crime capital[.]
 
 _Zopyr._ May we not keep our coin?
 
 _Mid._ No, Zopyrion,
   None but the meanest peasants shall have gold.
   It is a sordid, base and dirty thing:--
   Look at the grass, the sky, the trees, the flowers,
   These are Joves treasures & they are not gold:-- [64]
   Now they are mine, I am no longer cursed.--
   The hapless river hates its golden sands,
   As it rolls over them, having my gift;--
   Poor harmless shores! they now are dirty gold.
   How I detest it! Do not the Gods hate gold?
   Nature displays the treasures that she loves,
   She hides gold deep in the earth & piles above
   Mountains & rocks to keep the monster down.
 
 _Asph._ They say Apollo's sunny car is gold.
 
 _Mid._ Aye, so it is for Gold belongs to him:--
   But Phoebus is my bitterest enemy,
   And what pertains to him he makes my bane.
 
 _Zopyr._ What [!] will your Majesty tell the world?--
 
 _Mid._ Peace, vile gossip! Asphalion, come you here.
   Look at those golden columns; those inlaid walls;
   The ground, the trees, the flowers & precious food
   That in my madness I did turn to gold:--
   Pull it all down, I hate its sight and touch;
   Heap up my cars & waggons with the load
   And yoke my kine to drag it to the sea:
   Then crowned with flowers, ivy & Bacchic vine,
   And singing hymns to the immortal Gods,
   We will ascend ships freighted with the gold, [65]
   And where no plummet's line can sound the depth
   Of greedy Ocean, we will throw it in,
   All, all this frightful heap of yellow dirt.
   Down through the dark, blue waters it will sink,
   Frightening the green-haired Nereids from their sport
   And the strange Tritons--the waves will close above
   And I, thank Bacchus, ne'er shall see it more!
   And we will make all echoing heaven ring
   With our loud hymns of thanks, & joyous pour
   Libations in the deep, and reach the land,
   Rich, happy, free & great, that we have lost
   Man's curse, heart-bartering, soul-enchaining gold.
 
 FINIS.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Online Distributed Proofreading
 Team at http://www.pgdp.net and the booksmiths at
 http://www.eBookForge.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 POSTHUMOUS WORKS
 
 OF
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT GODWIN.
 
 VOL. I.
 
 
 POSTHUMOUS WORKS
 
 OF THE
 
 AUTHOR
 
 OF A
 
 VINDICATION OF THE RIGHTS OF WOMAN.
 
 IN FOUR VOLUMES.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 VOL. I.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 _LONDON:_
 
 PRINTED FOR J. JOHNSON, NO. 72, ST. PAUL'S
   CHURCH-YARD; AND G. G. AND J. ROBINSON,
               PATERNOSTER-ROW.
                    1798.
 
 
 THE
 
 WRONGS OF WOMAN:
 
 OR,
 
 MARIA.
 
 A FRAGMENT.
 
 IN TWO VOLUMES.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 VOL. I.
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 
 THE public are here presented with the last literary attempt of an
 author, whose fame has been uncommonly extensive, and whose talents have
 probably been most admired, by the persons by whom talents are estimated
 with the greatest accuracy and discrimination. There are few, to whom her
 writings could in any case have given pleasure, that would have wished
 that this fragment should have been suppressed, because it is a fragment.
 There is a sentiment, very dear to minds of taste and imagination, that
 finds a melancholy delight in contemplating these unfinished productions
 of genius, these sketches of what, if they had been filled up in a manner
 adequate to the writer's conception, would perhaps have given a new
 impulse to the manners of a world.
 
 The purpose and structure of the following work, had long formed a
 favourite subject of meditation with its author, and she judged them
 capable of producing an important effect. The composition had been in
 progress for a period of twelve months. She was anxious to do justice to
 her conception, and recommenced and revised the manuscript several
 different times. So much of it as is here given to the public, she was
 far from considering as finished, and, in a letter to a friend directly
 written on this subject, she says, "I am perfectly aware that some of the
 incidents ought to be transposed, and heightened by more harmonious
 shading; and I wished in some degree to avail myself of criticism, before
 I began to adjust my events into a story, the outline of which I had
 sketched in my mind[x-A]." The only friends to whom the author
 communicated her manuscript, were Mr. Dyson, the translator of the
 Sorcerer, and the present editor; and it was impossible for the most
 inexperienced author to display a stronger desire of profiting by the
 censures and sentiments that might be suggested[x-B].
 
 In revising these sheets for the press, it was necessary for the editor,
 in some places, to connect the more finished parts with the pages of an
 older copy, and a line or two in addition sometimes appeared requisite
 for that purpose. Wherever such a liberty has been taken, the additional
 phrases will be found inclosed in brackets; it being the editor's most
 earnest desire, to intrude nothing of himself into the work, but to give
 to the public the words, as well as ideas, of the real author.
 
 What follows in the ensuing pages, is not a preface regularly drawn out
 by the author, but merely hints for a preface, which, though never filled
 up in the manner the writer intended, appeared to be worth preserving.
 
 W. GODWIN.
 
 
 
 
 AUTHOR'S PREFACE.
 
 
 THE Wrongs of Woman, like the wrongs of the oppressed part of mankind,
 may be deemed necessary by their oppressors: but surely there are a few,
 who will dare to advance before the improvement of the age, and grant
 that my sketches are not the abortion of a distempered fancy, or the
 strong delineations of a wounded heart.
 
 In writing this novel, I have rather endeavoured to pourtray passions
 than manners.
 
 In many instances I could have made the incidents more dramatic, would I
 have sacrificed my main object, the desire of exhibiting the misery and
 oppression, peculiar to women, that arise out of the partial laws and
 customs of society.
 
 In the invention of the story, this view restrained my fancy; and the
 history ought rather to be considered, as of woman, than of an
 individual.
 
 The sentiments I have embodied.
 
 In many works of this species, the hero is allowed to be mortal, and to
 become wise and virtuous as well as happy, by a train of events and
 circumstances. The heroines, on the contrary, are to be born immaculate;
 and to act like goddesses of wisdom, just come forth highly finished
 Minervas from the head of Jove.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 [The following is an extract of a letter from the author to a friend, to
 whom she communicated her manuscript.]
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 For my part, I cannot suppose any situation more distressing, than for a
 woman of sensibility, with an improving mind, to be bound to such a man
 as I have described for life; obliged to renounce all the humanizing
 affections, and to avoid cultivating her taste, lest her perception of
 grace and refinement of sentiment, should sharpen to agony the pangs of
 disappointment. Love, in which the imagination mingles its bewitching
 colouring, must be fostered by delicacy. I should despise, or rather call
 her an ordinary woman, who could endure such a husband as I have
 sketched.
 
 These appear to me (matrimonial despotism of heart and conduct) to be the
 peculiar Wrongs of Woman, because they degrade the mind. What are termed
 great misfortunes, may more forcibly impress the mind of common readers;
 they have more of what may justly be termed _stage-effect_; but it is the
 delineation of finer sensations, which, in my opinion, constitutes the
 merit of our best novels. This is what I have in view; and to show the
 wrongs of different classes of women, equally oppressive, though, from
 the difference of education, necessarily various.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [x-A] A more copious extract of this letter is subjoined to the author's
 preface.
 
 [x-B] The part communicated consisted of the first fourteen chapters.
 
 
 
 
 ERRATA.
 
 Page 3, line 2, _dele_ half.
 
 P. 81 and 118, _for_ brackets [--], _read_ inverted commas " thus "
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS.
 
 VOL. I. AND II.
 
 The Wrongs of Woman, or Maria; a Fragment:
 to which is added, the First Book
 of a Series of Lessons for Children.
 
 VOL. III. AND IV.
 
 Letters and Miscellaneous Pieces.
 
 
 
 
 _WRONGS_
 
 OF
 
 WOMAN.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. I.
 
 
 ABODES of horror have frequently been described, and castles, filled with
 spectres and chimeras, conjured up by the magic spell of genius to harrow
 the soul, and absorb the wondering mind. But, formed of such stuff as
 dreams are made of, what were they to the mansion of despair, in one
 corner of which Maria sat, endeavouring to recal her scattered thoughts!
 
 Surprise, astonishment, that bordered on distraction, seemed to have
 suspended her faculties, till, waking by degrees to a keen sense of
 anguish, a whirlwind of rage and indignation roused her torpid pulse. One
 recollection with frightful velocity following another, threatened to
 fire her brain, and make her a fit companion for the terrific
 inhabitants, whose groans and shrieks were no unsubstantial sounds of
 whistling winds, or startled birds, modulated by a romantic fancy, which
 amuse while they affright; but such tones of misery as carry a dreadful
 certainty directly to the heart. What effect must they then have produced
 on one, true to the touch of sympathy, and tortured by maternal
 apprehension!
 
 Her infant's image was continually floating on Maria's sight, and the
 first smile of intelligence remembered, as none but a mother, an unhappy
 mother, can conceive. She heard her half speaking cooing, and felt the
 little twinkling fingers on her burning bosom--a bosom bursting with the
 nutriment for which this cherished child might now be pining in vain.
 From a stranger she could indeed receive the maternal aliment, Maria was
 grieved at the thought--but who would watch her with a mother's
 tenderness, a mother's self-denial?
 
 The retreating shadows of former sorrows rushed back in a gloomy train,
 and seemed to be pictured on the walls of her prison, magnified by the
 state of mind in which they were viewed--Still she mourned for her child,
 lamented she was a daughter, and anticipated the aggravated ills of life
 that her sex rendered almost inevitable, even while dreading she was no
 more. To think that she was blotted out of existence was agony, when the
 imagination had been long employed to expand her faculties; yet to
 suppose her turned adrift on an unknown sea, was scarcely less
 afflicting.
 
 After being two days the prey of impetuous, varying emotions, Maria began
 to reflect more calmly on her present situation, for she had actually
 been rendered incapable of sober reflection, by the discovery of the act
 of atrocity of which she was the victim. She could not have imagined,
 that, in all the fermentation of civilized depravity, a similar plot
 could have entered a human mind. She had been stunned by an unexpected
 blow; yet life, however joyless, was not to be indolently resigned, or
 misery endured without exertion, and proudly termed patience. She had
 hitherto meditated only to point the dart of anguish, and suppressed the
 heart heavings of indignant nature merely by the force of contempt. Now
 she endeavoured to brace her mind to fortitude, and to ask herself what
 was to be her employment in her dreary cell? Was it not to effect her
 escape, to fly to the succour of her child, and to baffle the selfish
 schemes of her tyrant--her husband?
 
 These thoughts roused her sleeping spirit, and the self-possession
 returned, that seemed to have abandoned her in the infernal solitude into
 which she had been precipitated. The first emotions of overwhelming
 impatience began to subside, and resentment gave place to tenderness, and
 more tranquil meditation; though anger once more stopt the calm current
 of reflection, when she attempted to move her manacled arms. But this
 was an outrage that could only excite momentary feelings of scorn, which
 evaporated in a faint smile; for Maria was far from thinking a personal
 insult the most difficult to endure with magnanimous indifference.
 
 She approached the small grated window of her chamber, and for a
 considerable time only regarded the blue expanse; though it commanded a
 view of a desolate garden, and of part of a huge pile of buildings, that,
 after having been suffered, for half a century, to fall to decay, had
 undergone some clumsy repairs, merely to render it habitable. The ivy had
 been torn off the turrets, and the stones not wanted to patch up the
 breaches of time, and exclude the warring elements, left in heaps in the
 disordered court. Maria contemplated this scene she knew not how long; or
 rather gazed on the walls, and pondered on her situation. To the master
 of this most horrid of prisons, she had, soon after her entrance, raved
 of injustice, in accents that would have justified his treatment, had not
 a malignant smile, when she appealed to his judgment, with a dreadful
 conviction stifled her remonstrating complaints. By force, or openly,
 what could be done? But surely some expedient might occur to an active
 mind, without any other employment, and possessed of sufficient
 resolution to put the risk of life into the balance with the chance of
 freedom.
 
 A woman entered in the midst of these reflections, with a firm,
 deliberate step, strongly marked features, and large black eyes, which
 she fixed steadily on Maria's, as if she designed to intimidate her,
 saying at the same time--"You had better sit down and eat your dinner,
 than look at the clouds."
 
 "I have no appetite," replied Maria, who had previously determined to
 speak mildly, "why then should I eat?"
 
 "But, in spite of that, you must and shall eat something. I have had many
 ladies under my care, who have resolved to starve themselves; but, soon
 or late, they gave up their intent, as they recovered their senses."
 
 "Do you really think me mad?" asked Maria, meeting the searching glance
 of her eye.
 
 "Not just now. But what does that prove?--only that you must be the more
 carefully watched, for appearing at times so reasonable. You have not
 touched a morsel since you entered the house."--Maria sighed
 intelligibly.--"Could any thing but madness produce such a disgust for
 food?"
 
 "Yes, grief; you would not ask the question if you knew what it was." The
 attendant shook her head; and a ghastly smile of desperate fortitude
 served as a forcible reply, and made Maria pause, before she added--"Yet
 I will take some refreshment: I mean not to die.--No; I will preserve my
 senses; and convince even you, sooner than you are aware of, that my
 intellects have never been disturbed, though the exertion of them may
 have been suspended by some infernal drug."
 
 Doubt gathered still thicker on the brow of her guard, as she attempted
 to convict her of mistake.
 
 "Have patience!" exclaimed Maria, with a solemnity that inspired awe. "My
 God! how have I been schooled into the practice!" A suffocation of voice
 betrayed the agonizing emotions she was labouring to keep down; and
 conquering a qualm of disgust, she calmly endeavoured to eat enough to
 prove her docility, perpetually turning to the suspicious female, whose
 observation she courted, while she was making the bed and adjusting the
 room.
 
 "Come to me often," said Maria, with a tone of persuasion, in consequence
 of a vague plan that she had hastily adopted, when, after surveying this
 woman's form and features, she felt convinced that she had an
 understanding above the common standard; "and believe me mad, till you
 are obliged to acknowledge the contrary." The woman was no fool, that is,
 she was superior to her class; nor had misery quite petrified the
 life's-blood of humanity, to which reflections on our own misfortunes
 only give a more orderly course. The manner, rather than the
 expostulations, of Maria made a slight suspicion dart into her mind with
 corresponding sympathy, which various other avocations, and the habit of
 banishing compunction, prevented her, for the present, from examining
 more minutely.
 
 But when she was told that no person, excepting the physician appointed
 by her family, was to be permitted to see the lady at the end of the
 gallery, she opened her keen eyes still wider, and uttered a--"hem!"
 before she enquired--"Why?" She was briefly told, in reply, that the
 malady was hereditary, and the fits not occurring but at very long and
 irregular intervals, she must be carefully watched; for the length of
 these lucid periods only rendered her more mischievous, when any vexation
 or caprice brought on the paroxysm of phrensy.
 
 Had her master trusted her, it is probable that neither pity nor
 curiosity would have made her swerve from the straight line of her
 interest; for she had suffered too much in her intercourse with mankind,
 not to determine to look for support, rather to humouring their passions,
 than courting their approbation by the integrity of her conduct. A deadly
 blight had met her at the very threshold of existence; and the
 wretchedness of her mother seemed a heavy weight fastened on her innocent
 neck, to drag her down to perdition. She could not heroically determine
 to succour an unfortunate; but, offended at the bare supposition that she
 could be deceived with the same ease as a common servant, she no longer
 curbed her curiosity; and, though she never seriously fathomed her own
 intentions, she would sit, every moment she could steal from observation,
 listening to the tale, which Maria was eager to relate with all the
 persuasive eloquence of grief.
 
 It is so cheering to see a human face, even if little of the divinity of
 virtue beam in it, that Maria anxiously expected the return of the
 attendant, as of a gleam of light to break the gloom of idleness.
 Indulged sorrow; she perceived, must blunt or sharpen the faculties to
 the two opposite extremes; producing stupidity, the moping melancholy of
 indolence; or the restless activity of a disturbed imagination. She sunk
 into one state, after being fatigued by the other: till the want of
 occupation became even more painful than the actual pressure or
 apprehension of sorrow; and the confinement that froze her into a nook of
 existence, with an unvaried prospect before her, the most insupportable
 of evils. The lamp of life seemed to be spending itself to chase the
 vapours of a dungeon which no art could dissipate.--And to what purpose
 did she rally all her energy?--Was not the world a vast prison, and women
 born slaves?
 
 Though she failed immediately to rouse a lively sense of injustice in the
 mind of her guard, because it had been sophisticated into misanthropy,
 she touched her heart. Jemima (she had only a claim to a Christian name,
 which had not procured her any Christian privileges) could patiently hear
 of Maria's confinement on false pretences; she had felt the crushing hand
 of power, hardened by the exercise of injustice, and ceased to wonder at
 the perversions of the understanding, which systematize oppression; but,
 when told that her child, only four months old, had been torn from her,
 even while she was discharging the tenderest maternal office, the woman
 awoke in a bosom long estranged from feminine emotions, and Jemima
 determined to alleviate all in her power, without hazarding the loss of
 her place, the sufferings of a wretched mother, apparently injured, and
 certainly unhappy. A sense of right seems to result from the simplest act
 of reason, and to preside over the faculties of the mind, like the
 master-sense of feeling, to rectify the rest; but (for the comparison may
 be carried still farther) how often is the exquisite sensibility of both
 weakened or destroyed by the vulgar occupations, and ignoble pleasures of
 life?
 
 The preserving her situation was, indeed, an important object to Jemima,
 who had been hunted from hole to hole, as if she had been a beast of
 prey, or infected with a moral plague. The wages she received, the
 greater part of which she hoarded, as her only chance for independence,
 were much more considerable than she could reckon on obtaining any where
 else, were it possible that she, an outcast from society, could be
 permitted to earn a subsistence in a reputable family. Hearing Maria
 perpetually complain of listlessness, and the not being able to beguile
 grief by resuming her customary pursuits, she was easily prevailed on, by
 compassion, and that involuntary respect for abilities, which those who
 possess them can never eradicate, to bring her some books and implements
 for writing. Maria's conversation had amused and interested her, and the
 natural consequence was a desire, scarcely observed by herself, of
 obtaining the esteem of a person she admired. The remembrance of better
 days was rendered more lively; and the sentiments then acquired appearing
 less romantic than they had for a long period, a spark of hope roused
 her mind to new activity.
 
 How grateful was her attention to Maria! Oppressed by a dead weight of
 existence, or preyed on by the gnawing worm of discontent, with what
 eagerness did she endeavour to shorten the long days, which left no
 traces behind! She seemed to be sailing on the vast ocean of life,
 without seeing any land-mark to indicate the progress of time; to find
 employment was then to find variety, the animating principle of nature.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. II.
 
 
 EARNESTLY as Maria endeavoured to soothe, by reading, the anguish of her
 wounded mind, her thoughts would often wander from the subject she was
 led to discuss, and tears of maternal tenderness obscured the reasoning
 page. She descanted on "the ills which flesh is heir to," with
 bitterness, when the recollection of her babe was revived by a tale of
 fictitious woe, that bore any resemblance to her own; and her imagination
 was continually employed, to conjure up and embody the various phantoms
 of misery, which folly and vice had let loose on the world. The loss of
 her babe was the tender string; against other cruel remembrances she
 laboured to steel her bosom; and even a ray of hope, in the midst of her
 gloomy reveries, would sometimes gleam on the dark horizon of futurity,
 while persuading herself that she ought to cease to hope, since happiness
 was no where to be found.--But of her child, debilitated by the grief
 with which its mother had been assailed before it saw the light, she
 could not think without an impatient struggle.
 
 "I, alone, by my active tenderness, could have saved," she would exclaim,
 "from an early blight, this sweet blossom; and, cherishing it, I should
 have had something still to love."
 
 In proportion as other expectations were torn from her, this tender one
 had been fondly clung to, and knit into her heart.
 
 The books she had obtained, were soon devoured, by one who had no other
 resource to escape from sorrow, and the feverish dreams of ideal
 wretchedness or felicity, which equally weaken the intoxicated
 sensibility. Writing was then the only alternative, and she wrote some
 rhapsodies descriptive of the state of her mind; but the events of her
 past life pressing on her, she resolved circumstantially to relate them,
 with the sentiments that experience, and more matured reason, would
 naturally suggest. They might perhaps instruct her daughter, and shield
 her from the misery, the tyranny, her mother knew not how to avoid.
 
 This thought gave life to her diction, her soul flowed into it, and she
 soon found the task of recollecting almost obliterated impressions very
 interesting. She lived again in the revived emotions of youth, and
 forgot her present in the retrospect of sorrows that had assumed an
 unalterable character.
 
 Though this employment lightened the weight of time, yet, never losing
 sight of her main object, Maria did not allow any opportunity to slip of
 winning on the affections of Jemima; for she discovered in her a strength
 of mind, that excited her esteem, clouded as it was by the misanthropy of
 despair.
 
 An insulated being, from the misfortune of her birth, she despised and
 preyed on the society by which she had been oppressed, and loved not her
 fellow-creatures, because she had never been beloved. No mother had ever
 fondled her, no father or brother had protected her from outrage; and the
 man who had plunged her into infamy, and deserted her when she stood in
 greatest need of support, deigned not to smooth with kindness the road to
 ruin. Thus degraded, was she let loose on the world; and virtue, never
 nurtured by affection, assumed the stern aspect of selfish independence.
 
 This general view of her life, Maria gathered from her exclamations and
 dry remarks. Jemima indeed displayed a strange mixture of interest and
 suspicion; for she would listen to her with earnestness, and then
 suddenly interrupt the conversation, as if afraid of resigning, by giving
 way to her sympathy, her dear-bought knowledge of the world.
 
 Maria alluded to the possibility of an escape, and mentioned a
 compensation, or reward; but the style in which she was repulsed made her
 cautious, and determine not to renew the subject, till she knew more of
 the character she had to work on. Jemima's countenance, and dark hints,
 seemed to say, "You are an extraordinary woman; but let me consider, this
 may only be one of your lucid intervals." Nay, the very energy of Maria's
 character, made her suspect that the extraordinary animation she
 perceived might be the effect of madness. "Should her husband then
 substantiate his charge, and get possession of her estate, from whence
 would come the promised annuity, or more desired protection? Besides,
 might not a woman, anxious to escape, conceal some of the circumstances
 which made against her? Was truth to be expected from one who had been
 entrapped, kidnapped, in the most fraudulent manner?"
 
 In this train Jemima continued to argue, the moment after compassion and
 respect seemed to make her swerve; and she still resolved not to be
 wrought on to do more than soften the rigour of confinement, till she
 could advance on surer ground.
 
 Maria was not permitted to walk in the garden; but sometimes, from her
 window, she turned her eyes from the gloomy walls, in which she pined
 life away, on the poor wretches who strayed along the walks, and
 contemplated the most terrific of ruins--that of a human soul. What is
 the view of the fallen column, the mouldering arch, of the most exquisite
 workmanship, when compared with this living memento of the fragility, the
 instability, of reason, and the wild luxuriancy of noxious passions?
 Enthusiasm turned adrift, like some rich stream overflowing its banks,
 rushes forward with destructive velocity, inspiring a sublime
 concentration of thought. Thus thought Maria--These are the ravages over
 which humanity must ever mournfully ponder, with a degree of anguish not
 excited by crumbling marble, or cankering brass, unfaithful to the trust
 of monumental fame. It is not over the decaying productions of the mind,
 embodied with the happiest art, we grieve most bitterly. The view of what
 has been done by man, produces a melancholy, yet aggrandizing, sense of
 what remains to be achieved by human intellect; but a mental convulsion,
 which, like the devastation of an earthquake, throws all the elements of
 thought and imagination into confusion, makes contemplation giddy, and
 we fearfully ask on what ground we ourselves stand.
 
 Melancholy and imbecility marked the features of the wretches allowed to
 breathe at large; for the frantic, those who in a strong imagination had
 lost a sense of woe, were closely confined. The playful tricks and
 mischievous devices of their disturbed fancy, that suddenly broke out,
 could not be guarded against, when they were permitted to enjoy any
 portion of freedom; for, so active was their imagination, that every new
 object which accidentally struck their senses, awoke to phrenzy their
 restless passions; as Maria learned from the burden of their incessant
 ravings.
 
 Sometimes, with a strict injunction of silence, Jemima would allow
 Maria, at the close of evening, to stray along the narrow avenues that
 separated the dungeon-like apartments, leaning on her arm. What a change
 of scene! Maria wished to pass the threshold of her prison, yet, when by
 chance she met the eye of rage glaring on her, yet unfaithful to its
 office, she shrunk back with more horror and affright, than if she had
 stumbled over a mangled corpse. Her busy fancy pictured the misery of a
 fond heart, watching over a friend thus estranged, absent, though
 present--over a poor wretch lost to reason and the social joys of
 existence; and losing all consciousness of misery in its excess. What a
 task, to watch the light of reason quivering in the eye, or with
 agonizing expectation to catch the beam of recollection; tantalized by
 hope, only to feel despair more keenly, at finding a much loved face or
 voice, suddenly remembered, or pathetically implored, only to be
 immediately forgotten, or viewed with indifference or abhorrence!
 
 The heart-rending sigh of melancholy sunk into her soul; and when she
 retired to rest, the petrified figures she had encountered, the only
 human forms she was doomed to observe, haunting her dreams with tales of
 mysterious wrongs, made her wish to sleep to dream no more.
 
 Day after day rolled away, and tedious as the present moment appeared,
 they passed in such an unvaried tenor, Maria was surprised to find that
 she had already been six weeks buried alive, and yet had such faint hopes
 of effecting her enlargement. She was, earnestly as she had sought for
 employment, now angry with herself for having been amused by writing her
 narrative; and grieved to think that she had for an instant thought of
 any thing, but contriving to escape.
 
 Jemima had evidently pleasure in her society: still, though she often
 left her with a glow of kindness, she returned with the same chilling
 air; and, when her heart appeared for a moment to open, some suggestion
 of reason forcibly closed it, before she could give utterance to the
 confidence Maria's conversation inspired.
 
 Discouraged by these changes, Maria relapsed into despondency, when she
 was cheered by the alacrity with which Jemima brought her a fresh parcel
 of books; assuring her, that she had taken some pains to obtain them from
 one of the keepers, who attended a gentleman confined in the opposite
 corner of the gallery.
 
 Maria took up the books with emotion. "They come," said she, "perhaps,
 from a wretch condemned, like me, to reason on the nature of madness, by
 having wrecked minds continually under his eye; and almost to wish
 himself--as I do--mad, to escape from the contemplation of it." Her heart
 throbbed with sympathetic alarm; and she turned over the leaves with awe,
 as if they had become sacred from passing through the hands of an
 unfortunate being, oppressed by a similar fate.
 
 Dryden's Fables, Milton's Paradise Lost, with several modern productions,
 composed the collection. It was a mine of treasure. Some marginal notes,
 in Dryden's Fables, caught her attention: they were written with force
 and taste; and, in one of the modern pamphlets, there was a fragment
 left, containing various observations on the present state of society and
 government, with a comparative view of the politics of Europe and
 America. These remarks were written with a degree of generous warmth,
 when alluding to the enslaved state of the labouring majority, perfectly
 in unison with Maria's mode of thinking.
 
 She read them over and over again; and fancy, treacherous fancy, began to
 sketch a character, congenial with her own, from these shadowy
 outlines.--"Was he mad?" She re-perused the marginal notes, and they
 seemed the production of an animated, but not of a disturbed imagination.
 Confined to this speculation, every time she re-read them, some fresh
 refinement of sentiment, or acuteness of thought impressed her, which
 she was astonished at herself for not having before observed.
 
 What a creative power has an affectionate heart! There are beings who
 cannot live without loving, as poets love; and who feel the electric
 spark of genius, wherever it awakens sentiment or grace. Maria had often
 thought, when disciplining her wayward heart, "that to charm, was to be
 virtuous." "They who make me wish to appear the most amiable and good in
 their eyes, must possess in a degree," she would exclaim, "the graces and
 virtues they call into action."
 
 She took up a book on the powers of the human mind; but, her attention
 strayed from cold arguments on the nature of what she felt, while she
 was feeling, and she snapt the chain of the theory to read Dryden's
 Guiscard and Sigismunda.
 
 Maria, in the course of the ensuing day, returned some of the books, with
 the hope of getting others--and more marginal notes. Thus shut out from
 human intercourse, and compelled to view nothing but the prison of vexed
 spirits, to meet a wretch in the same situation, was more surely to find
 a friend, than to imagine a countryman one, in a strange land, where the
 human voice conveys no information to the eager ear.
 
 "Did you ever see the unfortunate being to whom these books belong?"
 asked Maria, when Jemima brought her supper. "Yes. He sometimes walks
 out, between five and six, before the family is stirring, in the
 morning, with two keepers; but even then his hands are confined."
 
 "What! is he so unruly?" enquired Maria, with an accent of
 disappointment.
 
 "No, not that I perceive," replied Jemima; "but he has an untamed look, a
 vehemence of eye, that excites apprehension. Were his hands free, he
 looks as if he could soon manage both his guards: yet he appears
 tranquil."
 
 "If he be so strong, he must be young," observed Maria.
 
 "Three or four and thirty, I suppose; but there is no judging of a person
 in his situation."
 
 "Are you sure that he is mad?" interrupted Maria with eagerness. Jemima
 quitted the room, without replying.
 
 "No, no, he certainly is not!" exclaimed Maria, answering herself; "the
 man who could write those observations was not disordered in his
 intellects."
 
 She sat musing, gazing at the moon, and watching its motion as it seemed
 to glide under the clouds. Then, preparing for bed, she thought, "Of what
 use could I be to him, or he to me, if it be true that he is unjustly
 confined?--Could he aid me to escape, who is himself more closely
 watched?--Still I should like to see him." She went to bed, dreamed of
 her child, yet woke exactly at half after five o'clock, and starting up,
 only wrapped a gown around her, and ran to the window. The morning was
 chill, it was the latter end of September; yet she did not retire to warm
 herself and think in bed, till the sound of the servants, moving about
 the house, convinced her that the unknown would not walk in the garden
 that morning. She was ashamed at feeling disappointed; and began to
 reflect, as an excuse to herself, on the little objects which attract
 attention when there is nothing to divert the mind; and how difficult it
 was for women to avoid growing romantic, who have no active duties or
 pursuits.
 
 At breakfast, Jemima enquired whether she understood French? for, unless
 she did, the stranger's stock of books was exhausted. Maria replied in
 the affirmative; but forbore to ask any more questions respecting the
 person to whom they belonged. And Jemima gave her a new subject for
 contemplation, by describing the person of a lovely maniac, just brought
 into an adjoining chamber. She was singing the pathetic ballad of old Rob
                  with the most heart-melting falls and pauses. Jemima had
 half-opened the door, when she distinguished her voice, and Maria stood
 close to it, scarcely daring to respire, lest a modulation should escape
 her, so exquisitely sweet, so passionately wild. She began with sympathy
 to pourtray to herself another victim, when the lovely warbler flew, as
 it were, from the spray, and a torrent of unconnected exclamations and
 questions burst from her, interrupted by fits of laughter, so horrid,
 that Maria shut the door, and, turning her eyes up to heaven,
 exclaimed--"Gracious God!"
 
 Several minutes elapsed before Maria could enquire respecting the rumour
 of the house (for this poor wretch was obviously not confined without a
 cause); and then Jemima could only tell her, that it was said, "she had
 been married, against her inclination, to a rich old man, extremely
 jealous (no wonder, for she was a charming creature); and that, in
 consequence of his treatment, or something which hung on her mind, she
 had, during her first lying-in, lost her senses."
 
 What a subject of meditation--even to the very confines of madness.
 
 "Woman, fragile flower! why were you suffered to adorn a world exposed to
 the inroad of such stormy elements?" thought Maria, while the poor
 maniac's strain was still breathing on her ear, and sinking into her very
 soul.
 
 Towards the evening, Jemima brought her Rousseau's _Heloise_; and she sat
 reading with eyes and heart, till the return of her guard to extinguish
 the light. One instance of her kindness was, the permitting Maria to have
 one, till her own hour of retiring to rest. She had read this work long
 since; but now it seemed to open a new world to her--the only one worth
 inhabiting. Sleep was not to be wooed; yet, far from being fatigued by
 the restless rotation of thought, she rose and opened her window, just as
 the thin watery clouds of twilight made the long silent shadows visible.
 The air swept across her face with a voluptuous freshness that thrilled
 to her heart, awakening indefinable emotions; and the sound of a waving
 branch, or the twittering of a startled bird, alone broke the stillness
 of reposing nature. Absorbed by the sublime sensibility which renders the
 consciousness of existence felicity, Maria was happy, till an autumnal
 scent, wafted by the breeze of morn from the fallen leaves of the
 adjacent wood, made her recollect that the season had changed since her
 confinement; yet life afforded no variety to solace an afflicted heart.
 She returned dispirited to her couch, and thought of her child till the
 broad glare of day again invited her to the window. She looked not for
 the unknown, still how great was her vexation at perceiving the back of a
 man, certainly he, with his two attendants, as he turned into a side-path
 which led to the house! A confused recollection of having seen somebody
 who resembled him, immediately occurred, to puzzle and torment her with
 endless conjectures. Five minutes sooner, and she should have seen his
 face, and been out of suspense--was ever any thing so unlucky! His
 steady, bold step, and the whole air of his person, bursting as it were
 from a cloud, pleased her, and gave an outline to the imagination to
 sketch the individual form she wished to recognize.
 
 Feeling the disappointment more severely than she was willing to believe,
 she flew to Rousseau, as her only refuge from the idea of him, who might
 prove a friend, could she but find a way to interest him in her fate;
 still the personification of Saint Preux, or of an ideal lover far
 superior, was after this imperfect model, of which merely a glance had
 been caught, even to the minutiae of the coat and hat of the stranger.
 But if she lent St. Preux, or the demi-god of her fancy, his form, she
 richly repaid him by the donation of all St. Preux's sentiments and
 feelings, culled to gratify her own, to which he seemed to have an
 undoubted right, when she read on the margin of an impassioned letter,
 written in the well-known hand--"Rousseau alone, the true Prometheus of
 sentiment, possessed the fire of genius necessary to pourtray the
 passion, the truth of which goes so directly to the heart."
 
 Maria was again true to the hour, yet had finished Rousseau, and begun to
 transcribe some selected passages; unable to quit either the author or
 the window, before she had a glimpse of the countenance she daily longed
 to see; and, when seen, it conveyed no distinct idea to her mind where
 she had seen it before. He must have been a transient acquaintance; but
 to discover an acquaintance was fortunate, could she contrive to attract
 his attention, and excite his sympathy.
 
 Every glance afforded colouring for the picture she was delineating on
 her heart; and once, when the window was half open, the sound of his
 voice reached her. Conviction flashed on her; she had certainly, in a
 moment of distress, heard the same accents. They were manly, and
 characteristic of a noble mind; nay, even sweet--or sweet they seemed to
 her attentive ear.
 
 She started back, trembling, alarmed at the emotion a strange coincidence
 of circumstances inspired, and wondering why she thought so much of a
 stranger, obliged as she had been by his timely interference; [for she
 recollected, by degrees, all the circumstances of their former meeting.]
 She found however that she could think of nothing else; or, if she
 thought of her daughter, it was to wish that she had a father whom her
 mother could respect and love.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. III.
 
 
 WHEN perusing the first parcel of books, Maria had, with her pencil,
 written in one of them a few exclamations, expressive of compassion and
 sympathy, which she scarcely remembered, till turning over the leaves of
 one of the volumes, lately brought to her, a slip of paper dropped out,
 which Jemima hastily snatched up.
 
 "Let me see it," demanded Maria impatiently, "You surely are not afraid
 of trusting me with the effusions of a madman?" "I must consider,"
 replied Jemima; and withdrew, with the paper in her hand.
 
 In a life of such seclusion, the passions gain undue force; Maria
 therefore felt a great degree of resentment and vexation, which she had
 not time to subdue, before Jemima, returning, delivered the paper.
 
      "Whoever you are, who partake of my fate, accept my sincere
      commiseration--I would have said protection; but the privilege of
      man is denied me.
 
      "My own situation forces a dreadful suspicion on my mind--I may
      not always languish in vain for freedom--say are you--I cannot
      ask the question; yet I will remember you when my remembrance can
      be of any use. I will enquire, _why_ you are so mysteriously
      detained--and I _will_ have an answer.
 
      "HENRY DARNFORD."
 
 By the most pressing intreaties, Maria prevailed on Jemima to permit her
 to write a reply to this note. Another and another succeeded, in which
 explanations were not allowed relative to their present situation; but
 Maria, with sufficient explicitness, alluded to a former obligation; and
 they insensibly entered on an interchange of sentiments on the most
 important subjects. To write these letters was the business of the day,
 and to receive them the moment of sunshine. By some means, Darnford
 having discovered Maria's window, when she next appeared at it, he made
 her, behind his keepers, a profound bow of respect and recognition.
 
 Two or three weeks glided away in this kind of intercourse, during which
 period Jemima, to whom Maria had given the necessary information
 respecting her family, had evidently gained some intelligence, which
 increased her desire of pleasing her charge, though she could not yet
 determine to liberate her. Maria took advantage of this favourable
 charge, without too minutely enquiring into the cause; and such was her
 eagerness to hold human converse, and to see her former protector, still
 a stranger to her, that she incessantly requested her guard to gratify
 her more than curiosity.
 
 Writing to Darnford, she was led from the sad objects before her, and
 frequently rendered insensible to the horrid noises around her, which
 previously had continually employed her feverish fancy. Thinking it
 selfish to dwell on her own sufferings, when in the midst of wretches,
 who had not only lost all that endears life, but their very selves, her
 imagination was occupied with melancholy earnestness to trace the mazes
 of misery, through which so many wretches must have passed to this gloomy
 receptacle of disjointed souls, to the grand source of human corruption.
 Often at midnight was she waked by the dismal shrieks of demoniac rage,
 or of excruciating despair, uttered in such wild tones of indescribable
 anguish as proved the total absence of reason, and roused phantoms of
 horror in her mind, far more terrific than all that dreaming superstition
 ever drew. Besides, there was frequently something so inconceivably
 picturesque in the varying gestures of unrestrained passion, so
 irresistibly comic in their sallies, or so heart-piercingly pathetic in
 the little airs they would sing, frequently bursting out after an awful
 silence, as to fascinate the attention, and amuse the fancy, while
 torturing the soul. It was the uproar of the passions which she was
 compelled to observe; and to mark the lucid beam of reason, like a light
 trembling in a socket, or like the flash which divides the threatening
 clouds of angry heaven only to display the horrors which darkness
 shrouded.
 
 Jemima would labour to beguile the tedious evenings, by describing the
 persons and manners of the unfortunate beings, whose figures or voices
 awoke sympathetic sorrow in Maria's bosom; and the stories she told were
 the more interesting, for perpetually leaving room to conjecture
 something extraordinary. Still Maria, accustomed to generalize her
 observations, was led to conclude from all she heard, that it was a
 vulgar error to suppose that people of abilities were the most apt to
 lose the command of reason. On the contrary, from most of the instances
 she could investigate, she thought it resulted, that the passions only
 appeared strong and disproportioned, because the judgment was weak and
 unexercised; and that they gained strength by the decay of reason, as the
 shadows lengthen during the sun's decline.
 
 Maria impatiently wished to see her fellow-sufferer; but Darnford was
 still more earnest to obtain an interview. Accustomed to submit to every
 impulse of passion, and never taught, like women, to restrain the most
 natural, and acquire, instead of the bewitching frankness of nature, a
 factitious propriety of behaviour, every desire became a torrent that
 bore down all opposition.
 
 His travelling trunk, which contained the books lent to Maria, had been
 sent to him, and with a part of its contents he bribed his principal
 keeper; who, after receiving the most solemn promise that he would return
 to his apartment without attempting to explore any part of the house,
 conducted him, in the dusk of the evening, to Maria's room.
 
 Jemima had apprized her charge of the visit, and she expected with
 trembling impatience, inspired by a vague hope that he might again prove
 her deliverer, to see a man who had before rescued her from oppression.
 He entered with an animation of countenance, formed to captivate an
 enthusiast; and, hastily turned his eyes from her to the apartment, which
 he surveyed with apparent emotions of compassionate indignation.
 Sympathy illuminated his eye, and, taking her hand, he respectfully bowed
 on it, exclaiming--"This is extraordinary!--again to meet you, and in
 such circumstances!" Still, impressive as was the coincidence of events
 which brought them once more together, their full hearts did not
 overflow.--[54-A]
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 [And though, after this first visit, they were permitted frequently to
 repeat their interviews, they were for some time employed in] a reserved
 conversation, to which all the world might have listened; excepting,
 when discussing some literary subject, flashes of sentiment, inforced by
 each relaxing feature, seemed to remind them that their minds were
 already acquainted.
 
 [By degrees, Darnford entered into the particulars of his story.] In a
 few words, he informed her that he had been a thoughtless, extravagant
 young man; yet, as he described his faults, they appeared to be the
 generous luxuriancy of a noble mind. Nothing like meanness tarnished the
 lustre of his youth, nor had the worm of selfishness lurked in the
 unfolding bud, even while he had been the dupe of others. Yet he tardily
 acquired the experience necessary to guard him against future imposition.
 
 "I shall weary you," continued he, "by my egotism; and did not powerful
 emotions draw me to you,"--his eyes glistened as he spoke, and a
 trembling seemed to run through his manly frame,--"I would not waste
 these precious moments in talking of myself.
 
 "My father and mother were people of fashion; married by their parents.
 He was fond of the turf, she of the card-table. I, and two or three other
 children since dead, were kept at home till we became intolerable. My
 father and mother had a visible dislike to each other, continually
 displayed; the servants were of the depraved kind usually found in the
 houses of people of fortune. My brothers and parents all dying, I was
 left to the care of guardians, and sent to Eton. I never knew the sweets
 of domestic affection, but I felt the want of indulgence and frivolous
 respect at school. I will not disgust you with a recital of the vices of
 my youth, which can scarcely be comprehended by female delicacy. I was
 taught to love by a creature I am ashamed to mention; and the other women
 with whom I afterwards became intimate, were of a class of which you can
 have no knowledge. I formed my acquaintance with them at the theatres;
 and, when vivacity danced in their eyes, I was not easily disgusted by
 the vulgarity which flowed from their lips. Having spent, a few years
 after I was of age, [the whole of] a considerable patrimony, excepting a
 few hundreds, I had no recourse but to purchase a commission in a
 new-raised regiment, destined to subjugate America. The regret I felt to
 renounce a life of pleasure, was counter-balanced by the curiosity I had
 to see America, or rather to travel; [nor had any of those circumstances
 occurred to my youth, which might have been calculated] to bind my
 country to my heart. I shall not trouble you with the details of a
 military life. My blood was still kept in motion; till, towards the close
 of the contest, I was wounded and taken prisoner.
 
 "Confined to my bed, or chair, by a lingering cure, my only refuge from
 the preying activity of my mind, was books, which I read with great
 avidity, profiting by the conversation of my host, a man of sound
 understanding. My political sentiments now underwent a total change; and,
 dazzled by the hospitality of the Americans, I determined to take up my
 abode with freedom. I, therefore, with my usual impetuosity, sold my
 commission, and travelled into the interior parts of the country, to lay
 out my money to advantage. Added to this, I did not much like the
 puritanical manners of the large towns. Inequality of condition was there
 most disgustingly galling. The only pleasure wealth afforded, was to make
 an ostentatious display of it; for the cultivation of the fine arts, or
 literature, had not introduced into the first circles that polish of
 manners which renders the rich so essentially superior to the poor in
 Europe. Added to this, an influx of vices had been let in by the
 Revolution, and the most rigid principles of religion shaken to the
 centre, before the understanding could be gradually emancipated from the
 prejudices which led their ancestors undauntedly to seek an inhospitable
 clime and unbroken soil. The resolution, that led them, in pursuit of
 independence, to embark on rivers like seas, to search for unknown
 shores, and to sleep under the hovering mists of endless forests, whose
 baleful damps agued their limbs, was now turned into commercial
 speculations, till the national character exhibited a phenomenon in the
 history of the human mind--a head enthusiastically enterprising, with
 cold selfishness of heart. And woman, lovely woman!--they charm every
 where--still there is a degree of prudery, and a want of taste and ease
 in the manners of the American women, that renders them, in spite of
 their roses and lilies, far inferior to our European charmers. In the
 country, they have often a bewitching simplicity of character; but, in
 the cities, they have all the airs and ignorance of the ladies who give
 the tone to the circles of the large trading towns in England. They are
 fond of their ornaments, merely because they are good, and not because
 they embellish their persons; and are more gratified to inspire the women
 with jealousy of these exterior advantages, than the men with love. All
 the frivolity which often (excuse me, Madam) renders the society of
 modest women so stupid in England, here seemed to throw still more leaden
 fetters on their charms. Not being an adept in gallantry, I found that I
 could only keep myself awake in their company by making downright love to
 them.
 
 "But, not to intrude on your patience, I retired to the track of land
 which I had purchased in the country, and my time passed pleasantly
 enough while I cut down the trees, built my house, and planted my
 different crops. But winter and idleness came, and I longed for more
 elegant society, to hear what was passing in the world, and to do
 something better than vegetate with the animals that made a very
 considerable part of my household. Consequently, I determined to travel.
 Motion was a substitute for variety of objects; and, passing over immense
 tracks of country, I exhausted my exuberant spirits, without obtaining
 much experience. I every where saw industry the fore-runner and not the
 consequence, of luxury; but this country, every thing being on an ample
 scale, did not afford those picturesque views, which a certain degree of
 cultivation is necessary gradually to produce. The eye wandered without
 an object to fix upon over immeasureable plains, and lakes that seemed
 replenished by the ocean, whilst eternal forests of small clustering
 trees, obstructed the circulation of air, and embarrassed the path,
 without gratifying the eye of taste. No cottage smiling in the waste, no
 travellers hailed us, to give life to silent nature; or, if perchance we
 saw the print of a footstep in our path, it was a dreadful warning to
 turn aside; and the head ached as if assailed by the scalping knife. The
 Indians who hovered on the skirts of the European settlements had only
 learned of their neighbours to plunder, and they stole their guns from
 them to do it with more safety.
 
 "From the woods and back settlements, I returned to the towns, and
 learned to eat and drink most valiantly; but without entering into
 commerce (and I detested commerce) I found I could not live there; and,
 growing heartily weary of the land of liberty and vulgar aristocracy,
 seated on her bags of dollars, I resolved once more to visit Europe. I
 wrote to a distant relation in England, with whom I had been educated,
 mentioning the vessel in which I intended to sail. Arriving in London, my
 senses were intoxicated. I ran from street to street, from theatre to
 theatre, and the women of the town (again I must beg pardon for my
 habitual frankness) appeared to me like angels.
 
 "A week was spent in this thoughtless manner, when, returning very late
 to the hotel in which I had lodged ever since my arrival, I was knocked
 down in a private street, and hurried, in a state of insensibility, into
 a coach, which brought me hither, and I only recovered my senses to be
 treated like one who had lost them. My keepers are deaf to my
 remonstrances and enquiries, yet assure me that my confinement shall not
 last long. Still I cannot guess, though I weary myself with conjectures,
 why I am confined, or in what part of England this house is situated. I
 imagine sometimes that I hear the sea roar, and wished myself again on
 the Atlantic, till I had a glimpse of you[65-A]."
 
 A few moments were only allowed to Maria to comment on this narrative,
 when Darnford left her to her own thoughts, to the "never ending, still
 beginning," task of weighing his words, recollecting his tones of voice,
 and feeling them reverberate on her heart.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [54-A] The copy which had received the author's last corrections, breaks
 off in this place, and the pages which follow, to the end of Chap. IV,
 are printed from a copy in a less finished state.
 
 [65-A] The introduction of Darnford as the deliverer of Maria in a former
 instance, appears to have been an after-thought of the author. This has
 occasioned the omission of any allusion to that circumstance in the
 preceding narration.
 
 EDITOR.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. IV.
 
 
 PITY, and the forlorn seriousness of adversity, have both been considered
 as dispositions favourable to love, while satirical writers have
 attributed the propensity to the relaxing effect of idleness, what chance
 then had Maria of escaping, when pity, sorrow, and solitude all conspired
 to soften her mind, and nourish romantic wishes, and, from a natural
 progress, romantic expectations?
 
 Maria was six-and-twenty. But, such was the native soundness of her
 constitution, that time had only given to her countenance the character
 of her mind. Revolving thought, and exercised affections had banished
 some of the playful graces of innocence, producing insensibly that
 irregularity of features which the struggles of the understanding to
 trace or govern the strong emotions of the heart, are wont to imprint on
 the yielding mass. Grief and care had mellowed, without obscuring, the
 bright tints of youth, and the thoughtfulness which resided on her brow
 did not take from the feminine softness of her features; nay, such was
 the sensibility which often mantled over it, that she frequently
 appeared, like a large proportion of her sex, only born to feel; and the
 activity of her well-proportioned, and even almost voluptuous figure,
 inspired the idea of strength of mind, rather than of body. There was a
 simplicity sometimes indeed in her manner, which bordered on infantine
 ingenuousness, that led people of common discernment to underrate her
 talents, and smile at the flights of her imagination. But those who could
 not comprehend the delicacy of her sentiments, were attached by her
 unfailing sympathy, so that she was very generally beloved by characters
 of very different descriptions; still, she was too much under the
 influence of an ardent imagination to adhere to common rules.
 
 There are mistakes of conduct which at five-and-twenty prove the strength
 of the mind, that, ten or fifteen years after, would demonstrate its
 weakness, its incapacity to acquire a sane judgment. The youths who are
 satisfied with the ordinary pleasures of life, and do not sigh after
 ideal phantoms of love and friendship, will never arrive at great
 maturity of understanding; but if these reveries are cherished, as is too
 frequently the case with women, when experience ought to have taught
 them in what human happiness consists, they become as useless as they are
 wretched. Besides, their pains and pleasures are so dependent on outward
 circumstances, on the objects of their affections, that they seldom act
 from the impulse of a nerved mind, able to choose its own pursuit.
 
 Having had to struggle incessantly with the vices of mankind, Maria's
 imagination found repose in pourtraying the possible virtues the world
 might contain. Pygmalion formed an ivory maid, and longed for an
 informing soul. She, on the contrary, combined all the qualities of a
 hero's mind, and fate presented a statue in which she might enshrine
 them.
 
 We mean not to trace the progress of this passion, or recount how often
 Darnford and Maria were obliged to part in the midst of an interesting
 conversation. Jemima ever watched on the tip-toe of fear, and frequently
 separated them on a false alarm, when they would have given worlds to
 remain a little longer together.
 
 A magic lamp now seemed to be suspended in Maria's prison, and fairy
 landscapes flitted round the gloomy walls, late so blank. Rushing from
 the depth of despair, on the seraph wing of hope, she found herself
 happy.--She was beloved, and every emotion was rapturous.
 
 To Darnford she had not shown a decided affection; the fear of outrunning
 his, a sure proof of love, made her often assume a coldness and
 indifference foreign from her character; and, even when giving way to the
 playful emotions of a heart just loosened from the frozen bond of grief,
 there was a delicacy in her manner of expressing her sensibility, which
 made him doubt whether it was the effect of love.
 
 One evening, when Jemima left them, to listen to the sound of a distant
 footstep, which seemed cautiously to approach, he seized Maria's hand--it
 was not withdrawn. They conversed with earnestness of their situation;
 and, during the conversation, he once or twice gently drew her towards
 him. He felt the fragrance of her breath, and longed, yet feared, to
 touch the lips from which it issued; spirits of purity seemed to guard
 them, while all the enchanting graces of love sported on her cheeks, and
 languished in her eyes.
 
 Jemima entering, he reflected on his diffidence with poignant regret,
 and, she once more taking alarm, he ventured, as Maria stood near his
 chair, to approach her lips with a declaration of love. She drew back
 with solemnity, he hung down his head abashed; but lifting his eyes
 timidly, they met her's; she had determined, during that instant, and
 suffered their rays to mingle. He took, with more ardour, reassured, a
 half-consenting, half-reluctant kiss, reluctant only from modesty; and
 there was a sacredness in her dignified manner of reclining her glowing
 face on his shoulder, that powerfully impressed him. Desire was lost in
 more ineffable emotions, and to protect her from insult and sorrow--to
 make her happy, seemed not only the first wish of his heart, but the most
 noble duty of his life. Such angelic confidence demanded the fidelity of
 honour; but could he, feeling her in every pulsation, could he ever
 change, could he be a villain? The emotion with which she, for a moment,
 allowed herself to be pressed to his bosom, the tear of rapturous
 sympathy, mingled with a soft melancholy sentiment of recollected
 disappointment, said--more of truth and faithfulness, than the tongue
 could have given utterance to in hours! They were silent--yet discoursed,
 how eloquently? till, after a moment's reflection, Maria drew her chair
 by the side of his, and, with a composed sweetness of voice, and
 supernatural benignity of countenance, said, "I must open my whole heart
 to you; you must be told who I am, why I am here, and why, telling you I
 am a wife, I blush not to"--the blush spoke the rest.
 
 Jemima was again at her elbow, and the restraint of her presence did not
 prevent an animated conversation, in which love, sly urchin, was ever at
 bo-peep.
 
 So much of heaven did they enjoy, that paradise bloomed around them; or
 they, by a powerful spell, had been transported into Armida's garden.
 Love, the grand enchanter, "lapt them in Elysium," and every sense was
 harmonized to joy and social extacy. So animated, indeed, were their
 accents of tenderness, in discussing what, in other circumstances, would
 have been common-place subjects, that Jemima felt, with surprise, a tear
 of pleasure trickling down her rugged cheeks. She wiped it away, half
 ashamed; and when Maria kindly enquired the cause, with all the eager
 solicitude of a happy being wishing to impart to all nature its
 overflowing felicity, Jemima owned that it was the first tear that social
 enjoyment had ever drawn from her. She seemed indeed to breathe more
 freely; the cloud of suspicion cleared away from her brow; she felt
 herself, for once in her life, treated like a fellow-creature.
 
 Imagination! who can paint thy power; or reflect the evanescent tints of
 hope fostered by thee? A despondent gloom had long obscured Maria's
 horizon--now the sun broke forth, the rainbow appeared, and every
 prospect was fair. Horror still reigned in the darkened cells, suspicion
 lurked in the passages, and whispered along the walls. The yells of men
 possessed, sometimes made them pause, and wonder that they felt so happy,
 in a tomb of living death. They even chid themselves for such apparent
 insensibility; still the world contained not three happier beings. And
 Jemima, after again patrolling the passage, was so softened by the air of
 confidence which breathed around her, that she voluntarily began an
 account of herself.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. V.
 
 
 "MY father," said Jemima, "seduced my mother, a pretty girl, with whom he
 lived fellow-servant; and she no sooner perceived the natural, the
 dreaded consequence, than the terrible conviction flashed on her--that
 she was ruined. Honesty, and a regard for her reputation, had been the
 only principles inculcated by her mother; and they had been so forcibly
 impressed, that she feared shame, more than the poverty to which it would
 lead. Her incessant importunities to prevail upon my father to screen her
 from reproach by marrying her, as he had promised in the fervour of
 seduction, estranged him from her so completely, that her very person
 became distasteful to him; and he began to hate, as well as despise me,
 before I was born.
 
 "My mother, grieved to the soul by his neglect, and unkind treatment,
 actually resolved to famish herself; and injured her health by the
 attempt; though she had not sufficient resolution to adhere to her
 project, or renounce it entirely. Death came not at her call; yet sorrow,
 and the methods she adopted to conceal her condition, still doing the
 work of a house-maid, had such an effect on her constitution, that she
 died in the wretched garret, where her virtuous mistress had forced her
 to take refuge in the very pangs of labour, though my father, after a
 slight reproof, was allowed to remain in his place--allowed by the mother
 of six children, who, scarcely permitting a footstep to be heard, during
 her month's indulgence, felt no sympathy for the poor wretch, denied
 every comfort required by her situation.
 
 "The day my mother died, the ninth after my birth, I was consigned to the
 care of the cheapest nurse my father could find; who suckled her own
 child at the same time, and lodged as many more as she could get, in two
 cellar-like apartments.
 
 "Poverty, and the habit of seeing children die off her hands, had so
 hardened her heart, that the office of a mother did not awaken the
 tenderness of a woman; nor were the feminine caresses which seem a part
 of the rearing of a child, ever bestowed on me. The chicken has a wing to
 shelter under; but I had no bosom to nestle in, no kindred warmth to
 foster me. Left in dirt, to cry with cold and hunger till I was weary,
 and sleep without ever being prepared by exercise, or lulled by kindness
 to rest; could I be expected to become any thing but a weak and rickety
 babe? Still, in spite of neglect, I continued to exist, to learn to curse
 existence," her countenance grew ferocious as she spoke, "and the
 treatment that rendered me miserable, seemed to sharpen my wits. Confined
 then in a damp hovel, to rock the cradle of the succeeding tribe, I
 looked like a little old woman, or a hag shrivelling into nothing. The
 furrows of reflection and care contracted the youthful cheek, and gave a
 sort of supernatural wildness to the ever watchful eye. During this
 period, my father had married another fellow-servant, who loved him less,
 and knew better how to manage his passion, than my mother. She likewise
 proving with child, they agreed to keep a shop: my step-mother, if, being
 an illegitimate offspring, I may venture thus to characterize her, having
 obtained a sum of a rich relation, for that purpose.
 
 "Soon after her lying-in, she prevailed on my father to take me home, to
 save the expence of maintaining me, and of hiring a girl to assist her in
 the care of the child. I was young, it was true, but appeared a knowing
 little thing, and might be made handy. Accordingly I was brought to her
 house; but not to a home--for a home I never knew. Of this child, a
 daughter, she was extravagantly fond; and it was a part of my employment,
 to assist to spoil her, by humouring all her whims, and bearing all her
 caprices. Feeling her own consequence, before she could speak, she had
 learned the art of tormenting me, and if I ever dared to resist, I
 received blows, laid on with no compunctious hand, or was sent to bed
 dinnerless, as well as supperless. I said that it was a part of my daily
 labour to attend this child, with the servility of a slave; still it was
 but a part. I was sent out in all seasons, and from place to place, to
 carry burdens far above my strength, without being allowed to draw near
 the fire, or ever being cheered by encouragement or kindness. No wonder
 then, treated like a creature of another species, that I began to envy,
 and at length to hate, the darling of the house. Yet, I perfectly
 remember, that it was the caresses, and kind expressions of my
 step-mother, which first excited my jealous discontent. Once, I cannot
 forget it, when she was calling in vain her wayward child to kiss her, I
 ran to her, saying, 'I will kiss you, ma'am!' and how did my heart, which
 was in my mouth, sink, what was my debasement of soul, when pushed away
 with--'I do not want you, pert thing!' Another day, when a new gown had
 excited the highest good humour, and she uttered the appropriate _dear_,
 addressed unexpectedly to me, I thought I could never do enough to please
 her; I was all alacrity, and rose proportionably in my own estimation.
 
 "As her daughter grew up, she was pampered with cakes and fruit, while I
 was, literally speaking, fed with the refuse of the table, with her
 leavings. A liquorish tooth is, I believe, common to children, and I used
 to steal any thing sweet, that I could catch up with a chance of
 concealment. When detected, she was not content to chastize me herself at
 the moment, but, on my father's return in the evening (he was a shopman),
 the principal discourse was to recount my faults, and attribute them to
 the wicked disposition which I had brought into the world with me,
 inherited from my mother. He did not fail to leave the marks of his
 resentment on my body, and then solaced himself by playing with my
 sister.--I could have murdered her at those moments. To save myself from
 these unmerciful corrections, I resorted to falshood, and the untruths
 which I sturdily maintained, were brought in judgment against me, to
 support my tyrant's inhuman charge of my natural propensity to vice.
 Seeing me treated with contempt, and always being fed and dressed
 better, my sister conceived a contemptuous opinion of me, that proved an
 obstacle to all affection; and my father, hearing continually of my
 faults, began to consider me as a curse entailed on him for his sins: he
 was therefore easily prevailed on to bind me apprentice to one of my
 step-mother's friends, who kept a slop-shop in Wapping. I was represented
 (as it was said) in my true colours; but she, 'warranted,' snapping her
 fingers, 'that she should break my spirit or heart.'
 
 "My mother replied, with a whine, 'that if any body could make me better,
 it was such a clever woman as herself; though, for her own part, she had
 tried in vain; but good-nature was her fault.'
 
 "I shudder with horror, when I recollect the treatment I had now to
 endure. Not only under the lash of my task-mistress, but the drudge of
 the maid, apprentices and children, I never had a taste of human kindness
 to soften the rigour of perpetual labour. I had been introduced as an
 object of abhorrence into the family; as a creature of whom my
 step-mother, though she had been kind enough to let me live in the house
 with her own child, could make nothing. I was described as a wretch,
 whose nose must be kept to the grinding stone--and it was held there with
 an iron grasp. It seemed indeed the privilege of their superior nature to
 kick me about, like the dog or cat. If I were attentive, I was called
 fawning, if refractory, an obstinate mule, and like a mule I received
 their censure on my loaded back. Often has my mistress, for some
 instance of forgetfulness, thrown me from one side of the kitchen to the
 other, knocked my head against the wall, spit in my face, with various
 refinements on barbarity that I forbear to enumerate, though they were
 all acted over again by the servant, with additional insults, to which
 the appellation of _bastard_, was commonly added, with taunts or sneers.
 But I will not attempt to give you an adequate idea of my situation, lest
 you, who probably have never been drenched with the dregs of human
 misery, should think I exaggerate.
 
 "I stole now, from absolute necessity,--bread; yet whatever else was
 taken, which I had it not in my power to take, was ascribed to me. I was
 the filching cat, the ravenous dog, the dumb brute, who must bear all;
 for if I endeavoured to exculpate myself, I was silenced, without any
 enquiries being made, with 'Hold your tongue, you never tell truth.' Even
 the very air I breathed was tainted with scorn; for I was sent to the
 neighbouring shops with Glutton, Liar, or Thief, written on my forehead.
 This was, at first, the most bitter punishment; but sullen pride, or a
 kind of stupid desperation, made me, at length, almost regardless of the
 contempt, which had wrung from me so many solitary tears at the only
 moments when I was allowed to rest.
 
 "Thus was I the mark of cruelty till my sixteenth year; and then I have
 only to point out a change of misery; for a period I never knew. Allow me
 first to make one observation. Now I look back, I cannot help
 attributing the greater part of my misery, to the misfortune of having
 been thrown into the world without the grand support of life--a mother's
 affection. I had no one to love me; or to make me respected, to enable me
 to acquire respect. I was an egg dropped on the sand; a pauper by nature,
 shunted from family to family, who belonged to nobody--and nobody cared
 for me. I was despised from my birth, and denied the chance of obtaining
 a footing for myself in society. Yes; I had not even the chance of being
 considered as a fellow-creature--yet all the people with whom I lived,
 brutalized as they were by the low cunning of trade, and the despicable
 shifts of poverty, were not without bowels, though they never yearned for
 me. I was, in fact, born a slave, and chained by infamy to slavery
 during the whole of existence, without having any companions to alleviate
 it by sympathy, or teach me how to rise above it by their example. But,
 to resume the thread of my tale--
 
 "At sixteen, I suddenly grew tall, and something like comeliness appeared
 on a Sunday, when I had time to wash my face, and put on clean clothes.
 My master had once or twice caught hold of me in the passage; but I
 instinctively avoided his disgusting caresses. One day however, when the
 family were at a methodist meeting, he contrived to be alone in the house
 with me, and by blows--yes; blows and menaces, compelled me to submit to
 his ferocious desire; and, to avoid my mistress's fury, I was obliged in
 future to comply, and skulk to my loft at his command, in spite of
 increasing loathing.
 
 "The anguish which was now pent up in my bosom, seemed to open a new
 world to me: I began to extend my thoughts beyond myself, and grieve for
 human misery, till I discovered, with horror--ah! what horror!--that I
 was with child. I know not why I felt a mixed sensation of despair and
 tenderness, excepting that, ever called a bastard, a bastard appeared to
 me an object of the greatest compassion in creation.
 
 "I communicated this dreadful circumstance to my master, who was almost
 equally alarmed at the intelligence; for he feared his wife, and public
 censure at the meeting. After some weeks of deliberation had elapsed, I
 in continual fear that my altered shape would be noticed, my master gave
 me a medicine in a phial, which he desired me to take, telling me,
 without any circumlocution, for what purpose it was designed. I burst
 into tears, I thought it was killing myself--yet was such a self as I
 worth preserving? He cursed me for a fool, and left me to my own
 reflections. I could not resolve to take this infernal potion; but I
 wrapped it up in an old gown, and hid it in a corner of my box.
 
 "Nobody yet suspected me, because they had been accustomed to view me as
 a creature of another species. But the threatening storm at last broke
 over my devoted head--never shall I forget it! One Sunday evening when I
 was left, as usual, to take care of the house, my master came home
 intoxicated, and I became the prey of his brutal appetite. His extreme
 intoxication made him forget his customary caution, and my mistress
 entered and found us in a situation that could not have been more hateful
 to her than me. Her husband was 'pot-valiant,' he feared her not at the
 moment, nor had he then much reason, for she instantly turned the whole
 force of her anger another way. She tore off my cap, scratched, kicked,
 and buffetted me, till she had exhausted her strength, declaring, as she
 rested her arm, 'that I had wheedled her husband from her.--But, could
 any thing better be expected from a wretch, whom she had taken into her
 house out of pure charity?' What a torrent of abuse rushed out? till,
 almost breathless, she concluded with saying, 'that I was born a
 strumpet; it ran in my blood, and nothing good could come to those who
 harboured me.'
 
 "My situation was, of course, discovered, and she declared that I should
 not stay another night under the same roof with an honest family. I was
 therefore pushed out of doors, and my trumpery thrown after me, when it
 had been contemptuously examined in the passage, lest I should have
 stolen any thing.
 
 "Behold me then in the street, utterly destitute! Whither could I creep
 for shelter? To my father's roof I had no claim, when not pursued by
 shame--now I shrunk back as from death, from my mother's cruel
 reproaches, my father's execrations. I could not endure to hear him curse
 the day I was born, though life had been a curse to me. Of death I
 thought, but with a confused emotion of terror, as I stood leaning my
 head on a post, and starting at every footstep, lest it should be my
 mistress coming to tear my heart out. One of the boys of the shop passing
 by, heard my tale, and immediately repaired to his master, to give him a
 description of my situation; and he touched the right key--the scandal it
 would give rise to, if I were left to repeat my tale to every enquirer.
 This plea came home to his reason, who had been sobered by his wife's
 rage, the fury of which fell on him when I was out of her reach, and he
 sent the boy to me with half-a-guinea, desiring him to conduct me to a
 house, where beggars, and other wretches, the refuse of society, nightly
 lodged.
 
 "This night was spent in a state of stupefaction, or desperation. I
 detested mankind, and abhorred myself.
 
 "In the morning I ventured out, to throw myself in my master's way, at
 his usual hour of going abroad. I approached him, he 'damned me for a
 b----, declared I had disturbed the peace of the family, and that he had
 sworn to his wife, never to take any more notice of me.' He left me; but,
 instantly returning, he told me that he should speak to his friend, a
 parish-officer, to get a nurse for the brat I laid to him; and advised
 me, if I wished to keep out of the house of correction, not to make free
 with his name.
 
 "I hurried back to my hole, and, rage giving place to despair, sought for
 the potion that was to procure abortion, and swallowed it, with a wish
 that it might destroy me, at the same time that it stopped the sensations
 of new-born life, which I felt with indescribable emotion. My head
 turned round, my heart grew sick, and in the horrors of approaching
 dissolution, mental anguish was swallowed up. The effect of the medicine
 was violent, and I was confined to my bed several days; but, youth and a
 strong constitution prevailing, I once more crawled out, to ask myself
 the cruel question, 'Whither I should go?' I had but two shillings left
 in my pocket, the rest had been expended, by a poor woman who slept in
 the same room, to pay for my lodging, and purchase the necessaries of
 which she partook.
 
 "With this wretch I went into the neighbouring streets to beg, and my
 disconsolate appearance drew a few pence from the idle, enabling me still
 to command a bed; till, recovering from my illness, and taught to put on
 my rags to the best advantage, I was accosted from different motives, and
 yielded to the desire of the brutes I met, with the same detestation that
 I had felt for my still more brutal master. I have since read in novels
 of the blandishments of seduction, but I had not even the pleasure of
 being enticed into vice.
 
 "I shall not," interrupted Jemima, "lead your imagination into all the
 scenes of wretchedness and depravity, which I was condemned to view; or
 mark the different stages of my debasing misery. Fate dragged me through
 the very kennels of society; I was still a slave, a bastard, a common
 property. Become familiar with vice, for I wish to conceal nothing from
 you, I picked the pockets of the drunkards who abused me; and proved by
 my conduct, that I deserved the epithets, with which they loaded me at
 moments when distrust ought to cease.
 
 "Detesting my nightly occupation, though valuing, if I may so use the
 word, my independence, which only consisted in choosing the street in
 which I should wander, or the roof, when I had money, in which I should
 hide my head, I was some time before I could prevail on myself to accept
 of a place in a house of ill fame, to which a girl, with whom I had
 accidentally conversed in the street, had recommended me. I had been
 hunted almost into a a fever, by the watchmen of the quarter of the town
 I frequented; one, whom I had unwittingly offended, giving the word to
 the whole pack. You can scarcely conceive the tyranny exercised by these
 wretches: considering themselves as the instruments of the very laws they
 violate, the pretext which steels their conscience, hardens their heart.
 Not content with receiving from us, outlaws of society (let other women
 talk of favours) a brutal gratification gratuitously as a privilege of
 office, they extort a tithe of prostitution, and harrass with threats the
 poor creatures whose occupation affords not the means to silence the
 growl of avarice. To escape from this persecution, I once more entered
 into servitude.
 
 "A life of comparative regularity restored my health; and--do not
 start--my manners were improved, in a situation where vice sought to
 render itself alluring, and taste was cultivated to fashion the person,
 if not to refine the mind. Besides, the common civility of speech,
 contrasted with the gross vulgarity to which I had been accustomed, was
 something like the polish of civilization. I was not shut out from all
 intercourse of humanity. Still I was galled by the yoke of service, and
 my mistress often flying into violent fits of passion, made me dread a
 sudden dismission, which I understood was always the case. I was
 therefore prevailed on, though I felt a horror of men, to accept the
 offer of a gentleman, rather in the decline of years, to keep his house,
 pleasantly situated in a little village near Hampstead.
 
 "He was a man of great talents, and of brilliant wit; but, a worn-out
 votary of voluptuousness, his desires became fastidious in proportion as
 they grew weak, and the native tenderness of his heart was undermined by
 a vitiated imagination. A thoughtless career of libertinism and social
 enjoyment, had injured his health to such a degree, that, whatever
 pleasure his conversation afforded me (and my esteem was ensured by
 proofs of the generous humanity of his disposition), the being his
 mistress was purchasing it at a very dear rate. With such a keen
 perception of the delicacies of sentiment, with an imagination
 invigorated by the exercise of genius, how could he sink into the
 grossness of sensuality!
 
 "But, to pass over a subject which I recollect with pain, I must remark
 to you, as an answer to your often-repeated question, 'Why my sentiments
 and language were superior to my station?' that I now began to read, to
 beguile the tediousness of solitude, and to gratify an inquisitive,
 active mind. I had often, in my childhood, followed a ballad-singer, to
 hear the sequel of a dismal story, though sure of being severely punished
 for delaying to return with whatever I was sent to purchase. I could just
 spell and put a sentence together, and I listened to the various
 arguments, though often mingled with obscenity, which occurred at the
 table where I was allowed to preside: for a literary friend or two
 frequently came home with my master, to dine and pass the night. Having
 lost the privileged respect of my sex, my presence, instead of
 restraining, perhaps gave the reins to their tongues; still I had the
 advantage of hearing discussions, from which, in the common course of
 life, women are excluded.
 
 "You may easily imagine, that it was only by degrees that I could
 comprehend some of the subjects they investigated, or acquire from their
 reasoning what might be termed a moral sense. But my fondness of reading
 increasing, and my master occasionally shutting himself up in this
 retreat, for weeks together, to write, I had many opportunities of
 improvement. At first, considering money I was right!" (exclaimed Jemima,
 altering her tone of voice) "as the only means, after my loss of
 reputation, of obtaining respect, or even the toleration of humanity, I
 had not the least scruple to secrete a part of the sums intrusted to me,
 and to screen myself from detection by a system of falshood. But,
 acquiring new principles, I began to have the ambition of returning to
 the respectable part of society, and was weak enough to suppose it
 possible. The attention of my unassuming instructor, who, without being
 ignorant of his own powers, possessed great simplicity of manners,
 strengthened the illusion. Having sometimes caught up hints for thought,
 from my untutored remarks, he often led me to discuss the subjects he was
 treating, and would read to me his productions, previous to their
 publication, wishing to profit by the criticism of unsophisticated
 feeling. The aim of his writings was to touch the simple springs of the
 heart; for he despised the would-be oracles, the self-elected
 philosophers, who fright away fancy, while sifting each grain of thought
 to prove that slowness of comprehension is wisdom.
 
 "I should have distinguished this as a moment of sunshine, a happy period
 in my life, had not the repugnance the disgusting libertinism of my
 protector inspired, daily become more painful.--And, indeed, I soon did
 recollect it as such with agony, when his sudden death (for he had
 recourse to the most exhilarating cordials to keep up the convivial tone
 of his spirits) again threw me into the desert of human society. Had he
 had any time for reflection, I am certain he would have left the little
 property in his power to me: but, attacked by the fatal apoplexy in town,
 his heir, a man of rigid morals, brought his wife with him to take
 possession of the house and effects, before I was even informed of his
 death,--'to prevent,' as she took care indirectly to tell me, 'such a
 creature as she supposed me to be, from purloining any of them, had I
 been apprized of the event in time.'
 
 "The grief I felt at the sudden shock the information gave me, which at
 first had nothing selfish in it, was treated with contempt, and I was
 ordered to pack up my clothes; and a few trinkets and books, given me by
 the generous deceased, were contested, while they piously hoped, with a
 reprobating shake of the head, 'that God would have mercy on his sinful
 soul!' With some difficulty, I obtained my arrears of wages; but
 asking--such is the spirit-grinding consequence of poverty and
 infamy--for a character for honesty and economy, which God knows I
 merited, I was told by this--why must I call her woman?--'that it would
 go against her conscience to recommend a kept mistress.' Tears started in
 my eyes, burning tears; for there are situations in which a wretch is
 humbled by the contempt they are conscious they do not deserve.
 
 "I returned to the metropolis; but the solitude of a poor lodging was
 inconceivably dreary, after the society I had enjoyed. To be cut off from
 human converse, now I had been taught to relish it, was to wander a ghost
 among the living. Besides, I foresaw, to aggravate the severity of my
 fate, that my little pittance would soon melt away. I endeavoured to
 obtain needlework; but, not having been taught early, and my hands being
 rendered clumsy by hard work, I did not sufficiently excel to be employed
 by the ready-made linen shops, when so many women, better qualified, were
 suing for it. The want of a character prevented my getting a place; for,
 irksome as servitude would have been to me, I should have made another
 trial, had it been feasible. Not that I disliked employment, but the
 inequality of condition to which I must have submitted. I had acquired a
 taste for literature, during the five years I had lived with a literary
 man, occasionally conversing with men of the first abilities of the age;
 and now to descend to the lowest vulgarity, was a degree of wretchedness
 not to be imagined unfelt. I had not, it is true, tasted the charms of
 affection, but I had been familiar with the graces of humanity.
 
 "One of the gentlemen, whom I had frequently dined in company with, while
 I was treated like a companion, met me in the street, and enquired after
 my health. I seized the occasion, and began to describe my situation; but
 he was in haste to join, at dinner, a select party of choice spirits;
 therefore, without waiting to hear me, he impatiently put a guinea into
 my hand, saying, 'It was a pity such a sensible woman should be in
 distress--he wished me well from his soul.'
 
 "To another I wrote, stating my case, and requesting advice. He was an
 advocate for unequivocal sincerity; and had often, in my presence,
 descanted on the evils which arise in society from the despotism of rank
 and riches.
 
 "In reply, I received a long essay on the energy of the human mind, with
 continual allusions to his own force of character. He added, 'That the
 woman who could write such a letter as I had sent him, could never be in
 want of resources, were she to look into herself, and exert her powers;
 misery was the consequence of indolence, and, as to my being shut out
 from society, it was the lot of man to submit to certain privations.'
 
 "How often have I heard," said Jemima, interrupting her narrative, "in
 conversation, and read in books, that every person willing to work may
 find employment? It is the vague assertion, I believe, of insensible
 indolence, when it relates to men; but, with respect to women, I am sure
 of its fallacy, unless they will submit to the most menial bodily labour;
 and even to be employed at hard labour is out of the reach of many, whose
 reputation misfortune or folly has tainted.
 
 "How writers, professing to be friends to freedom, and the improvement of
 morals, can assert that poverty is no evil, I cannot imagine."
 
 "No more can I," interrupted Maria, "yet they even expatiate on the
 peculiar happiness of indigence, though in what it can consist, excepting
 in brutal rest, when a man can barely earn a subsistence, I cannot
 imagine. The mind is necessarily imprisoned in its own little tenement;
 and, fully occupied by keeping it in repair, has not time to rove abroad
 for improvement. The book of knowledge is closely clasped, against those
 who must fulfil their daily task of severe manual labour or die; and
 curiosity, rarely excited by thought or information, seldom moves on the
 stagnate lake of ignorance."
 
 "As far as I have been able to observe," replied Jemima, "prejudices,
 caught up by chance, are obstinately maintained by the poor, to the
 exclusion of improvement; they have not time to reason or reflect to any
 extent, or minds sufficiently exercised to adopt the principles of
 action, which form perhaps the only basis of contentment in every
 station[114-A]."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 "And independence," said Darnford, "they are necessarily strangers to,
 even the independence of despising their persecutors. If the poor are
 happy, or can be happy, _things are very well as they are_. And I cannot
 conceive on what principle those writers contend for a change of system,
 who support this opinion. The authors on the other side of the question
 are much more consistent, who grant the fact; yet, insisting that it is
 the lot of the majority to be oppressed in this life, kindly turn them
 over to another, to rectify the false weights and measures of this, as
 the only way to justify the dispensations of Providence. I have not,"
 continued Darnford, "an opinion more firmly fixed by observation in my
 mind, than that, though riches may fail to produce proportionate
 happiness, poverty most commonly excludes it, by shutting up all the
 avenues to improvement."
 
 "And as for the affections," added Maria, with a sigh, "how gross, and
 even tormenting do they become, unless regulated by an improving mind!
 The culture of the heart ever, I believe, keeps pace with that of the
 mind. But pray go on," addressing Jemima, "though your narrative gives
 rise to the most painful reflections on the present state of society."
 
 "Not to trouble you," continued she, "with a detailed description of all
 the painful feelings of unavailing exertion, I have only to tell you,
 that at last I got recommended to wash in a few families, who did me the
 favour to admit me into their houses, without the most strict enquiry, to
 wash from one in the morning till eight at night, for eighteen or
 twenty-pence a day. On the happiness to be enjoyed over a washing-tub I
 need not comment; yet you will allow me to observe, that this was a
 wretchedness of situation peculiar to my sex. A man with half my
 industry, and, I may say, abilities, could have procured a decent
 livelihood, and discharged some of the duties which knit mankind
 together; whilst I, who had acquired a taste for the rational, nay, in
 honest pride let me assert it, the virtuous enjoyments of life, was cast
 aside as the filth of society. Condemned to labour, like a machine, only
 to earn bread, and scarcely that, I became melancholy and desperate.
 
 "I have now to mention a circumstance which fills me with remorse, and
 fear it will entirely deprive me of your esteem. A tradesman became
 attached to me, and visited me frequently,--and I at last obtained such a
 power over him, that he offered to take me home to his house.--Consider,
 dear madam, I was famishing: wonder not that I became a wolf!--The only
 reason for not taking me home immediately, was the having a girl in the
 house, with child by him--and this girl--I advised him--yes, I did! would
 I could forget it!--to turn out of doors: and one night he determined to
 follow my advice, Poor wretch! she fell upon her knees, reminded him
 that he had promised to marry her, that her parents were honest!--What
 did it avail?--She was turned out.
 
 "She approached her father's door, in the skirts of London,--listened at
 the shutters,--but could not knock. A watchman had observed her go and
 return several times--Poor wretch!--"The remorse Jemima spoke of, seemed
 to be stinging her to the soul, as she proceeded."
 
 "She left it, and, approaching a tub where horses were watered, she sat
 down in it, and, with desperate resolution, remained in that
 attitude--till resolution was no longer necessary!
 
 "I happened that morning to be going out to wash, anticipating the moment
 when I should escape from such hard labour. I passed by, just as some
 men, going to work, drew out the stiff, cold corpse--Let me not recal the
 horrid moment!--I recognized her pale visage; I listened to the tale told
 by the spectators, and my heart did not burst. I thought of my own state,
 and wondered how I could be such a monster!--I worked hard; and,
 returning home, I was attacked by a fever. I suffered both in body and
 mind. I determined not to live with the wretch. But he did not try me; he
 left the neighbourhood. I once more returned to the wash-tub.
 
 "Still this state, miserable as it was, admitted of aggravation. Lifting
 one day a heavy load, a tub fell against my shin, and gave me great pain.
 I did not pay much attention to the hurt, till it became a serious wound;
 being obliged to work as usual, or starve. But, finding myself at length
 unable to stand for any time, I thought of getting into an hospital.
 Hospitals, it should seem (for they are comfortless abodes for the sick)
 were expressly endowed for the reception of the friendless; yet I, who
 had on that plea a right to assistance, wanted the recommendation of the
 rich and respectable, and was several weeks languishing for admittance;
 fees were demanded on entering; and, what was still more unreasonable,
 security for burying me, that expence not coming into the letter of the
 charity. A guinea was the stipulated sum--I could as soon have raised a
 million; and I was afraid to apply to the parish for an order, lest they
 should have passed me, I knew not whither. The poor woman at whose house
 I lodged, compassionating my state, got me into the hospital; and the
 family where I received the hurt, sent me five shillings, three and
 six-pence of which I gave at my admittance--I know not for what.
 
 "My leg grew quickly better; but I was dismissed before my cure was
 completed, because I could not afford to have my linen washed to appear
 decently, as the virago of a nurse said, when the gentlemen (the
 surgeons) came. I cannot give you an adequate idea of the wretchedness of
 an hospital; every thing is left to the care of people intent on gain.
 The attendants seem to have lost all feeling of compassion in the
 bustling discharge of their offices; death is so familiar to them, that
 they are not anxious to ward it off. Every thing appeared to be conducted
 for the accommodation of the medical men and their pupils, who came to
 make experiments on the poor, for the benefit of the rich. One of the
 physicians, I must not forget to mention, gave me half-a-crown, and
 ordered me some wine, when I was at the lowest ebb. I thought of making
 my case known to the lady-like matron; but her forbidding countenance
 prevented me. She condescended to look on the patients, and make general
 enquiries, two or three times a week; but the nurses knew the hour when
 the visit of ceremony would commence, and every thing was as it should
 be.
 
 "After my dismission, I was more at a loss than ever for a subsistence,
 and, not to weary you with a repetition of the same unavailing attempts,
 unable to stand at the washing-tub, I began to consider the rich and poor
 as natural enemies, and became a thief from principle. I could not now
 cease to reason, but I hated mankind. I despised myself, yet I justified
 my conduct. I was taken, tried, and condemned to six months' imprisonment
 in a house of correction. My soul recoils with horror from the
 remembrance of the insults I had to endure, till, branded with shame, I
 was turned loose in the street, pennyless. I wandered from street to
 street, till, exhausted by hunger and fatigue, I sunk down senseless at a
 door, where I had vainly demanded a morsel of bread. I was sent by the
 inhabitant to the work-house, to which he had surlily bid me go, saying,
 he 'paid enough in conscience to the poor,' when, with parched tongue, I
 implored his charity. If those well-meaning people who exclaim against
 beggars, were acquainted with the treatment the poor receive in many of
 these wretched asylums, they would not stifle so easily involuntary
 sympathy, by saying that they have all parishes to go to, or wonder that
 the poor dread to enter the gloomy walls. What are the common run of
 work-houses, but prisons, in which many respectable old people, worn out
 by immoderate labour, sink into the grave in sorrow, to which they are
 carried like dogs!"
 
 Alarmed by some indistinct noise, Jemima rose hastily to listen, and
 Maria, turning to Darnford, said, "I have indeed been shocked beyond
 expression when I have met a pauper's funeral. A coffin carried on the
 shoulders of three or four ill-looking wretches, whom the imagination
 might easily convert into a band of assassins, hastening to conceal the
 corpse, and quarrelling about the prey on their way. I know it is of
 little consequence how we are consigned to the earth; but I am led by
 this brutal insensibility, to what even the animal creation appears
 forcibly to feel, to advert to the wretched, deserted manner in which
 they died."
 
 "True," rejoined Darnford, "and, till the rich will give more than a part
 of their wealth, till they will give time and attention to the wants of
 the distressed, never let them boast of charity. Let them open their
 hearts, and not their purses, and employ their minds in the service, if
 they are really actuated by humanity; or charitable institutions will
 always be the prey of the lowest order of knaves."
 
 Jemima returning, seemed in haste to finish her tale. "The overseer
 farmed the poor of different parishes, and out of the bowels of poverty
 was wrung the money with which he purchased this dwelling, as a private
 receptacle for madness. He had been a keeper at a house of the same
 description, and conceived that he could make money much more readily in
 his old occupation. He is a shrewd--shall I say it?--villain. He observed
 something resolute in my manner, and offered to take me with him, and
 instruct me how to treat the disturbed minds he meant to intrust to my
 care. The offer of forty pounds a year, and to quit a workhouse, was not
 to be despised, though the condition of shutting my eyes and hardening my
 heart was annexed to it.
 
 "I agreed to accompany him; and four years have I been attendant on many
 wretches, and"--she lowered her voice,--"the witness of many enormities.
 In solitude my mind seemed to recover its force, and many of the
 sentiments which I imbibed in the only tolerable period of my life,
 returned with their full force. Still what should induce me to be the
 champion for suffering humanity?--Who ever risked any thing for me?--Who
 ever acknowledged me to be a fellow-creature?"--
 
 Maria took her hand, and Jemima, more overcome by kindness than she had
 ever been by cruelty, hastened out of the room to conceal her emotions.
 
 Darnford soon after heard his summons, and, taking leave of him, Maria
 promised to gratify his curiosity, with respect to herself, the first
 opportunity.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [114-A] The copy which appears to have received the author's last
 corrections, ends at this place.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. VI.
 
 
 ACTIVE as love was in the heart of Maria, the story she had just heard
 made her thoughts take a wider range. The opening buds of hope closed, as
 if they had put forth too early, and the the happiest day of her life was
 overcast by the most melancholy reflections. Thinking of Jemima's
 peculiar fate and her own, she was led to consider the oppressed state of
 women, and to lament that she had given birth to a daughter. Sleep fled
 from her eyelids, while she dwelt on the wretchedness of unprotected
 infancy, till sympathy with Jemima changed to agony, when it seemed
 probable that her own babe might even now be in the very state she so
 forcibly described.
 
 Maria thought, and thought again. Jemima's humanity had rather been
 benumbed than killed, by the keen frost she had to brave at her entrance
 into life; an appeal then to her feelings, on this tender point, surely
 would not be fruitless; and Maria began to anticipate the delight it
 would afford her to gain intelligence of her child. This project was now
 the only subject of reflection; and she watched impatiently for the dawn
 of day, with that determinate purpose which generally insures success.
 
 At the usual hour, Jemima brought her breakfast, and a tender note from
 Darnford. She ran her eye hastily over it, and her heart calmly hoarded
 up the rapture a fresh assurance of affection, affection such as she
 wished to inspire, gave her, without diverting her mind a moment from its
 design. While Jemima waited to take away the breakfast, Maria alluded to
 the reflections, that had haunted her during the night to the exclusion
 of sleep. She spoke with energy of Jemima's unmerited sufferings, and of
 the fate of a number of deserted females, placed within the sweep of a
 whirlwind, from which it was next to impossible to escape. Perceiving the
 effect her conversation produced on the countenance of her guard, she
 grasped the arm of Jemima with that irresistible warmth which defies
 repulse, exclaiming--"With your heart, and such dreadful experience, can
 you lend your aid to deprive my babe of a mother's tenderness, a mother's
 care? In the name of God, assist me to snatch her from destruction! Let
 me but give her an education--let me but prepare her body and mind to
 encounter the ills which await her sex, and I will teach her to consider
 you as her second mother, and herself as the prop of your age. Yes,
 Jemima, look at me--observe me closely, and read my very soul; you merit
 a better fate;" she held out her hand with a firm gesture of assurance;
 "and I will procure it for you, as a testimony of my esteem, as well as
 of my gratitude."
 
 Jemima had not power to resist this persuasive torrent; and, owning that
 the house in which she was confined, was situated on the banks of the
 Thames, only a few miles from London, and not on the sea-coast, as
 Darnford had supposed, she promised to invent some excuse for her
 absence, and go herself to trace the situation, and enquire concerning
 the health, of this abandoned daughter. Her manner implied an intention
 to do something more, but she seemed unwilling to impart her design; and
 Maria, glad to have obtained the main point, thought it best to leave her
 to the workings of her own mind; convinced that she had the power of
 interesting her still more in favour of herself and child, by a simple
 recital of facts.
 
 In the evening, Jemima informed the impatient mother, that on the morrow
 she should hasten to town before the family hour of rising, and received
 all the information necessary, as a clue to her search. The "Good night!"
 Maria uttered was peculiarly solemn and affectionate. Glad expectation
 sparkled in her eye; and, for the first time since her detention, she
 pronounced the name of her child with pleasureable fondness; and, with
 all the garrulity of a nurse, described her first smile when she
 recognized her mother. Recollecting herself, a still kinder "Adieu!" with
 a "God bless you!"--that seemed to include a maternal benediction,
 dismissed Jemima.
 
 The dreary solitude of the ensuing day, lengthened by impatiently
 dwelling on the same idea, was intolerably wearisome. She listened for
 the sound of a particular clock, which some directions of the wind
 allowed her to hear distinctly. She marked the shadow gaining on the
 wall; and, twilight thickening into darkness, her breath seemed oppressed
 while she anxiously counted nine.--The last sound was a stroke of
 despair on her heart; for she expected every moment, without seeing
 Jemima, to have her light extinguished by the savage female who supplied
 her place. She was even obliged to prepare for bed, restless as she was,
 not to disoblige her new attendant. She had been cautioned not to speak
 too freely to her; but the caution was needless, her countenance would
 still more emphatically have made her shrink back. Such was the ferocity
 of manner, conspicuous in every word and gesture of this hag, that Maria
 was afraid to enquire, why Jemima, who had faithfully promised to see her
 before her door was shut for the night, came not?--and, when the key
 turned in the lock, to consign her to a night of suspence, she felt a
 degree of anguish which the circumstances scarcely justified.
 
 Continually on the watch, the shutting of a door, or the sound of a
 footstep, made her start and tremble with apprehension, something like
 what she felt, when, at her entrance, dragged along the gallery, she
 began to doubt whether she were not surrounded by demons?
 
 Fatigued by an endless rotation of thought and wild alarms, she looked
 like a spectre, when Jemima entered in the morning; especially as her
 eyes darted out of her head, to read in Jemima's countenance, almost as
 pallid, the intelligence she dared not trust her tongue to demand. Jemima
 put down the tea-things, and appeared very busy in arranging the table.
 Maria took up a cup with trembling hand, then forcibly recovering her
 fortitude, and restraining the convulsive movement which agitated the
 muscles of her mouth, she said, "Spare yourself the pain of preparing me
 for your information, I adjure you!--My child is dead!" Jemima solemnly
 answered, "Yes;" with a look expressive of compassion and angry emotions.
 "Leave me," added Maria, making a fresh effort to govern her feelings,
 and hiding her face in her handkerchief, to conceal her anguish--"It is
 enough--I know that my babe is no more--I will hear the particulars when
 I am"--_calmer_, she could not utter; and Jemima, without importuning her
 by idle attempts to console her, left the room.
 
 Plunged in the deepest melancholy, she would not admit Darnford's visits;
 and such is the force of early associations even on strong minds, that,
 for a while, she indulged the superstitious notion that she was justly
 punished by the death of her child, for having for an instant ceased to
 regret her loss. Two or three letters from Darnford, full of soothing,
 manly tenderness, only added poignancy to these accusing emotions; yet
 the passionate style in which he expressed, what he termed the first and
 fondest wish of his heart, "that his affection might make her some amends
 for the cruelty and injustice she had endured," inspired a sentiment of
 gratitude to heaven; and her eyes filled with delicious tears, when, at
 the conclusion of his letter, wishing to supply the place of her unworthy
 relations, whose want of principle he execrated, he assured her, calling
 her his dearest girl, "that it should henceforth be the business of his
 life to make her happy."
 
 He begged, in a note sent the following morning, to be permitted to see
 her, when his presence would be no intrusion on her grief; and so
 earnestly intreated to be allowed, according to promise, to beguile the
 tedious moments of absence, by dwelling on the events of her past life,
 that she sent him the memoirs which had been written for her daughter,
 promising Jemima the perusal as soon as he returned them.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. VII.
 
 
 "ADDRESSING these memoirs to you, my child, uncertain whether I shall
 ever have an opportunity of instructing you, many observations will
 probably flow from my heart, which only a mother--a mother schooled in
 misery, could make.
 
 "The tenderness of a father who knew the world, might be great; but could
 it equal that of a mother--of a mother, labouring under a portion of the
 misery, which the constitution of society seems to have entailed on all
 her kind? It is, my child, my dearest daughter, only such a mother, who
 will dare to break through all restraint to provide for your
 happiness--who will voluntarily brave censure herself, to ward off
 sorrow from your bosom. From my narrative, my dear girl, you may gather
 the instruction, the counsel, which is meant rather to exercise than
 influence your mind.--Death may snatch me from you, before you can weigh
 my advice, or enter into my reasoning: I would then, with fond anxiety,
 lead you very early in life to form your grand principle of action, to
 save you from the vain regret of having, through irresolution, let the
 spring-tide of existence pass away, unimproved, unenjoyed.--Gain
 experience--ah! gain it--while experience is worth having, and acquire
 sufficient fortitude to pursue your own happiness; it includes your
 utility, by a direct path. What is wisdom too often, but the owl of the
 goddess, who sits moping in a desolated heart; around me she shrieks,
 but I would invite all the gay warblers of spring to nestle in your
 blooming bosom.--Had I not wasted years in deliberating, after I ceased
 to doubt, how I ought to have acted--I might now be useful and
 happy.--For my sake, warned by my example, always appear what you are,
 and you will not pass through existence without enjoying its genuine
 blessings, love and respect.
 
 "Born in one of the most romantic parts of England, an enthusiastic
 fondness for the varying charms of nature is the first sentiment I
 recollect; or rather it was the first consciousness of pleasure that
 employed and formed my imagination.
 
 "My father had been a captain of a man of war; but, disgusted with the
 service, on account of the preferment of men whose chief merit was their
 family connections or borough interest, he retired into the country; and,
 not knowing what to do with himself--married. In his family, to regain
 his lost consequence, he determined to keep up the same passive
 obedience, as in the vessels in which he had commanded. His orders were
 not to be disputed; and the whole house was expected to fly, at the word
 of command, as if to man the shrouds, or mount aloft in an elemental
 strife, big with life or death. He was to be instantaneously obeyed,
 especially by my mother, whom he very benevolently married for love; but
 took care to remind her of the obligation, when she dared, in the
 slightest instance, to question his absolute authority. My eldest
 brother, it is true, as he grew up, was treated with more respect by my
 father; and became in due form the deputy-tyrant of the house. The
 representative of my father, a being privileged by nature--a boy, and the
 darling of my mother, he did not fail to act like an heir apparent. Such
 indeed was my mother's extravagant partiality, that, in comparison with
 her affection for him, she might be said not to love the rest of her
 children. Yet none of the children seemed to have so little affection for
 her. Extreme indulgence had rendered him so selfish, that he only thought
 of himself; and from tormenting insects and animals, he became the despot
 of his brothers, and still more of his sisters.
 
 "It is perhaps difficult to give you an idea of the petty cares which
 obscured the morning of my life; continual restraint in the most trivial
 matters; unconditional submission to orders, which, as a mere child, I
 soon discovered to be unreasonable, because inconsistent and
 contradictory. Thus are we destined to experience a mixture of
 bitterness, with the recollection of our most innocent enjoyments.
 
 "The circumstances which, during my childhood, occurred to fashion my
 mind, were various; yet, as it would probably afford me more pleasure to
 revive the fading remembrance of new-born delight, than you, my child,
 could feel in the perusal, I will not entice you to stray with me into
 the verdant meadow, to search for the flowers that youthful hopes scatter
 in every path; though, as I write, I almost scent the fresh green of
 spring--of that spring which never returns!
 
 "I had two sisters, and one brother, younger than myself; my brother
 Robert was two years older, and might truly be termed the idol of his
 parents, and the torment of the rest of the family. Such indeed is the
 force of prejudice, that what was called spirit and wit in him, was
 cruelly repressed as forwardness in me.
 
 "My mother had an indolence of character, which prevented her from paying
 much attention to our education. But the healthy breeze of a neighbouring
 heath, on which we bounded at pleasure, volatilized the humours that
 improper food might have generated. And to enjoy open air and freedom,
 was paradise, after the unnatural restraint of our fire-side, where we
 were often obliged to sit three or four hours together, without daring to
 utter a word, when my father was out of humour, from want of employment,
 or of a variety of boisterous amusement. I had however one advantage, an
 instructor, the brother of my father, who, intended for the church, had
 of course received a liberal education. But, becoming attached to a young
 lady of great beauty and large fortune, and acquiring in the world some
 opinions not consonant with the profession for which he was designed, he
 accepted, with the most sanguine expectations of success, the offer of a
 nobleman to accompany him to India, as his confidential secretary.
 
 "A correspondence was regularly kept up with the object of his affection;
 and the intricacies of business, peculiarly wearisome to a man of a
 romantic turn of mind, contributed, with a forced absence, to increase
 his attachment. Every other passion was lost in this master-one, and
 only served to swell the torrent. Her relations, such were his waking
 dreams, who had despised him, would court in their turn his alliance, and
 all the blandishments of taste would grace the triumph of love.--While he
 basked in the warm sunshine of love, friendship also promised to shed its
 dewy freshness; for a friend, whom he loved next to his mistress, was the
 confident, who forwarded the letters from one to the other, to elude the
 observation of prying relations. A friend false in similar circumstances,
 is, my dearest girl, an old tale; yet, let not this example, or the
 frigid caution of cold-blooded moralists, make you endeavour to stifle
 hopes, which are the buds that naturally unfold themselves during the
 spring of life! Whilst your own heart is sincere, always expect to meet
 one glowing with the same sentiments; for to fly from pleasure, is not to
 avoid pain!
 
 "My uncle realized, by good luck, rather than management, a handsome
 fortune; and returning on the wings of love, lost in the most enchanting
 reveries, to England, to share it with his mistress and his friend, he
 found them--united.
 
 "There were some circumstances, not necessary for me to recite, which
 aggravated the guilt of the friend beyond measure, and the deception,
 that had been carried on to the last moment, was so base, it produced the
 most violent effect on my uncle's health and spirits. His native country,
 the world! lately a garden of blooming sweets, blasted by treachery,
 seemed changed into a parched desert, the abode of hissing serpents.
 Disappointment rankled in his heart; and, brooding over his wrongs, he
 was attacked by a raging fever, followed by a derangement of mind, which
 only gave place to habitual melancholy, as he recovered more strength of
 body.
 
 "Declaring an intention never to marry, his relations were ever
 clustering about him, paying the grossest adulation to a man, who,
 disgusted with mankind, received them with scorn, or bitter sarcasms.
 Something in my countenance pleased him, when I began to prattle. Since
 his return, he appeared dead to affection; but I soon, by showing him
 innocent fondness, became a favourite; and endeavouring to enlarge and
 strengthen my mind, I grew dear to him in proportion as I imbibed his
 sentiments. He had a forcible manner of speaking, rendered more so by a
 certain impressive wildness of look and gesture, calculated to engage the
 attention of a young and ardent mind. It is not then surprising that I
 quickly adopted his opinions in preference, and reverenced him as one of
 a superior order of beings. He inculcated, with great warmth,
 self-respect, and a lofty consciousness of acting right, independent of
 the censure or applause of the world; nay, he almost taught me to brave,
 and even despise its censure, when convinced of the rectitude of my own
 intentions.
 
 "Endeavouring to prove to me that nothing which deserved the name of love
 or friendship, existed in the world, he drew such animated pictures of
 his own feelings, rendered permanent by disappointment, as imprinted the
 sentiments strongly on my heart, and animated my imagination. These
 remarks are necessary to elucidate some peculiarities in my character,
 which by the world are indefinitely termed romantic.
 
 "My uncle's increasing affection led him to visit me often. Still, unable
 to rest in any place, he did not remain long in the country to soften
 domestic tyranny; but he brought me books, for which I had a passion, and
 they conspired with his conversation, to make me form an ideal picture of
 life. I shall pass over the tyranny of my father, much as I suffered from
 it; but it is necessary to notice, that it undermined my mother's health;
 and that her temper, continually irritated by domestic bickering, became
 intolerably peevish.
 
 "My eldest brother was articled to a neighbouring attorney, the
 shrewdest, and, I may add, the most unprincipled man in that part of the
 country. As my brother generally came home every Saturday, to astonish my
 mother by exhibiting his attainments, he gradually assumed a right of
 directing the whole family, not excepting my father. He seemed to take a
 peculiar pleasure in tormenting and humbling me; and if I ever ventured
 to complain of this treatment to either my father or mother, I was rudely
 rebuffed for presuming to judge of the conduct of my eldest brother.
 
 "About this period a merchant's family came to settle in our
 neighbourhood. A mansion-house in the village, lately purchased, had been
 preparing the whole spring, and the sight of the costly furniture, sent
 from London, had excited my mother's envy, and roused my father's pride.
 My sensations were very different, and all of a pleasurable kind. I
 longed to see new characters, to break the tedious monotony of my life;
 and to find a friend, such as fancy had pourtrayed. I cannot then
 describe the emotion I felt, the Sunday they made their appearance at
 church. My eyes were rivetted on the pillar round which I expected first
 to catch a glimpse of them, and darted forth to meet a servant who
 hastily preceded a group of ladies, whose white robes and waving plumes,
 seemed to stream along the gloomy aisle, diffusing the light, by which I
 contemplated their figures.
 
 "We visited them in form; and I quickly selected the eldest daughter for
 my friend. The second son, George, paid me particular attention, and
 finding his attainments and manners superior to those of the young men of
 the village, I began to imagine him superior to the rest of mankind. Had
 my home been more comfortable, or my previous acquaintance more numerous,
 I should not probably have been so eager to open my heart to new
 affections.
 
 "Mr. Venables, the merchant, had acquired a large fortune by unremitting
 attention to business; but his health declining rapidly, he was obliged
 to retire, before his son, George, had acquired sufficient experience, to
 enable him to conduct their affairs on the same prudential plan, his
 father had invariably pursued. Indeed, he had laboured to throw off his
 authority, having despised his narrow plans and cautious speculation. The
 eldest son could not be prevailed on to enter the firm; and, to oblige
 his wife, and have peace in the house, Mr. Venables had purchased a
 commission for him in the guards.
 
 "I am now alluding to circumstances which came to my knowledge long
 after; but it is necessary, my dearest child, that you should know the
 character of your father, to prevent your despising your mother; the only
 parent inclined to discharge a parent's duty. In London, George had
 acquired habits of libertinism, which he carefully concealed from his
 father and his commercial connections. The mask he wore, was so complete
 a covering of his real visage, that the praise his father lavished on his
 conduct, and, poor mistaken man! on his principles, contrasted with his
 brother's, rendered the notice he took of me peculiarly flattering.
 Without any fixed design, as I am now convinced, he continued to single
 me out at the dance, press my hand at parting, and utter expressions of
 unmeaning passion, to which I gave a meaning naturally suggested by the
 romantic turn of my thoughts. His stay in the country was short; his
 manners did not entirely please me; but, when he left us, the colouring
 of my picture became more vivid--Whither did not my imagination lead me?
 In short, I fancied myself in love--in love with the disinterestedness,
 fortitude, generosity, dignity, and humanity, with which I had invested
 the hero I dubbed. A circumstance which soon after occurred, rendered all
 these virtues palpable. [The incident is perhaps worth relating on other
 accounts, and therefore I shall describe it distinctly.]
 
 "I had a great affection for my nurse, old Mary, for whom I used often to
 work, to spare her eyes. Mary had a younger sister, married to a sailor,
 while she was suckling me; for my mother only suckled my eldest brother,
 which might be the cause of her extraordinary partiality. Peggy, Mary's
 sister, lived with her, till her husband, becoming a mate in a West-India
 trader, got a little before-hand in the world. He wrote to his wife from
 the first port in the Channel, after his most successful voyage, to
 request her to come to London to meet him; he even wished her to
 determine on living there for the future, to save him the trouble of
 coming to her the moment he came on shore; and to turn a penny by
 keeping a green-stall. It was too much to set out on a journey the
 moment he had finished a voyage, and fifty miles by land, was worse than
 a thousand leagues by sea.
 
 "She packed up her alls, and came to London--but did not meet honest
 Daniel. A common misfortune prevented her, and the poor are bound to
 suffer for the good of their country--he was pressed in the river--and
 never came on shore.
 
 "Peggy was miserable in London, not knowing, as she said, 'the face of
 any living soul.' Besides, her imagination had been employed,
 anticipating a month or six weeks' happiness with her husband. Daniel was
 to have gone with her to Sadler's Wells, and Westminster Abbey, and to
 many sights, which he knew she never heard of in the country. Peggy too
 was thrifty, and how could she manage to put his plan in execution
 alone? He had acquaintance; but she did not know the very name of their
 places of abode. His letters were made up of--How do you does, and God
 bless yous,--information was reserved for the hour of meeting.
 
 "She too had her portion of information, near at heart. Molly and Jacky
 were grown such little darlings, she was almost angry that daddy did not
 see their tricks. She had not half the pleasure she should have had from
 their prattle, could she have recounted to him each night the pretty
 speeches of the day. Some stories, however, were stored up--and Jacky
 could say papa with such a sweet voice, it must delight his heart. Yet
 when she came, and found no Daniel to greet her, when Jacky called papa,
 she wept, bidding 'God bless his innocent soul, that did not know what
 sorrow was.'--But more sorrow was in store for Peggy, innocent as she
 was.--Daniel was killed in the first engagement, and then the _papa_ was
 agony, sounding to the heart.
 
 "She had lived sparingly on his wages, while there was any hope of his
 return; but, that gone, she returned with a breaking heart to the
 country, to a little market town, nearly three miles from our village.
 She did not like to go to service, to be snubbed about, after being her
 own mistress. To put her children out to nurse was impossible: how far
 would her wages go? and to send them to her husband's parish, a distant
 one, was to lose her husband twice over.
 
 "I had heard all from Mary, and made my uncle furnish a little cottage
 for her, to enable her to sell--so sacred was poor Daniel's advice, now
 he was dead and gone--a little fruit, toys and cakes. The minding of the
 shop did not require her whole time, nor even the keeping her children
 clean, and she loved to see them clean; so she took in washing, and
 altogether made a shift to earn bread for her children, still weeping for
 Daniel, when Jacky's arch looks made her think of his father.--It was
 pleasant to work for her children.--'Yes; from morning till night, could
 she have had a kiss from their father, God rest his soul! Yes; had it
 pleased Providence to have let him come back without a leg or an arm, it
 would have been the same thing to her--for she did not love him because
 he maintained them--no; she had hands of her own.'
 
 "The country people were honest, and Peggy left her linen out to dry very
 late. A recruiting party, as she supposed, passing through, made free
 with a large wash; for it was all swept away, including her own and her
 children's little stock.
 
 "This was a dreadful blow; two dozen of shirts, stocks and handkerchiefs.
 She gave the money which she had laid by for half a year's rent, and
 promised to pay two shillings a week till all was cleared; so she did not
 lose her employment. This two shillings a week, and the buying a few
 necessaries for the children, drove her so hard, that she had not a penny
 to pay her rent with, when a twelvemonth's became due.
 
 "She was now with Mary, and had just told her tale, which Mary instantly
 repeated--it was intended for my ear. Many houses in this town, producing
 a borough-interest, were included in the estate purchased by Mr.
 Venables, and the attorney with whom my brother lived, was appointed his
 agent, to collect and raise the rents.
 
 "He demanded Peggy's, and, in spite of her intreaties, her poor goods had
 been seized and sold. So that she had not, and what was worse her
 children, 'for she had known sorrow enough,' a bed to lie on. She knew
 that I was good-natured--right charitable, yet not liking to ask for more
 than needs must, she scorned to petition while people could any how be
 made to wait. But now, should she be turned out of doors, she must
 expect nothing less than to lose all her customers, and then she must
 beg or starve--and what would become of her children?--'had Daniel not
 been pressed--but God knows best--all this could not have happened.'
 
 "I had two mattrasses on my bed; what did I want with two, when such a
 worthy creature must lie on the ground? My mother would be angry, but I
 could conceal it till my uncle came down; and then I would tell him all
 the whole truth, and if he absolved me, heaven would.
 
 "I begged the house-maid to come up stairs with me (servants always feel
 for the distresses of poverty, and so would the rich if they knew what it
 was). She assisted me to tie up the mattrass; I discovering, at the same
 time, that one blanket would serve me till winter, could I persuade my
 sister, who slept with me, to keep my secret. She entering in the midst
 of the package, I gave her some new feathers, to silence her. We got the
 mattrass down the back stairs, unperceived, and I helped to carry it,
 taking with me all the money I had, and what I could borrow from my
 sister.
 
 "When I got to the cottage, Peggy declared that she would not take what I
 had brought secretly; but, when, with all the eager eloquence inspired by
 a decided purpose, I grasped her hand with weeping eyes, assuring her
 that my uncle would screen me from blame, when he was once more in the
 country, describing, at the same time, what she would suffer in parting
 with her children, after keeping them so long from being thrown on the
 parish, she reluctantly consented.
 
 "My project of usefulness ended not here; I determined to speak to the
 attorney; he frequently paid me compliments. His character did not
 intimidate me; but, imagining that Peggy must be mistaken, and that no
 man could turn a deaf ear to such a tale of complicated distress, I
 determined to walk to the town with Mary the next morning, and request
 him to wait for the rent, and keep my secret, till my uncle's return.
 
 "My repose was sweet; and, waking with the first dawn of day, I bounded
 to Mary's cottage. What charms do not a light heart spread over nature!
 Every bird that twittered in a bush, every flower that enlivened the
 hedge, seemed placed there to awaken me to rapture--yes; to rapture. The
 present moment was full fraught with happiness; and on futurity I
 bestowed not a thought, excepting to anticipate my success with the
 attorney.
 
 "This man of the world, with rosy face and simpering features, received
 me politely, nay kindly; listened with complacency to my remonstrances,
 though he scarcely heeded Mary's tears. I did not then suspect, that my
 eloquence was in my complexion, the blush of seventeen, or that, in a
 world where humanity to women is the characteristic of advancing
 civilization, the beauty of a young girl was so much more interesting
 than the distress of an old one. Pressing my hand, he promised to let
 Peggy remain in the house as long as I wished.--I more than returned the
 pressure--I was so grateful and so happy. Emboldened by my innocent
 warmth, he then kissed me--and I did not draw back--I took it for a kiss
 of charity.
 
 "Gay as a lark, I went to dine at Mr. Venables'. I had previously
 obtained five shillings from my father, towards re-clothing the poor
 children of my care, and prevailed on my mother to take one of the girls
 into the house, whom I determined to teach to work and read.
 
 "After dinner, when the younger part of the circle retired to the music
 room, I recounted with energy my tale; that is, I mentioned Peggy's
 distress, without hinting at the steps I had taken to relieve her. Miss
 Venables gave me half-a-crown; the heir five shillings; but George sat
 unmoved. I was cruelly distressed by the disappointment--I scarcely could
 remain on my chair; and, could I have got out of the room unperceived, I
 should have flown home, as if to run away from myself. After several
 vain attempts to rise, I leaned my head against the marble chimney-piece,
 and gazing on the evergreens that filled the fire-place, moralized on the
 vanity of human expectations; regardless of the company. I was roused by
 a gentle tap on my shoulder from behind Charlotte's chair. I turned my
 head, and George slid a guinea into my hand, putting his finger to his
 mouth, to enjoin me silence.
 
 "What a revolution took place, not only in my train of thoughts, but
 feelings! I trembled with emotion--now, indeed, I was in love. Such
 delicacy too, to enhance his benevolence! I felt in my pocket every five
 minutes, only to feel the guinea; and its magic touch invested my hero
 with more than mortal beauty. My fancy had found a basis to erect its
 model of perfection on; and quickly went to work, with all the happy
 credulity of youth, to consider that heart as devoted to virtue, which
 had only obeyed a virtuous impulse. The bitter experience was yet to
 come, that has taught me how very distinct are the principles of virtue,
 from the casual feelings from which they germinate.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. VIII.
 
 
 "I HAVE perhaps dwelt too long on a circumstance, which is only of
 importance as it marks the progress of a deception that has been so fatal
 to my peace; and introduces to your notice a poor girl, whom, intending
 to serve, I led to ruin. Still it is probable that I was not entirely the
 victim of mistake; and that your father, gradually fashioned by the
 world, did not quickly become what I hesitate to call him--out of respect
 to my daughter.
 
 "But, to hasten to the more busy scenes of my life. Mr. Venables and my
 mother died the same summer; and, wholly engrossed by my attention to
 her, I thought of little else. The neglect of her darling, my brother
 Robert, had a violent effect on her weakened mind; for, though boys may
 be reckoned the pillars of the house without doors, girls are often the
 only comfort within. They but too frequently waste their health and
 spirits attending a dying parent, who leaves them in comparative poverty.
 After closing, with filial piety, a father's eyes, they are chased from
 the paternal roof, to make room for the first-born, the son, who is to
 carry the empty family-name down to posterity; though, occupied with his
 own pleasures, he scarcely thought of discharging, in the decline of his
 parent's life, the debt contracted in his childhood. My mother's conduct
 led me to make these reflections. Great as was the fatigue I endured, and
 the affection my unceasing solicitude evinced, of which my mother seemed
 perfectly sensible, still, when my brother, whom I could hardly persuade
 to remain a quarter of an hour in her chamber, was with her alone, a
 short time before her death, she gave him a little hoard, which she had
 been some years accumulating.
 
 "During my mother's illness, I was obliged to manage my father's temper,
 who, from the lingering nature of her malady, began to imagine that it
 was merely fancy. At this period, an artful kind of upper servant
 attracted my father's attention, and the neighbours made many remarks on
 the finery, not honestly got, exhibited at evening service. But I was too
 much occupied with my mother to observe any change in her dress or
 behaviour, or to listen to the whisper of scandal.
 
 "I shall not dwell on the death-bed scene, lively as is the remembrance,
 or on the emotion produced by the last grasp of my mother's cold hand;
 when blessing me, she added, 'A little patience, and all will be over!'
 Ah! my child, how often have those words rung mournfully in my ears--and
 I have exclaimed--'A little more patience, and I too shall be at rest!'
 
 "My father was violently affected by her death, recollected instances of
 his unkindness, and wept like a child.
 
 "My mother had solemnly recommended my sisters to my care, and bid me be
 a mother to them. They, indeed, became more dear to me as they became
 more forlorn; for, during my mother's illness, I discovered the ruined
 state of my father's circumstances, and that he had only been able to
 keep up appearances, by the sums which he borrowed of my uncle.
 
 "My father's grief, and consequent tenderness to his children, quickly
 abated, the house grew still more gloomy or riotous; and my refuge from
 care was again at Mr. Venables'; the young 'squire having taken his
 father's place, and allowing, for the present, his sister to preside at
 his table. George, though dissatisfied with his portion of the fortune,
 which had till lately been all in trade, visited the family as usual. He
 was now full of speculations in trade, and his brow became clouded by
 care. He seemed to relax in his attention to me, when the presence of my
 uncle gave a new turn to his behaviour. I was too unsuspecting, too
 disinterested, to trace these changes to their source.
 
 My home every day became more and more disagreeable to me; my liberty was
 unnecessarily abridged, and my books, on the pretext that they made me
 idle, taken from me. My father's mistress was with child, and he, doating
 on her, allowed or overlooked her vulgar manner of tyrannizing over us. I
 was indignant, especially when I saw her endeavouring to attract, shall I
 say seduce? my younger brother. By allowing women but one way of rising
 in the world, the fostering the libertinism of men, society makes
 monsters of them, and then their ignoble vices are brought forward as a
 proof of inferiority of intellect.
 
 The wearisomeness of my situation can scarcely be described. Though my
 life had not passed in the most even tenour with my mother, it was
 paradise to that I was destined to endure with my father's mistress,
 jealous of her illegitimate authority. My father's former occasional
 tenderness, in spite of his violence of temper, had been soothing to me;
 but now he only met me with reproofs or portentous frowns. The
 house-keeper, as she was now termed, was the vulgar despot of the family;
 and assuming the new character of a fine lady, she could never forgive
 the contempt which was sometimes visible in my countenance, when she
 uttered with pomposity her bad English, or affected to be well bred.
 
 To my uncle I ventured to open my heart; and he, with his wonted
 benevolence, began to consider in what manner he could extricate me out
 of my present irksome situation. In spite of his own disappointment, or,
 most probably, actuated by the feelings that had been petrified, not
 cooled, in all their sanguine fervour, like a boiling torrent of lava
 suddenly dashing into the sea, he thought a marriage of mutual
 inclination (would envious stars permit it) the only chance for happiness
 in this disastrous world. George Venables had the reputation of being
 attentive to business, and my father's example gave great weight to this
 circumstance; for habits of order in business would, he conceived, extend
 to the regulation of the affections in domestic life. George seldom spoke
 in my uncle's company, except to utter a short, judicious question, or to
 make a pertinent remark, with all due deference to his superior judgment;
 so that my uncle seldom left his company without observing, that the
 young man had more in him than people supposed.
 
 In this opinion he was not singular; yet, believe me, and I am not swayed
 by resentment, these speeches so justly poized, this silent deference,
 when the animal spirits of other young people were throwing off youthful
 ebullitions, were not the effect of thought or humility, but sheer
 barrenness of mind, and want of imagination. A colt of mettle will curvet
 and shew his paces. Yes; my dear girl, these prudent young men want all
 the fire necessary to ferment their faculties, and are characterized as
 wise, only because they are not foolish. It is true, that George was by
 no means so great a favourite of mine as during the first year of our
 acquaintance; still, as he often coincided in opinion with me, and echoed
 my sentiments; and having myself no other attachment, I heard with
 pleasure my uncle's proposal; but thought more of obtaining my freedom,
 than of my lover. But, when George, seemingly anxious for my happiness,
 pressed me to quit my present painful situation, my heart swelled with
 gratitude--I knew not that my uncle had promised him five thousand
 pounds.
 
 Had this truly generous man mentioned his intention to me, I should have
 insisted on a thousand pounds being settled on each of my sisters; George
 would have contested; I should have seen his selfish soul; and--gracious
 God! have been spared the misery of discovering, when too late, that I
 was united to a heartless, unprincipled wretch. All my schemes of
 usefulness would not then have been blasted. The tenderness of my heart
 would not have heated my imagination with visions of the ineffable
 delight of happy love; nor would the sweet duty of a mother have been so
 cruelly interrupted.
 
 But I must not suffer the fortitude I have so hardly acquired, to be
 undermined by unavailing regret. Let me hasten forward to describe the
 turbid stream in which I had to wade--but let me exultingly declare that
 it is passed--my soul holds fellowship with him no more. He cut the
 Gordian knot, which my principles, mistaken ones, respected; he dissolved
 the tie, the fetters rather, that ate into my very vitals--and I should
 rejoice, conscious that my mind is freed, though confined in hell itself;
 the only place that even fancy can imagine more dreadful than my present
 abode.
 
 These varying emotions will not allow me to proceed. I heave sigh after
 sigh; yet my heart is still oppressed. For what am I reserved? Why was I
 not born a man, or why was I born at all?
 
 
 END OF VOL. I.
 
 
 
 
 POSTHUMOUS WORKS
 
 OF
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT GODWIN.
 
 VOL. II.
 
 
 POSTHUMOUS WORKS
 
 OF THE
 
 AUTHOR
 
 OF A
 
 VINDICATION OF THE RIGHTS OF WOMAN.
 
 IN FOUR VOLUMES.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 VOL. II.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 _LONDON:_
 
 PRINTED FOR J. JOHNSON, NO. 72, ST. PAUL'S
   CHURCH-YARD; AND G. G. AND J. ROBINSON,
               PATERNOSTER-ROW.
                    1798.
 
 
 
 THE
 
 WRONGS OF WOMAN:
 
 OR,
 
 MARIA.
 
 A FRAGMENT.
 
 IN TWO VOLUMES.
 
 
 VOL. II.
 
 
 
 
 _WRONGS_
 
 OF
 
 WOMAN.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. IX.
 
 
 "I RESUME my pen to fly from thought. I was married; and we hastened to
 London. I had purposed taking one of my sisters with me; for a strong
 motive for marrying, was the desire of having a home at which I could
 receive them, now their own grew so uncomfortable, as not to deserve the
 cheering appellation. An objection was made to her accompanying me, that
 appeared plausible; and I reluctantly acquiesced. I was however willingly
 allowed to take with me Molly, poor Peggy's daughter. London and
 preferment, are ideas commonly associated in the country; and, as
 blooming as May, she bade adieu to Peggy with weeping eyes. I did not
 even feel hurt at the refusal in relation to my sister, till hearing what
 my uncle had done for me, I had the simplicity to request, speaking with
 warmth of their situation, that he would give them a thousand pounds
 a-piece, which seemed to me but justice. He asked me, giving me a kiss,
 'If I had lost my senses?' I started back, as if I had found a wasp in a
 rose-bush. I expostulated. He sneered; and the demon of discord entered
 our paradise, to poison with his pestiferous breath every opening joy.
 
 "I had sometimes observed defects in my husband's understanding; but, led
 astray by a prevailing opinion, that goodness of disposition is of the
 first importance in the relative situations of life, in proportion as I
 perceived the narrowness of his understanding, fancy enlarged the
 boundary of his heart. Fatal error! How quickly is the so much vaunted
 milkiness of nature turned into gall, by an intercourse with the world,
 if more generous juices do not sustain the vital source of virtue!
 
 "One trait in my character was extreme credulity; but, when my eyes were
 once opened, I saw but too clearly all I had before overlooked. My
 husband was sunk in my esteem; still there are youthful emotions, which,
 for a while, fill up the chasm of love and friendship. Besides, it
 required some time to enable me to see his whole character in a just
 light, or rather to allow it to become fixed. While circumstances were
 ripening my faculties, and cultivating my taste, commerce and gross
 relaxations were shutting his against any possibility of improvement,
 till, by stifling every spark of virtue in himself, he began to imagine
 that it no where existed.
 
 "Do not let me lead you astray, my child, I do not mean to assert, that
 any human being is entirely incapable of feeling the generous emotions,
 which are the foundation of every true principle of virtue; but they are
 frequently, I fear, so feeble, that, like the inflammable quality which
 more or less lurks in all bodies, they often lie for ever dormant; the
 circumstances never occurring, necessary to call them into action.
 
 "I discovered however by chance, that, in consequence of some losses in
 trade, the natural effect of his gambling desire to start suddenly into
 riches, the five thousand pounds given me by my uncle, had been paid very
 opportunely. This discovery, strange as you may think the assertion, gave
 me pleasure; my husband's embarrassments endeared him to me. I was glad
 to find an excuse for his conduct to my sisters, and my mind became
 calmer.
 
 "My uncle introduced me to some literary society; and the theatres were a
 never-failing source of amusement to me. My delighted eye followed Mrs.
 Siddons, when, with dignified delicacy, she played Calista; and I
 involuntarily repeated after her, in the same tone, and with a
 long-drawn sigh,
 
     'Hearts like our's were pair'd--not match'd.'
 
 "These were, at first, spontaneous emotions, though, becoming acquainted
 with men of wit and polished manners, I could not sometimes help
 regretting my early marriage; and that, in my haste to escape from a
 temporary dependence, and expand my newly fledged wings, in an unknown
 sky, I had been caught in a trap, and caged for life. Still the novelty
 of London, and the attentive fondness of my husband, for he had some
 personal regard for me, made several months glide away. Yet, not
 forgetting the situation of my sisters, who were still very young, I
 prevailed on my uncle to settle a thousand pounds on each; and to place
 them in a school near town, where I could frequently visit, as well as
 have them at home with me.
 
 "I now tried to improve my husband's taste, but we had few subjects in
 common; indeed he soon appeared to have little relish for my society,
 unless he was hinting to me the use he could make of my uncle's wealth.
 When we had company, I was disgusted by an ostentatious display of
 riches, and I have often quitted the room, to avoid listening to
 exaggerated tales of money obtained by lucky hits.
 
 "With all my attention and affectionate interest, I perceived that I
 could not become the friend or confident of my husband. Every thing I
 learned relative to his affairs I gathered up by accident; and I vainly
 endeavoured to establish, at our fire-side, that social converse, which
 often renders people of different characters dear to each other.
 Returning from the theatre, or any amusing party, I frequently began to
 relate what I had seen and highly relished; but with sullen taciturnity
 he soon silenced me. I seemed therefore gradually to lose, in his
 society, the soul, the energies of which had just been in action. To such
 a degree, in fact, did his cold, reserved manner affect me, that, after
 spending some days with him alone, I have imagined myself the most stupid
 creature in the world, till the abilities of some casual visitor
 convinced me that I had some dormant animation, and sentiments above the
 dust in which I had been groveling. The very countenance of my husband
 changed; his complexion became sallow, and all the charms of youth were
 vanishing with its vivacity.
 
 "I give you one view of the subject; but these experiments and
 alterations took up the space of five years; during which period, I had
 most reluctantly extorted several sums from my uncle, to save my husband,
 to use his own words, from destruction. At first it was to prevent bills
 being noted, to the injury of his credit; then to bail him; and
 afterwards to prevent an execution from entering the house. I began at
 last to conclude, that he would have made more exertions of his own to
 extricate himself, had he not relied on mine, cruel as was the task he
 imposed on me; and I firmly determined that I would make use of no more
 pretexts.
 
 "From the moment I pronounced this determination, indifference on his
 part was changed into rudeness, or something worse.
 
 "He now seldom dined at home, and continually returned at a late hour,
 drunk, to bed. I retired to another apartment; I was glad, I own, to
 escape from his; for personal intimacy without affection, seemed, to me
 the most degrading, as well as the most painful state in which a woman of
 any taste, not to speak of the peculiar delicacy of fostered sensibility,
 could be placed. But my husband's fondness for women was of the grossest
 kind, and imagination was so wholly out of the question, as to render his
 indulgences of this sort entirely promiscuous, and of the most brutal
 nature. My health suffered, before my heart was entirely estranged by the
 loathsome information; could I then have returned to his sullied arms,
 but as a victim to the prejudices of mankind, who have made women the
 property of their husbands? I discovered even, by his conversation, when
 intoxicated, that his favourites were wantons of the lowest class, who
 could by their vulgar, indecent mirth, which he called nature, rouse his
 sluggish spirits. Meretricious ornaments and manners were necessary to
 attract his attention. He seldom looked twice at a modest woman, and sat
 silent in their company; and the charms of youth and beauty had not the
 slightest effect on his senses, unless the possessors were initiated in
 vice. His intimacy with profligate women, and his habits of thinking,
 gave him a contempt for female endowments; and he would repeat, when
 wine had loosed his tongue, most of the common-place sarcasms levelled at
 them, by men who do not allow them to have minds, because mind would be
 an impediment to gross enjoyment. Men who are inferior to their fellow
 men, are always most anxious to establish their superiority over women.
 But where are these reflections leading me?
 
 "Women who have lost their husband's affection, are justly reproved for
 neglecting their persons, and not taking the same pains to keep, as to
 gain a heart; but who thinks of giving the same advice to men, though
 women are continually stigmatized for being attached to fops; and from
 the nature of their education, are more susceptible of disgust? Yet why a
 woman should be expected to endure a sloven, with more patience than a
 man, and magnanimously to govern herself, I cannot conceive; unless it be
 supposed arrogant in her to look for respect as well as a maintenance. It
 is not easy to be pleased, because, after promising to love, in different
 circumstances, we are told that it is our duty. I cannot, I am sure
 (though, when attending the sick, I never felt disgust) forget my own
 sensations, when rising with health and spirit, and after scenting the
 sweet morning, I have met my husband at the breakfast table. The active
 attention I had been giving to domestic regulations, which were generally
 settled before he rose, or a walk, gave a glow to my countenance, that
 contrasted with his squallid appearance. The squeamishness of stomach
 alone, produced by the last night's intemperance, which he took no pains
 to conceal, destroyed my appetite. I think I now see him lolling in an
 arm-chair, in a dirty powdering gown, soiled linen, ungartered stockings,
 and tangled hair, yawning and stretching himself. The newspaper was
 immediately called for, if not brought in on the tea-board, from which he
 would scarcely lift his eyes while I poured out the tea, excepting to ask
 for some brandy to put into it, or to declare that he could not eat. In
 answer to any question, in his best humour, it was a drawling 'What do
 you say, child?' But if I demanded money for the house expences, which I
 put off till the last moment, his customary reply, often prefaced with an
 oath, was, 'Do you think me, madam, made of money?'--The butcher, the
 baker, must wait; and, what was worse, I was often obliged to witness
 his surly dismission of tradesmen, who were in want of their money, and
 whom I sometimes paid with the presents my uncle gave me for my own use.
 
 "At this juncture my father's mistress, by terrifying his conscience,
 prevailed on him to marry her; he was already become a methodist; and my
 brother, who now practised for himself, had discovered a flaw in the
 settlement made on my mother's children, which set it aside, and he
 allowed my father, whose distress made him submit to any thing, a tithe
 of his own, or rather our fortune.
 
 "My sisters had left school, but were unable to endure home, which my
 father's wife rendered as disagreeable as possible, to get rid of girls
 whom she regarded as spies on her conduct. They were accomplished, yet
 you can (may you never be reduced to the same destitute state!) scarcely
 conceive the trouble I had to place them in the situation of governesses,
 the only one in which even a well-educated woman, with more than ordinary
 talents, can struggle for a subsistence; and even this is a dependence
 next to menial. Is it then surprising, that so many forlorn women, with
 human passions and feelings, take refuge in infamy? Alone in large
 mansions, I say alone, because they had no companions with whom they
 could converse on equal terms, or from whom they could expect the
 endearments of affection, they grew melancholy, and the sound of joy made
 them sad; and the youngest, having a more delicate frame, fell into a
 decline. It was with great difficulty that I, who now almost supported
 the house by loans from my uncle, could prevail on the _master_ of it, to
 allow her a room to die in. I watched her sick bed for some months, and
 then closed her eyes, gentle spirit! for ever. She was pretty, with very
 engaging manners; yet had never an opportunity to marry, excepting to a
 very old man. She had abilities sufficient to have shone in any
 profession, had there been any professions for women, though she shrunk
 at the name of milliner or mantua-maker as degrading to a gentlewoman. I
 would not term this feeling false pride to any one but you, my child,
 whom I fondly hope to see (yes; I will indulge the hope for a moment!)
 possessed of that energy of character which gives dignity to any station;
 and with that clear, firm spirit that will enable you to choose a
 situation for yourself, or submit to be classed in the lowest, if it be
 the only one in which you can be the mistress of your own actions.
 
 "Soon after the death of my sister, an incident occurred, to prove to me
 that the heart of a libertine is dead to natural affection; and to
 convince me, that the being who has appeared all tenderness, to gratify a
 selfish passion, is as regardless of the innocent fruit of it, as of the
 object, when the fit is over. I had casually observed an old,
 mean-looking woman, who called on my husband every two or three months to
 receive some money. One day entering the passage of his little
 counting-house, as she was going out, I heard her say, 'The child is very
 weak; she cannot live long, she will soon die out of your way, so you
 need not grudge her a little physic.'
 
 "'So much the better,' he replied, 'and pray mind your own business, good
 woman.'
 
 "I was struck by his unfeeling, inhuman tone of voice, and drew back,
 determined when the woman came again, to try to speak to her, not out of
 curiosity, I had heard enough, but with the hope of being useful to a
 poor, outcast girl.
 
 "A month or two elapsed before I saw this woman again; and then she had a
 child in her hand that tottered along, scarcely able to sustain her own
 weight. They were going away, to return at the hour Mr. Venables was
 expected; he was now from home. I desired the woman to walk into the
 parlour. She hesitated, yet obeyed. I assured her that I should not
 mention to my husband (the word seemed to weigh on my respiration), that
 I had seen her, or his child. The woman stared at me with astonishment;
 and I turned my eyes on the squalid object [that accompanied her.] She
 could hardly support herself, her complexion was sallow, and her eyes
 inflamed, with an indescribable look of cunning, mixed with the wrinkles
 produced by the peevishness of pain.
 
 "'Poor child!' I exclaimed. 'Ah! you may well say poor child,' replied
 the woman. 'I brought her here to see whether he would have the heart to
 look at her, and not get some advice. I do not know what they deserve who
 nursed her. Why, her legs bent under her like a bow when she came to me,
 and she has never been well since; but, if they were no better paid than
 I am, it is not to be wondered at, sure enough.'
 
 "On further enquiry I was informed, that this miserable spectacle was the
 daughter of a servant, a country girl, who caught Mr. Venables' eye, and
 whom he seduced. On his marriage he sent her away, her situation being
 too visible. After her delivery, she was thrown on the town; and died in
 an hospital within the year. The babe was sent to a parish-nurse, and
 afterwards to this woman, who did not seem much better; but what was to
 be expected from such a close bargain? She was only paid three shillings
 a week for board and washing.
 
 "The woman begged me to give her some old clothes for the child, assuring
 me, that she was almost afraid to ask master for money to buy even a
 pair of shoes.
 
 "I grew sick at heart. And, fearing Mr. Venables might enter, and oblige
 me to express my abhorrence, I hastily enquired where she lived, promised
 to pay her two shillings a week more, and to call on her in a day or two;
 putting a trifle into her hand as a proof of my good intention.
 
 "If the state of this child affected me, what were my feelings at a
 discovery I made respecting Peggy----?[22-A]
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [22-A] The manuscript is imperfect here. An episode seems to have been
 intended, which was never committed to paper.
 
 EDITOR.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. X.
 
 
 "MY father's situation was now so distressing, that I prevailed on my
 uncle to accompany me to visit him; and to lend me his assistance, to
 prevent the whole property of the family from becoming the prey of my
 brother's rapacity; for, to extricate himself out of present
 difficulties, my father was totally regardless of futurity. I took down
 with me some presents for my step-mother; it did not require an effort
 for me to treat her with civility, or to forget the past.
 
 "This was the first time I had visited my native village, since my
 marriage. But with what different emotions did I return from the busy
 world, with a heavy weight of experience benumbing my imagination, to
 scenes, that whispered recollections of joy and hope most eloquently to
 my heart! The first scent of the wild flowers from the heath, thrilled
 through my veins, awakening every sense to pleasure. The icy hand of
 despair seemed to be removed from my bosom; and--forgetting my
 husband--the nurtured visions of a romantic mind, bursting on me with all
 their original wildness and gay exuberance, were again hailed as sweet
 realities. I forgot, with equal facility, that I ever felt sorrow, or
 knew care in the country; while a transient rainbow stole athwart the
 cloudy sky of despondency. The picturesque form of several favourite
 trees, and the porches of rude cottages, with their smiling hedges, were
 recognized with the gladsome playfulness of childish vivacity. I could
 have kissed the chickens that pecked on the common; and longed to pat the
 cows, and frolic with the dogs that sported on it. I gazed with delight
 on the windmill, and thought it lucky that it should be in motion, at the
 moment I passed by; and entering the dear green lane, which led directly
 to the village, the sound of the well-known rookery gave that sentimental
 tinge to the varying sensations of my active soul, which only served to
 heighten the lustre of the luxuriant scenery. But, spying, as I advanced,
 the spire, peeping over the withered tops of the aged elms that composed
 the rookery, my thoughts flew immediately to the church-yard, and tears
 of affection, such was the effect of my imagination, bedewed my mother's
 grave! Sorrow gave place to devotional feelings. I wandered through the
 church in fancy, as I used sometimes to do on a Saturday evening. I
 recollected with what fervour I addressed the God of my youth: and once
 more with rapturous love looked above my sorrows to the Father of nature.
 I pause--feeling forcibly all the emotions I am describing; and
 (reminded, as I register my sorrows, of the sublime calm I have felt,
 when in some tremendous solitude, my soul rested on itself, and seemed to
 fill the universe) I insensibly breathe soft, hushing every wayward
 emotion, as if fearing to sully with a sigh, a contentment so extatic.
 
 "Having settled my father's affairs, and, by my exertions in his favour,
 made my brother my sworn foe, I returned to London. My husband's conduct
 was now changed; I had during my absence, received several affectionate,
 penitential letters from him; and he seemed on my arrival, to wish by his
 behaviour to prove his sincerity. I could not then conceive why he acted
 thus; and, when the suspicion darted into my head, that it might arise
 from observing my increasing influence with my uncle, I almost despised
 myself for imagining that such a degree of debasing selfishness could
 exist.
 
 "He became, unaccountable as was the change, tender and attentive; and,
 attacking my weak side, made a confession of his follies, and lamented
 the embarrassments in which I, who merited a far different fate, might be
 involved. He besought me to aid him with my counsel, praised my
 understanding, and appealed to the tenderness of my heart.
 
 "This conduct only inspired me with compassion. I wished to be his
 friend; but love had spread his rosy pinions, and fled far, far away; and
 had not (like some exquisite perfumes, the fine spirit of which is
 continually mingling with the air) left a fragrance behind, to mark where
 he had shook his wings. My husband's renewed caresses then became hateful
 to me; his brutality was tolerable, compared to his distasteful fondness.
 Still, compassion, and the fear of insulting his supposed feelings, by a
 want of sympathy, made me dissemble, and do violence to my delicacy. What
 a task!
 
 "Those who support a system of what I term false refinement, and will
 not allow great part of love in the female, as well as male breast, to
 spring in some respects involuntarily, may not admit that charms are as
 necessary to feed the passion, as virtues to convert the mellowing spirit
 into friendship. To such observers I have nothing to say, any more than
 to the moralists, who insist that women ought to, and can love their
 husbands, because it is their duty. To you, my child, I may add, with a
 heart tremblingly alive to your future conduct, some observations,
 dictated by my present feelings, on calmly reviewing this period of my
 life. When novelists or moralists praise as a virtue, a woman's coldness
 of constitution, and want of passion; and make her yield to the ardour of
 her lover out of sheer compassion, or to promote a frigid plan of future
 comfort, I am disgusted. They may be good women, in the ordinary
 acceptation of the phrase, and do no harm; but they appear to me not to
 have those 'finely fashioned nerves,' which render the senses exquisite.
 They may possess tenderness; but they want that fire of the imagination,
 which produces _active_ sensibility, and _positive_ virtue. How does the
 woman deserve to be characterized, who marries one man, with a heart and
 imagination devoted to another? Is she not an object of pity or contempt,
 when thus sacrilegiously violating the purity of her own feelings? Nay,
 it is as indelicate, when she is indifferent, unless she be
 constitutionally insensible; then indeed it is a mere affair of barter;
 and I have nothing to do with the secrets of trade. Yes; eagerly as I
 wish you to possess true rectitude of mind, and purity of affection, I
 must insist that a heartless conduct is the contrary of virtuous. Truth
 is the only basis of virtue; and we cannot, without depraving our minds,
 endeavour to please a lover or husband, but in proportion as he pleases
 us. Men, more effectually to enslave us, may inculcate this partial
 morality, and lose sight of virtue in subdividing it into the duties of
 particular stations; but let us not blush for nature without a cause!
 
 "After these remarks, I am ashamed to own, that I was pregnant. The
 greatest sacrifice of my principles in my whole life, was the allowing my
 husband again to be familiar with my person, though to this cruel act of
 self-denial, when I wished the earth to open and swallow me, you owe your
 birth; and I the unutterable pleasure of being a mother. There was
 something of delicacy in my husband's bridal attentions; but now his
 tainted breath, pimpled face, and blood-shot eyes, were not more
 repugnant to my senses, than his gross manners, and loveless familiarity
 to my taste.
 
 "A man would only be expected to maintain; yes, barely grant a
 subsistence, to a woman rendered odious by habitual intoxication; but who
 would expect him, or think it possible to love her? And unless 'youth,
 and genial years were flown,' it would be thought equally unreasonable to
 insist, [under penalty of] forfeiting almost every thing reckoned
 valuable in life, that he should not love another: whilst woman, weak in
 reason, impotent in will, is required to moralize, sentimentalize herself
 to stone, and pine her life away, labouring to reform her embruted mate.
 He may even spend in dissipation, and intemperance, the very intemperance
 which renders him so hateful, her property, and by stinting her expences,
 not permit her to beguile in society, a wearisome, joyless life; for over
 their mutual fortune she has no power, it must all pass through his hand.
 And if she be a mother, and in the present state of women, it is a great
 misfortune to be prevented from discharging the duties, and cultivating
 the affections of one, what has she not to endure?--But I have suffered
 the tenderness of one to lead me into reflections that I did not think of
 making, to interrupt my narrative--yet the full heart will overflow.
 
 "Mr. Venables' embarrassments did not now endear him to me; still,
 anxious to befriend him, I endeavoured to prevail on him to retrench his
 expences; but he had always some plausible excuse to give, to justify his
 not following my advice. Humanity, compassion, and the interest produced
 by a habit of living together, made me try to relieve, and sympathize
 with him; but, when I recollected that I was bound to live with such a
 being for ever--my heart died within me; my desire of improvement became
 languid, and baleful, corroding melancholy took possession of my soul.
 Marriage had bastilled me for life. I discovered in myself a capacity for
 the enjoyment of the various pleasures existence affords; yet, fettered
 by the partial laws of society, this fair globe was to me an universal
 blank.
 
 "When I exhorted my husband to economy, I referred to himself. I was
 obliged to practise the most rigid, or contract debts, which I had too
 much reason to fear would never be paid. I despised this paltry privilege
 of a wife, which can only be of use to the vicious or inconsiderate, and
 determined not to increase the torrent that was bearing him down. I was
 then ignorant of the extent of his fraudulent speculations, whom I was
 bound to honour and obey.
 
 "A woman neglected by her husband, or whose manners form a striking
 contrast with his, will always have men on the watch to soothe and
 flatter her. Besides, the forlorn state of a neglected woman, not
 destitute of personal charms, is particularly interesting, and rouses
 that species of pity, which is so near akin, it easily slides into love.
 A man of feeling thinks not of seducing, he is himself seduced by all the
 noblest emotions of his soul. He figures to himself all the sacrifices a
 woman of sensibility must make, and every situation in which his
 imagination places her, touches his heart, and fires his passions.
 Longing to take to his bosom the shorn lamb, and bid the drooping buds of
 hope revive, benevolence changes into passion: and should he then
 discover that he is beloved, honour binds him fast, though foreseeing
 that he may afterwards be obliged to pay severe damages to the man, who
 never appeared to value his wife's society, till he found that there was
 a chance of his being indemnified for the loss of it.
 
 "Such are the partial laws enacted by men; for, only to lay a stress on
 the dependent state of a woman in the grand question of the comforts
 arising from the possession of property, she is [even in this article]
 much more injured by the loss of the husband's affection, than he by that
 of his wife; yet where is she, condemned to the solitude of a deserted
 home, to look for a compensation from the woman, who seduces him from
 her? She cannot drive an unfaithful husband from his house, nor separate,
 or tear, his children from him, however culpable he may be; and he, still
 the master of his own fate, enjoys the smiles of a world, that would
 brand her with infamy, did she, seeking consolation, venture to
 retaliate.
 
 "These remarks are not dictated by experience; but merely by the
 compassion I feel for many amiable women, the _out-laws_ of the world.
 For myself, never encouraging any of the advances that were made to me,
 my lovers dropped off like the untimely shoots of spring. I did not even
 coquet with them; because I found, on examining myself, I could not
 coquet with a man without loving him a little; and I perceived that I
 should not be able to stop at the line of what are termed _innocent
 freedoms_, did I suffer any. My reserve was then the consequence of
 delicacy. Freedom of conduct has emancipated many women's minds; but my
 conduct has most rigidly been governed by my principles, till the
 improvement of my understanding has enabled me to discern the fallacy of
 prejudices at war with nature and reason.
 
 "Shortly after the change I have mentioned in my husband's conduct, my
 uncle was compelled by his declining health, to seek the succour of a
 milder climate, and embark for Lisbon. He left his will in the hands of a
 friend, an eminent solicitor; he had previously questioned me relative to
 my situation and state of mind, and declared very freely, that he could
 place no reliance on the stability of my husband's professions. He had
 been deceived in the unfolding of his character; he now thought it fixed
 in a train of actions that would inevitably lead to ruin and disgrace.
 
 "The evening before his departure, which we spent alone together, he
 folded me to his heart, uttering the endearing appellation of
 'child.'--My more than father! why was I not permitted to perform the
 last duties of one, and smooth the pillow of death? He seemed by his
 manner to be convinced that he should never see me more; yet requested
 me, most earnestly, to come to him, should I be obliged to leave my
 husband. He had before expressed his sorrow at hearing of my pregnancy,
 having determined to prevail on me to accompany him, till I informed him
 of that circumstance. He expressed himself unfeignedly sorry that any new
 tie should bind me to a man whom he thought so incapable of estimating my
 value; such was the kind language of affection.
 
 "I must repeat his own words; they made an indelible impression on my
 mind:
 
 "'The marriage state is certainly that in which women, generally
 speaking, can be most useful; but I am far from thinking that a woman,
 once married, ought to consider the engagement as indissoluble
 (especially if there be no children to reward her for sacrificing her
 feelings) in case her husband merits neither her love, nor esteem. Esteem
 will often supply the place of love; and prevent a woman from being
 wretched, though it may not make her happy. The magnitude of a sacrifice
 ought always to bear some proportion to the utility in view; and for a
 woman to live with a man, for whom she can cherish neither affection nor
 esteem, or even be of any use to him, excepting in the light of a
 house-keeper, is an abjectness of condition, the enduring of which no
 concurrence of circumstances can ever make a duty in the sight of God or
 just men. If indeed she submits to it merely to be maintained in
 idleness, she has no right to complain bitterly of her fate; or to act,
 as a person of independent character might, as if she had a title to
 disregard general rules.
 
 "'But the misfortune is, that many women only submit in appearance, and
 forfeit their own respect to secure their reputation in the world. The
 situation of a woman separated from her husband, is undoubtedly very
 different from that of a man who has left his wife. He, with lordly
 dignity, has shaken of a clog; and the allowing her food and raiment, is
 thought sufficient to secure his reputation from taint. And, should she
 have been inconsiderate, he will be celebrated for his generosity and
 forbearance. Such is the respect paid to the master-key of property! A
 woman, on the contrary, resigning what is termed her natural protector
 (though he never was so, but in name) is despised and shunned, for
 asserting the independence of mind distinctive of a rational being, and
 spurning at slavery.'
 
 "During the remainder of the evening, my uncle's tenderness led him
 frequently to revert to the subject, and utter, with increasing warmth,
 sentiments to the same purport. At length it was necessary to say
 'Farewell!'--and we parted--gracious God! to meet no more.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XI.
 
 
 "A GENTLEMAN of large fortune and of polished manners, had lately visited
 very frequently at our house, and treated me, if possible, with more
 respect than Mr. Venables paid him; my pregnancy was not yet visible, his
 society was a great relief to me, as I had for some time past, to avoid
 expence, confined myself very much at home. I ever disdained unnecessary,
 perhaps even prudent concealments; and my husband, with great ease,
 discovered the amount of my uncle's parting present. A copy of a writ was
 the stale pretext to extort it from me; and I had soon reason to believe
 that it was fabricated for the purpose. I acknowledge my folly in thus
 suffering myself to be continually imposed on. I had adhered to my
 resolution not to apply to my uncle, on the part of my husband, any more;
 yet, when I had received a sum sufficient to supply my own wants, and to
 enable me to pursue a plan I had in view, to settle my younger brother in
 a respectable employment, I allowed myself to be duped by Mr. Venables'
 shallow pretences, and hypocritical professions.
 
 "Thus did he pillage me and my family, thus frustrate all my plans of
 usefulness. Yet this was the man I was bound to respect and esteem: as if
 respect and esteem depended on an arbitrary will of our own! But a wife
 being as much a man's property as his horse, or his ass, she has nothing
 she can call her own. He may use any means to get at what the law
 considers as his, the moment his wife is in possession of it, even to the
 forcing of a lock, as Mr. Venables did, to search for notes in my
 writing-desk--and all this is done with a show of equity, because,
 forsooth, he is responsible for her maintenance.
 
 "The tender mother cannot _lawfully_ snatch from the gripe of the
 gambling spendthrift, or beastly drunkard, unmindful of his offspring,
 the fortune which falls to her by chance; or (so flagrant is the
 injustice) what she earns by her own exertions. No; he can rob her with
 impunity, even to waste publicly on a courtezan; and the laws of her
 country--if women have a country--afford her no protection or redress
 from the oppressor, unless she have the plea of bodily fear; yet how
 many ways are there of goading the soul almost to madness, equally
 unmanly, though not so mean? When such laws were framed, should not
 impartial lawgivers have first decreed, in the style of a great assembly,
 who recognized the existence of an _etre supreme_, to fix the national
 belief, that the husband should always be wiser and more virtuous than
 his wife, in order to entitle him, with a show of justice, to keep this
 idiot, or perpetual minor, for ever in bondage. But I must have done--on
 this subject, my indignation continually runs away with me.
 
 "The company of the gentleman I have already mentioned, who had a general
 acquaintance with literature and subjects of taste, was grateful to me;
 my countenance brightened up as he approached, and I unaffectedly
 expressed the pleasure I felt. The amusement his conversation afforded
 me, made it easy to comply with my husband's request, to endeavour to
 render our house agreeable to him.
 
 "His attentions became more pointed; but, as I was not of the number of
 women, whose virtue, as it is termed, immediately takes alarm, I
 endeavoured, rather by raillery than serious expostulation, to give a
 different turn to his conversation. He assumed a new mode of attack, and
 I was, for a while, the dupe of his pretended friendship.
 
 "I had, merely in the style of _badinage_, boasted of my conquest, and
 repeated his lover-like compliments to my husband. But he begged me, for
 God's sake, not to affront his friend, or I should destroy all his
 projects, and be his ruin. Had I had more affection for my husband, I
 should have expressed my contempt of this time-serving politeness: now I
 imagined that I only felt pity; yet it would have puzzled a casuist to
 point out in what the exact difference consisted.
 
 "This friend began now, in confidence, to discover to me the real state
 of my husband's affairs. 'Necessity,' said Mr. S----; why should I reveal
 his name? for he affected to palliate the conduct he could not excuse,
 'had led him to take such steps, by accommodation bills, buying goods on
 credit, to sell them for ready money, and similar transactions, that his
 character in the commercial world was gone. He was considered,' he added,
 lowering his voice, 'on 'Change as a swindler.'
 
 "I felt at that moment the first maternal pang. Aware of the evils my sex
 have to struggle with, I still wished, for my own consolation, to be the
 mother of a daughter; and I could not bear to think, that the _sins_ of
 her father's entailed disgrace, should be added to the ills to which
 woman is heir.
 
 "So completely was I deceived by these shows of friendship (nay, I
 believe, according to his interpretation, Mr. S--really was my friend)
 that I began to consult him respecting the best mode of retrieving my
 husband's character: it is the good name of a woman only that sets to
 rise no more. I knew not that he had been drawn into a whirlpool, out of
 which he had not the energy to attempt to escape. He seemed indeed
 destitute of the power of employing his faculties in any regular
 pursuit. His principles of action were so loose, and his mind so
 uncultivated, that every thing like order appeared to him in the shape of
 restraint; and, like men in the savage state, he required the strong
 stimulus of hope or fear, produced by wild speculations, in which the
 interests of others went for nothing, to keep his spirits awake. He one
 time possessed patriotism, but he knew not what it was to feel honest
 indignation; and pretended to be an advocate for liberty, when, with as
 little affection for the human race as for individuals, he thought of
 nothing but his own gratification. He was just such a citizen, as a
 father. The sums he adroitly obtained by a violation of the laws of his
 country, as well as those of humanity, he would allow a mistress to
 squander; though she was, with the same _sang froid_, consigned, as were
 his children, to poverty, when another proved more attractive.
 
 "On various pretences, his friend continued to visit me; and, observing
 my want of money, he tried to induce me to accept of pecuniary aid; but
 this offer I absolutely rejected, though it was made with such delicacy,
 I could not be displeased.
 
 "One day he came, as I thought accidentally, to dinner. My husband was
 very much engaged in business, and quitted the room soon after the cloth
 was removed. We conversed as usual, till confidential advice led again to
 love. I was extremely mortified. I had a sincere regard for him, and
 hoped that he had an equal friendship for me. I therefore began mildly to
 expostulate with him. This gentleness he mistook for coy encouragement;
 and he would not be diverted from the subject. Perceiving his mistake, I
 seriously asked him how, using such language to me, he could profess to
 be my husband's friend? A significant sneer excited my curiosity, and he,
 supposing this to be my only scruple, took a letter deliberately out of
 his pocket, saying, 'Your husband's honour is not inflexible. How could
 you, with your discernment, think it so? Why, he left the room this very
 day on purpose to give me an opportunity to explain myself; _he_ thought
 me too timid--too tardy.'
 
 "I snatched the letter with indescribable emotion. The purport of it was
 to invite him to dinner, and to ridicule his chivalrous respect for me.
 He assured him, 'that every woman had her price, and, with gross
 indecency, hinted, that he should be glad to have the duty of a husband
 taken off his hands. These he termed _liberal sentiments_. He advised him
 not to shock my romantic notions, but to attack my credulous generosity,
 and weak pity; and concluded with requesting him to lend him five hundred
 pounds for a month or six weeks.' I read this letter twice over; and the
 firm purpose it inspired, calmed the rising tumult of my soul. I rose
 deliberately, requested Mr. S---- to wait a moment, and instantly going
 into the counting-house, desired Mr. Venables to return with me to the
 dining-parlour.
 
 "He laid down his pen, and entered with me, without observing any change
 in my countenance. I shut the door, and, giving him the letter, simply
 asked, 'whether he wrote it, or was it a forgery?'
 
 "Nothing could equal his confusion. His friend's eye met his, and he
 muttered something about a joke--But I interrupted him--'It is
 sufficient--We part for ever.'
 
 "I continued, with solemnity, 'I have borne with your tyranny and
 infidelities. I disdain to utter what I have borne with. I thought you
 unprincipled, but not so decidedly vicious. I formed a tie, in the sight
 of heaven--I have held it sacred; even when men, more conformable to my
 taste, have made me feel--I despise all subterfuge!--that I was not dead
 to love. Neglected by you, I have resolutely stifled the enticing
 emotions, and respected the plighted faith you outraged. And you dare now
 to insult me, by selling me to prostitution!--Yes--equally lost to
 delicacy and principle--you dared sacrilegiously to barter the honour of
 the mother of your child.'
 
 "Then, turning to Mr. S----, I added, 'I call on you, Sir, to witness,'
 and I lifted my hands and eyes to heaven, 'that, as solemnly as I took
 his name, I now abjure it,' I pulled off my ring, and put it on the
 table; 'and that I mean immediately to quit his house, never to enter it
 more. I will provide for myself and child. I leave him as free as I am
 determined to be myself--he shall be answerable for no debts of mine.'
 
 "Astonishment closed their lips, till Mr. Venables, gently pushing his
 friend, with a forced smile, out of the room, nature for a moment
 prevailed, and, appearing like himself, he turned round, burning with
 rage, to me: but there was no terror in the frown, excepting when
 contrasted with the malignant smile which preceded it. He bade me 'leave
 the house at my peril; told me he despised my threats; I had no resource;
 I could not swear the peace against him!--I was not afraid of my
 life!--he had never struck me!'
 
 "He threw the letter in the fire, which I had incautiously left in his
 hands; and, quitting the room, locked the door on me.
 
 "When left alone, I was a moment or two before I could recollect myself.
 One scene had succeeded another with such rapidity, I almost doubted
 whether I was reflecting on a real event. 'Was it possible? Was I,
 indeed, free?'--Yes; free I termed myself, when I decidedly perceived
 the conduct I ought to adopt. How had I panted for liberty--liberty, that
 I would have purchased at any price, but that of my own esteem! I rose,
 and shook myself; opened the window, and methought the air never smelled
 so sweet. The face of heaven grew fairer as I viewed it, and the clouds
 seemed to flit away obedient to my wishes, to give my soul room to
 expand. I was all soul, and (wild as it may appear) felt as if I could
 have dissolved in the soft balmy gale that kissed my cheek, or have
 glided below the horizon on the glowing, descending beams. A seraphic
 satisfaction animated, without agitating my spirits; and my imagination
 collected, in visions sublimely terrible, or soothingly beautiful, an
 immense variety of the endless images, which nature affords, and fancy
 combines, of the grand and fair. The lustre of these bright picturesque
 sketches faded with the setting sun; but I was still alive to the calm
 delight they had diffused through my heart.
 
 "There may be advocates for matrimonial obedience, who, making a
 distinction between the duty of a wife and of a human being, may blame my
 conduct.--To them I write not--my feelings are not for them to analyze;
 and may you, my child, never be able to ascertain, by heart-rending
 experience, what your mother felt before the present emancipation of her
 mind!
 
 "I began to write a letter to my father, after closing one to my uncle;
 not to ask advice, but to signify my determination; when I was
 interrupted by the entrance of Mr. Venables. His manner was changed. His
 views on my uncle's fortune made him averse to my quitting his house, or
 he would, I am convinced, have been glad to have shaken off even the
 slight restraint my presence imposed on him; the restraint of showing me
 some respect. So far from having an affection for me, he really hated me,
 because he was convinced that I must despise him.
 
 "He told me, that, 'As I now had had time to cool and reflect, he did not
 doubt but that my prudence, and nice sense of propriety, would lead me to
 overlook what was passed.'
 
 "'Reflection,' I replied, 'had only confirmed my purpose, and no power on
 earth could divert me from it.'
 
 "Endeavouring to assume a soothing voice and look, when he would
 willingly have tortured me, to force me to feel his power, his
 countenance had an infernal expression, when he desired me, 'Not to
 expose myself to the servants, by obliging him to confine me in my
 apartment; if then I would give my promise not to quit the house
 precipitately, I should be free--and--.' I declared, interrupting him,
 'that I would promise nothing. I had no measures to keep with him--I was
 resolved, and would not condescend to subterfuge.'
 
 "He muttered, 'that I should soon repent of these preposterous airs;'
 and, ordering tea to be carried into my little study, which had a
 communication with my bed-chamber, he once more locked the door upon me,
 and left me to my own meditations. I had passively followed him up
 stairs, not wishing to fatigue myself with unavailing exertion.
 
 "Nothing calms the mind like a fixed purpose. I felt as if I had heaved
 a thousand weight from my heart; the atmosphere seemed lightened; and, if
 I execrated the institutions of society, which thus enable men to
 tyrannize over women, it was almost a disinterested sentiment. I
 disregarded present inconveniences, when my mind had done struggling with
 itself,--when reason and inclination had shaken hands and were at peace.
 I had no longer the cruel task before me, in endless perspective, aye,
 during the tedious for ever of life, of labouring to overcome my
 repugnance--of labouring to extinguish the hopes, the maybes of a lively
 imagination. Death I had hailed as my only chance for deliverance; but,
 while existence had still so many charms, and life promised happiness, I
 shrunk from the icy arms of an unknown tyrant, though far more inviting
 than those of the man, to whom I supposed myself bound without any other
 alternative; and was content to linger a little longer, waiting for I
 knew not what, rather than leave 'the warm precincts of the cheerful
 day,' and all the unenjoyed affection of my nature.
 
 "My present situation gave a new turn to my reflection; and I wondered
 (now the film seemed to be withdrawn, that obscured the piercing sight of
 reason) how I could, previously to the deciding outrage, have considered
 myself as everlastingly united to vice and folly? 'Had an evil genius
 cast a spell at my birth; or a demon stalked out of chaos, to perplex my
 understanding, and enchain my will, with delusive prejudices?'
 
 "I pursued this train of thinking; it led me out of myself, to expatiate
 on the misery peculiar to my sex. 'Are not,' I thought, 'the despots for
 ever stigmatized, who, in the wantonness of power, commanded even the
 most atrocious criminals to be chained to dead bodies? though surely
 those laws are much more inhuman, which forge adamantine fetters to bind
 minds together, that never can mingle in social communion! What indeed
 can equal the wretchedness of that state, in which there is no
 alternative, but to extinguish the affections, or encounter infamy?'
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XII.
 
 
 "TOWARDS midnight Mr. Venables entered my chamber; and, with calm
 audacity preparing to go to bed, he bade me make haste, 'for that was the
 best place for husbands and wives to end their differences. He had been
 drinking plentifully to aid his courage.
 
 "I did not at first deign to reply. But perceiving that he affected to
 take my silence for consent, I told him that, 'If he would not go to
 another bed, or allow me, I should sit up in my study all night.' He
 attempted to pull me into the chamber, half joking. But I resisted; and,
 as he had determined not to give me any reason for saying that he used
 violence, after a few more efforts, he retired, cursing my obstinacy, to
 bed.
 
 "I sat musing some time longer; then, throwing my cloak around me,
 prepared for sleep on a sopha. And, so fortunate seemed my deliverance,
 so sacred the pleasure of being thus wrapped up in myself, that I slept
 profoundly, and woke with a mind composed to encounter the struggles of
 the day. Mr. Venables did not wake till some hours after; and then he
 came to me half-dressed, yawning and stretching, with haggard eyes, as if
 he scarcely recollected what had passed the preceding evening. He fixed
 his eyes on me for a moment, then, calling me a fool, asked 'How long I
 intended to continue this pretty farce? For his part, he was devilish
 sick of it; but this was the plague of marrying women who pretended to
 know something.'
 
 "I made no other reply to this harangue, than to say, 'That he ought to
 be glad to get rid of a woman so unfit to be his companion--and that any
 change in my conduct would be mean dissimulation; for maturer reflection
 only gave the sacred seal of reason to my first resolution.'
 
 "He looked as if he could have stamped with impatience, at being obliged
 to stifle his rage; but, conquering his anger (for weak people, whose
 passions seem the most ungovernable, restrain them with the greatest
 ease, when they have a sufficient motive), he exclaimed, 'Very pretty,
 upon my soul! very pretty, theatrical flourishes! Pray, fair Roxana,
 stoop from your altitudes, and remember that you are acting a part in
 real life.'
 
 "He uttered this speech with a self-satisfied air, and went down stairs
 to dress.
 
 "In about an hour he came to me again; and in the same tone said, 'That
 he came as my gentleman-usher to hand me down to breakfast.
 
 "'Of the black rod?' asked I.
 
 "This question, and the tone in which I asked it, a little disconcerted
 him. To say the truth, I now felt no resentment; my firm resolution to
 free myself from my ignoble thraldom, had absorbed the various emotions
 which, during six years, had racked my soul. The duty pointed out by my
 principles seemed clear; and not one tender feeling intruded to make me
 swerve: The dislike which my husband had inspired was strong; but it only
 led me to wish to avoid, to wish to let him drop out of my memory; there
 was no misery, no torture that I would not deliberately have chosen,
 rather than renew my lease of servitude.
 
 "During the breakfast, he attempted to reason with me on the folly of
 romantic sentiments; for this was the indiscriminate epithet he gave to
 every mode of conduct or thinking superior to his own. He asserted, 'that
 all the world were governed by their own interest; those who pretended to
 be actuated by different motives, were only deeper knaves, or fools
 crazed by books, who took for gospel all the rodomantade nonsense written
 by men who knew nothing of the world. For his part, he thanked God, he
 was no hypocrite; and, if he stretched a point sometimes, it was always
 with an intention of paying every man his own.'
 
 "He then artfully insinuated, 'that he daily expected a vessel to
 arrive, a successful speculation, that would make him easy for the
 present, and that he had several other schemes actually depending, that
 could not fail. He had no doubt of becoming rich in a few years, though
 he had been thrown back by some unlucky adventures at the setting out.'
 
 "I mildly replied, 'That I wished he might not involve himself still
 deeper.'
 
 "He had no notion that I was governed by a decision of judgment, not to
 be compared with a mere spurt of resentment. He knew not what it was to
 feel indignation against vice, and often boasted of his placable temper,
 and readiness to forgive injuries. True; for he only considered the being
 deceived, as an effort of skill he had not guarded against; and then,
 with a cant of candour, would observe, 'that he did not know how he
 might himself have been tempted to act in the same circumstances.' And,
 as his heart never opened to friendship, it never was wounded by
 disappointment. Every new acquaintance he protested, it is true, was 'the
 cleverest fellow in the world;' and he really thought so; till the
 novelty of his conversation or manners ceased to have any effect on his
 sluggish spirits. His respect for rank or fortune was more permanent,
 though he chanced to have no design of availing himself of the influence
 of either to promote his own views.
 
 "After a prefatory conversation,--my blood (I thought it had been cooler)
 flushed over my whole countenance as he spoke--he alluded to my
 situation. He desired me to reflect--'and act like a prudent woman, as
 the best proof of my superior understanding; for he must own I had sense,
 did I know how to use it. I was not,' he laid a stress on his words,
 'without my passions; and a husband was a convenient cloke.--He was
 liberal in his way of thinking; and why might not we, like many other
 married people, who were above vulgar prejudices, tacitly consent to let
 each other follow their own inclination?--He meant nothing more, in the
 letter I made the ground of complaint; and the pleasure which I seemed to
 take in Mr. S.'s company, led him to conclude, that he was not
 disagreeable to me.'
 
 "A clerk brought in the letters of the day, and I, as I often did, while
 he was discussing subjects of business, went to the _piano forte_, and
 began to play a favourite air to restore myself, as it were, to nature,
 and drive the sophisticated sentiments I had just been obliged to listen
 to, out of my soul.
 
 "They had excited sensations similar to those I have felt, in viewing the
 squalid inhabitants of some of the lanes and back streets of the
 metropolis, mortified at being compelled to consider them as my
 fellow-creatures, as if an ape had claimed kindred with me. Or, as when
 surrounded by a mephitical fog, I have wished to have a volley of cannon
 fired, to clear the incumbered atmosphere, and give me room to breathe
 and move.
 
 "My spirits were all in arms, and I played a kind of extemporary prelude.
 The cadence was probably wild and impassioned, while, lost in thought, I
 made the sounds a kind of echo to my train of thinking.
 
 "Pausing for a moment, I met Mr. Venables' eyes. He was observing me with
 an air of conceited satisfaction, as much as to say--'My last insinuation
 has done the business--she begins to know her own interest.' Then
 gathering up his letters, he said, 'That he hoped he should hear no more
 romantic stuff, well enough in a miss just come from boarding school;'
 and went, as was his custom, to the counting-house. I still continued
 playing; and, turning to a sprightly lesson, I executed it with uncommon
 vivacity. I heard footsteps approach the door, and was soon convinced
 that Mr. Venables was listening; the consciousness only gave more
 animation to my fingers. He went down into the kitchen, and the cook,
 probably by his desire, came to me, to know what I would please to order
 for dinner. Mr. Venables came into the parlour again, with apparent
 carelessness. I perceived that the cunning man was over-reaching himself;
 and I gave my directions as usual, and left the room.
 
 "While I was making some alteration in my dress, Mr. Venables peeped in,
 and, begging my pardon for interrupting me, disappeared. I took up some
 work (I could not read), and two or three messages were sent to me,
 probably for no other purpose, but to enable Mr. Venables to ascertain
 what I was about.
 
 "I listened whenever I heard the street-door open; at last I imagined I
 could distinguish Mr. Venables' step, going out. I laid aside my work;
 my heart palpitated; still I was afraid hastily to enquire; and I waited
 a long half hour, before I ventured to ask the boy whether his master was
 in the counting-house?
 
 "Being answered in the negative, I bade him call me a coach, and
 collecting a few necessaries hastily together, with a little parcel of
 letters and papers which I had collected the preceding evening, I hurried
 into it, desiring the coachman to drive to a distant part of the town.
 
 "I almost feared that the coach would break down before I got out of the
 street; and, when I turned the corner, I seemed to breathe a freer air. I
 was ready to imagine that I was rising above the thick atmosphere of
 earth; or I felt, as wearied souls might be supposed to feel on entering
 another state of existence.
 
 "I stopped at one or two stands of coaches to elude pursuit, and then
 drove round the skirts of the town to seek for an obscure lodging, where
 I wished to remain concealed, till I could avail myself of my uncle's
 protection. I had resolved to assume my own name immediately, and openly
 to avow my determination, without any formal vindication, the moment I
 had found a home, in which I could rest free from the daily alarm of
 expecting to see Mr. Venables enter.
 
 "I looked at several lodgings; but finding that I could not, without a
 reference to some acquaintance, who might inform my tyrant, get
 admittance into a decent apartment--men have not all this trouble--I
 thought of a woman whom I had assisted to furnish a little haberdasher's
 shop, and who I knew had a first floor to let.
 
 "I went to her, and though I could not persuade her, that the quarrel
 between me and Mr. Venables would never be made up, still she agreed to
 conceal me for the present; yet assuring me at the same time, shaking her
 head, that, when a woman was once married, she must bear every thing. Her
 pale face, on which appeared a thousand haggard lines and delving
 wrinkles, produced by what is emphatically termed fretting, inforced her
 remark; and I had afterwards an opportunity of observing the treatment
 she had to endure, which grizzled her into patience. She toiled from
 morning till night; yet her husband would rob the till, and take away the
 money reserved for paying bills; and, returning home drunk, he would
 beat her if she chanced to offend him, though she had a child at the
 breast.
 
 "These scenes awoke me at night; and, in the morning, I heard her, as
 usual, talk to her dear Johnny--he, forsooth, was her master; no slave in
 the West Indies had one more despotic; but fortunately she was of the
 true Russian breed of wives.
 
 "My mind, during the few past days, seemed, as it were, disengaged from
 my body; but, now the struggle was over, I felt very forcibly the effect
 which perturbation of spirits produces on a woman in my situation.
 
 "The apprehension of a miscarriage, obliged me to confine myself to my
 apartment near a fortnight; but I wrote to my uncle's friend for money,
 promising 'to call on him, and explain my situation, when I was well
 enough to go out; mean time I earnestly intreated him, not to mention my
 place of abode to any one, lest my husband--such the law considered
 him--should disturb the mind he could not conquer. I mentioned my
 intention of setting out for Lisbon, to claim my uncle's protection, the
 moment my health would permit.'
 
 "The tranquillity however, which I was recovering, was soon interrupted.
 My landlady came up to me one day, with eyes swollen with weeping, unable
 to utter what she was commanded to say. She declared, 'That she was never
 so miserable in her life; that she must appear an ungrateful monster; and
 that she would readily go down on her knees to me, to intreat me to
 forgive her, as she had done to her husband to spare her the cruel task.'
 Sobs prevented her from proceeding, or answering my impatient enquiries,
 to know what she meant.
 
 "When she became a little more composed, she took a newspaper out of her
 pocket, declaring, 'that her heart smote her, but what could she do?--she
 must obey her husband.' I snatched the paper from her. An advertisement
 quickly met my eye, purporting, that 'Maria Venables had, without any
 assignable cause, absconded from her husband; and any person harbouring
 her, was menaced with the utmost severity of the law.'
 
 "Perfectly acquainted with Mr. Venables' meanness of soul, this step did
 not excite my surprise, and scarcely my contempt. Resentment in my
 breast, never survived love. I bade the poor woman, in a kind tone, wipe
 her eyes, and request her husband to come up, and speak to me himself.
 
 "My manner awed him. He respected a lady, though not a woman; and began
 to mutter out an apology.
 
 "'Mr. Venables was a rich gentleman; he wished to oblige me, but he had
 suffered enough by the law already, to tremble at the thought; besides,
 for certain, we should come together again, and then even I should not
 thank him for being accessary to keeping us asunder.--A husband and wife
 were, God knows, just as one,--and all would come round at last.' He
 uttered a drawling 'Hem!' and then with an arch look, added--'Master
 might have had his little frolics--but--Lord bless your heart!--men
 would be men while the world stands.'
 
 "To argue with this privileged first-born of reason, I perceived, would
 be vain. I therefore only requested him to let me remain another day at
 his house, while I sought for a lodging; and not to inform Mr. Venables
 that I had ever been sheltered there.
 
 "He consented, because he had not the courage to refuse a person for whom
 he had an habitual respect; but I heard the pent-up choler burst forth in
 curses, when he met his wife, who was waiting impatiently at the foot of
 the stairs, to know what effect my expostulations would have on him.
 
 "Without wasting any time in the fruitless indulgence of vexation, I once
 more set out in search of an abode in which I could hide myself for a
 few weeks.
 
 "Agreeing to pay an exorbitant price, I hired an apartment, without any
 reference being required relative to my character: indeed, a glance at my
 shape seemed to say, that my motive for concealment was sufficiently
 obvious. Thus was I obliged to shroud my head in infamy.
 
 "To avoid all danger of detection--I use the appropriate word, my child,
 for I was hunted out like a felon--I determined to take possession of my
 new lodgings that very evening.
 
 "I did not inform my landlady where I was going. I knew that she had a
 sincere affection for me, and would willingly have run any risk to show
 her gratitude; yet I was fully convinced, that a few kind words from
 Johnny would have found the woman in her, and her dear benefactress, as
 she termed me in an agony of tears, would have been sacrificed, to
 recompense her tyrant for condescending to treat her like an equal. He
 could be kind-hearted, as she expressed it, when he pleased. And this
 thawed sternness, contrasted with his habitual brutality, was the more
 acceptable, and could not be purchased at too dear a rate.
 
 "The sight of the advertisement made me desirous of taking refuge with my
 uncle, let what would be the consequence; and I repaired in a hackney
 coach (afraid of meeting some person who might chance to know me, had I
 walked) to the chambers of my uncle's friend.
 
 "He received me with great politeness (my uncle had already prepossessed
 him in my favour), and listened, with interest, to my explanation of the
 motives which had induced me to fly from home, and skulk in obscurity,
 with all the timidity of fear that ought only to be the companion of
 guilt. He lamented, with rather more gallantry than, in my situation, I
 thought delicate, that such a woman should be thrown away on a man
 insensible to the charms of beauty or grace. He seemed at a loss what to
 advise me to do, to evade my husband's search, without hastening to my
 uncle, whom, he hesitating said, I might not find alive. He uttered this
 intelligence with visible regret; requested me, at least, to wait for the
 arrival of the next packet; offered me what money I wanted, and promised
 to visit me.
 
 "He kept his word; still no letter arrived to put an end to my painful
 state of suspense. I procured some books and music, to beguile the
 tedious solitary days.
 
     'Come, ever smiling Liberty,
     'And with thee bring thy jocund train:'
 
 I sung--and sung till, saddened by the strain of joy, I bitterly lamented
 the fate that deprived me of all social pleasure. Comparative liberty
 indeed I had possessed myself of; but the jocund train lagged far
 behind!
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XIII.
 
 
 "BY watching my only visitor, my uncle's friend, or by some other means,
 Mr. Venables discovered my residence, and came to enquire for me. The
 maid-servant assured him there was no such person in the house. A bustle
 ensued--I caught the alarm--listened--distinguished his voice, and
 immediately locked the door. They suddenly grew still; and I waited near
 a quarter of an hour, before I heard him open the parlour door, and mount
 the stairs with the mistress of the house, who obsequiously declared that
 she knew nothing of me.
 
 "Finding my door locked, she requested me to 'open it, and prepare to go
 home with my husband, poor gentleman! to whom I had already occasioned
 sufficient vexation.' I made no reply. Mr. Venables then, in an assumed
 tone of softness, intreated me, 'to consider what he suffered, and my own
 reputation, and get the better of childish resentment.' He ran on in the
 same strain, pretending to address me, but evidently adapting his
 discourse to the capacity of the landlady; who, at every pause, uttered
 an exclamation of pity; or 'Yes, to be sure--Very true, sir.'
 
 "Sick of the farce, and perceiving that I could not avoid the hated
 interview, I opened the door, and he entered. Advancing with easy
 assurance to take my hand, I shrunk from his touch, with an involuntary
 start, as I should have done from a noisome reptile, with more disgust
 than terror. His conductress was retiring, to give us, as she said, an
 opportunity to accommodate matters. But I bade her come in, or I would go
 out; and curiosity impelled her to obey me.
 
 "Mr. Venables began to expostulate; and this woman, proud of his
 confidence, to second him. But I calmly silenced her, in the midst of a
 vulgar harangue, and turning to him, asked, 'Why he vainly tormented me?
 declaring that no power on earth should force me back to his house.'
 
 "After a long altercation, the particulars of which, it would be to no
 purpose to repeat, he left the room. Some time was spent in loud
 conversation in the parlour below, and I discovered that he had brought
 his friend, an attorney, with him.
 
                     *   *   *   *   *   *   *
 *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *
 *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *   *
 *   *
 
 The tumult on the landing place, brought out a gentleman, who had
 recently taken apartments in the house; he enquired why I was thus
 assailed[91-A]? The voluble attorney instantly repeated the trite tale.
 The stranger turned to me, observing, with the most soothing politeness
 and manly interest, that 'my countenance told a very different story.' He
 added, 'that I should not be insulted, or forced out of the house, by any
 body.'
 
 "'Not by her husband?' asked the attorney.
 
 "'No, sir, not by her husband.' Mr. Venables advanced towards him--But
 there was a decision in his attitude, that so well seconded that of his
 voice,
 
 *  *  *  *  *  *  *  *  *  *  *
 *  *  *  *  *  *  *  *  *  *  *
 *  *  *  *
 
 They left the house: at the same time protesting, that any one that
 should dare to protect me, should be prosecuted with the utmost rigour.
 
 "They were scarcely out of the house, when my landlady came up to me
 again, and begged my pardon, in a very different tone. For, though Mr.
 Venables had bid her, at her peril, harbour me, he had not attended, I
 found, to her broad hints, to discharge the lodging. I instantly promised
 to pay her, and make her a present to compensate for my abrupt departure,
 if she would procure me another lodging, at a sufficient distance; and
 she, in return, repeating Mr. Venables' plausible tale, I raised her
 indignation, and excited her sympathy, by telling her briefly the truth.
 
 "She expressed her commiseration with such honest warmth, that I felt
 soothed; for I have none of that fastidious sensitiveness, which a vulgar
 accent or gesture can alarm to the disregard of real kindness. I was ever
 glad to perceive in others the humane feelings I delighted to exercise;
 and the recollection of some ridiculous characteristic circumstances,
 which have occurred in a moment of emotion, has convulsed me with
 laughter, though at the instant I should have thought it sacrilegious to
 have smiled. Your improvement, my dearest girl, being ever present to me
 while I write, I note these feelings, because women, more accustomed to
 observe manners than actions, are too much alive to ridicule. So much so,
 that their boasted sensibility is often stifled by false delicacy. True
 sensibility, the sensibility which is the auxiliary of virtue, and the
 soul of genius, is in society so occupied with the feelings of others, as
 scarcely to regard its own sensations. With what reverence have I looked
 up at my uncle, the dear parent of my mind! when I have seen the sense of
 his own sufferings, of mind and body, absorbed in a desire to comfort
 those, whose misfortunes were comparatively trivial. He would have been
 ashamed of being as indulgent to himself, as he was to others. 'Genuine
 fortitude,' he would assert, 'consisted in governing our own emotions,
 and making allowance for the weaknesses in our friends, that we would not
 tolerate in ourselves.' But where is my fond regret leading me!
 
 "'Women must be submissive,' said my landlady. 'Indeed what could most
 women do? Who had they to maintain them, but their husbands? Every woman,
 and especially a lady, could not go through rough and smooth, as she had
 done, to earn a little bread.'
 
 "She was in a talking mood, and proceeded to inform me how she had been
 used in the world. 'She knew what it was to have a bad husband, or she
 did not know who should.' I perceived that she would be very much
 mortified, were I not to attend to her tale, and I did not attempt to
 interrupt her, though I wished her, as soon as possible, to go out in
 search of a new abode for me, where I could once more hide my head.
 
 "She began by telling me, 'That she had saved a little money in service;
 and was over-persuaded (we must all be in love once in our lives) to
 marry a likely man, a footman in the family, not worth a groat. My plan,'
 she continued, 'was to take a house, and let out lodgings; and all went
 on well, till my husband got acquainted with an impudent slut, who chose
 to live on other people's means--and then all went to rack and ruin. He
 ran in debt to buy her fine clothes, such clothes as I never thought of
 wearing myself, and--would you believe it?--he signed an execution on my
 very goods, bought with the money I worked so hard to get; and they came
 and took my bed from under me, before I heard a word of the matter. Aye,
 madam, these are misfortunes that you gentlefolks know nothing of,--but
 sorrow is sorrow, let it come which way it will.
 
 "'I sought for a service again--very hard, after having a house of my
 own!--but he used to follow me, and kick up such a riot when he was
 drunk, that I could not keep a place; nay, he even stole my clothes, and
 pawned them; and when I went to the pawnbroker's, and offered to take my
 oath that they were not bought with a farthing of his money, they said,
 'It was all as one, my husband had a right to whatever I had.'
 
 "'At last he listed for a soldier, and I took a house, making an
 agreement to pay for the furniture by degrees; and I almost starved
 myself, till I once more got before-hand in the world.
 
 "'After an absence of six years (God forgive me! I thought he was dead)
 my husband returned; found me out, and came with such a penitent face, I
 forgave him, and clothed him from head to foot. But he had not been a
 week in the house, before some of his creditors arrested him; and, he
 selling my goods, I found myself once more reduced to beggary; for I was
 not as well able to work, go to bed late, and rise early, as when I
 quitted service; and then I thought it hard enough. He was soon tired of
 me, when there was nothing more to be had, and left me again.
 
 "'I will not tell you how I was buffeted about, till, hearing for certain
 that he had died in an hospital abroad, I once more returned to my old
 occupation; but have not yet been able to get my head above water: so,
 madam, you must not be angry if I am afraid to run any risk, when I know
 so well, that women have always the worst of it, when law is to decide.'
 
 "After uttering a few more complaints, I prevailed on my landlady to go
 out in quest of a lodging; and, to be more secure, I condescended to the
 mean shift of changing my name.
 
 "But why should I dwell on similar incidents!--I was hunted, like an
 infected beast, from three different apartments, and should not have been
 allowed to rest in any, had not Mr. Venables, informed of my uncle's
 dangerous state of health, been inspired with the fear of hurrying me out
 of the world as I advanced in my pregnancy, by thus tormenting and
 obliging me to take sudden journeys to avoid him; and then his
 speculations on my uncle's fortune must prove abortive.
 
 "One day, when he had pursued me to an inn, I fainted, hurrying from him;
 and, falling down, the sight of my blood alarmed him, and obtained a
 respite for me. It is strange that he should have retained any hope,
 after observing my unwavering determination; but, from the mildness of my
 behaviour, when I found all my endeavours to change his disposition
 unavailing, he formed an erroneous opinion of my character, imagining
 that, were we once more together, I should part with the money he could
 not legally force from me, with the same facility as formerly. My
 forbearance and occasional sympathy he had mistaken for weakness of
 character; and, because he perceived that I disliked resistance, he
 thought my indulgence and compassion mere selfishness, and never
 discovered that the fear of being unjust, or of unnecessarily wounding
 the feelings of another, was much more painful to me, than any thing I
 could have to endure myself. Perhaps it was pride which made me imagine,
 that I could bear what I dreaded to inflict; and that it was often easier
 to suffer, than to see the sufferings of others.
 
 "I forgot to mention that, during this persecution, I received a letter
 from my uncle, informing me, 'that he only found relief from continual
 change of air; and that he intended to return when the spring was a
 little more advanced (it was now the middle of February), and then we
 would plan a journey to Italy, leaving the fogs and cares of England far
 behind.' He approved of my conduct, promised to adopt my child, and
 seemed to have no doubt of obliging Mr. Venables to hear reason. He wrote
 to his friend, by the same post, desiring him to call on Mr. Venables in
 his name; and, in consequence of the remonstrances he dictated, I was
 permitted to lie-in tranquilly.
 
 "The two or three weeks previous, I had been allowed to rest in peace;
 but, so accustomed was I to pursuit and alarm, that I seldom closed my
 eyes without being haunted by Mr. Venables' image, who seemed to assume
 terrific or hateful forms to torment me, wherever I turned.--Sometimes a
 wild cat, a roaring bull, or hideous assassin, whom I vainly attempted to
 fly; at others he was a demon, hurrying me to the brink of a precipice,
 plunging me into dark waves, or horrid gulfs; and I woke, in violent fits
 of trembling anxiety, to assure myself that it was all a dream, and to
 endeavour to lure my waking thoughts to wander to the delightful Italian
 vales, I hoped soon to visit; or to picture some august ruins, where I
 reclined in fancy on a mouldering column, and escaped, in the
 contemplation of the heart-enlarging virtues of antiquity, from the
 turmoil of cares that had depressed all the daring purposes of my soul.
 But I was not long allowed to calm my mind by the exercise of my
 imagination; for the third day after your birth, my child, I was
 surprised by a visit from my elder brother; who came in the most abrupt
 manner, to inform me of the death of my uncle. He had left the greater
 part of his fortune to my child, appointing me its guardian; in short,
 every step was taken to enable me to be mistress of his fortune, without
 putting any part of it in Mr. Venables' power. My brother came to vent
 his rage on me, for having, as he expressed himself, 'deprived him, my
 uncle's eldest nephew, of his inheritance;' though my uncle's property,
 the fruit of his own exertion, being all in the funds, or on landed
 securities, there was not a shadow of justice in the charge.
 
 "As I sincerely loved my uncle, this intelligence brought on a fever,
 which I struggled to conquer with all the energy of my mind; for, in my
 desolate state, I had it very much at heart to suckle you, my poor babe.
 You seemed my only tie to life, a cherub, to whom I wished to be a
 father, as well as a mother; and the double duty appeared to me to
 produce a proportionate increase of affection. But the pleasure I felt,
 while sustaining you, snatched from the wreck of hope, was cruelly damped
 by melancholy reflections on my widowed state--widowed by the death of my
 uncle. Of Mr. Venables I thought not, even when I thought of the felicity
 of loving your father, and how a mother's pleasure might be exalted, and
 her care softened by a husband's tenderness.--'Ought to be!' I exclaimed;
 and I endeavoured to drive away the tenderness that suffocated me; but
 my spirits were weak, and the unbidden tears would flow. 'Why was I,' I
 would ask thee, but thou didst not heed me,--'cut off from the
 participation of the sweetest pleasure of life?' I imagined with what
 extacy, after the pains of child-bed, I should have presented my little
 stranger, whom I had so long wished to view, to a respectable father, and
 with what maternal fondness I should have pressed them both to my
 heart!--Now I kissed her with less delight, though with the most
 endearing compassion, poor helpless one! when I perceived a slight
 resemblance of him, to whom she owed her existence; or, if any gesture
 reminded me of him, even in his best days, my heart heaved, and I pressed
 the innocent to my bosom, as if to purify it--yes, I blushed to think
 that its purity had been sullied, by allowing such a man to be its
 father.
 
 "After my recovery, I began to think of taking a house in the country, or
 of making an excursion on the continent, to avoid Mr. Venables; and to
 open my heart to new pleasures and affection. The spring was melting into
 summer, and you, my little companion, began to smile--that smile made
 hope bud out afresh, assuring me the world was not a desert. Your
 gestures were ever present to my fancy; and I dwelt on the joy I should
 feel when you would begin to walk and lisp. Watching your wakening mind,
 and shielding from every rude blast my tender blossom, I recovered my
 spirits--I dreamed not of the frost--'the killing frost,' to which you
 were destined to be exposed.--But I lose all patience--and execrate the
 injustice of the world--folly! ignorance!--I should rather call it; but,
 shut up from a free circulation of thought, and always pondering on the
 same griefs, I writhe under the torturing apprehensions, which ought to
 excite only honest indignation, or active compassion; and would, could I
 view them as the natural consequence of things. But, born a woman--and
 born to suffer, in endeavouring to repress my own emotions, I feel more
 acutely the various ills my sex are fated to bear--I feel that the evils
 they are subject to endure, degrade them so far below their oppressors,
 as almost to justify their tyranny; leading at the same time superficial
 reasoners to term that weakness the cause, which is only the consequence
 of short-sighted despotism.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [91-A] The introduction of Darnford as the deliverer of Maria, in an
 early stage of the history, is already stated (Chap. III.) to have been
 an after-thought of the author. This has probably caused the
 imperfectness of the manuscript in the above passage; though, at the same
 time, it must be acknowledged to be somewhat uncertain, whether Darnford
 is the stranger intended in this place. It appears from Chap. XVII. that
 an interference of a more decisive nature was designed to be attributed
 to him.
 
 EDITOR.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XIV.
 
 
 "AS my mind grew calmer, the visions of Italy again returned with their
 former glow of colouring; and I resolved on quitting the kingdom for a
 time, in search of the cheerfulness, that naturally results from a change
 of scene, unless we carry the barbed arrow with us, and only see what we
 feel.
 
 "During the period necessary to prepare for a long absence, I sent a
 supply to pay my father's debts, and settled my brothers in eligible
 situations; but my attention was not wholly engrossed by my family,
 though I do not think it necessary to enumerate the common exertions of
 humanity. The manner in which my uncle's property was settled, prevented
 me from making the addition to the fortune of my surviving sister, that I
 could have wished; but I had prevailed on him to bequeath her two
 thousand pounds, and she determined to marry a lover, to whom she had
 been some time attached. Had it not been for this engagement, I should
 have invited her to accompany me in my tour; and I might have escaped the
 pit, so artfully dug in my path, when I was the least aware of danger.
 
 "I had thought of remaining in England, till I weaned my child; but this
 state of freedom was too peaceful to last, and I had soon reason to wish
 to hasten my departure. A friend of Mr. Venables, the same attorney who
 had accompanied him in several excursions to hunt me from my hiding
 places, waited on me to propose a reconciliation. On my refusal, he
 indirectly advised me to make over to my husband--for husband he would
 term him--the greater part of the property I had at command, menacing me
 with continual persecution unless I complied, and that, as a last resort,
 he would claim the child. I did not, though intimidated by the last
 insinuation, scruple to declare, that I would not allow him to squander
 the money left to me for far different purposes, but offered him five
 hundred pounds, if he would sign a bond not to torment me any more. My
 maternal anxiety made me thus appear to waver from my first
 determination, and probably suggested to him, or his diabolical agent,
 the infernal plot, which has succeeded but too well.
 
 "The bond was executed; still I was impatient to leave England. Mischief
 hung in the air when we breathed the same; I wanted seas to divide us,
 and waters to roll between, till he had forgotten that I had the means of
 helping him through a new scheme. Disturbed by the late occurrences, I
 instantly prepared for my departure. My only delay was waiting for a
 maid-servant, who spoke French fluently, and had been warmly recommended
 to me. A valet I was advised to hire, when I fixed on my place of
 residence for any time.
 
 "My God, with what a light heart did I set out for Dover!--It was not my
 country, but my cares, that I was leaving behind. My heart seemed to
 bound with the wheels, or rather appeared the centre on which they
 twirled. I clasped you to my bosom, exclaiming 'And you will be
 safe--quite safe--when--we are once on board the packet.--Would we were
 there!' I smiled at my idle fears, as the natural effect of continual
 alarm; and I scarcely owned to myself that I dreaded Mr. Venables's
 cunning, or was conscious of the horrid delight he would feel, at forming
 stratagem after stratagem to circumvent me. I was already in the snare--I
 never reached the packet--I never saw thee more.--I grow breathless. I
 have scarcely patience to write down the details. The maid--the plausible
 woman I had hired--put, doubtless, some stupifying potion in what I ate
 or drank, the morning I left town. All I know is, that she must have
 quitted the chaise, shameless wretch! and taken (from my breast) my babe
 with her. How could a creature in a female form see me caress thee, and
 steal thee from my arms! I must stop, stop to repress a mother's anguish;
 left, in bitterness of soul, I imprecate the wrath of heaven on this
 tiger, who tore my only comfort from me.
 
 "How long I slept I know not; certainly many hours, for I woke at the
 close of day, in a strange confusion of thought. I was probably roused to
 recollection by some one thundering at a huge, unwieldy gate. Attempting
 to ask where I was, my voice died away, and I tried to raise it in vain,
 as I have done in a dream. I looked for my babe with affright; feared
 that it had fallen out of my lap, while I had so strangely forgotten
 her; and, such was the vague intoxication, I can give it no other name,
 in which I was plunged, I could not recollect when or where I last saw
 you; but I sighed, as if my heart wanted room to clear my head.
 
 "The gates opened heavily, and the sullen sound of many locks and bolts
 drawn back, grated on my very soul, before I was appalled by the creeking
 of the dismal hinges, as they closed after me. The gloomy pile was before
 me, half in ruins; some of the aged trees of the avenue were cut down,
 and left to rot where they fell; and as we approached some mouldering
 steps, a monstrous dog darted forwards to the length of his chain, and
 barked and growled infernally.
 
 "The door was opened slowly, and a murderous visage peeped out, with a
 lantern. 'Hush!' he uttered, in a threatning tone, and the affrighted
 animal stole back to his kennel. The door of the chaise flew back, the
 stranger put down the lantern, and clasped his dreadful arms around me.
 It was certainly the effect of the soporific draught, for, instead of
 exerting my strength, I sunk without motion, though not without sense, on
 his shoulder, my limbs refusing to obey my will. I was carried up the
 steps into a close-shut hall. A candle flaring in the socket, scarcely
 dispersed the darkness, though it displayed to me the ferocious
 countenance of the wretch who held me.
 
 "He mounted a wide staircase. Large figures painted on the walls seemed
 to start on me, and glaring eyes to meet me at every turn. Entering a
 long gallery, a dismal shriek made me spring out of my conductor's arms,
 with I know not what mysterious emotion of terror; but I fell on the
 floor, unable to sustain myself.
 
 "A strange-looking female started out of one of the recesses, and
 observed me with more curiosity than interest; till, sternly bid retire,
 she flitted back like a shadow. Other faces, strongly marked, or
 distorted, peeped through the half-opened doors, and I heard some
 incoherent sounds. I had no distinct idea where I could be--I looked on
 all sides, and almost doubted whether I was alive or dead.
 
 "Thrown on a bed, I immediately sunk into insensibility again; and next
 day, gradually recovering the use of reason, I began, starting
 affrighted from the conviction, to discover where I was confined--I
 insisted on seeing the master of the mansion--I saw him--and perceived
 that I was buried alive.--
 
 "Such, my child, are the events of thy mother's life to this dreadful
 moment--Should she ever escape from the fangs of her enemies, she will
 add the secrets of her prison-house--and--"
 
 Some lines were here crossed out, and the memoirs broke off abruptly with
 the names of Jemima and Darnford.
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX.
 
 [ADVERTISEMENT.
 
 
 THE performance, with a fragment of which the reader has now been
 presented, was designed to consist of three parts. The preceding sheets
 were considered as constituting one of those parts. Those persons who in
 the perusal of the chapters, already written and in some degree finished
 by the author, have felt their hearts awakened, and their curiosity
 excited as to the sequel of the story, will, of course, gladly accept
 even of the broken paragraphs and half-finished sentences, which have
 been found committed to paper, as materials for the remainder. The
 fastidious and cold-hearted critic may perhaps feel himself repelled by
 the incoherent form in which they are presented. But an inquisitive
 temper willingly accepts the most imperfect and mutilated information,
 where better is not to be had: and readers, who in any degree resemble
 the author in her quick apprehension of sentiment, and of the pleasures
 and pains of imagination, will, I believe, find gratification, in
 contemplating sketches, which were designed in a short time to have
 received the finishing touches of her genius; but which must now for ever
 remain a mark to record the triumphs of mortality, over schemes of
 usefulness, and projects of public interest.]
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XV.
 
 
 DARNFORD returned the memoirs to Maria, with a most affectionate letter,
 in which he reasoned on "the absurdity of the laws respecting matrimony,
 which, till divorces could be more easily obtained, was," he declared,
 "the most insufferable bondage. Ties of this nature could not bind minds
 governed by superior principles; and such beings were privileged to act
 above the dictates of laws they had no voice in framing, if they had
 sufficient strength of mind to endure the natural consequence. In her
 case, to talk of duty, was a farce, excepting what was due to herself.
 Delicacy, as well as reason, forbade her ever to think of returning to
 her husband: was she then to restrain her charming sensibility through
 mere prejudice? These arguments were not absolutely impartial, for he
 disdained to conceal, that, when he appealed to her reason, he felt that
 he had some interest in her heart.--The conviction was not more
 transporting, than sacred--a thousand times a day, he asked himself how
 he had merited such happiness?--and as often he determined to purify the
 heart she deigned to inhabit--He intreated to be again admitted to her
 presence."
 
 He was; and the tear which glistened in his eye, when he respectfully
 pressed her to his bosom, rendered him peculiarly dear to the unfortunate
 mother. Grief had stilled the transports of love, only to render their
 mutual tenderness more touching. In former interviews, Darnford had
 contrived, by a hundred little pretexts, to sit near her, to take her
 hand, or to meet her eyes--now it was all soothing affection, and esteem
 seemed to have rivalled love. He adverted to her narrative, and spoke
 with warmth of the oppression she had endured.--His eyes, glowing with a
 lambent flame, told her how much he wished to restore her to liberty and
 love; but he kissed her hand, as if it had been that of a saint; and
 spoke of the loss of her child, as if it had been his own.--What could
 have been more flattering to Maria?--Every instance of self-denial was
 registered in her heart, and she loved him, for loving her too well to
 give way to the transports of passion.
 
 They met again and again; and Darnford declared, while passion suffused
 his cheeks, that he never before knew what it was to love.--
 
 One morning Jemima informed Maria, that her master intended to wait on
 her, and speak to her without witnesses. He came, and brought a letter
 with him, pretending that he was ignorant of its contents, though he
 insisted on having it returned to him. It was from the attorney already
 mentioned, who informed her of the death of her child, and hinted, "that
 she could not now have a legitimate heir, and that, would she make over
 the half of her fortune during life, she should be conveyed to Dover, and
 permitted to pursue her plan of travelling."
 
 Maria answered with warmth, "That she had no terms to make with the
 murderer of her babe, nor would she purchase liberty at the price of her
 own respect."
 
 She began to expostulate with her jailor; but he sternly bade her "Be
 silent--he had not gone so far, not to go further."
 
 Darnford came in the evening. Jemima was obliged to be absent, and she,
 as usual, locked the door on them, to prevent interruption or
 discovery.--The lovers were, at first, embarrassed; but fell insensibly
 into confidential discourse. Darnford represented, "that they might soon
 be parted," and wished her "to put it out of the power of fate to
 separate them."
 
 As her husband she now received him, and he solemnly pledged himself as
 her protector--and eternal friend.--
 
 There was one peculiarity in Maria's mind: she was more anxious not to
 deceive, than to guard against deception; and had rather trust without
 sufficient reason, than be for ever the prey of doubt. Besides, what are
 we, when the mind has, from reflection, a certain kind of elevation,
 which exalts the contemplation above the little concerns of prudence! We
 see what we wish, and make a world of our own--and, though reality may
 sometimes open a door to misery, yet the moments of happiness procured by
 the imagination, may, without a paradox, be reckoned among the solid
 comforts of life. Maria now, imagining that she had found a being of
 celestial mould--was happy,--nor was she deceived.--He was then plastic
 in her impassioned hand--and reflected all the sentiments which animated
 and warmed her.
 
 -- -- -- --
 -- -- -- -- -- -- -- -- -- -- --
 -- -- -- -- -- -- -- -- -- -- --
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XVI.
 
 
 ONE morning confusion seemed to reign in the house, and Jemima came in
 terror, to inform Maria, "that her master had left it, with a
 determination, she was assured (and too many circumstances corroborated
 the opinion, to leave a doubt of its truth) of never returning. I am
 prepared then," said Jemima, "to accompany you in your flight."
 
 Maria started up, her eyes darting towards the door, as if afraid that
 some one should fasten it on her for ever.
 
 Jemima continued, "I have perhaps no right now to expect the performance
 of your promise; but on you it depends to reconcile me with the human
 race."
 
 "But Darnford!"--exclaimed Maria, mournfully--sitting down again, and
 crossing her arms--"I have no child to go to, and liberty has lost its
 sweets."
 
 "I am much mistaken, if Darnford is not the cause of my master's
 flight--his keepers assure me, that they have promised to confine him two
 days longer, and then he will be free--you cannot see him; but they will
 give a letter to him the moment he is free.--In that inform him where he
 may find you in London; fix on some hotel. Give me your clothes; I will
 send them out of the house with mine, and we will slip out at the
 garden-gate. Write your letter while I make these arrangements, but lose
 no time!"
 
 In an agitation of spirit, not to be calmed, Maria began to write to
 Darnford. She called him by the sacred name of "husband," and bade him
 "hasten to her, to share her fortune, or she would return to him."--An
 hotel in the Adelphi was the place of rendezvous.
 
 The letter was sealed and given in charge; and with light footsteps, yet
 terrified at the sound of them, she descended, scarcely breathing, and
 with an indistinct fear that she should never get out at the garden gate.
 Jemima went first.
 
 A being, with a visage that would have suited one possessed by a devil,
 crossed the path, and seized Maria by the arm. Maria had no fear but of
 being detained--"Who are you? what are you?" for the form was scarcely
 human. "If you are made of flesh and blood," his ghastly eyes glared on
 her, "do not stop me!"
 
 "Woman," interrupted a sepulchral voice, "what have I to do with
 thee?"--Still he grasped her hand, muttering a curse.
 
 "No, no; you have nothing to do with me," she exclaimed, "this is a
 moment of life and death!"--
 
 With supernatural force she broke from him, and, throwing her arms round
 Jemima, cried, "Save me!" The being, from whose grasp she had loosed
 herself, took up a stone as they opened the door, and with a kind of
 hellish sport threw it after them. They were out of his reach.
 
 When Maria arrived in town, she drove to the hotel already fixed on. But
 she could not sit still--her child was ever before her; and all that had
 passed during her confinement, appeared to be a dream. She went to the
 house in the suburbs, where, as she now discovered, her babe had been
 sent. The moment she entered, her heart grew sick; but she wondered not
 that it had proved its grave. She made the necessary enquiries, and the
 church-yard was pointed out, in which it rested under a turf. A little
 frock which the nurse's child wore (Maria had made it herself) caught her
 eye. The nurse was glad to sell it for half-a-guinea, and Maria hastened
 away with the relic, and, re-entering the hackney-coach which waited for
 her, gazed on it, till she reached her hotel.
 
 She then waited on the attorney who had made her uncle's will, and
 explained to him her situation. He readily advanced her some of the
 money which still remained in his hands, and promised to take the whole
 of the case into consideration. Maria only wished to be permitted to
 remain in quiet--She found that several bills, apparently with her
 signature, had been presented to her agent, nor was she for a moment at a
 loss to guess by whom they had been forged; yet, equally averse to
 threaten or intreat, she requested her friend [the solicitor] to call on
 Mr. Venables. He was not to be found at home; but at length his agent,
 the attorney, offered a conditional promise to Maria, to leave her in
 peace, as long as she behaved with propriety, if she would give up the
 notes. Maria inconsiderately consented--Darnford was arrived, and she
 wished to be only alive to love; she wished to forget the anguish she
 felt whenever she thought of her child.
 
 They took a ready furnished lodging together, for she was above disguise;
 Jemima insisting on being considered as her house-keeper, and to receive
 the customary stipend. On no other terms would she remain with her
 friend.
 
 Darnford was indefatigable in tracing the mysterious circumstances of his
 confinement. The cause was simply, that a relation, a very distant one,
 to whom he was heir, had died intestate, leaving a considerable fortune.
 On the news of Darnford's arrival [in England, a person, intrusted with
 the management of the property, and who had the writings in his
 possession, determining, by one bold stroke, to strip Darnford of the
 succession,] had planned his confinement; and [as soon as he had taken
 the measures he judged most conducive to his object, this ruffian,
 together with his instrument,] the keeper of the private mad-house, left
 the kingdom. Darnford, who still pursued his enquiries, at last
 discovered that they had fixed their place of refuge at Paris.
 
 Maria and he determined therefore, with the faithful Jemima, to visit
 that metropolis, and accordingly were preparing for the journey, when
 they were informed that Mr. Venables had commenced an action against
 Darnford for seduction and adultery. The indignation Maria felt cannot be
 explained; she repented of the forbearance she had exercised in giving up
 the notes. Darnford could not put off his journey, without risking the
 loss of his property: Maria therefore furnished him with money for his
 expedition; and determined to remain in London till the termination of
 this affair.
 
 She visited some ladies with whom she had formerly been intimate, but was
 refused admittance; and at the opera, or Ranelagh, they could not
 recollect her. Among these ladies there were some, not her most intimate
 acquaintance, who were generally supposed to avail themselves of the
 cloke of marriage, to conceal a mode of conduct, that would for ever have
 damned their fame, had they been innocent, seduced girls. These
 particularly stood aloof.--Had she remained with her husband, practising
 insincerity, and neglecting her child to manage an intrigue, she would
 still have been visited and respected. If, instead of openly living with
 her lover, she could have condescended to call into play a thousand
 arts, which, degrading her own mind, might have allowed the people who
 were not deceived, to pretend to be so, she would have been caressed and
 treated like an honourable woman. "And Brutus[138-A] is an honourable
 man!" said Mark-Antony with equal sincerity.
 
 With Darnford she did not taste uninterrupted felicity; there was a
 volatility in his manner which often distressed her; but love gladdened
 the scene; besides, he was the most tender, sympathizing creature in the
 world. A fondness for the sex often gives an appearance of humanity to
 the behaviour of men, who have small pretensions to the reality; and they
 seem to love others, when they are only pursuing their own
 gratification. Darnford appeared ever willing to avail himself of her
 taste and acquirements, while she endeavoured to profit by his decision
 of character, and to eradicate some of the romantic notions, which had
 taken root in her mind, while in adversity she had brooded over visions
 of unattainable bliss.
 
 The real affections of life, when they are allowed to burst forth, are
 buds pregnant with joy and all the sweet emotions of the soul; yet they
 branch out with wild ease, unlike the artificial forms of felicity,
 sketched by an imagination painful alive. The substantial happiness,
 which enlarges and civilizes the mind, may be compared to the pleasure
 experienced in roving through nature at large, inhaling the sweet gale
 natural to the clime; while the reveries of a feverish imagination
 continually sport themselves in gardens full of aromatic shrubs, which
 cloy while they delight, and weaken the sense of pleasure they gratify.
 The heaven of fancy, below or beyond the stars, in this life, or in those
 ever-smiling regions surrounded by the unmarked ocean of futurity, have
 an insipid uniformity which palls. Poets have imagined scenes of bliss;
 but, fencing out sorrow, all the extatic emotions of the soul, and even
 its grandeur, seem to be equally excluded. We dose over the unruffled
 lake, and long to scale the rocks which fence the happy valley of
 contentment, though serpents hiss in the pathless desert, and danger
 lurks in the unexplored wiles. Maria found herself more indulgent as she
 was happier, and discovered virtues, in characters she had before
 disregarded, while chasing the phantoms of elegance and excellence, which
 sported in the meteors that exhale in the marshes of misfortune. The
 heart is often shut by romance against social pleasure; and, fostering a
 sickly sensibility, grows callous to the soft touches of humanity.
 
 To part with Darnford was indeed cruel.--It was to feel most painfully
 alone; but she rejoiced to think, that she should spare him the care and
 perplexity of the suit, and meet him again, all his own. Marriage, as at
 present constituted, she considered as leading to immorality--yet, as the
 odium of society impedes usefulness, she wished to avow her affection to
 Darnford, by becoming his wife according to established rules; not to be
 confounded with women who act from very different motives, though her
 conduct would be just the same without the ceremony as with it, and her
 expectations from him not less firm. The being summoned to defend herself
 from a charge which she was determined to plead guilty to, was still
 galling, as it roused bitter reflections on the situation of women in
 society.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [138-A] The name in the manuscript is by mistake written Caesar.
 
 EDITOR.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XVII.
 
 
 SUCH was her state of mind when the dogs of law were let loose on her.
 Maria took the task of conducting Darnford's defence upon herself. She
 instructed his counsel to plead guilty to the charge of adultery; but to
 deny that of seduction.
 
 The counsel for the plaintiff opened the cause, by observing, "that his
 client had ever been an indulgent husband, and had borne with several
 defects of temper, while he had nothing criminal to lay to the charge of
 his wife. But that she left his house without assigning any cause. He
 could not assert that she was then acquainted with the defendant; yet,
 when he was once endeavouring to bring her back to her home, this man
 put the peace-officers to flight, and took her he knew not whither. After
 the birth of her child, her conduct was so strange, and a melancholy
 malady having afflicted one of the family, which delicacy forbade the
 dwelling on, it was necessary to confine her. By some means the defendant
 enabled her to make her escape, and they had lived together, in despite
 of all sense of order and decorum. The adultery was allowed, it was not
 necessary to bring any witnesses to prove it; but the seduction, though
 highly probable from the circumstances which he had the honour to state,
 could not be so clearly proved.--It was of the most atrocious kind, as
 decency was set at defiance, and respect for reputation, which shows
 internal compunction, utterly disregarded."
 
 A strong sense of injustice had silenced every emotion, which a mixture
 of true and false delicacy might otherwise have excited in Maria's bosom.
 She only felt in earnest to insist on the privilege of her nature. The
 sarcasms of society, and the condemnation of a mistaken world, were
 nothing to her, compared with acting contrary to those feelings which
 were the foundation of her principles. [She therefore eagerly put herself
 forward, instead of desiring to be absent, on this memorable occasion.]
 
 Convinced that the subterfuges of the law were disgraceful, she wrote a
 paper, which she expressly desired might be read in court:
 
 "Married when scarcely able to distinguish the nature of the engagement,
 I yet submitted to the rigid laws which enslave women, and obeyed the man
 whom I could no longer love. Whether the duties of the state are
 reciprocal, I mean not to discuss; but I can prove repeated infidelities
 which I overlooked or pardoned. Witnesses are not wanting to establish
 these facts. I at present maintain the child of a maid servant, sworn to
 him, and born after our marriage. I am ready to allow, that education and
 circumstances lead men to think and act with less delicacy, than the
 preservation of order in society demands from women; but surely I may
 without assumption declare, that, though I could excuse the birth, I
 could not the desertion of this unfortunate babe:--and, while I despised
 the man, it was not easy to venerate the husband. With proper
 restrictions however, I revere the institution which fraternizes the
 world. I exclaim against the laws which throw the whole weight of the
 yoke on the weaker shoulders, and force women, when they claim
 protectorship as mothers, to sign a contract, which renders them
 dependent on the caprice of the tyrant, whom choice or necessity has
 appointed to reign over them. Various are the cases, in which a woman
 ought to separate herself from her husband; and mine, I may be allowed
 emphatically to insist, comes under the description of the most
 aggravated.
 
 "I will not enlarge on those provocations which only the individual can
 estimate; but will bring forward such charges only, the truth of which is
 an insult upon humanity. In order to promote certain destructive
 speculations, Mr. Venables prevailed on me to borrow certain sums of a
 wealthy relation; and, when I refused further compliance, he thought of
 bartering my person; and not only allowed opportunities to, but urged, a
 friend from whom he borrowed money, to seduce me. On the discovery of
 this act of atrocity, I determined to leave him, and in the most decided
 manner, for ever. I consider all obligation as made void by his conduct;
 and hold, that schisms which proceed from want of principles, can never
 be healed.
 
 "He received a fortune with me to the amount of five thousand pounds. On
 the death of my uncle, convinced that I could provide for my child, I
 destroyed the settlement of that fortune. I required none of my property
 to be returned to me, nor shall enumerate the sums extorted from me
 during six years that we lived together.
 
 "After leaving, what the law considers as my home, I was hunted like a
 criminal from place to place, though I contracted no debts, and demanded
 no maintenance--yet, as the laws sanction such proceeding, and make women
 the property of their husbands, I forbear to animadvert. After the birth
 of my daughter, and the death of my uncle, who left a very considerable
 property to myself and child, I was exposed to new persecution; and,
 because I had, before arriving at what is termed years of discretion,
 pledged my faith, I was treated by the world, as bound for ever to a man
 whose vices were notorious. Yet what are the vices generally known, to
 the various miseries that a woman may be subject to, which, though
 deeply felt, eating into the soul, elude description, and may be glossed
 over! A false morality is even established, which makes all the virtue of
 women consist in chastity, submission, and the forgiveness of injuries.
 
 "I pardon my oppressor--bitterly as I lament the loss of my child, torn
 from me in the most violent manner. But nature revolts, and my soul
 sickens at the bare supposition, that it could ever be a duty to pretend
 affection, when a separation is necessary to prevent my feeling hourly
 aversion.
 
 "To force me to give my fortune, I was imprisoned--yes; in a private
 mad-house.--There, in the heart of misery, I met the man charged with
 seducing me. We became attached--I deemed, and ever shall deem, myself
 free. The death of my babe dissolved the only tie which subsisted
 between me and my, what is termed, lawful husband.
 
 "To this person, thus encountered, I voluntarily gave myself, never
 considering myself as any more bound to transgress the laws of moral
 purity, because the will of my husband might be pleaded in my excuse,
 than to transgress those laws to which [the policy of artificial society
 has] annexed [positive] punishments.----While no command of a husband can
 prevent a woman from suffering for certain crimes, she must be allowed to
 consult her conscience, and regulate her conduct, in some degree, by her
 own sense of right. The respect I owe to myself, demanded my strict
 adherence to my determination of never viewing Mr. Venables in the light
 of a husband, nor could it forbid me from encouraging another. If I am
 unfortunately united to an unprincipled man, am I for ever to be shut out
 from fulfilling the duties of a wife and mother?--I wish my country to
 approve of my conduct; but, if laws exist, made by the strong to oppress
 the weak, I appeal to my own sense of justice, and declare that I will
 not live with the individual, who has violated every moral obligation
 which binds man to man.
 
 "I protest equally against any charge being brought to criminate the man,
 whom I consider as my husband. I was six-and-twenty when I left Mr.
 Venables' roof; if ever I am to be supposed to arrive at an age to direct
 my own actions, I must by that time have arrived at it.--I acted with
 deliberation.--Mr. Darnford found me a forlorn and oppressed woman, and
 promised the protection women in the present state of society want.--But
 the man who now claims me--was he deprived of my society by this conduct?
 The question is an insult to common sense, considering where Mr. Darnford
 met me.--Mr. Venables' door was indeed open to me--nay, threats and
 intreaties were used to induce me to return; but why? Was affection or
 honour the motive?--I cannot, it is true, dive into the recesses of the
 human heart--yet I presume to assert, [borne out as I am by a variety of
 circumstances,] that he was merely influenced by the most rapacious
 avarice.
 
 "I claim then a divorce, and the liberty of enjoying, free from
 molestation, the fortune left to me by a relation, who was well aware of
 the character of the man with whom I had to contend.--I appeal to the
 justice and humanity of the jury--a body of men, whose private judgment
 must be allowed to modify laws, that must be unjust, because definite
 rules can never apply to indefinite circumstances--and I deprecate
 punishment upon the man of my choice, freeing him, as I solemnly do, from
 the charge of seduction.]
 
 "I did not put myself into a situation to justify a charge of adultery,
 till I had, from conviction, shaken off the fetters which bound me to Mr.
 Venables.--While I lived with him, I defy the voice of calumny to sully
 what is termed the fair fame of woman.--Neglected by my husband, I never
 encouraged a lover; and preserved with scrupulous care, what is termed my
 honour, at the expence of my peace, till he, who should have been its
 guardian, laid traps to ensnare me. From that moment I believed myself,
 in the sight of heaven, free--and no power on earth shall force me to
 renounce my resolution."
 
 The judge, in summing up the evidence, alluded to "the fallacy of letting
 women plead their feelings, as an excuse for the violation of the
 marriage-vow. For his part, he had always determined to oppose all
 innovation, and the new-fangled notions which incroached on the good old
 rules of conduct. We did not want French principles in public or private
 life--and, if women were allowed to plead their feelings, as an excuse or
 palliation of infidelity, it was opening a flood-gate for immorality.
 What virtuous woman thought of her feelings?--It was her duty to love and
 obey the man chosen by her parents and relations, who were qualified by
 their experience to judge better for her, than she could for herself. As
 to the charges brought against the husband, they were vague, supported by
 no witnesses, excepting that of imprisonment in a private mad-house. The
 proofs of an insanity in the family, might render that however a prudent
 measure; and indeed the conduct of the lady did not appear that of a
 person of sane mind. Still such a mode of proceeding could not be
 justified, and might perhaps entitle the lady [in another court] to a
 sentence of separation from bed and board, during the joint lives of the
 parties; but he hoped that no Englishman would legalize adultery, by
 enabling the adulteress to enrich her seducer. Too many restrictions
 could not be thrown in the way of divorces, if we wished to maintain the
 sanctity of marriage; and, though they might bear a little hard on a few,
 very few individuals, it was evidently for the good of the whole."
 
 
 
 
 CONCLUSION,
 
 BY THE EDITOR.
 
 
 VERY few hints exist respecting the plan of the remainder of the work. I
 find only two detached sentences, and some scattered heads for the
 continuation of the story. I transcribe the whole.
 
 
 I.
 
 "Darnford's letters were affectionate; but circumstances occasioned
 delays, and the miscarriage of some letters rendered the reception of
 wished-for answers doubtful: his return was necessary to calm Maria's
 mind."
 
 
 II.
 
 "As Darnford had informed her that his business was settled, his delaying
 to return seemed extraordinary; but love to excess, excludes fear or
 suspicion."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The scattered heads for the continuation of the story, are as
 follow[159-A].
 
 
 I.
 
 "Trial for adultery--Maria defends herself--A separation from bed and
 board is the consequence--Her fortune is thrown into chancery--Darnford
 obtains a part of his property--Maria goes into the country."
 
 
 II.
 
 "A prosecution for adultery commenced--Trial--Darnford sets out for
 France--Letters--Once more pregnant--He returns--Mysterious
 behaviour--Visit--Expectation--Discovery--Interview--Consequence."
 
 
 III.
 
 "Sued by her husband--Damages awarded to him--Separation from bed and
 board--Darnford goes abroad--Maria into the country--Provides for her
 father--Is shunned--Returns to London--Expects to see her lover--The
 rack of expectation--Finds herself again with child--Delighted--A
 discovery--A visit--A miscarriage--Conclusion."
 
 
 IV.
 
 "Divorced by her husband--Her lover
 unfaithful--Pregnancy--Miscarriage--Suicide."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 [The following passage appears in some respects to deviate from the
 preceding hints. It is superscribed]
 
 
 "THE END.
 
 
 "She swallowed the laudanum; her soul was calm--the tempest had
 subsided--and nothing remained but an eager longing to forget
 herself--to fly from the anguish she endured to escape from thought--from
 this hell of disappointment.
 
 "Still her eyes closed not--one remembrance with frightful velocity
 followed another--All the incidents of her life were in arms, embodied to
 assail her, and prevent her sinking into the sleep of death.--Her
 murdered child again appeared to her, mourning for the babe of which she
 was the tomb.--'And could it have a nobler?--Surely it is better to die
 with me, than to enter on life without a mother's care!--I cannot
 live!--but could I have deserted my child the moment it was born?--thrown
 it on the troubled wave of life, without a hand to support it?'--She
 looked up: 'What have I not suffered!--may I find a father where I am
 going!'--Her head turned; a stupor ensued; a faintness--'Have a little
 patience,' said Maria, holding her swimming head (she thought of her
 mother), 'this cannot last long; and what is a little bodily pain to the
 pangs I have endured?'
 
 "A new vision swam before her. Jemima seemed to enter--leading a little
 creature, that, with tottering footsteps, approached the bed. The voice
 of Jemima sounding as at a distance, called her--she tried to listen, to
 speak, to look!
 
 "'Behold your child!' exclaimed Jemima. Maria started off the bed, and
 fainted.--Violent vomiting followed.
 
 "When she was restored to life, Jemima addressed her with great
 solemnity: '------ led me to suspect, that your husband and brother had
 deceived you, and secreted the child. I would not torment you with
 doubtful hopes, and I left you (at a fatal moment) to search for the
 child!--I snatched her from misery--and (now she is alive again) would
 you leave her alone in the world, to endure what I have endured?'
 
 "Maria gazed wildly at her, her whole frame was convulsed with emotion;
 when the child, whom Jemima had been tutoring all the journey, uttered
 the word 'Mamma!' She caught her to her bosom, and burst into a passion
 of tears--then, resting the child gently on the bed, as if afraid of
 killing it,--she put her hand to her eyes, to conceal as it were the
 agonizing struggle of her soul. She remained silent for five minutes,
 crossing her arms over her bosom, and reclining her head,--then
 exclaimed: 'The conflict is over!--I will live for my child!'"
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 A few readers perhaps, in looking over these hints, will wonder how it
 could have been practicable, without tediousness, or remitting in any
 degree the interest of the story, to have filled, from these slight
 sketches, a number of pages, more considerable than those which have been
 already presented. But, in reality, these hints, simple as they are, are
 pregnant with passion and distress. It is the refuge of barren authors
 only, to crowd their fictions with so great a number of events, as to
 suffer no one of them to sink into the reader's mind. It is the province
 of true genius to develop events, to discover their capabilities, to
 ascertain the different passions and sentiments with which they are
 fraught, and to diversify them with incidents, that give reality to the
 picture, and take a hold upon the mind of a reader of taste, from which
 they can never be loosened. It was particularly the design of the author,
 in the present instance, to make her story subordinate to a great moral
 purpose, that "of exhibiting the misery and oppression, peculiar to
 women, that arise out of the partial laws and customs of society.--This
 view restrained her fancy[166-A]." It was necessary for her, to place in
 a striking point of view, evils that are too frequently overlooked, and
 to drag into light those details of oppression, of which the grosser and
 more insensible part of mankind make little account.
 
 
 THE END.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [159-A] To understand these minutes, it is necessary the reader should
 consider each of them as setting out from the same point in the story,
 _viz._ the point to which it is brought down in the preceding chapter.
 
 [166-A] See author's preface.
 
 
 
 
 LESSONS.
 
 
 ADVERTISEMENT,
 
 BY THE EDITOR.
 
 
 THE following pages will, I believe, be judged by every reader of taste
 to have been worth preserving, among the other testimonies the author
 left behind her, of her genius and the soundness of her understanding.
 To such readers I leave the task of comparing these lessons, with other
 works of the same nature previously published. It is obvious that the
 author has struck out a path of her own, and by no means intrenched upon
 the plans of her predecessors.
 
 It may however excite surprise in some persons to find these papers
 annexed to the conclusion of a novel. All I have to offer on this
 subject, consists in the following considerations:
 
 First, something is to be allowed for the difficulty of arranging the
 miscellaneous papers upon very different subjects, which will frequently
 constitute an author's posthumous works.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Secondly, the small portion they occupy in the present volume, will
 perhaps be accepted as an apology, by such good-natured readers (if any
 such there are), to whom the perusal of them shall be a matter of perfect
 indifference.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Thirdly, the circumstance which determined me in annexing them to the
 present work, was the slight association (in default of a strong one)
 between the affectionate and pathetic manner in which Maria Venables
 addresses her infant, in the Wrongs of Woman; and the agonising and
 painful sentiment with which the author originally bequeathed these
 papers, as a legacy for the benefit of her child.
 
 
 
 
 LESSONS.
 
 _The first book of a series which I intended to have written for my
 unfortunate girl[175-A]._
 
 
 LESSON I.
 
 CAT. Dog. Cow. Horse. Sheep. Pig. Bird. Fly.
 
 Man. Boy. Girl. Child.
 
 Head. Hair. Face. Nose. Mouth. Chin. Neck. Arms. Hand. Leg. Foot. Back.
 Breast.
 
 House. Wall. Field. Street. Stone. Grass.
 
 Bed. Chair. Door. Pot. Spoon. Knife. Fork. Plate. Cup. Box. Boy. Bell.
 
 Tree. Leaf. Stick. Whip. Cart. Coach.
 
 Frock. Hat. Coat. Shoes. Shift. Cap.
 
 Bread. Milk. Tea. Meat. Drink. Cake.
 
 
 LESSON II.
 
 Come. Walk. Run. Go. Jump. Dance. Ride. Sit. Stand. Play. Hold. Shake.
 Speak. Sing. Cry. Laugh. Call. Fall.
 
 Day. Night. Sun. Moon. Light. Dark. Sleep. Wake.
 
 Wash. Dress. Kiss. Comb.
 
 Fire. Hot. Burn. Wind. Rain. Cold.
 
 Hurt. Tear. Break. Spill.
 
 Book. See. Look.
 
 Sweet. Good. Clean.
 
 Gone. Lost. Hide. Keep. Give. Take.
 
 One. Two. Three. Four. Five. Six. Seven. Eight. Nine. Ten.
 
 White. Black. Red. Blue. Green. Brown.
 
 
 LESSON III.
 
 STROKE the cat. Play with the Dog. Eat the bread. Drink the milk. Hold
 the cup. Lay down the knife.
 
 Look at the fly. See the horse. Shut the door. Bring the chair. Ring the
 bell. Get your book.
 
 Hide your face. Wipe your nose. Wash your hands. Dirty hands. Why do you
 cry? A clean mouth. Shake hands. I love you. Kiss me now. Good girl.
 
 The bird sings. The fire burns. The cat jumps. The dog runs. The bird
 flies. The cow lies down. The man laughs. The child cries.
 
 
 LESSON IV.
 
 LET me comb your head. Ask Betty to wash your face. Go and see for some
 bread. Drink milk, if you are dry. Play on the floor with the ball. Do
 not touch the ink; you will black your hands.
 
 What do you want to say to me? Speak slow, not so fast. Did you fall? You
 will not cry, not you; the baby cries. Will you walk in the fields?
 
 
 LESSON V.
 
 COME to me, my little girl. Are you tired of playing? Yes. Sit down and
 rest yourself, while I talk to you.
 
 Have you seen the baby? Poor little thing. O here it comes. Look at him.
 How helpless he is. Four years ago you were as feeble as this very little
 boy.
 
 See, he cannot hold up his head. He is forced to lie on his back, if his
 mamma do not turn him to the right or left side, he will soon begin to
 cry. He cries to tell her, that he is tired with lying on his back.
 
 
 LESSON VI.
 
 PERHAPS he is hungry. What shall we give him to eat? Poor fellow, he
 cannot eat. Look in his mouth, he has no teeth.
 
 How did you do when you were a baby like him? You cannot tell. Do you
 want to know? Look then at the dog, with her pretty puppy. You could not
 help yourself as well as the puppy. You could only open your mouth, when
 you were lying, like William, on my knee. So I put you to my breast, and
 you sucked, as the puppy sucks now, for there was milk enough for you.
 
 
 LESSON VII.
 
 WHEN you were hungry, you began to cry, because you could not speak. You
 were seven months without teeth, always sucking. But after you got one,
 you began to gnaw a crust of bread. It was not long before another came
 pop. At ten months you had four pretty white teeth, and you used to bite
 me. Poor mamma! Still I did not cry, because I am not a child, but you
 hurt me very much. So I said to papa, it is time the little girl should
 eat. She is not naughty, yet she hurts me. I have given her a crust of
 bread, and I must look for some other milk.
 
 The cow has got plenty, and her jumping calf eats grass very well. He has
 got more teeth than my little girl. Yes, says papa, and he tapped you on
 the cheek, you are old enough to learn to eat? Come to me, and I will
 teach you, my little dear, for you must not hurt poor mamma, who has
 given you her milk, when you could not take any thing else.
 
 
 LESSON VIII.
 
 YOU were then on the carpet, for you could not walk well. So when you
 were in a hurry, you used to run quick, quick, quick, on your hands and
 feet, like the dog.
 
 Away you ran to papa, and putting both your arms round his leg, for your
 hands were not big enough, you looked up at him, and laughed. What did
 this laugh say, when you could not speak? Cannot you guess by what you
 now say to papa?--Ah! it was, Play with me, papa!--play with me!
 
 Papa began to smile, and you knew that the smile was always--Yes. So you
 got a ball, and papa threw it along the floor--Roll--roll--roll; and you
 ran after it again--and again. How pleased you were. Look at William, he
 smiles; but you could laugh loud--Ha! ha! ha!--Papa laughed louder than
 the little girl, and rolled the ball still faster.
 
 Then he put the ball on a chair, and you were forced to take hold of the
 back, and stand up to reach it. At last you reached too far, and down you
 fell: not indeed on your face, because you put out your hands. You were
 not much hurt; but the palms of your hands smarted with the pain, and you
 began to cry, like a little child.
 
 It is only very little children who cry when they are hurt; and it is to
 tell their mamma, that something is the matter with them. Now you can
 come to me, and say, Mamma, I have hurt myself. Pray rub my hand: it
 smarts. Put something on it, to make it well. A piece of rag, to stop the
 blood. You are not afraid of a little blood--not you. You scratched your
 arm with a pin: it bled a little; but it did you no harm. See, the skin
 is grown over it again.
 
 
 LESSON IX.
 
 TAKE care not to put pins in your mouth, because they will stick in your
 throat, and give you pain. Oh! you cannot think what pain a pin would
 give you in your throat, should it remain there: but, if you by chance
 swallow it, I should be obliged to give you, every morning, something
 bitter to drink. You never tasted any thing so bitter! and you would grow
 very sick. I never put pins in my mouth; but I am older than you, and
 know how to take care of myself.
 
 My mamma took care of me, when I was a little girl, like you. She bade me
 never put any thing in my mouth, without asking her what it was.
 
 When you were a baby, with no more sense than William, you put every
 thing in your mouth to gnaw, to help your teeth to cut through the skin.
 Look at the puppy, how he bites that piece of wood. William presses his
 gums against my finger. Poor boy! he is so young, he does not know what
 he is doing. When you bite any thing, it is because you are hungry.
 
 
 LESSON X.
 
 SEE how much taller you are than William. In four years you have learned
 to eat, to walk, to talk. Why do you smile? You can do much more, you
 think: you can wash your hands and face. Very well. I should never kiss a
 dirty face. And you can comb your head with the pretty comb you always
 put by in your own drawer. To be sure, you do all this to be ready to
 take a walk with me. You would be obliged to stay at home, if you could
 not comb your own hair. Betty is busy getting the dinner ready, and only
 brushes William's hair, because he cannot do it for himself.
 
 Betty is making an apple-pye. You love an apple-pye; but I do not bid you
 make one. Your hands are not strong enough to mix the butter and flour
 together; and you must not try to pare the apples, because you cannot
 manage a great knife.
 
 Never touch the large knives: they are very sharp, and you might cut your
 finger to the bone. You are a little girl, and ought to have a little
 knife. When you are as tall as I am, you shall have a knife as large as
 mine; and when you are as strong as I am, and have learned to manage it,
 you will not hurt yourself.
 
 You can trundle a hoop, you say; and jump over a stick. O, I forgot!--and
 march like the men in the red coats, when papa plays a pretty tune on the
 fiddle.
 
 
 LESSON XI.
 
 WHAT, you think that you shall soon be able to dress yourself entirely? I
 am glad of it: I have something else to do. You may go, and look for your
 frock in the drawer; but I will tie it, till you are stronger. Betty will
 tie it, when I am busy.
 
 I button my gown myself: I do not want a maid to assist me, when I am
 dressing. But you have not yet got sense enough to do it properly, and
 must beg somebody to help you, till you are older.
 
 Children grow older and wiser at the same time. William is not able to
 take a piece of meat, because he has not got the sense which would make
 him think that, without teeth, meat would do him harm. He cannot tell
 what is good for him.
 
 The sense of children grows with them. You know much more than William,
 now you walk alone, and talk; but you do not know as much as the boys and
 girls you see playing yonder, who are half as tall again as you; and they
 do not know half as much as their fathers and mothers, who are men and
 women grown. Papa and I were children, like you; and men and women took
 care of us. I carry William, because he is too weak to walk. I lift you
 over a stile, and over the gutter, when you cannot jump over it.
 
 You know already, that potatoes will not do you any harm: but I must
 pluck the fruit for you, till you are wise enough to know the ripe apples
 and pears. The hard ones would make you sick, and then you must take
 physic. You do not love physic: I do not love it any more than you. But I
 have more sense than you; therefore I take care not to eat unripe fruit,
 or any thing else that would make my stomach ache, or bring out ugly red
 spots on my face.
 
 When I was a child, my mamma chose the fruit for me, to prevent my making
 myself sick. I was just like you; I used to ask for what I saw, without
 knowing whether it was good or bad. Now I have lived a long time, I know
 what is good; I do not want any body to tell me.
 
 
 LESSON XII.
 
 LOOK at those two dogs. The old one brings the ball to me in a moment;
 the young one does not know how. He must be taught.
 
 I can cut your shift in a proper shape. You would not know how to begin.
 You would spoil it; but you will learn.
 
 John digs in the garden, and knows when to put the seed in the ground.
 You cannot tell whether it should be in the winter or summer. Try to find
 it out. When do the trees put out their leaves? In the spring, you say,
 after the cold weather. Fruit would not grow ripe without very warm
 weather. Now I am sure you can guess why the summer is the season for
 fruit.
 
 Papa knows that peas and beans are good for us to eat with our meat. You
 are glad when you see them; but if he did not think for you, and have the
 seed put in the ground, we should have no peas or beans.
 
 
 LESSON XIII.
 
 POOR child, she cannot do much for herself. When I let her do any thing
 for me, it is to please her: for I could do it better myself.
 
 Oh! the poor puppy has tumbled off the stool. Run and stroak him. Put a
 little milk in a saucer to comfort him. You have more sense than he. You
 can pour the milk into the saucer without spilling it. He would cry for a
 day with hunger, without being able to get it. You are wiser than the
 dog, you must help him. The dog will love you for it, and run after you.
 I feed you and take care of you: you love me and follow me for it.
 
 When the book fell down on your foot, it gave you great pain. The poor
 dog felt the same pain just now.
 
 Take care not to hurt him when you play with him. And every morning leave
 a little milk in your bason for him. Do not forget to put the bason in a
 corner, lest somebody should fall over it.
 
 When the snow covers the ground, save the crumbs of bread for the birds.
 In the summer they find feed enough, and do not want you to think about
 them.
 
 I make broth for the poor man who is sick. A sick man is like a child, he
 cannot help himself.
 
 
 LESSON X.
 
 WHEN I caught cold some time ago, I had such a pain in my head, I could
 scarcely hold it up. Papa opened the door very softly, because he loves
 me. You love me, yet you made a noise. You had not the sense to know that
 it made my head worse, till papa told you.
 
 Papa had a pain in the stomach, and he would not eat the fine cherries or
 grapes on the table. When I brought him a cup of camomile tea, he drank
 it without saying a word, or making an ugly face. He knows that I love
 him, and that I would not give him any thing to drink that has a bad
 taste, if it were not to do him good.
 
 You asked me for some apples when your stomach ached; but I was not angry
 with you. If you had been as wise as papa, you would have said, I will
 not eat the apples to-day, I must take some camomile tea.
 
 You say that you do not know how to think. Yes; you do a little. The
 other day papa was tired; he had been walking about all the morning.
 After dinner he fell asleep on the sopha. I did not bid you be quiet; but
 you thought of what papa said to you, when my head ached. This made you
 think that you ought not to make a noise, when papa was resting himself.
 So you came to me, and said to me, very softly, Pray reach me my ball,
 and I will go and play in the garden, till papa wakes.
 
 You were going out; but thinking again, you came back to me on your
 tip-toes. Whisper----whisper. Pray mama, call me, when papa wakes; for I
 shall be afraid to open the door to see, lest I should disturb him.
 
 Away you went.--Creep--creep--and shut the door as softly as I could have
 done myself.
 
 That was thinking. When a child does wrong at first, she does not know
 any better. But, after she has been told that she must not disturb mama,
 when poor mama is unwell, she thinks herself, that she must not wake papa
 when he is tired.
 
 Another day we will see if you can think about any thing else.
 
 THE END.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [175-A] This title which is indorsed on the back of the manuscript, I
 conclude to have been written in a period of desperation, in the month of
 October, 1795.
 
 EDITOR.
 
 
 
 
 POSTHUMOUS WORKS
 
 OF THE
 
 AUTHOR
 
 OF A
 
 VINDICATION OF THE RIGHTS OF WOMAN.
 
 IN FOUR VOLUMES.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 VOL. III.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 _LONDON:_
 
 PRINTED FOR J. JOHNSON, NO. 72, ST. PAUL'S
   CHURCH-YARD; AND G. G. AND J. ROBINSON,
               PATERNOSTER-ROW.
                    1798.
 
 
 LETTERS
 AND
 MISCELLANEOUS PIECES.
 
 
 IN TWO VOLUMES.
 
 
 
 VOL. I.
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 
 THE following Letters may possibly be found to contain the finest
 examples of the language of sentiment and passion ever presented to the
 world. They bear a striking resemblance to the celebrated romance of
 Werter, though the incidents to which they relate are of a very different
 cast. Probably the readers to whom Werter is incapable of affording
 pleasure, will receive no delight from the present publication. The
 editor apprehends that, in the judgment of those best qualified to
 decide upon the comparison, these Letters will be admitted to have the
 superiority over the fiction of Goethe. They are the offspring of a
 glowing imagination, and a heart penetrated with the passion it essays to
 describe.
 
 To the series of letters constituting the principal article in these two
 volumes, are added various pieces, none of which, it is hoped, will be
 found discreditable to the talents of the author. The slight fragment of
 Letters on the Management of Infants, may be thought a trifle; but it
 seems to have some value, as presenting to us with vividness the
 intention of the writer on this important subject. The publication of a
 few select Letters to Mr. Johnson, appeared to be at once a just monument
 to the sincerity of his friendship, and a valuable and interesting
 specimen of the mind of the writer. The Letter on the Present Character
 of the French Nation, the Extract of the Cave of Fancy, a Tale, and the
 Hints for the Second Part of the Rights of Woman, may, I believe, safely
 be left to speak for themselves. The Essay on Poetry and our Relish for
 the Beauties of Nature, appeared in the Monthly Magazine for April last,
 and is the only piece in this collection which has previously found its
 way to the press.
 
 
 
 
 LETTERS.
 
 
 LETTER I.
 
 Two o'Clock.
 
 MY dear love, after making my arrangements for our snug dinner to-day, I
 have been taken by storm, and obliged to promise to dine, at an early
 hour, with the Miss ----s, the _only_ day they intend to pass here. I
 shall however leave the key in the door, and hope to find you at my
 fire-side when I return, about eight o'clock. Will you not wait for poor
 Joan?--whom you will find better, and till then think very
 affectionately of her.
 
 Yours, truly,
 
 * * * *
 
 I am sitting down to dinner; so do not send an answer.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER II.
 
 Past Twelve o'Clock, Monday night.
 
 [August.]
 
 I OBEY an emotion of my heart, which made me think of wishing thee, my
 love, good-night! before I go to rest, with more tenderness than I can
 to-morrow, when writing a hasty line or two under Colonel ----'s eye. You
 can scarcely imagine with what pleasure I anticipate the day, when we
 are to begin almost to live together; and you would smile to hear how
 many plans of employment I have in my head, now that I am confident my
 heart has found peace in your bosom.--Cherish me with that dignified
 tenderness, which I have only found in you; and your own dear girl will
 try to keep under a quickness of feeling, that has sometimes given you
 pain--Yes, I will be _good_, that I may deserve to be happy; and whilst
 you love me, I cannot again fall into the miserable state, which rendered
 life a burthen almost too heavy to be borne.
 
 But, good-night!--God bless you! Sterne says, that is equal to a
 kiss--yet I would rather give you the kiss into the bargain, glowing with
 gratitude to Heaven, and affection to you. I like the word affection,
 because it signifies something habitual; and we are soon to meet, to try
 whether we have mind enough to keep our hearts warm.
 
 * * * *
 
 I will be at the barrier a little after ten o'clock
 to-morrow[4-A].--Yours--
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER III.
 
 Wednesday Morning.
 
 YOU have often called me, dear girl, but you would now say good, did you
 know how very attentive I have been to the ---- ever since I came to
 Paris. I am not however going to trouble you with the account, because I
 like to see your eyes praise me; and, Milton insinuates, that, during
 such recitals, there are interruptions, not ungrateful to the heart, when
 the honey that drops from the lips is not merely words.
 
 Yet, I shall not (let me tell you before these people enter, to force me
 to huddle away my letter) be content with only a kiss of DUTY--you _must_
 be glad to see me--because you are glad--or I will make love to the
 _shade_ of Mirabeau, to whom my heart continually turned, whilst I was
 talking with Madame ----, forcibly telling me, that it will ever have
 sufficient warmth to love, whether I will or not, sentiment, though I so
 highly respect principle.----
 
 Not that I think Mirabeau utterly devoid of principles--Far from it--and,
 if I had not begun to form a new theory respecting men, I should, in the
 vanity of my heart, have _imagined_ that _I_ could have made something of
 his----it was composed of such materials--Hush! here they come--and love
 flies away in the twinkling of an eye, leaving a little brush of his wing
 on my pale cheeks.
 
 I hope to see Dr. ---- this morning; I am going to Mr. ----'s to meet
 him. ----, and some others, are invited to dine with us to-day; and
 to-morrow I am to spend the day with ----.
 
 I shall probably not be able to return to ---- to-morrow; but it is no
 matter, because I must take a carriage, I have so many books, that I
 immediately want, to take with me.--On Friday then I shall expect you to
 dine with me--and, if you come a little before dinner, it is so long
 since I have seen you, you will not be scolded by yours affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER IV[7-A].
 
 Friday Morning [September.]
 
 A MAN, whom a letter from Mr. ----previously announced, called here
 yesterday for the payment of a draft; and, as he seemed disappointed at
 not finding you at home, I sent him to Mr. ----. I have since seen him,
 and he tells me that he has settled the business.
 
 So much for business!--May I venture to talk a little longer about less
 weighty affairs?--How are you?--I have been following you all along the
 road this comfortless weather; for, when I am absent from those I love,
 my imagination is as lively, as if my senses had never been gratified by
 their presence--I was going to say caresses--and why should I not? I have
 found out that I have more mind than you, in one respect; because I can,
 without any violent effort of reason, find food for love in the same
 object, much longer than you can.--The way to my senses is through my
 heart; but, forgive me! I think there is sometimes a shorter cut to
 yours.
 
 With ninety-nine men out of a hundred, a very sufficient dash of folly is
 necessary to render a woman _piquante_, a soft word for desirable; and,
 beyond these casual ebullitions of sympathy, few look for enjoyment by
 fostering a passion in their hearts. One reason, in short, why I wish my
 whole sex to become wiser, is, that the foolish ones may not, by their
 pretty folly, rob those whose sensibility keeps down their vanity, of the
 few roses that afford them some solace in the thorny road of life.
 
 I do not know how I fell into these reflections, excepting one thought
 produced it--that these continual separations were necessary to warm your
 affection.--Of late, we are always separating.--Crack!--crack!--and away
 you go.--This joke wears the sallow cast of thought; for, though I began
 to write cheerfully, some melancholy tears have found their way into my
 eyes, that linger there, whilst a glow of tenderness at my heart whispers
 that you are one of the best creatures in the world.--Pardon then the
 vagaries of a mind, that has been almost "crazed by care," as well as
 "crossed in hapless love," and bear with me a _little_ longer!--When we
 are settled in the country together, more duties will open before me, and
 my heart, which now, trembling into peace, is agitated by every emotion
 that awakens the remembrance of old griefs, will learn to rest on yours,
 with that dignity your character, not to talk of my own, demands.
 
 Take care of yourself--and write soon to your own girl (you may add dear,
 if you please) who sincerely loves you, and will try to convince you of
 it, by becoming happier.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER V.
 
 Sunday Night.
 
 I HAVE just received your letter, and feel as if I could not go to bed
 tranquilly without saying a few words in reply--merely to tell you, that
 my mind is serene, and my heart affectionate.
 
 Ever since you last saw me inclined to faint, I have felt some gentle
 twitches, which make me begin to think, that I am nourishing a creature
 who will soon be sensible of my care.--This thought has not only produced
 an overflowing of tenderness to you, but made me very attentive to calm
 my mind and take exercise, lest I should destroy an object, in whom we
 are to have a mutual interest, you know. Yesterday--do not
 smile!--finding that I had hurt myself by lifting precipitately a large
 log of wood, I sat down in an agony, till I felt those said twitches
 again.
 
 Are you very busy?
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 So you may reckon on its being finished soon, though not before you come
 home, unless you are detained longer than I now allow myself to believe
 you will.--
 
 Be that as it may, write to me, my best love, and bid me be
 patient--kindly--and the expressions of kindness will again beguile the
 time, as sweetly as they have done to-night.--Tell me also over and over
 again, that your happiness (and you deserve to be happy!) is closely
 connected with mine, and I will try to dissipate, as they rise, the fumes
 of former discontent, that have too often clouded the sunshine, which you
 have endeavoured to diffuse through my mind. God bless you! Take care of
 yourself, and remember with tenderness your affectionate
 
 * * * *
 
 I am going to rest very happy, and you have made me so.--This is the
 kindest good-night I can utter.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER VI.
 
 Friday Morning.
 
 I AM glad to find that other people can be unreasonable, as well as
 myself--for be it known to thee, that I answered thy _first_ letter, the
 very night it reached me (Sunday), though thou couldst not receive it
 before Wednesday, because it was not sent off till the next day.--There
 is a full, true, and particular account.--
 
 Yet I am not angry with thee, my love, for I think that it is a proof of
 stupidity, and likewise of a milk-and-water affection, which comes to the
 same thing, when the temper is governed by a square and compass.--There
 is nothing picturesque in this straight-lined equality, and the passions
 always give grace to the actions.
 
 Recollection now makes my heart bound to thee; but, it is not to thy
 money-getting face, though I cannot be seriously displeased with the
 exertion which increases my esteem, or rather is what I should have
 expected from thy character.--No; I have thy honest countenance before
 me--Pop--relaxed by tenderness; a little--little wounded by my whims; and
 thy eyes glistening with sympathy.--Thy lips then feel softer than
 soft--and I rest my cheek on thine, forgetting all the world.--I have not
 left the hue of love out of the picture--the rosy glow; and fancy has
 spread it over my own cheeks, I believe, for I feel them burning, whilst
 a delicious tear trembles in my eye, that would be all your own, if a
 grateful emotion directed to the Father of nature, who has made me thus
 alive to happiness, did not give more warmth to the sentiment it
 divides--I must pause a moment.
 
 Need I tell you that I am tranquil after writing thus?--I do not know
 why, but I have more confidence in your affection, when absent, than
 present; nay, I think that you must love me, for, in the sincerity of my
 heart let me say it, I believe I deserve your tenderness, because I am
 true, and have a degree of sensibility that you can see and relish.
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER VII.
 
 Sunday Morning [December 29.]
 
 YOU seem to have taken up your abode at H----. Pray sir! when do you
 think of coming home? or, to write very considerately, when will business
 permit you? I shall expect (as the country people say in England) that
 you will make a _power_ of money to indemnify me for your absence.
 
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 Well! but, my love, to the old story--am I to see you this week, or this
 month?--I do not know what you are about--for, as you did not tell me, I
 would not ask Mr. ----, who is generally pretty communicative.
 
 I long to see Mrs. ------; not to hear from you, so do not give yourself
 airs, but to get a letter from Mr. ----. And I am half angry with you for
 not informing me whether she had brought one with her or not.--On this
 score I will cork up some of the kind things that were ready to drop from
 my pen, which has never been dipt in gall when addressing you; or, will
 only suffer an exclamation--"The creature!" or a kind look, to escape me,
 when I pass the slippers--which I could not remove from my _salle_ door,
 though they are not the handsomest of their kind.
 
 Be not too anxious to get money!--for nothing worth having is to be
 purchased. God bless you.
 
 Yours affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER VIII.
 
 Monday Night [December 30.]
 
 MY best love, your letter to-night was particularly grateful to my heart,
 depressed by the letters I received by ----, for he brought me several,
 and the parcel of books directed to Mr. ------ was for me. Mr. ------'s
 letter was long and very affectionate; but the account he gives me of his
 own affairs, though he obviously makes the best of them, has vexed me.
 
 A melancholy letter from my sister ------ has also harrassed my
 mind--that from my brother would have given me sincere pleasure; but for
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 There is a spirit of independence in his letter, that will please you;
 and you shall see it, when we are once more over the fire together.--I
 think that you would hail him as a brother, with one of your tender
 looks, when your heart not only gives a lustre to your eye, but a dance
 of playfulness, that he would meet with a glow half made up of
 bashfulness, and a desire to please the----where shall I find a word to
 express the relationship which subsists between us?--Shall I ask the
 little twitcher?--But I have dropt half the sentence that was to tell you
 how much he would be inclined to love the man loved by his sister. I have
 been fancying myself sitting between you, ever since I began to write,
 and my heart has leaped at the thought!--You see how I chat to you.
 
 I did not receive your letter till I came home; and I did not expect it,
 for the post came in much later than usual. It was a cordial to me--and I
 wanted one.
 
 Mr. ---- tells me that he has written again and again.--Love him a
 little!--It would be a kind of separation, if you did not love those I
 love.
 
 There was so much considerate tenderness in your epistle to-night, that,
 if it has not made you dearer to me, it has made me forcibly feel how
 very dear you are to me, by charming away half my cares.
 
 Yours affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER IX.
 
 Tuesday Morning [December 31.]
 
 THOUGH I have just sent a letter off, yet, as captain ---- offers to take
 one, I am not willing to let him go without a kind greeting, because
 trifles of this sort, without having any effect on my mind, damp my
 spirits:--and you, with all your struggles to be manly, have some of this
 same sensibility.--Do not bid it begone, for I love to see it striving to
 master your features; besides, these kind of sympathies are the life of
 affection: and why, in cultivating our understandings, should we try to
 dry up these springs of pleasure, which gush out to give a freshness to
 days browned by care!
 
 The books sent to me are such as we may read together; so I shall not
 look into them till you return; when you shall read, whilst I mend my
 stockings.
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER X.
 
 Wednesday Night [January 1.]
 
 AS I have been, you tell me, three days without writing, I ought not to
 complain of two: yet, as I expected to receive a letter this afternoon, I
 am hurt; and why should I, by concealing it, affect the heroism I do not
 feel?
 
 I hate commerce. How differently must ------'s head and heart be
 organized from mine! You will tell me, that exertions are necessary: I am
 weary of them! The face of things, public and private, vexes me. The
 "peace" and clemency which seemed to be dawning a few days ago, disappear
 again. "I am fallen," as Milton said, "on evil days;" for I really
 believe that Europe will be in a state of convulsion, during half a
 century at least. Life is but a labour of patience: it is always rolling
 a great stone up a hill; for, before a person can find a resting-place,
 imagining it is lodged, down it comes again, and all the work is to be
 done over anew!
 
 Should I attempt to write any more, I could not change the strain. My
 head aches, and my heart is heavy. The world appears an "unweeded
 garden," where "things rank and vile" flourish best.
 
 If you do not return soon--or, which is no such mighty matter, talk of
 it--I will throw your slippers out at window, and be off--nobody knows
 where.
 
 * * * *
 
 Finding that I was observed, I told the good women, the two Mrs. ----s,
 simply that I was with child: and let them stare! and ------, and ------,
 nay, all the world, may know it for aught I care!--Yet I wish to avoid
 ------'s coarse jokes.
 
 Considering the care and anxiety a woman must have about a child before
 it comes into the world, it seems to me, by a _natural right_, to belong
 to her. When men get immersed in the world, they seem to lose all
 sensations, excepting those necessary to continue or produce life!--Are
 these the privileges of reason? Amongst the feathered race, whilst the
 hen keeps the young warm, her mate stays by to cheer her; but it is
 sufficient for man to condescend to get a child, in order to claim it.--A
 man is a tyrant!
 
 You may now tell me, that, if it were not for me, you would be laughing
 away with some honest fellows in L--n. The casual exercise of social
 sympathy would not be sufficient for me--I should not think such an
 heartless life worth preserving.--It is necessary to be in good-humour
 with you, to be pleased with the world.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Thursday Morning.
 
 I WAS very low-spirited last night, ready to quarrel with your cheerful
 temper, which makes absence easy to you.--And, why should I mince the the
 matter? I was offended at your not even mentioning it.--I do not want to
 be loved like a goddess; but I wish to be necessary to you. God bless
 you[27-A]!
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XI.
 
 Monday Night.
 
 I HAVE just received your kind and rational letter, and would fain hide
 my face, glowing with shame for my folly.--I would hide it in your bosom,
 if you would again open it to me, and nestle closely till you bade my
 fluttering heart be still, by saying that you forgave me. With eyes
 overflowing with tears, and in the humblest attitude, I intreat you.--Do
 not turn from me, for indeed I love you fondly, and have been very
 wretched, since the night I was so cruelly hurt by thinking that you had
 no confidence in me----
 
 It is time for me to grow more reasonable, a few more of these caprices
 of sensibility would destroy me. I have, in fact, been very much
 indisposed for a few days past, and the notion that I was tormenting, or
 perhaps killing, a poor little animal, about whom I am grown anxious and
 tender, now I feel it alive, made me worse. My bowels have been
 dreadfully disordered, and every thing I ate or drank disagreed with my
 stomach; still I feel intimations of its existence, though they have been
 fainter.
 
 Do you think that the creature goes regularly to sleep? I am ready to ask
 as many questions as Voltaire's Man of Forty Crowns. Ah! do not continue
 to be angry with me! You perceive that I am already smiling through my
 tears--You have lightened my heart, and my frozen spirits are melting
 into playfulness.
 
 Write the moment you receive this. I shall count the minutes. But drop
 not an angry word--I cannot now bear it. Yet, if you think I deserve a
 scolding (it does not admit of a question, I grant), wait till you come
 back--and then, if you are angry one day, I shall be sure of seeing you
 the next.
 
 ------ did not write to you, I suppose, because he talked of going to
 H----. Hearing that I was ill, he called very kindly on me, not dreaming
 that it was some words that he incautiously let fall, which rendered me
 so.
 
 God bless you, my love; do not shut your heart against a return of
 tenderness; and, as I now in fancy cling to you, be more than ever my
 support.--Feel but as affectionate when you read this letter, as I did
 writing it, and you will make happy, your
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XII.
 
 Wednesday Morning.
 
 I WILL never, if I am not entirely cured of quarrelling, begin to
 encourage "quick-coming fancies," when we are separated. Yesterday, my
 love, I could not open your letter for some time; and, though it was not
 half as severe as I merited, it threw me into such a fit of trembling, as
 seriously alarmed me. I did not, as you may suppose, care for a little
 pain on my own account; but all the fears which I have had for a few days
 past, returned with fresh force. This morning I am better; will you not
 be glad to hear it? You perceive that sorrow has almost made a child of
 me, and that I want to be soothed to peace.
 
 One thing you mistake in my character, and imagine that to be coldness
 which is just the contrary. For, when I am hurt by the person most dear
 to me, I must let out a whole torrent of emotions, in which tenderness
 would be uppermost, or stifle them altogether; and it appears to me
 almost a duty to stifle them, when I imagine _that I am treated with
 coldness_.
 
 I am afraid that I have vexed you, my own ----. I know the quickness of
 your feelings--and let me, in the sincerity of my heart, assure you,
 there is nothing I would not suffer to make you happy. My own happiness
 wholly depends on you--and, knowing you, when my reason is not clouded, I
 look forward to a rational prospect of as much felicity as the earth
 affords--with a little dash of rapture into the bargain, if you will look
 at me, when we meet again, as you have sometimes greeted, your humbled,
 yet most affectionate
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XIII.
 
 Thursday Night.
 
 I HAVE been wishing the time away, my kind love, unable to rest till I
 knew that my penitential letter had reached your hand--and this
 afternoon, when your tender epistle of Tuesday gave such exquisite
 pleasure to your poor sick girl, her heart smote her to think that you
 were still to receive another cold one.--Burn it also, my ----; yet do
 not forget that even those letters were full of love; and I shall ever
 recollect, that you did not wait to be mollified by my penitence, before
 you took me again to your heart.
 
 I have been unwell, and would not, now I am recovering, take a journey,
 because I have been seriously alarmed and angry with myself, dreading
 continually the fatal consequence of my folly.--But, should you think it
 right to remain at H--, I shall find some opportunity, in the course of a
 fortnight, or less perhaps, to come to you, and before then I shall be
 strong again.--Yet do not be uneasy! I am really better, and never took
 such care of myself, as I have done since you restored my peace of mind.
 The girl is come to warm my bed--so I will tenderly say, good night! and
 write a line or two in the morning.
 
 Morning.
 
 I WISH you were here to walk with me this fine morning! yet your absence
 shall not prevent me. I have stayed at home too much; though, when I was
 so dreadfully out of spirits, I was careless of every thing.
 
 I will now sally forth (you will go with me in my heart) and try whether
 this fine bracing air will not give the vigour to the poor babe, it had,
 before I so inconsiderately gave way to the grief that deranged my
 bowels, and gave a turn to my whole system.
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *  * * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XIV.
 
 Saturday Morning.
 
 THE two or three letters, which I have written to you lately, my love,
 will serve as an answer to your explanatory one. I cannot but respect
 your motives and conduct. I always respected them; and was only hurt, by
 what seemed to me a want of confidence, and consequently affection.--I
 thought also, that if you were obliged to stay three months at H--, I
 might as well have been with you.--Well! well, what signifies what I
 brooded over--Let us now be friends!
 
 I shall probably receive a letter from you to-day, sealing my pardon--and
 I will be careful not to torment you with my querulous humours, at
 least, till I see you again. Act as circumstances direct, and I will not
 enquire when they will permit you to return, convinced that you will
 hasten to your * * * *, when you have attained (or lost sight of) the
 object of your journey.
 
 What a picture have you sketched of our fire-side! Yes, my love, my fancy
 was instantly at work, and I found my head on your shoulder, whilst my
 eyes were fixed on the little creatures that were clinging about your
 knees. I did not absolutely determine that there should be six--if you
 have not set your heart on this round number.
 
 I am going to dine with Mrs. ----. I have not been to visit her since the
 first day she came to Paris. I wish indeed to be out in the air as much
 as I can; for the exercise I have taken these two or three days past,
 has been of such service to me, that I hope shortly to tell you, that I
 am quite well. I have scarcely slept before last night, and then not
 much.--The two Mrs. ------s have been very anxious and tender.
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
 I need not desire you to give the colonel a good bottle of wine.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XV.
 
 Sunday Morning.
 
 I WROTE to you yesterday, my ----; but, finding that the colonel is still
 detained (for his passport was forgotten at the office yesterday) I am
 not willing to let so many days elapse without your hearing from me,
 after having talked of illness and apprehensions.
 
 I cannot boast of being quite recovered, yet I am (I must use my
 Yorkshire phrase; for, when my heart is warm, pop come the expressions of
 childhood into my head) so _lightsome_, that I think it will not _go
 badly with me_.--And nothing shall be wanting on my part, I assure you;
 for I am urged on, not only by an enlivened affection for you, but by a
 new-born tenderness that plays cheerly round my dilating heart.
 
 I was therefore, in defiance of cold and dirt, out in the air the greater
 part of yesterday; and, if I get over this evening without a return of
 the fever that has tormented me, I shall talk no more of illness. I have
 promised the little creature, that its mother, who ought to cherish it,
 will not again plague it, and begged it to pardon me; and, since I could
 not hug either it or you to my breast, I have to my heart.--I am afraid
 to read over this prattle--but it is only for your eye.
 
 I have been seriously vexed, to find that, whilst you were harrassed by
 impediments in your undertakings, I was giving you additional
 uneasiness.--If you can make any of your plans answer--it is well, I do
 not think a _little_ money inconvenient; but, should they fail, we will
 struggle cheerfully together--drawn closer by the pinching blasts of
 poverty.
 
 Adieu, my love! Write often to your poor girl, and write long letters;
 for I not only like them for being longer, but because more heart steals
 into them; and I am happy to catch your heart whenever I can.
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XVI.
 
 Tuesday Morning.
 
 I SEIZE this opportunity to inform you, that I am to set out on Thursday
 with Mr. ------, and hope to tell you soon (on your lips) how glad I
 shall be to see you. I have just got my passport, so I do not foresee any
 impediment to my reaching H----, to bid you good-night next Friday in my
 new apartment--where I am to meet you and love, in spite of care, to
 smile me to sleep--for I have not caught much rest since we parted.
 
 You have, by your tenderness and worth, twisted yourself more artfully
 round my heart, than I supposed possible.--Let me indulge the thought,
 that I have thrown out some tendrils to cling to the elm by which I wish
 to be supported.--This is talking a new language for me!--But, knowing
 that I am not a parasite-plant, I am willing to receive the proofs of
 affection, that every pulse replies to, when I think of being once more
 in the same house with you.--God bless you!
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XVII.
 
 Wednesday Morning.
 
 I ONLY send this as an _avant-coureur_, without jack-boots, to tell you,
 that I am again on the wing, and hope to be with you a few hours after
 you receive it. I shall find you well, and composed, I am sure; or, more
 properly speaking, cheerful.--What is the reason that my spirits are not
 as manageable as yours? Yet, now I think of it, I will not allow that
 your temper is even, though I have promised myself, in order to obtain my
 own forgiveness, that I will not ruffle it for a long, long time--I am
 afraid to say never.
 
 Farewell for a moment!--Do not forget that I am driving towards you in
 person! My mind, unfettered, has flown to you long since, or rather has
 never left you.
 
 I am well, and have no apprehension that I shall find the journey too
 fatiguing, when I follow the lead of my heart.--With my face turned to
 H--my spirits will not sink--and my mind has always hitherto enabled my
 body to do whatever I wished.
 
 Yours affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XVIII.
 
 H--, Thursday Morning, March 12.
 
 WE are such creatures of habit, my love, that, though I cannot say I was
 sorry, childishly so, for your going, when I knew that you were to stay
 such a short time, and I had a plan of employment; yet I could not
 sleep.--I turned to your side of the bed, and tried to make the most of
 the comfort of the pillow, which you used to tell me I was churlish
 about; but all would not do.--I took nevertheless my walk before
 breakfast, though the weather was not very inviting--and here I am,
 wishing you a finer day, and seeing you peep over my shoulder, as I
 write, with one of your kindest looks--when your eyes glisten, and a
 suffusion creeps over your relaxing features.
 
 But I do not mean to dally with you this morning--So God bless you! Take
 care of yourself--and sometimes fold to your heart your affectionate
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XIX.
 
 DO not call me stupid, for leaving on the table the little bit of paper I
 was to inclose.--This comes of being in love at the fag-end of a letter
 of business.--You know, you say, they will not chime together.--I had got
 you by the fire-side, with the _gigot_ smoking on the board, to lard your
 poor bare ribs--and behold, I closed my letter without taking the paper
 up, that was directly under my eyes!--What had I got in them to render me
 so blind?--I give you leave to answer the question, if you will not
 scold; for I am
 
 Yours most affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XX.
 
 Sunday, August 17.
 
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 I have promised ------ to go with him to his country-house, where he is
 now permitted to dine--I, and the little darling, to be sure[47-A]--whom
 I cannot help kissing with more fondness, since you left us. I think I
 shall enjoy the fine prospect, and that it will rather enliven, than
 satiate my imagination.
 
 I have called on Mrs. ------. She has the manners of a gentlewoman, with
 a dash of the easy French coquetry, which renders her _piquante_.--But
 _Monsieur_ her husband, whom nature never dreamed of casting in either
 the mould of a gentleman or lover, makes but an aukward figure in the
 foreground of the picture.
 
 The H----s are very ugly, without doubt--and the house smelt of commerce
 from top to toe--so that his abortive attempt to display taste, only
 proved it to be one of the things not to be bought with gold. I was in a
 room a moment alone, and my attention was attracted by the _pendule_--A
 nymph was offering up her vows before a smoking altar, to a fat-bottomed
 Cupid (saving your presence), who was kicking his heels in the air.--Ah!
 kick on, thought I; for the demon of traffic will ever fright away the
 loves and graces, that streak with the rosy beams of infant fancy the
 _sombre_ day of life--whilst the imagination, not allowing us to see
 things as they are, enables us to catch a hasty draught of the running
 stream of delight, the thirst for which seems to be given only to
 tantalize us.
 
 But I am philosophizing; nay, perhaps you will call me severe, and bid me
 let the square-headed money-getters alone.--Peace to them! though none of
 the social sprites (and there are not a few of different descriptions,
 who sport about the various inlets to my heart) gave me a twitch to
 restrain my pen.
 
 I have been writing on, expecting poor ------ to come; for, when I began,
 I merely thought of business; and, as this is the idea that most
 naturally associates with your image, I wonder I stumbled on any other.
 
 Yet, as common life, in my opinion, is scarcely worth having, even with a
 _gigot_ every day, and a pudding added thereunto, I will allow you to
 cultivate my judgment, if you will permit me to keep alive the sentiments
 in your heart, which may be termed romantic, because, the offspring of
 the senses and the imagination, they resemble the mother more than the
 father[50-A], when they produce the suffusion I admire.--In spite of icy
 age, I hope still to see it, if you have not determined only to eat and
 drink, and be stupidly useful to the stupid--
 
 Yours
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXI.
 
 H--, August 19, Tuesday.
 
 I RECEIVED both your letters to-day--I had reckoned on hearing from you
 yesterday, therefore was disappointed, though I imputed your silence to
 the right cause. I intended answering your kind letter immediately, that
 you might have felt the pleasure it gave me; but ------ came in, and
 some other things interrupted me; so that the fine vapour has
 evaporated--yet, leaving a sweet scent behind, I have only to tell you,
 what is sufficiently obvious, that the earnest desire I have shown to
 keep my place, or gain more ground in your heart, is a sure proof how
 necessary your affection is to my happiness.--Still I do not think it
 false delicacy, or foolish pride, to wish that your attention to my
 happiness should arise _as much_ from love, which is always rather a
 selfish passion, as reason--that is, I want you to promote my felicity,
 by seeking your own.--For, whatever pleasure it may give me to discover
 your generosity of soul, I would not be dependent for your affection on
 the very quality I most admire. No; there are qualities in your heart,
 which demand my affection; but, unless the attachment appears to me
 clearly mutual, I shall labour only to esteem your character, instead of
 cherishing a tenderness for your person.
 
 I write in a hurry, because the little one, who has been sleeping a long
 time, begins to call for me. Poor thing! when I am sad, I lament that all
 my affections grow on me, till they become too strong for my peace,
 though they all afford me snatches of exquisite enjoyment--This for our
 little girl was at first very reasonable--more the effect of reason, a
 sense of duty, than feeling--now, she has got into my heart and
 imagination, and when I walk out without her, her little figure is ever
 dancing before me.
 
 You too have somehow clung round my heart--I found I could not eat my
 dinner in the great room--and, when I took up the large knife to carve
 for myself, tears rushed into my eyes.--Do not however suppose that I am
 melancholy--for, when you are from me, I not only wonder how I can find
 fault with you--but how I can doubt your affection.
 
 I will not mix any comments on the inclosed (it roused my indignation)
 with the effusion of tenderness, with which I assure you, that you are
 the friend of my bosom, and the prop of my heart.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXII.
 
 H--, August 20.
 
 I WANT to know what steps you have taken respecting ----. Knavery always
 rouses my indignation--I should be gratified to hear that the law had
 chastised ------ severely; but I do not wish you to see him, because the
 business does not now admit of peaceful discussion, and I do not exactly
 know how you would express your contempt.
 
 Pray ask some questions about Tallien--I am still pleased with the
 dignity of his conduct.--The other day, in the cause of humanity, he made
 use of a degree of address, which I admire--and mean to point out to
 you, as one of the few instances of address which do credit to the
 abilities of the man, without taking away from that confidence in his
 openness of heart, which is the true basis of both public and private
 friendship.
 
 Do not suppose that I mean to allude to a little reserve of temper in
 you, of which I have sometimes complained! You have been used to a
 cunning woman, and you almost look for cunning--Nay, in _managing_ my
 happiness, you now and then wounded my sensibility, concealing yourself,
 till honest sympathy, giving you to me without disguise, lets me look
 into a heart, which my half-broken one wishes to creep into, to be
 revived and cherished.----You have frankness of heart, but not often
 exactly that overflowing (_epanchement de coeur_), which becoming almost
 childish, appears a weakness only to the weak.
 
 But I have left poor Tallien. I wanted you to enquire likewise whether,
 as a member declared in the convention, Robespierre really maintained a
 _number_ of mistresses.--Should it prove so, I suspect that they rather
 flattered his vanity than his senses.
 
 Here is a chatting, desultory epistle! But do not suppose that I mean to
 close it without mentioning the little damsel--who has been almost
 springing out of my arm--she certainly looks very like you--but I do not
 love her the less for that, whether I am angry or pleased with you.--
 
 Yours affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXIII[58-A].
 
 September 22.
 
 I HAVE just written two letters, that are going by other conveyances, and
 which I reckon on your receiving long before this. I therefore merely
 write, because I know I should be disappointed at seeing any one who had
 left you, if you did not send a letter, were it ever so short, to tell me
 why you did not write a longer--and you will want to be told, over and
 over again, that our little Hercules is quite recovered.
 
 Besides looking at me, there are three other things, which delight
 her--to ride in a coach, to look at a scarlet waistcoat, and hear loud
 music--yesterday, at the _fete_, she enjoyed the two latter; but, to
 honour J. J. Rousseau, I intend to give her a sash, the first she has
 ever had round her--and why not?--for I have always been half in love
 with him.
 
 Well, this you will say is trifling--shall I talk about alum or soap?
 There is nothing picturesque in your present pursuits; my imagination
 then rather chuses to ramble back to the barrier with you, or to see you
 coming to meet me, and my basket of grapes.--With what pleasure do I
 recollect your looks and words, when I have been sitting on the window,
 regarding the waving corn!
 
 Believe me, sage sir, you have not sufficient respect for the
 imagination--I could prove to you in a trice that it is the mother of
 sentiment, the great distinction of our nature, the only purifier of the
 passions--animals have a portion of reason, and equal, if not more
 exquisite, senses; but no trace of imagination, or her offspring taste,
 appears in any of their actions. The impulse of the senses, passions, if
 you will, and the conclusions of reason, draw men together; but the
 imagination is the true fire, stolen from heaven, to animate this cold
 creature of clay, producing all those fine sympathies that lead to
 rapture, rendering men social by expanding their hearts, instead of
 leaving them leisure to calculate how many comforts society affords.
 
 If you call these observations romantic, a phrase in this place which
 would be tantamount to nonsensical, I shall be apt to retort, that you
 are embruted by trade, and the vulgar enjoyments of life--Bring me then
 back your barrier-face, or you shall have nothing to say to my
 barrier-girl; and I shall fly from you, to cherish the remembrances that
 will ever be dear to me; for I am yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXIV.
 
 Evening, Sept. 23.
 
 I HAVE been playing and laughing with the little girl so long, that I
 cannot take up my pen to address you without emotion. Pressing her to my
 bosom, she looked so like you (_entre nous_, your best looks, for I do
 not admire your commercial face) every nerve seemed to vibrate to the
 touch, and I began to think that there was something in the assertion of
 man and wife being one--for you seemed to pervade my whole frame,
 quickening the beat of my heart, and lending me the sympathetic tears you
 excited.
 
 Have I any thing more to say to you? No; not for the present--the rest is
 all flown away; and, indulging tenderness for you, I cannot now complain
 of some people here, who have ruffled my temper for two or three days
 past.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Morning.
 
 YESTERDAY B---- sent to me for my packet of letters. He called on me
 before; and I like him better than I did--that is, I have the same
 opinion of his understanding, but I think with you, he has more
 tenderness and real delicacy of feeling with respect to women, than are
 commonly to be met with. His manner too of speaking of his little girl,
 about the age of mine, interested me. I gave him a letter for my sister,
 and requested him to see her.
 
 I have been interrupted. Mr. ----I suppose will write about business.
 Public affairs I do not descant on, except to tell you that they write
 now with great freedom and truth, and this liberty of the press will
 overthrow the Jacobins, I plainly perceive.
 
 I hope you take care of your health. I have got a habit of restlessness
 at night, which arises, I believe, from activity of mind; for, when I am
 alone, that is, not near one to whom I can open my heart, I sink into
 reveries and trains of thinking, which agitate and fatigue me.
 
 This is my third letter; when am I to hear from you? I need not tell you,
 I suppose, that I am now writing with somebody in the room with me, and
 ---- is waiting to carry this to Mr. ----'s. I will then kiss the girl
 for you, and bid you adieu.
 
 I desired you, in one of my other letters, to bring back to me your
 barrier-face--or that you should not be loved by my barrier-girl. I know
 that you will love her more and more, for she is a little affectionate,
 intelligent creature, with as much vivacity, I should think, as you could
 wish for.
 
 I was going to tell you of two or three things which displease me here;
 but they are not of sufficient consequence to interrupt pleasing
 sensations. I have received a letter from Mr. ----. I want you to bring
 ----with you. Madame S---- is by me, reading a German translation of your
 letters--she desires me to give her love to you, on account of what you
 say of the negroes.
 
 Yours most affectionately,
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXV.
 
 Paris, Sept. 28.
 
 I HAVE written to you three or four letters; but different causes have
 prevented my sending them by the persons who promised to take or forward
 them. The inclosed is one I wrote to go by B----; yet, finding that he
 will not arrive, before I hope, and believe, you will have set out on
 your return, I inclose it to you, and shall give it in charge to ----, as
 Mr. ---- is detained, to whom I also gave a letter.
 
 I cannot help being anxious to hear from you; but I shall not harrass you
 with accounts of inquietudes, or of cares that arise from peculiar
 circumstances.--I have had so many little plagues here, that I have
 almost lamented that I left H----. ----, who is at best a most helpless
 creature, is now, on account of her pregnancy, more trouble than use to
 me, so that I still continue to be almost a slave to the child.--She
 indeed rewards me, for she is a sweet little creature; for, setting aside
 a mother's fondness (which, by the bye, is growing on me, her little
 intelligent smiles sinking into my heart), she has an astonishing degree
 of sensibility and observation. The other day by B----'s child, a fine
 one, she looked like a little sprite.--She is all life and motion, and
 her eyes are not the eyes of a fool--I will swear.
 
 I slept at St. Germain's, in the very room (if you have not forgot) in
 which you pressed me very tenderly to your heart.--I did not forget to
 fold my darling to mine, with sensations that are almost too sacred to
 be alluded to.
 
 Adieu, my love! Take care of yourself, if you wish to be the protector of
 your child, and the comfort of her mother.
 
 I have received, for you, letters from --------. I want to hear how that
 affair finishes, though I do not know whether I have most contempt for
 his folly or knavery.
 
 Your own
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXVI.
 
 October 1.
 
 IT is a heartless task to write letters, without knowing whether they
 will ever reach you.--I have given two to ----, who has been a-going,
 a-going, every day, for a week past; and three others, which were written
 in a low-spirited strain, a little querulous or so, I have not been able
 to forward by the opportunities that were mentioned to me. _Tant mieux!_
 you will say, and I will not say nay; for I should be sorry that the
 contents of a letter, when you are so far away, should damp the pleasure
 that the sight of it would afford--judging of your feelings by my own. I
 just now stumbled on one of the kind letters, which you wrote during your
 last absence. You are then a dear affectionate creature, and I will not
 plague you. The letter which you chance to receive, when the absence is
 so long, ought to bring only tears of tenderness, without any bitter
 alloy, into your eyes.
 
 After your return I hope indeed, that you will not be so immersed in
 business, as during the last three or four months past--for even money,
 taking into the account all the future comforts it is to procure, may be
 gained at too dear a rate, if painful impressions are left on the
 mind.--These impressions were much more lively, soon after you went away,
 than at present--for a thousand tender recollections efface the
 melancholy traces they left on my mind--and every emotion is on the same
 side as my reason, which always was on yours.--Separated, it would be
 almost impious to dwell on real or imaginary imperfections of
 character.--I feel that I love you; and, if I cannot be happy with you, I
 will seek it no where else.
 
 My little darling grows every day more dear to me--and she often has a
 kiss, when we are alone together, which I give her for you, with all my
 heart.
 
 I have been interrupted--and must send off my letter. The liberty of the
 press will produce a great effect here--the _cry of blood will not be
 vain_!--Some more monsters will perish--and the Jacobins are
 conquered.--Yet I almost fear the last slap of the tail of the beast.
 
 I have had several trifling teazing inconveniencies here, which I shall
 not now trouble you with a detail of.--I am sending ---- back; her
 pregnancy rendered her useless. The girl I have got has more vivacity,
 which is better for the child.
 
 I long to hear from you.--Bring a copy of ---- and ---- with you.
 
 ---- is still here: he is a lost man.--He really loves his wife, and is
 anxious about his children; but his indiscriminate hospitality and social
 feelings have given him an inveterate habit of drinking, that destroys
 his health, as well as renders his person disgusting.--If his wife had
 more sense, or delicacy, she might restrain him: as it is, nothing will
 save him.
 
 Yours most truly and affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXVII.
 
 October 26.
 
 MY dear love, I began to wish so earnestly to hear from you, that the
 sight of your letters occasioned such pleasurable emotions, I was obliged
 to throw them aside till the little girl and I were alone together; and
 this said little girl, our darling, is become a most intelligent little
 creature, and as gay as a lark, and that in the morning too, which I do
 not find quite so convenient. I once told you, that the sensations before
 she was born, and when she is sucking, were pleasant; but they do not
 deserve to be compared to the emotions I feel, when she stops to smile
 upon me, or laughs outright on meeting me unexpectedly in the street, or
 after a short absence. She has now the advantage of having two good
 nurses, and I am at present able to discharge my duty to her, without
 being the slave of it.
 
 I have therefore employed and amused myself since I got rid of ----, and
 am making a progress in the language amongst other things. I have also
 made some new acquaintance. I have almost _charmed_ a judge of the
 tribunal, R----, who, though I should not have thought it possible, has
 humanity, if not _beaucoup d'esprit_. But let me tell you, if you do not
 make haste back, I shall be half in love with the author of the
 _Marseillaise_, who is a handsome man, a little too broad-faced or so,
 and plays sweetly on the violin.
 
 What do you say to this threat?--why, _entre nous_, I like to give way to
 a sprightly vein, when writing to you, that is, when I am pleased with
 you. "The devil," you know, is proverbially said to be "in a good humour,
 when he is pleased." Will you not then be a good boy, and come back
 quickly to play with your girls? but I shall not allow you to love the
 new-comer best.
 
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 My heart longs for your return, my love, and only looks for, and seeks
 happiness with you; yet do not imagine that I childishly wish you to come
 back, before you have arranged things in such a manner, that it will not
 be necessary for you to leave us soon again; or to make exertions which
 injure your constitution.
 
 Yours most truly and tenderly
 
 * * * *
 
 P.S. "You would oblige me by delivering the inclosed to Mr. ----, and
 pray call for an answer.--It is for a person uncomfortably situated.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXVIII.
 
 Dec. 26.
 
 I HAVE been, my love, for some days tormented by fears, that I would not
 allow to assume a form--I had been expecting you daily--and I heard that
 many vessels had been driven on shore during the late gale.--Well, I now
 see your letter--and find that you are safe; I will not regret then that
 your exertions have hitherto been so unavailing.
 
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 Be that as it may, return to me when you have arranged the other matters,
 which ---- has been crowding on you. I want to be sure that you are
 safe--and not separated from me by a sea that must be passed. For,
 feeling that I am happier than I ever was, do you wonder at my sometimes
 dreading that fate has not done persecuting me? Come to me, my dearest
 friend, husband, father of my child!--All these fond ties glow at my
 heart at this moment, and dim my eyes.--With you an independence is
 desirable; and it is always within our reach, if affluence escapes
 us--without you the world again appears empty to me. But I am recurring
 to some of the melancholy thoughts that have flitted across my mind for
 some days past, and haunted my dreams.
 
 My little darling is indeed a sweet child; and I am sorry that you are
 not here, to see her little mind unfold itself. You talk of "dalliance;"
 but certainly no lover was ever more attached to his mistress, than she
 is to me. Her eyes follow me every where, and by affection I have the
 most despotic power over her. She is all vivacity or softness--yes; I
 love her more than I thought I should. When I have been hurt at your
 stay, I have embraced her as my only comfort--when pleased with you, for
 looking and laughing like you; nay, I cannot, I find, long be angry with
 you, whilst I am kissing her for resembling you. But there would be no
 end to these details. Fold us both to your heart; for I am truly and
 affectionately
 
 Yours
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXIX.
 
 December 28.
 
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 I do, my love, indeed sincerely sympathize with you in all your
 disappointments.--Yet, knowing that you are well, and think of me with
 affection, I only lament other disappointments, because I am sorry that
 you should thus exert yourself in vain, and that you are kept from me.
 
 ------, I know, urges you to stay, and is continually branching out into
 new projects, because he has the idle desire to amass a large fortune,
 rather an immense one, merely to have the credit of having made it. But
 we who are governed by other motives, ought not to be led on by him. When
 we meet, we will discuss this subject--You will listen to reason, and it
 has probably occurred to you, that it will be better, in future, to
 pursue some sober plan, which may demand more time, and still enable you
 to arrive at the same end. It appears to me absurd to waste life in
 preparing to live.
 
 Would it not now be possible to arrange your business in such a manner
 as to avoid the inquietudes, of which I have had my share since your
 departure? Is it not possible to enter into business, as an employment
 necessary to keep the faculties awake, and (to sink a little in the
 expressions) the pot boiling, without suffering what must ever be
 considered as a secondary object, to engross the mind, and drive
 sentiment and affection out of the heart?
 
 I am in a hurry to give this letter to the person who has promised to
 forward it with ------'s. I wish then to counteract, in some measure,
 what he has doubtless recommended most warmly.
 
 Stay, my friend, whilst it is _absolutely_ necessary.--I will give you no
 tenderer name, though it glows at my heart, unless you come the moment
 the settling the _present_ objects permit.--_I do not consent_ to your
 taking any other journey--or the little woman and I will be off, the Lord
 knows where. But, as I had rather owe every thing to your affection, and,
 I may add, to your reason, (for this immoderate desire of wealth, which
 makes ------ so eager to have you remain, is contrary to your principles
 of action), I will not importune you.--I will only tell you, that I long
 to see you--and, being at peace with you, I shall be hurt, rather than
 made angry, by delays.--Having suffered so much in life, do not be
 surprised if I sometimes, when left to myself, grow gloomy, and suppose
 that it was all a dream, and that my happiness is not to last. I say
 happiness, because remembrance retrenches all the dark shades of the
 picture.
 
 My little one begins to show her teeth, and use her legs--She wants you
 to bear your part in the nursing business, for I am fatigued with dancing
 her, and yet she is not satisfied--she wants you to thank her mother for
 taking such care of her, as you only can.
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXX.
 
 December 29.
 
 THOUGH I suppose you have later intelligence, yet, as ------ has just
 informed me that he has an opportunity of sending immediately to you, I
 take advantage of it to inclose you
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 How I hate this crooked business! This intercourse with the world, which
 obliges one to see the worst side of human nature! Why cannot you be
 content with the object you had first in view, when you entered into this
 wearisome labyrinth?--I know very well that you have imperceptibly been
 drawn on; yet why does one project, successful or abortive, only give
 place to two others? Is it not sufficient to avoid poverty?--I am
 contented to do my part; and, even here, sufficient to escape from
 wretchedness is not difficult to obtain. And, let me tell you, I have my
 project also--and, if you do not soon return, the little girl and I will
 take care of ourselves; we will not accept any of your cold
 kindness--your distant civilities--no; not we.
 
 This is but half jesting, for I am really tormented by the desire which
 ------ manifests to have you remain where you are.--Yet why do I talk to
 you?--If he can persuade you--let him!--for, if you are not happier with
 me, and your own wishes do not make you throw aside these eternal
 projects, I am above using any arguments, though reason as well as
 affection seems to offer them--if our affection be mutual, they will
 occur to you--and you will act accordingly.
 
 Since my arrival here, I have found the German lady, of whom you have
 heard me speak. Her first child died in the month; but she has another,
 about the age of my ------, a fine little creature. They are still but
 contriving to live----earning their daily bread--yet, though they are
 but just above poverty, I envy them.--She is a tender, affectionate
 mother--fatigued even by her attention.--However she has an affectionate
 husband in her turn, to render her care light, and to share her pleasure.
 
 I will own to you that, feeling extreme tenderness for my little girl, I
 grow sad very often when I am playing with her, that you are not here, to
 observe with me how her mind unfolds, and her little heart becomes
 attached!--These appear to me to be true pleasures--and still you suffer
 them to escape you, in search of what we may never enjoy.--It is your own
 maxim to "live in the present moment."--_If you do_--stay, for God's
 sake; but tell me the truth--if not, tell me when I may expect to see
 you, and let me not be always vainly looking for you, till I grow sick at
 heart.
 
 Adieu! I am a little hurt.--I must take my darling to my bosom to comfort
 me.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXI.
 
 December 30.
 
 SHOULD you receive three or four of the letters at once which I have
 written lately, do not think of Sir John Brute, for I do not mean to wife
 you. I only take advantage of every occasion, that one out of three of my
 epistles may reach your hands, and inform you that I am not of ------'s
 opinion, who talks till he makes me angry, of the necessity of your
 staying two or three months longer. I do not like this life of continual
 inquietude--and, _entre nous_, I am determined to try to earn some money
 here myself, in order to convince you that, if you chuse to run about the
 world to get a fortune, it is for yourself--for the little girl and I
 will live without your assistance, unless you are with us. I may be
 termed proud--Be it so--but I will never abandon certain principles of
 action.
 
 The common run of men have such an ignoble way of thinking, that, if they
 debauch their hearts, and prostitute their persons, following perhaps a
 gust of inebriation, they suppose the wife, slave rather, whom they
 maintain, has no right to complain, and ought to receive the sultan,
 whenever he deigns to return, with open arms, though his have been
 polluted by half an hundred promiscuous amours during his absence.
 
 I consider fidelity and constancy as two distinct things; yet the former
 is necessary, to give life to the other--and such a degree of respect do
 I think due to myself, that, if only probity, which is a good thing in
 its place, brings you back, never return!--for, if a wandering of the
 heart, or even a caprice of the imagination detains you--there is an end
 of all my hopes of happiness--I could not forgive it, if I would.
 
 I have gotten into a melancholy mood, you perceive. You know my opinion
 of men in general; you know that I think them systematic tyrants, and
 that it is the rarest thing in the world, to meet with a man with
 sufficient delicacy of feeling to govern desire. When I am thus sad, I
 lament that my little darling, fondly as I doat on her, is a girl.--I am
 sorry to have a tie to a world that for me is ever sown with thorns.
 
 You will call this an ill-humoured letter, when, in fact, it is the
 strongest proof of affection I can give, to dread to lose you. ------ has
 taken such pains to convince me that you must and ought to stay, that it
 has inconceivably depressed my spirits--You have always known my
 opinion--I have ever declared, that two people, who mean to live
 together, ought not to be long separated.--If certain things are more
 necessary to you than me--search for them--Say but one word, and you
 shall never hear of me more.--If not--for God's sake, let us struggle
 with poverty--with any evil, but these continual inquietudes of business,
 which I have been told were to last but a few months, though every day
 the end appears more distant! This is the first letter in this strain
 that I have determined to forward to you; the rest lie by, because I was
 unwilling to give you pain, and I should not now write, if I did not
 think that there would be no conclusion to the schemes, which demand, as
 I am told, your presence.
 
 * * * *[91-A]
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXII.
 
 January 9.
 
 I JUST now received one of your hasty _notes_; for business so entirely
 occupies you, that you have not time, or sufficient command of thought,
 to write letters. Beware! you seem to be got into a whirl of projects and
 schemes, which are drawing you into a gulph, that, if it do not absorb
 your happiness, will infallibly destroy mine.
 
 Fatigued during my youth by the most arduous struggles, not only to
 obtain independence, but to render myself useful, not merely pleasure,
 for which I had the most lively taste, I mean the simple pleasures that
 flow from passion and affection, escaped me, but the most melancholy
 views of life were impressed by a disappointed heart on my mind. Since I
 knew you, I have been endeavouring to go back to my former nature, and
 have allowed some time to glide away, winged with the delight which only
 spontaneous enjoyment can give.--Why have you so soon dissolved the
 charm?
 
 I am really unable to bear the continual inquietude which your and
 ------'s never-ending plans produce. This you may term want of
 firmness--but you are mistaken--I have still sufficient firmness to
 pursue my principle of action. The present misery, I cannot find a softer
 word to do justice to my feelings, appears to me unnecessary--and
 therefore I have not firmness to support it as you may think I ought. I
 should have been content, and still wish, to retire with you to a
 farm--My God! any thing, but these continual anxieties--any thing but
 commerce, which debases the mind, and roots out affection from the heart.
 
 I do not mean to complain of subordinate inconveniences----yet I will
 simply observe, that, led to expect you every week, I did not make the
 arrangements required by the present circumstances, to procure the
 necessaries of life. In order to have them, a servant, for that purpose
 only, is indispensible--The want of wood, has made me catch the most
 violent cold I ever had; and my head is so disturbed by continual
 coughing, that I am unable to write without stopping frequently to
 recollect myself.--This however is one of the common evils which must be
 borne with----bodily pain does not touch the heart, though it fatigues
 the spirits.
 
 Still as you talk of your return, even in February, doubtingly, I have
 determined, the moment the weather changes, to wean my child.--It is too
 soon for her to begin to divide sorrow!--And as one has well said,
 "despair is a freeman," we will go and seek our fortune together.
 
 This is not a caprice of the moment--for your absence has given new
 weight to some conclusions, that I was very reluctantly forming before
 you left me.--I do not chuse to be a secondary object.--If your feelings
 were in unison with mine, you would not sacrifice so much to visionary
 prospects of future advantage.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXIII.
 
 Jan. 15.
 
 I WAS just going to begin my letter with the fag end of a song, which
 would only have told you, what I may as well say simply, that it is
 pleasant to forgive those we love. I have received your two letters,
 dated the 26th and 28th of December, and my anger died away. You can
 scarcely conceive the effect some of your letters have produced on me.
 After longing to hear from you during a tedious interval of suspense, I
 have seen a superscription written by you.--Promising myself pleasure,
 and feeling emotion, I have laid it by me, till the person who brought
 it, left the room--when, behold! on opening it, I have found only half a
 dozen hasty lines, that have damped all the rising affection of my soul.
 
 Well, now for business--
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 My animal is well; I have not yet taught her to eat, but nature is doing
 the business. I gave her a crust to assist the cutting of her teeth; and
 now she has two, she makes good use of them to gnaw a crust, biscuit, &c.
 You would laugh to see her; she is just like a little squirrel; she will
 guard a crust for two hours; and, after fixing her eye on an object for
 some time, dart on it with an aim as sure as a bird of prey--nothing can
 equal her life and spirits. I suffer from a cold; but it does not affect
 her. Adieu! do not forget to love us--and come soon to tell us that you
 do.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXIV.
 
 Jan. 30.
 
 FROM the purport of your last letters, I would suppose that this will
 scarcely reach you; and I have already written so many letters, that you
 have either not received, or neglected to acknowledge, I do not find it
 pleasant, or rather I have no inclination, to go over the same ground
 again. If you have received them, and are still detained by new projects,
 it is useless for me to say any more on the subject. I have done with it
 for ever--yet I ought to remind you that your pecuniary interest suffers
 by your absence.
 
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 For my part, my head is turned giddy, by only hearing of plans to make
 money, and my contemptuous feelings have sometimes burst out. I therefore
 was glad that a violent cold gave me a pretext to stay at home, lest I
 should have uttered unseasonable truths.
 
 My child is well, and the spring will perhaps restore me to myself.--I
 have endured many inconveniences this winter, which should I be ashamed
 to mention, if they had been unavoidable. "The secondary pleasures of
 life," you say, "are very necessary to my comfort:" it may be so; but I
 have ever considered them as secondary. If therefore you accuse me of
 wanting the resolution necessary to bear the _common_[100-A] evils of
 life; I should answer, that I have not fashioned my mind to sustain them,
 because I would avoid them, cost what it would----
 
 Adieu!
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXV.
 
 February 9.
 
 THE melancholy presentiment has for some time hung on my spirits, that we
 were parted for ever; and the letters I received this day, by Mr. ----,
 convince me that it was not without foundation. You allude to some other
 letters, which I suppose have miscarried; for most of those I have got,
 were only a few hasty lines, calculated to wound the tenderness the sight
 of the superscriptions excited.
 
 I mean not however to complain; yet so many feelings are struggling for
 utterance, and agitating a heart almost bursting with anguish, that I
 find it very difficult to write with any degree of coherence.
 
 You left me indisposed, though you have taken no notice of it; and the
 most fatiguing journey I ever had, contributed to continue it. However, I
 recovered my health; but a neglected cold, and continual inquietude
 during the last two months, have reduced me to a state of weakness I
 never before experienced. Those who did not know that the canker-worm was
 at work at the core, cautioned me about suckling my child too long.--God
 preserve this poor child, and render her happier than her mother!
 
 But I am wandering from my subject: indeed my head turns giddy, when I
 think that all the confidence I have had in the affection of others is
 come to this.
 
 I did not expect this blow from you. I have done my duty to you and my
 child; and if I am not to have any return of affection to reward me, I
 have the sad consolation of knowing that I deserved a better fate. My
 soul is weary--I am sick at heart; and, but for this little darling, I
 would cease to care about a life, which is now stripped of every charm.
 
 You see how stupid I am, uttering declamation, when I meant simply to
 tell you, that I consider your requesting me to come to you, as merely
 dictated by honour.--Indeed, I scarcely understand you.--You request me
 to come, and then tell me, that you have not given up all thoughts of
 returning to this place.
 
 When I determined to live with you, I was only governed by affection.--I
 would share poverty with you, but I turn with affright from the sea of
 trouble on which you are entering.--I have certain principles of action:
 I know what I look for to found my happiness on.--It is not money.--With
 you I wished for sufficient to procure the comforts of life--as it is,
 less will do.--I can still exert myself to obtain the necessaries of life
 for my child, and she does not want more at present.--I have two or three
 plans in my head to earn our subsistence; for do not suppose that,
 neglected by you, I will lie under obligations of a pecuniary kind to
 you!--No; I would sooner submit to menial service.--I wanted the support
 of your affection--that gone, all is over!--I did not think, when I
 complained of ----'s contemptible avidity to accumulate money, that he
 would have dragged you into his schemes.
 
 I cannot write.--I inclose a fragment of a letter, written soon after
 your departure, and another which tenderness made me keep back when it
 was written.--You will see then the sentiments of a calmer, though not a
 more determined, moment.--Do not insult me by saying, that "our being
 together is paramount to every other consideration!" Were it, you would
 not be running after a bubble, at the expence of my peace of mind.
 
 Perhaps this is the last letter you will ever receive from me.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXVI.
 
 Feb. 10.
 
 YOU talk of "permanent views and future comfort"--not for me, for I am
 dead to hope. The inquietudes of the last winter have finished the
 business, and my heart is not only broken, but my constitution destroyed.
 I conceive myself in a galloping consumption, and the continual anxiety I
 feel at the thought of leaving my child, feeds the fever that nightly
 devours me. It is on her account that I again write to you, to conjure
 you, by all that you hold sacred, to leave her here with the German lady
 you may have heard me mention! She has a child of the same age, and they
 may be brought up together, as I wish her to be brought up. I shall
 write more fully on the subject. To facilitate this, I shall give up my
 present lodgings, and go into the same house. I can live much cheaper
 there, which is now become an object. I have had 3000 livres from ----,
 and I shall take one more, to pay my servant's wages, &c. and then I
 shall endeavour to procure what I want by my own exertions. I shall
 entirely give up the acquaintance of the Americans.
 
 ---- and I have not been on good terms a long time. Yesterday he very
 unmanlily exulted over me, on account of your determination to stay. I
 had provoked it, it is true, by some asperities against commerce, which
 have dropped from me, when we have argued about the propriety of your
 remaining where you are; and it is no matter, I have drunk too deep of
 the bitter cup to care about trifles.
 
 When you first entered into these plans, you bounded your views to the
 gaining of a thousand pounds. It was sufficient to have procured a farm
 in America, which would have been an independence. You find now that you
 did not know yourself, and that a certain situation in life is more
 necessary to you than you imagined--more necessary than an uncorrupted
 heart--For a year or two, you may procure yourself what you call
 pleasure; eating, drinking, and women; but, in the solitude of declining
 life, I shall be remembered with regret--I was going to say with remorse,
 but checked my pen.
 
 As I have never concealed the nature of my connection with you, your
 reputation will not suffer. I shall never have a confident: I am content
 with the approbation of my own mind; and, if there be a searcher of
 hearts, mine will not be despised. Reading what you have written relative
 to the desertion of women, I have often wondered how theory and practice
 could be so different, till I recollected, that the sentiments of
 passion, and the resolves of reason, are very distinct. As to my sisters,
 as you are so continually hurried with business, you need not write to
 them--I shall, when my mind is calmer. God bless you! Adieu!
 
 * * * *
 
 This has been such a period of barbarity and misery, I ought not to
 complain of having my share. I wish one moment that I had never heard of
 the cruelties that have been practised here, and the next envy the
 mothers who have been killed with their children. Surely I had suffered
 enough in life, not to be cursed with a fondness, that burns up the vital
 stream I am imparting. You will think me mad: I would I were so, that I
 could forget my misery--so that my head or heart would be still.----
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXVII.
 
 Feb. 19.
 
 WHEN I first received your letter, putting off your return to an
 indefinite time, I felt so hurt, that I know not what I wrote. I am now
 calmer, though it was not the kind of wound over which time has the
 quickest effect; on the contrary, the more I think, the sadder I grow.
 Society fatigues me inexpressibly--So much so, that finding fault with
 every one, I have only reason enough, to discover that the fault is in
 myself. My child alone interests me, and, but for her, I should not take
 any pains to recover my health.
 
 As it is, I shall wean her, and try if by that step (to which I feel a
 repugnance, for it is my only solace) I can get rid of my cough.
 Physicians talk much of the danger attending any complaint on the lungs,
 after a woman has suckled for some months. They lay a stress also on the
 necessity of keeping the mind tranquil--and, my God! how has mine been
 harrassed! But whilst the caprices of other women are gratified, "the
 wind of heaven not suffered to visit them too rudely," I have not found
 a guardian angel, in heaven or on earth, to ward off sorrow or care from
 my bosom.
 
 What sacrifices have you not made for a woman you did not respect!--But I
 will not go over this ground--I want to tell you that I do not understand
 you. You say that you have not given up all thoughts of returning
 here--and I know that it will be necessary--nay, is. I cannot explain
 myself; but if you have not lost your memory, you will easily divine my
 meaning. What! is our life then only to be made up of separations? and am
 I only to return to a country, that has not merely lost all charms for
 me, but for which I feel a repugnance that almost amounts to horror, only
 to be left there a prey to it!
 
 Why is it so necessary that I should return?--brought up here, my girl
 would be freer. Indeed, expecting you to join us, I had formed some plans
 of usefulness that have now vanished with my hopes of happiness.
 
 In the bitterness of my heart, I could complain with reason, that I am
 left here dependent on a man, whose avidity to acquire a fortune has
 rendered him callous to every sentiment connected with social or
 affectionate emotions.--With a brutal insensibility, he cannot help
 displaying the pleasure your determination to stay gives him, in spite of
 the effect it is visible it has had on me.
 
 Till I can earn money, I shall endeavour to borrow some, for I want to
 avoid asking him continually for the sum necessary to maintain me.--Do
 not mistake me, I have never been refused.--Yet I have gone half a dozen
 times to the house to ask for it, and come away without speaking----you
 must guess why--Besides, I wish to avoid hearing of the eternal projects
 to which you have sacrificed my peace--not remembering--but I will be
 silent for ever.----
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXVIII.
 
 April 7.
 
 HERE I am at H----, on the wing towards you, and I write now, only to
 tell you, that you may expect me in the course of three or four days;
 for I shall not attempt to give vent to the different emotions which
 agitate my heart--You may term a feeling, which appears to me to be a
 degree of delicacy that naturally arises from sensibility, pride--Still I
 cannot indulge the very affectionate tenderness which glows in my bosom,
 without trembling, till I see, by your eyes, that it is mutual.
 
 I sit, lost in thought, looking at the sea--and tears rush into my eyes,
 when I find that I am cherishing any fond expectations.--I have indeed
 been so unhappy this winter, I find it as difficult to acquire fresh
 hopes, as to regain tranquillity.--Enough of this--lie still, foolish
 heart!--But for the little girl, I could almost wish that it should cease
 to beat, to be no more alive to the anguish of disappointment.
 
 Sweet little creature! I deprived myself of my only pleasure, when I
 weaned her, about ten days ago.--I am however glad I conquered my
 repugnance.--It was necessary it should be done soon, and I did not wish
 to embitter the renewal of your acquaintance with her, by putting it off
 till we met.--It was a painful exertion to me, and I thought it best to
 throw this inquietude with the rest, into the sack that I would fain
 throw over my shoulder.--I wished to endure it alone, in short--Yet,
 after sending her to sleep in the next room for three or four nights, you
 cannot think with what joy I took her back again to sleep in my bosom!
 
 I suppose I shall find you, when I arrive, for I do not see any necessity
 for your coming to me.--Pray inform Mr. ------, that I have his little
 friend with me.--My wishing to oblige him, made me put myself to some
 inconvenience----and delay my departure; which was irksome to me, who
 have not quite as much philosophy, I would not for the world say
 indifference, as you. God bless you!
 
 Yours truly,
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XXXIX.
 
 Brighthelmstone, Saturday, April 11.
 
 HERE we are, my love, and mean to set out early in the morning; and, if I
 can find you, I hope to dine with you to-morrow.--I shall drive to
 ------'s hotel, where ------ tells me you have been--and, if you have
 left it, I hope you will take care to be there to receive us.
 
 I have brought with me Mr. ----'s little friend, and a girl whom I like
 to take care of our little darling--not on the way, for that fell to my
 share.--But why do I write about trifles?--or any thing?--Are we not to
 meet soon?--What does your heart say!
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
 I have weaned my ------, and she is now eating away at the white bread.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XL.
 
 London, Friday, May 22.
 
 I HAVE just received your affectionate letter, and am distressed to think
 that I have added to your embarrassments at this troublesome juncture,
 when the exertion of all the faculties of your mind appears to be
 necessary, to extricate you out of your pecuniary difficulties. I suppose
 it was something relative to the circumstance you have mentioned, which
 made ------ request to see me to-day, to _converse about a matter of
 great importance_. Be that as it may, his letter (such is the state of my
 spirits) inconceivably alarmed me, and rendered the last night as
 distressing, as the two former had been.
 
 I have laboured to calm my mind since you left me--Still I find that
 tranquillity is not to be obtained by exertion; it is a feeling so
 different from the resignation of despair!--I am however no longer angry
 with you--nor will I ever utter another complaint--there are arguments
 which convince the reason, whilst they carry death to the heart.--We have
 had too many cruel explanations, that not only cloud every future
 prospect; but embitter the remembrances which alone give life to
 affection.--Let the subject never be revived!
 
 It seems to me that I have not only lost the hope, but the power of being
 happy.--Every emotion is now sharpened by anguish.--My soul has been
 shook, and my tone of feelings destroyed.--I have gone out--and sought
 for dissipation, if not amusement, merely to fatigue still more, I find,
 my irritable nerves----
 
 My friend--my dear friend--examine yourself well--I am out of the
 question; for, alas! I am nothing--and discover what you wish to do--what
 will render you most comfortable--or, to be more explicit--whether you
 desire to live with me, or part for ever? When you can once ascertain it,
 tell me frankly, I conjure you!--for, believe me, I have very
 involuntarily interrupted your peace.
 
 I shall expect you to dinner on Monday, and will endeavour to assume a
 cheerful face to greet you--at any rate I will avoid conversations,
 which only tend to harrass your feelings, because I am most
 affectionately yours,
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLI.
 
 Wednesday.
 
 I INCLOSE you the letter, which you desired me to forward, and I am
 tempted very laconically to wish you a good morning--not because I am
 angry, or have nothing to say; but to keep down a wounded spirit.--I
 shall make every effort to calm my mind--yet a strong conviction seems to
 whirl round in the very centre of my brain, which, like the fiat of
 fate, emphatically assures me, that grief has a firm hold of my heart.
 
 God bless you!
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLII.
 
 --, Wednesday, Two o'Clock.
 
 WE arrived here about an hour ago. I am extremely fatigued with the
 child, who would not rest quiet with any body but me, during the
 night--and now we are here in a comfortless, damp room, in a sort of a
 tomb-like house. This however I shall quickly remedy, for, when I have
 finished this letter, (which I must do immediately, because the post goes
 out early), I shall sally forth, and enquire about a vessel and an inn.
 
 I will not distress you by talking of the depression of my spirits, or
 the struggle I had to keep alive my dying heart.--It is even now too full
 to allow me to write with composure.--*****,--dear *****, --am I always
 to be tossed about thus?--shall I never find an asylum to rest
 _contented_ in? How can you love to fly about continually--dropping down,
 as it were, in a new world--cold and strange!--every other day? Why do
 you not attach those tender emotions round the idea of home, which even
 now dim my eyes?--This alone is affection--every thing else is only
 humanity, electrified by sympathy.
 
 I will write to you again to-morrow, when I know how long I am to be
 detained--and hope to get a letter quickly from you, to cheer yours
 sincerely and affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
 ------ is playing near me in high spirits. She was so pleased with the
 noise of the mail-horn, she has been continually imitating it.----Adieu!
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLIII.
 
 Thursday.
 
 A LADY has just sent to offer to take me to ------. I have then only a
 moment to exclaim against the vague manner in which people give
 information    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 But why talk of inconveniences, which are in fact trifling, when compared
 with the sinking of the heart I have felt! I did not intend to touch this
 painful string--God bless you!
 
 Yours truly,
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLIV.
 
 Friday, June 12.
 
 I HAVE just received yours dated the 9th, which I suppose was a mistake,
 for it could scarcely have loitered so long on the road. The general
 observations which apply to the state of your own mind, appear to me
 just, as far as they go; and I shall always consider it as one of the
 most serious misfortunes of my life, that I did not meet you, before
 satiety had rendered your senses so fastidious, as almost to close up
 every tender avenue of sentiment and affection that leads to your
 sympathetic heart. You have a heart, my friend, yet, hurried away by the
 impetuosity of inferior feelings, you have sought in vulgar excesses,
 for that gratification which only the heart can bestow.
 
 The common run of men, I know, with strong health and gross appetites,
 must have variety to banish _ennui_, because the imagination never lends
 its magic wand, to convert appetite into love, cemented by according
 reason.--Ah! my friend, you know not the ineffable delight, the exquisite
 pleasure, which arises from a unison of affection and desire, when the
 whole soul and senses are abandoned to a lively imagination, that renders
 every emotion delicate and rapturous. Yes; these are emotions, over which
 satiety has no power, and the recollection of which, even disappointment
 cannot disenchant; but they do not exist without self-denial. These
 emotions, more or less strong, appear to me to be the distinctive
 characteristic of genius, the foundation of taste, and of that exquisite
 relish for the beauties of nature, of which the common herd of eaters and
 drinkers and _child-begeters_, certainly have no idea. You will smile at
 an observation that has just occurred to me:--I consider those minds as
 the most strong and original, whose imagination acts as the stimulus to
 their senses.
 
 Well! you will ask, what is the result of all this reasoning? Why I
 cannot help thinking that it is possible for you, having great strength
 of mind, to return to nature, and regain a sanity of constitution, and
 purity of feeling--which would open your heart to me.--I would fain rest
 there!
 
 Yet, convinced more than ever of the sincerity and tenderness of my
 attachment to you, the involuntary hopes, which a determination to live
 has revived, are not sufficiently strong to dissipate the cloud, that
 despair has spread over futurity. I have looked at the sea, and at my
 child, hardly daring to own to myself the secret wish, that it might
 become our tomb; and that the heart, still so alive to anguish, might
 there be quieted by death. At this moment ten thousand complicated
 sentiments press for utterance, weigh on my heart, and obscure my sight.
 
 Are we ever to meet again? and will you endeavour to render that meeting
 happier than the last? Will you endeavour to restrain your caprices, in
 order to give vigour to affection, and to give play to the checked
 sentiments that nature intended should expand your heart? I cannot
 indeed, without agony, think of your bosom's being continually
 contaminated; and bitter are the tears which exhaust my eyes, when I
 recollect why my child and I are forced to stray from the asylum, in
 which, after so many storms, I had hoped to rest, smiling at angry
 fate.--These are not common sorrows; nor can you perhaps conceive, how
 much active fortitude it requires to labour perpetually to blunt the
 shafts of disappointment.
 
 Examine now yourself, and ascertain whether you can live in
 something-like a settled stile. Let our confidence in future be
 unbounded; consider whether you find it necessary to sacrifice me to what
 you term "the zest of life;" and, when you have once a clear view of your
 own motives, of your own incentive to action, do not deceive me!
 
 The train of thoughts which the writing of this epistle awoke, makes me
 so wretched, that I must take a walk, to rouse and calm my mind. But
 first, let me tell you, that, if you really wish to promote my happiness,
 you will endeavour to give me as much as you can of yourself. You have
 great mental energy; and your judgment seems to me so just, that it is
 only the dupe of your inclination in discussing one subject.
 
 The post does not go out to-day. To-morrow I may write more tranquilly. I
 cannot yet say when the vessel will sail in which I have determined to
 depart.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Saturday Morning.
 
 Your second letter reached me about an hour ago. You were certainly
 wrong, in supposing that I did not mention you with respect; though,
 without my being conscious of it, some sparks of resentment may have
 animated the gloom of despair--Yes; with less affection, I should have
 been more respectful. However the regard which I have for you, is so
 unequivocal to myself, I imagine that it must be sufficiently obvious to
 every body else. Besides, the only letter I intended for the public eye
 was to ----, and that I destroyed from delicacy before you saw them,
 because it was only written (of course warmly in your praise) to prevent
 any odium being thrown on you[133-A].
 
 I am harrassed by your embarrassments, and shall certainly use all my
 efforts, to make the business terminate to your satisfaction in which I
 am engaged.
 
 My friend--my dearest friend--I feel my fate united to yours by the most
 sacred principles of my soul, and the yearns of--yes, I will say it--a
 true, unsophisticated heart.
 
 Yours most truly
 
 * * * *
 
 If the wind be fair, the captain talks of sailing on Monday; but I am
 afraid I shall be detained some days longer. At any rate, continue to
 write, (I want this support) till you are sure I am where I cannot expect
 a letter; and, if any should arrive after my departure, a gentleman (not
 Mr. ----'s friend, I promise you) from whom I have received great
 civilities, will send them after me.
 
 Do write by every occasion! I am anxious to hear how your affairs go on;
 and, still more, to be convinced that you are not separating yourself
 from us. For my little darling is calling papa, and adding her parrot
 word--Come, Come! And will you not come, and let us exert ourselves?--I
 shall recover all my energy, when I am convinced that my exertions will
 draw us more closely together. One more adieu!
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLV.
 
 Sunday, June 14.
 
 I RATHER expected to hear from you to-day--I wish you would not fail to
 write to me for a little time, because I am not quite well--Whether I
 have any good sleep or not, I wake in the morning in violent fits of
 trembling--and, in spite of all my efforts, the child--every
 thing--fatigues me, in which I seek for solace or amusement.
 
 Mr. ---- forced on me a letter to a physician of this place; it was
 fortunate, for I should otherwise have had some difficulty to obtain the
 necessary information. His wife is a pretty woman (I can admire, you
 know, a pretty woman, when I am alone) and he an intelligent and rather
 interesting man.--They have behaved to me with great hospitality; and
 poor ------ was never so happy in her life, as amongst their young brood.
 
 They took me in their carriage to ------, and I ran over my favourite
 walks, with a vivacity that would have astonished you.--The town did not
 please me quite so well as formerly--It appeared so diminutive; and, when
 I found that many of the inhabitants had lived in the same houses ever
 since I left it, I could not help wondering how they could thus have
 vegetated, whilst I was running over a world of sorrow, snatching at
 pleasure, and throwing off prejudices. The place where I at present am,
 is much improved; but it is astonishing what strides aristocracy and
 fanaticism have made, since I resided in this country.
 
 The wind does not appear inclined to change, so I am still forced to
 linger--When do you think that you shall be able to set out for France? I
 do not entirely like the aspect of your affairs, and still less your
 connections on either side of the water. Often do I sigh, when I think of
 your entanglements in business, and your extreme restlessness of
 mind.--Even now I am almost afraid to ask you, whether the pleasure of
 being free, does not over-balance the pain you felt at parting with me?
 Sometimes I indulge the hope that you will feel me necessary to you--or
 why should we meet again?--but, the moment after, despair damps my rising
 spirits, aggravated by the emotions of tenderness, which ought to soften
 the cares of life.----God bless you!
 
 Yours sincerely and affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLVI.
 
 June 15.
 
 I WANT to know how you have settled with respect to ------. In short, be
 very particular in your account of all your affairs--let our confidence,
 my dear, be unbounded.--The last time we were separated, was a separation
 indeed on your part--Now you have acted more ingenuously, let the most
 affectionate interchange of sentiments fill up the aching void of
 disappointment. I almost dread that your plans will prove abortive--yet
 should the most unlucky turn send you home to us, convinced that a true
 friend is a treasure, I should not much mind having to struggle with the
 world again. Accuse me not of pride--yet sometimes, when nature has
 opened my heart to its author, I have wondered that you did not set a
 higher value on my heart.
 
 Receive a kiss from ------, I was going to add, if you will not take one
 from me, and believe me yours
 
 Sincerely
 
 * * * *
 
 The wind still continues in the same quarter.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLVII.
 
 Tuesday Morning.
 
 THE captain has just sent to inform me, that I must be on board in the
 course of a few hours.--I wished to have stayed till to-morrow. It would
 have been a comfort to me to have received another letter from
 you--Should one arrive, it will be sent after me.
 
 My spirits are agitated, I scarcely know why----The quitting England
 seems to be a fresh parting.--Surely you will not forget me.--A thousand
 weak forebodings assault my soul, and the state of my health renders me
 sensible to every thing. It is surprising that in London, in a continual
 conflict of mind, I was still growing better--whilst here, bowed down by
 the despotic hand of fate, forced into resignation by despair, I seem to
 be fading away--perishing beneath a cruel blight, that withers up all my
 faculties.
 
 The child is perfectly well. My hand seems unwilling to add adieu! I know
 not why this inexpressible sadness has taken possession of me.--It is not
 a presentiment of ill. Yet, having been so perpetually the sport of
 disappointment,--having a heart that has been as it were a mark for
 misery, I dread to meet wretchedness in some new shape.--Well, let it
 come--I care not!--what have I to dread, who have so little to hope for!
 God bless you--I am most affectionately and sincerely yours
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLVIII.
 
 Wednesday Morning.
 
 I WAS hurried on board yesterday about three o'clock, the wind having
 changed. But before evening it veered round to the old point; and here we
 are, in the midst of mists and water, only taking advantage of the tide
 to advance a few miles.
 
 You will scarcely suppose that I left the town with reluctance--yet it
 was even so--for I wished to receive another letter from you, and I felt
 pain at parting, for ever perhaps, from the amiable family, who had
 treated me with so much hospitality and kindness. They will probably send
 me your letter, if it arrives this morning; for here we are likely to
 remain, I am afraid to think how long.
 
 The vessel is very commodious, and the captain a civil, open-hearted kind
 of man. There being no other passengers, I have the cabin to myself,
 which is pleasant; and I have brought a few books with me to beguile
 weariness; but I seem inclined, rather to employ the dead moments of
 suspence in writing some effusions, than in reading.
 
 What are you about? How are your affairs going on? It may be a long time
 before you answer these questions. My dear friend, my heart sinks within
 me!--Why am I forced thus to struggle continually with my affections and
 feelings?--Ah! why are those affections and feelings the source of so
 much misery, when they seem to have been given to vivify my heart, and
 extend my usefulness! But I must not dwell on this subject.--Will you not
 endeavour to cherish all the affection you can for me? What am I
 saying?--Rather forget me, if you can--if other gratifications are dearer
 to you.--How is every remembrance of mine embittered by disappointment?
 What a world is this!--They only seem happy, who never look beyond
 sensual or artificial enjoyments.--Adieu!
 
 ------ begins to play with the cabin-boy, and is as gay as a lark.--I
 will labour to be tranquil; and am in every mood,
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XLIX.
 
 Thursday.
 
 HERE I am still--and I have just received your letter of Monday by the
 pilot, who promised to bring it to me, if we were detained, as he
 expected, by the wind.--It is indeed wearisome to be thus tossed about
 without going forward.--I have a violent head-ache--yet I am obliged to
 take care of the child, who is a little tormented by her teeth, because
 ------ is unable to do any thing, she is rendered so sick by the motion
 of the ship, as we ride at anchor.
 
 These are however trifling inconveniences, compared with anguish of
 mind--compared with the sinking of a broken heart.--To tell you the
 truth, I never suffered in my life so much from depression of
 spirits--from despair.--I do not sleep--or, if I close my eyes, it is to
 have the most terrifying dreams, in which I often meet you with different
 casts of countenance.
 
 I will not, my dear ------, torment you by dwelling on my sufferings--and
 will use all my efforts to calm my mind, instead of deadening it--at
 present it is most painfully active. I find I am not equal to these
 continual struggles--yet your letter this morning has afforded me some
 comfort--and I will try to revive hope. One thing let me tell you--when
 we meet again--surely we are to meet!--it must be to part no more. I mean
 not to have seas between us--it is more than I can support.
 
 The pilot is hurrying me--God bless you.
 
 In spite of the commodiousness of the vessel, every thing here would
 disgust my senses, had I nothing else to think of--"When the mind's free,
 the body's delicate;"--mine has been too much hurt to regard trifles.
 
 Yours most truly
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER L.
 
 Saturday.
 
 THIS is the fifth dreary day I have been imprisoned by the wind, with
 every outward object to disgust the senses, and unable to banish the
 remembrances that sadden my heart.
 
 How am I altered by disappointment!--When going to ----, ten years ago,
 the elasticity of my mind was sufficient to ward off weariness--and the
 imagination still could dip her brush in the rainbow of fancy, and sketch
 futurity in smiling colours. Now I am going towards the North in search
 of sunbeams!--Will any ever warm this desolated heart? All nature seems
 to frown--or rather mourn with me.--Every thing is cold--cold as my
 expectations! Before I left the shore, tormented, as I now am, by these
 North east _chillers_, I could not help exclaiming--Give me, gracious
 Heaven! at least, genial weather, if I am never to meet the genial
 affection that still warms this agitated bosom--compelling life to linger
 there.
 
 I am now going on shore with the captain, though the weather be rough,
 to seek for milk, &c. at a little village, and to take a walk--after
 which I hope to sleep--for, confined here, surrounded by disagreeable
 smells, I have lost the little appetite I had; and I lie awake, till
 thinking almost drives me to the brink of madness--only to the brink, for
 I never forget, even in the feverish slumbers I sometimes fall into, the
 misery I am labouring to blunt the the sense of, by every exertion in my
 power.
 
 Poor ------ still continues sick, and ------ grows weary when the weather
 will not allow her to remain on deck.
 
 I hope this will be the last letter I shall write from England to
 you--are you not tired of this lingering adieu?
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LI.
 
 Sunday Morning.
 
 THE captain last night, after I had written my letter to you intended to
 be left at a little village, offered to go to ---- to pass to-day. We had
 a troublesome sail--and now I must hurry on board again, for the wind has
 changed.
 
 I half expected to find a letter from you here. Had you written one
 haphazard, it would have been kind and considerate--you might have known,
 had you thought, that the wind would not permit me to depart. These are
 attentions, more grateful to the heart than offers of service--But why
 do I foolishly continue to look for them?
 
 Adieu! adieu! My friend--your friendship is very cold--you see I am
 hurt.--God bless you! I may perhaps be, some time or other, independent
 in every sense of the word--Ah! there is but one sense of it of
 consequence. I will break or bend this weak heart--yet even now it is
 full.
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 * * * *
 
 The child is well; I did not leave her on board.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LII.
 
 June 27, Saturday.
 
 I ARRIVED in ------ this afternoon, after vainly attempting to land at
 ----. I have now but a moment, before the post goes out, to inform you we
 have got here; though not without considerable difficulty, for we were
 set ashore in a boat above twenty miles below.
 
 What I suffered in the vessel I will not now descant upon--nor mention
 the pleasure I received from the sight of the rocky coast.--This morning
 however, walking to join the carriage that was to transport us to this
 place, I fell, without any previous warning, senseless on the rocks--and
 how I escaped with life I can scarcely guess. I was in a stupour for a
 quarter of an hour; the suffusion of blood at last restored me to my
 senses--the contusion is great, and my brain confused. The child is well.
 
 Twenty miles ride in the rain, after my accident, has sufficiently
 deranged me--and here I could not get a fire to warm me, or any thing
 warm to eat; the inns are mere stables--I must nevertheless go to bed.
 For God's sake, let me hear from you immediately, my friend! I am not
 well and yet you see I cannot die.
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LIII.
 
 June 29.
 
 I WROTE to you by the last post, to inform you of my arrival; and I
 believe I alluded to the extreme fatigue I endured on ship-board, owing
 to ------'s illness, and the roughness of the weather--I likewise
 mentioned to you my fall, the effects of which I still feel, though I do
 not think it will have any serious consequences.
 
 ------ will go with me, if I find it necessary to go to ------. The inns
 here are so bad, I was forced to accept of an apartment in his house. I
 am overwhelmed with civilities on all sides, and fatigued with the
 endeavours to amuse me, from which I cannot escape.
 
 My friend--my friend, I am not well--a deadly weight of sorrow lies
 heavily on my heart. I am again tossed on the troubled billows of life;
 and obliged to cope with difficulties, without being buoyed up by the
 hopes that alone render them bearable. "How flat, dull, and
 unprofitable," appears to me all the bustle into which I see people here
 so eagerly enter! I long every night to go to bed, to hide my melancholy
 face in my pillow; but there is a canker-worm in my bosom that never
 sleeps.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LIV.
 
 July 1.
 
 I LABOUR in vain to calm my mind--my soul has been overwhelmed by sorrow
 and disappointment. Every thing fatigues me--this is a life that cannot
 last long. It is you who must determine with respect to futurity--and,
 when you have, I will act accordingly--I mean, we must either resolve to
 live together, or part for ever, I cannot bear these continual
 struggles--But I wish you to examine carefully your own heart and mind;
 and, if you perceive the least chance of being happier without me than
 with me, or if your inclination leans capriciously to that side, do not
 dissemble; but tell me frankly that you will never see me more. I will
 then adopt the plan I mentioned to you--for we must either live together,
 or I will be entirely independent.
 
 My heart is so oppressed, I cannot write with precision--You know however
 that what I so imperfectly express, are not the crude sentiments of the
 moment--You can only contribute to my comfort (it is the consolation I am
 in need of) by being with me--and, if the tenderest friendship is of any
 value, why will you not look to me for a degree of satisfaction that
 heartless affections cannot bestow?
 
 Tell me then, will you determine to meet me at Basle?--I shall, I should
 imagine, be at ------ before the close of August; and, after you settle
 your affairs at Paris, could we not meet there?
 
 God bless you!
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
 Poor ------ has suffered during the journey with her teeth.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LV.
 
 July 3.
 
 THERE was a gloominess diffused through your last letter, the impression
 of which still rests on my mind--though, recollecting how quickly you
 throw off the forcible feelings of the moment, I flatter myself it has
 long since given place to your usual cheerfulness.
 
 Believe me (and my eyes fill with tears of tenderness as I assure you)
 there is nothing I would not endure in the way of privation, rather than
 disturb your tranquillity.--If I am fated to be unhappy, I will labour to
 hide my sorrows in my own bosom; and you shall always find me a faithful,
 affectionate friend.
 
 I grow more and more attached to my little girl--and I cherish this
 affection without fear, because it must be a long time before it can
 become bitterness of soul.--She is an interesting creature.--On
 ship-board, how often as I gazed at the sea, have I longed to bury my
 troubled bosom in the less troubled deep; asserting with Brutus, "that
 the virtue I had followed too far, was merely an empty name!" and
 nothing but the sight of her--her playful smiles, which seemed to cling
 and twine round my heart--could have stopped me.
 
 What peculiar misery has fallen to my share! To act up to my principles,
 I have laid the strictest restraint on my very thoughts--yes; not to
 sully the delicacy of my feelings, I have reined in my imagination; and
 started with affright from every sensation, (I allude to ----) that
 stealing with balmy sweetness into my soul, led me to scent from afar the
 fragrance of reviving nature.
 
 My friend, I have dearly paid for one conviction.--Love, in some minds,
 is an affair of sentiment, arising from the same delicacy of perception
 (or taste) as renders them alive to the beauties of nature, poetry, &c,
 alive to the charms of those evanescent graces that are, as it were,
 impalpable--they must be felt, they cannot be described.
 
 Love is a want of my heart. I have examined myself lately with more care
 than formerly, and find, that to deaden is not to calm the mind--Aiming
 at tranquillity, I have almost destroyed all the energy of my
 soul--almost rooted out what renders it estimable--Yes, I have damped
 that enthusiasm of character, which converts the grossest materials into
 a fuel, that imperceptibly feeds hopes, which aspire above common
 enjoyment. Despair, since the birth of my child, has rendered me
 stupid--soul and body seemed to be fading away before the withering touch
 of disappointment.
 
 I am now endeavouring to recover myself--and such is the elasticity of my
 constitution, and the purity of the atmosphere here, that health unsought
 for, begins to reanimate my countenance.
 
 I have the sincerest esteem and affection for you--but the desire of
 regaining peace, (do you understand me?) has made me forget the respect
 due to my own emotions--sacred emotions, that are the sure harbingers of
 the delights I was formed to enjoy--and shall enjoy, for nothing can
 extinguish the heavenly spark.
 
 Still, when we meet again, I will not torment you, I promise you. I blush
 when I recollect my former conduct--and will not in future confound
 myself with the beings whom I feel to be my inferiors.--I will listen to
 delicacy, or pride.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LVI.
 
 July 4.
 
 I HOPE to hear from you by to-morrow's mail. My dearest friend! I cannot
 tear my affections from you--and, though every remembrance stings me to
 the soul, I think of you, till I make allowance for the very defects of
 character, that have given such a cruel stab to my peace.
 
 Still however I am more alive, than you have seen me for a long, long
 time. I have a degree of vivacity, even in my grief, which is preferable
 to the benumbing stupour that, for the last year, has frozen up all my
 faculties.--Perhaps this change is more owing to returning health, than
 to the vigour of my reason--for, in spite of sadness (and surely I have
 had my share), the purity of this air, and the being continually out in
 it, for I sleep in the country every night, has made an alteration in my
 appearance that really surprises me.--The rosy fingers of health already
 streak my cheeks--and I have seen a _physical_ life in my eyes, after I
 have been climbing the rocks, that resembled the fond, credulous hopes of
 youth.
 
 With what a cruel sigh have I recollected that I had forgotten to
 hope!--Reason, or rather experience, does not thus cruelly damp poor
 ------'s pleasures; she plays all day in the garden with ------'s
 children, and makes friends for herself.
 
 Do not tell me, that you are happier without us--Will you not come to us
 in Switzerland? Ah, why do not you love us with more sentiment?--why are
 you a creature of such sympathy, that the warmth of your feelings, or
 rather quickness of your senses, hardens your heart? It is my misfortune,
 that my imagination is perpetually shading your defects, and lending you
 charms, whilst the grossness of your senses makes you (call me not vain)
 overlook graces in me, that only dignity of mind, and the sensibility of
 an expanded heart can give.--God bless you! Adieu.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LVII.
 
 July 7.
 
 I COULD not help feeling extremely mortified last post, at not receiving
 a letter from you. My being at ------was but a chance, and you might have
 hazarded it; and would a year ago.
 
 I shall not however complain--There are misfortunes so great, as to
 silence the usual expressions of sorrow--Believe me, there is such a
 thing as a broken heart! There are characters whose very energy preys
 upon them; and who, ever inclined to cherish by reflection some passion,
 cannot rest satisfied with the common comforts of life. I have
 endeavoured to fly from myself, and launched into all the dissipation
 possible here, only to feel keener anguish, when alone with my child.
 
 Still, could any thing please me--had not disappointment cut me off from
 life, this romantic country, these fine evenings, would interest me.--My
 God! can any thing? and am I ever to feel alive only to painful
 sensations?--But it cannot--it shall not last long.
 
 The post is again arrived; I have sent to seek for letters, only to be
 wounded to the soul by a negative.--My brain seems on fire, I must go
 into the air.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LVIII.
 
 July 14.
 
 I AM now on my journey to ------. I felt more at leaving my child, than I
 thought I should--and, whilst at night I imagined every instant that I
 heard the half-formed sounds of her voice,--I asked myself how I could
 think of parting with her for ever, of leaving her thus helpless?
 
 Poor lamb! It may run very well in a tale, that "God will temper the
 winds to the shorn lamb!" but how can I expect that she will be shielded,
 when my naked bosom has had to brave continually the pitiless storm?
 Yes; I could add, with poor Lear--What is the war of elements to the
 pangs of disappointed affection, and the horror arising from a discovery
 of a breach of confidence, that snaps every social tie!
 
 All is not right somewhere!--When you first knew me, I was not thus lost.
 I could still confide--for I opened my heart to you--of this only comfort
 you have deprived me, whilst my happiness, you tell me, was your first
 object. Strange want of judgment!
 
 I will not complain; but, from the soundness of your understanding, I am
 convinced, if you give yourself leave to reflect, you will also feel,
 that your conduct to me, so far from being generous, has not been
 just.--I mean not to allude to factitious principles of morality; but to
 the simple basis of all rectitude.--However I did not intend to
 argue--Your not writing is cruel--and my reason is perhaps disturbed by
 constant wretchedness.
 
 Poor ------ would fain have accompanied me, out of tenderness; for my
 fainting, or rather convulsion, when I landed, and my sudden changes of
 countenance since, have alarmed her so much, that she is perpetually
 afraid of some accident--But it would have injured the child this warm
 season, as she is cutting her teeth.
 
 I hear not of your having written to me at ----. Very well! Act as you
 please--there is nothing I fear or care for! When I see whether I can, or
 cannot obtain the money I am come here about, I will not trouble you with
 letters to which you do not reply.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LIX.
 
 July 18.
 
 I AM here in ----, separated from my child--and here I must remain a
 month at least, or I might as well never have come.    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 I have begun -------- which will, I hope, discharge all my obligations of
 a pecuniary kind.--I am lowered in my own eyes, on account of my not
 having done it sooner.
 
 I shall make no further comments on your silence. God bless you!
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LX.
 
 July 30.
 
 I HAVE just received two of your letters, dated the 26th and 30th of
 June; and you must have received several from me, informing you of my
 detention, and how much I was hurt by your silence.
 
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 Write to me then, my friend, and write explicitly. I have suffered, God
 knows, since I left you. Ah! you have never felt this kind of sickness of
 heart!--My mind however is at present painfully active, and the sympathy
 I feel almost rises to agony. But this is not a subject of complaint, it
 has afforded me pleasure,--and reflected pleasure is all I have to hope
 for--if a spark of hope be yet alive in my forlorn bosom.
 
 I will try to write with a degree of composure. I wish for us to live
 together, because I want you to acquire an habitual tenderness for my
 poor girl. I cannot bear to think of leaving her alone in the world, or
 that she should only be protected by your sense of duty. Next to
 preserving her, my most earnest wish is not to disturb your peace. I have
 nothing to expect, and little to fear, in life--There are wounds that can
 never be healed--but they may be allowed to fester in silence without
 wincing.
 
 When we meet again, you shall be convinced that I have more resolution
 than you give me credit for. I will not torment you. If I am destined
 always to be disappointed and unhappy, I will conceal the anguish I
 cannot dissipate; and the tightened cord of life or reason will at last
 snap, and set me free.
 
 Yes; I shall be happy--This heart is worthy of the bliss its feelings
 anticipate--and I cannot even persuade myself, wretched as they have made
 me, that my principles and sentiments are not founded in nature and
 truth. But to have done with these subjects.
 
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 I have been seriously employed in this way since I came to ----; yet I
 never was so much in the air.--I walk, I ride on horseback--row, bathe,
 and even sleep in the fields; my health is consequently improved. The
 child, ------informs me, is well. I long to be with her.
 
 Write to me immediately--were I only to think of myself, I could wish you
 to return to me, poor, with the simplicity of character, part of which
 you seem lately to have lost, that first attached to you.
 
 Yours most affectionately
 
 * * * *  * * * * *
 
 I have been subscribing other letters--so I mechanically did the same to
 yours.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXI.
 
 August 5.
 
 EMPLOYMENT and exercise have been of great service to me; and I have
 entirely recovered the strength and activity I lost during the time of my
 nursing. I have seldom been in better health; and my mind, though
 trembling to the touch of anguish, is calmer--yet still the same.--I
 have, it is true, enjoyed some tranquillity, and more happiness here,
 than for a long--long time past.--(I say happiness, for I can give no
 other appellation to the exquisite delight this wild country and fine
 summer have afforded me.)--Still, on examining my heart, I find that it
 is so constituted, I cannot live without some particular affection--I am
 afraid not without a passion--and I feel the want of it more in society,
 than in solitude--
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 Writing to you, whenever an affectionate epithet occurs--my eyes fill
 with tears, and my trembling hand stops--you may then depend on my
 resolution, when with you. If I am doomed to be unhappy, I will confine
 my anguish in my own bosom--tenderness, rather than passion, has made me
 sometimes overlook delicacy--the same tenderness will in future restrain
 me. God bless you!
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXII.
 
 August 7.
 
 AIR, exercise, and bathing, have restored me to health, braced my
 muscles, and covered my ribs, even whilst I have recovered my former
 activity.--I cannot tell you that my mind is calm, though I have snatched
 some moments of exquisite delight, wandering through the woods, and
 resting on the rocks.
 
 This state of suspense, my friend, is intolerable; we must determine on
 something--and soon;--we must meet shortly, or part for ever. I am
 sensible that I acted foolishly--but I was wretched--when we were
 together--Expecting too much, I let the pleasure I might have caught,
 slip from me. I cannot live with you--I ought not--if you form another
 attachment. But I promise you, mine shall not be intruded on you. Little
 reason have I to expect a shadow of happiness, after the cruel
 disappointments that have rent my heart; but that of my child seems to
 depend on our being together. Still I do not wish you to sacrifice a
 chance of enjoyment for an uncertain good. I feel a conviction, that I
 can provide for her, and it shall be my object--if we are indeed to part
 to meet no more. Her affection must not be divided. She must be a comfort
 to me--if I am to have no other--and only know me as her support.--I feel
 that I cannot endure the anguish of corresponding with you--if we are
 only to correspond.--No; if you seek for happiness elsewhere, my letters
 shall not interrupt your repose. I will be dead to you. I cannot express
 to you what pain it gives me to write about an eternal separation.--You
 must determine--examine yourself--But, for God's sake! spare me the
 anxiety of uncertainty!--I may sink under the trial; but I will not
 complain.
 
 Adieu! If I had any thing more to say to you, it is all flown, and
 absorbed by the most tormenting apprehensions, yet I scarcely know what
 new form of misery I have to dread.
 
 I ought to beg your pardon for having sometimes written peevishly; but
 you will impute it to affection, if you understand any thing of the heart
 of
 
 Yours truly
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXIII.
 
 August 9.
 
 FIVE of your letters have been sent after me from ----. One, dated the
 14th of July, was written in a style which I may have merited, but did
 not expect from you. However this is not a time to reply to it, except to
 assure you that you shall not be tormented with any more complaints. I am
 disgusted with myself for having so long importuned you with my
 affection.----
 
 My child is very well. We shall soon meet, to part no more, I hope--I
 mean, I and my girl.--I shall wait with some degree of anxiety till I am
 informed how your affairs terminate.
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXIV.
 
 August 26.
 
 I ARRIVED here last night, and with the most exquisite delight, once more
 pressed my babe to my heart. We shall part no more. You perhaps cannot
 conceive the pleasure it gave me, to see her run about, and play alone.
 Her increasing intelligence attaches me more and more to her. I have
 promised her that I will fulfil my duty to her; and nothing in future
 shall make me forget it. I will also exert myself to obtain an
 independence for her; but I will not be too anxious on this head.
 
 I have already told you, that I have recovered my health. Vigour, and
 even vivacity of mind, have returned with a renovated constitution. As
 for peace, we will not talk of it. I was not made, perhaps, to enjoy the
 calm contentment so termed.--
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 You tell me that my letters torture you; I will not describe the effect
 yours have on me. I received three this morning, the last dated the 7th
 of this month. I mean not to give vent to the emotions they
 produced.--Certainly you are right; our minds are not congenial. I have
 lived in an ideal world, and fostered sentiments that you do not
 comprehend--or you would not treat me thus. I am not, I will not be,
 merely an object of compassion--a clog, however light, to teize you.
 Forget that I exist: I will never remind you. Something emphatical
 whispers me to put an end to these struggles. Be free--I will not
 torment, when I cannot please. I can take care of my child; you need not
 continually tell me that our fortune is inseparable, _that you will try
 to cherish tenderness_ for me. Do no violence to yourself! When we are
 separated, our interest, since you give so much weight to pecuniary
 considerations, will be entirely divided. I want not protection without
 affection; and support I need not, whilst my faculties are undisturbed.
 I had a dislike to living in England; but painful feelings must give way
 to superior considerations. I may not be able to acquire the sum
 necessary to maintain my child and self elsewhere. It is too late to go
 to Switzerland. I shall not remain at ----, living expensively. But be
 not alarmed! I shall not force myself on you any more.
 
 Adieu! I am agitated--my whole frame is convulsed--my lips tremble, as if
 shook by cold, though fire seems to be circulating in my veins.
 
 God bless you.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXV.
 
 September 6.
 
 I RECEIVED just now your letter of the 20th. I had written you a letter
 last night, into which imperceptibly slipt some of my bitterness of soul.
 I will copy the part relative to business. I am not sufficiently vain to
 imagine that I can, for more than a moment, cloud your enjoyment of
 life--to prevent even that, you had better never hear from me--and repose
 on the idea that I am happy.
 
 Gracious God! It is impossible for me to stifle something like
 resentment, when I receive fresh proofs of your indifference. What I
 have suffered this last year, is not to be forgotten! I have not that
 happy substitute for wisdom, insensibility--and the lively sympathies
 which bind me to my fellow-creatures, are all of a painful kind.--They
 are the agonies of a broken heart--pleasure and I have shaken hands.
 
 I see here nothing but heaps of ruins, and only converse with people
 immersed in trade and sensuality.
 
 I am weary of travelling--yet seem to have no home--no resting place to
 look to.--I am strangely cast off.--How often, passing through the rocks,
 I have thought, "But for this child, I would lay my head on one of them,
 and never open my eyes again!" With a heart feelingly alive to all the
 affections of my nature--I have never met with one, softer than the stone
 that I would fain take for my last pillow. I once thought I had, but it
 was all a delusion. I meet with families continually, who are bound
 together by affection or principle--and, when I am conscious that I have
 fulfilled the duties of my station, almost to a forgetfulness of myself,
 I am ready to demand, in a murmuring tone, of Heaven, "Why am I thus
 abandoned?"
 
 You say now   --   --   --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 I do not understand you. It is necessary for you to write more
 explicitly--and determine on some mode of conduct.--I cannot endure this
 suspense--Decide--Do you fear to strike another blow? We live together,
 or eternally part!--I shall not write to you again, till I receive an
 answer to this. I must compose my tortured soul, before I write on
 indifferent subjects.   --   --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 I do not know whether I write intelligibly, for my head is
 disturbed.--But this you ought to pardon--for it is with difficulty
 frequently that I make out what you mean to say--You write, I suppose, at
 Mr. ----'s after dinner, when your head is not the clearest--and as for
 your heart, if you have one, I see nothing like the dictates of
 affection, unless a glimpse when you mention, the child.--Adieu!
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXVI.
 
 September 25.
 
 I HAVE just finished a letter, to be given in charge to captain ------.
 In that I complained of your silence, and expressed my surprise that
 three mails should have arrived without bringing a line for me. Since I
 closed it, I hear of another, and still no letter.--I am labouring to
 write calmly--this silence is a refinement on cruelty. Had captain ------
 remained a few days longer, I would have returned with him to England.
 What have I to do here? I have repeatedly written to you fully. Do you
 do the same--and quickly. Do not leave me in suspense. I have not
 deserved this of you. I cannot write, my mind is so distressed. Adieu!
 
 * * * *
 
 
 END VOL. III.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [4-A] The child is in a subsequent letter called the "barrier girl,"
 probably from a supposition that she owed her existence to this
 interview.
 
 EDITOR.
 
 [7-A] This and the thirteen following letters appear to have been written
 during a separation of several months; the date, Paris.
 
 [27-A] Some further letters, written during the remainder of the week, in
 a similar strain to the preceding, appear to have been destroyed by the
 person to whom they were addressed.
 
 [47-A] The child spoken of in some preceding letters, had now been born a
 considerable time.
 
 [50-A] She means, "the latter more than the former."
 
 EDITOR.
 
 [58-A] This is the first of a series of letters written during a
 separation of many months, to which no cordial meeting ever succeeded.
 They were sent from Paris, and bear the address of London.
 
 [91-A] The person to whom the letters are addressed, was about this time
 at Ramsgate, on his return, as he professed, to Paris, when he was
 recalled, as it should seem, to London, by the further pressure of
 business now accumulated upon him.
 
 [100-A] This probably alludes to some expression of the person to whom
 the letters are addressed, in which he treated as common evils, things
 upon which the letter writer was disposed to bestow a different
 appellation.
 
 EDITOR.
 
 [133-A] This passage refers to letters written under a purpose of
 suicide, and not intended to be opened till after the catastrophe.
 
 
 
 
 POSTHUMOUS WORKS
 
 OF THE
 
 AUTHOR
 
 OF A
 
 VINDICATION OF THE RIGHTS OF WOMAN.
 
 IN FOUR VOLUMES.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 VOL. IV.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 _LONDON:_
 
 PRINTED FOR J. JOHNSON, NO. 72, ST. PAUL'S
   CHURCH-YARD; AND G. G. AND J. ROBINSON,
               PATERNOSTER-ROW.
                    1798.
 
 
 
 LETTERS
 
 AND
 
 MISCELLANEOUS PIECES.
 
 IN TWO VOLUMES.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 VOL. II.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS.
 
 
                                                        Page
 Letters                                                   1
 Letter on the Present Character of the French Nation     39
 Fragment of Letters on the Management of Infants         55
 Letters to Mr. Johnson                                   61
 Extract of the Cave of Fancy, a Tale                     99
 On Poetry and our Relish for the Beauties of Nature     159
 Hints                                                   179
 
 
 
 
 ERRATA.
 
 
 Page 10, line 8, _for_ I write you, _read_ I write to you.
 ---- 20, -- 9, _read_ bring them to ----.
 ---- 146, -- 2 from the bottom, after over, insert a comma.
 
 
 
 
 LETTERS.
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXVII.
 
 September 27.
 
 WHEN you receive this, I shall either have landed, or be hovering on the
 British coast--your letter of the 18th decided me.
 
 By what criterion of principle or affection, you term my questions
 extraordinary and unnecessary, I cannot determine.--You desire me to
 decide--I had decided. You must have had long ago two letters of mine,
 from ------, to the same purport, to consider.--In these, God knows!
 there was but too much affection, and the agonies of a distracted mind
 were but too faithfully pourtrayed!--What more then had I to say?--The
 negative was to come from you.--You had perpetually recurred to your
 promise of meeting me in the autumn--Was it extraordinary that I should
 demand a yes, or no?--Your letter is written with extreme harshness,
 coldness I am accustomed to, in it I find not a trace of the tenderness
 of humanity, much less of friendship.--I only see a desire to heave a
 load off your shoulders.
 
 I am above disputing about words.--It matters not in what terms you
 decide.
 
 The tremendous power who formed this heart, must have foreseen that, in a
 world in which self-interest, in various shapes, is the principal mobile,
 I had little chance of escaping misery.--To the fiat of fate I submit.--I
 am content to be wretched; but I will not be contemptible.--Of me you
 have no cause to complain, but for having had too much regard for
 you--for having expected a degree of permanent happiness, when you only
 sought for a momentary gratification.
 
 I am strangely deficient in sagacity.--Uniting myself to you, your
 tenderness seemed to make me amends for all my former misfortunes.--On
 this tenderness and affection with what confidence did I rest!--but I
 leaned on a spear, that has pierced me to the heart.--You have thrown off
 a faithful friend, to pursue the caprices of the moment.--We certainly
 are differently organized; for even now, when conviction has been stamped
 on my soul by sorrow, I can scarcely believe it possible. It depends at
 present on you, whether you will see me or not.--I shall take no step,
 till I see or hear from you.
 
 Preparing myself for the worst--I have determined, if your next letter be
 like the last, to write to Mr. ------to procure me an obscure lodging,
 and not to inform any body of my arrival.--There I will endeavour in a
 few months to obtain the sum necessary to take me to France--from you I
 will not receive any more.--I am not yet sufficiently humbled to depend
 on your beneficence.
 
 Some people, whom my unhappiness has interested, though they know not
 the extent of it, will assist me to attain the object I have in view, the
 independence of my child. Should a peace take place, ready money will go
 a great way in France--and I will borrow a sum, which my industry _shall_
 enable me to pay at my leisure, to purchase a small estate for my
 girl.--The assistance I shall find necessary to complete her education, I
 can get at an easy rate at Paris--I can introduce her to such society as
 she will like--and thus, securing for her all the chance for happiness,
 which depends on me, I shall die in peace, persuaded that the felicity
 which has hitherto cheated my expectation, will not always elude my
 grasp. No poor tempest-tossed mariner ever more earnestly longed to
 arrive at his port.
 
 * * * *
 
 I shall not come up in the vessel all the way, because I have no place to
 go to. Captain ------ will inform you where I am. It is needless to add,
 that I am not in a state of mind to bear suspense--and that I wish to see
 you, though it be for the last time.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXVIII.
 
 Sunday, October 4.
 
 I WROTE to you by the packet, to inform you, that your letter of the 18th
 of last month, had determined me to set out with captain ------; but, as
 we sailed very quick, I take it for granted, that you have not yet
 received it.
 
 You say, I must decide for myself.--I had decided, that it was most for
 the interest of my little girl, and for my own comfort, little as I
 expect, for us to live together; and I even thought that you would be
 glad, some years hence, when the tumult of business was over, to repose
 in the society of an affectionate friend, and mark the progress of our
 interesting child, whilst endeavouring to be of use in the circle you at
 last resolved to rest in; for you cannot run about for ever.
 
 From the tenour of your last letter however, I am led to imagine, that
 you have formed some new attachment.--If it be so, let me earnestly
 request you to see me once more, and immediately. This is the only proof
 I require of the friendship you profess for me. I will then decide,
 since you boggle about a mere form.
 
 I am labouring to write with calmness--but the extreme anguish I feel, at
 landing without having any friend to receive me, and even to be conscious
 that the friend whom I most wish to see, will feel a disagreeable
 sensation at being informed of my arrival, does not come under the
 description of common misery. Every emotion yields to an overwhelming
 flood of sorrow--and the playfulness of my child distresses me.--On her
 account, I wished to remain a few days here, comfortless as is my
 situation.--Besides, I did not wish to surprise you. You have told me,
 that you would make any sacrifice to promote my happiness--and, even in
 your last unkind letter, you talk of the ties which bind you to me and
 my child.--Tell me, that you wish it, and I will cut this Gordian knot.
 
 I now most earnestly intreat you to write to me, without fail, by the
 return of the post. Direct your letter to be left at the post-office, and
 tell me whether you will come to me here, or where you will meet me. I
 can receive your letter on Wednesday morning.
 
 Do not keep me in suspense.--I expect nothing from you, or any human
 being: my die is cast!--I have fortitude enough to determine to do my
 duty; yet I cannot raise my depressed spirits, or calm my trembling
 heart.--That being who moulded it thus, knows that I am unable to tear up
 by the roots the propensity to affection which has been the torment of my
 life--but life will have an end!
 
 Should you come here (a few months ago I could not have doubted it) you
 will find me at ------. If you prefer meeting me on the road, tell me
 where.
 
 Yours affectionately
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXIX.
 
 I WRITE you now on my knees; imploring you to send my child and the maid
 with ----, to Paris, to be consigned to the care of Madame ----, rue
 ----, section de ----. Should they be removed, ---- can give their
 direction.
 
 Let the maid have all my clothes, without distinction.
 
 Pray pay the cook her wages, and do not mention the confession which I
 forced from her--a little sooner or later is of no consequence. Nothing
 but my extreme stupidity could have rendered me blind so long. Yet,
 whilst you assured me that you had no attachment, I thought we might
 still have lived together.
 
 I shall make no comments on your conduct; or any appeal to the world. Let
 my wrongs sleep with me! Soon, very soon shall I be at peace. When you
 receive this, my burning head will be cold.
 
 I would encounter a thousand deaths, rather than a night like the last.
 Your treatment has thrown my mind into a state of chaos; yet I am serene.
 I go to find comfort, and my only fear is, that my poor body will be
 insulted by an endeavour to recal my hated existence. But I shall plunge
 into the Thames where there is the least chance of my being snatched from
 the death I seek.
 
 God bless you! May you never know by experience what you have made me
 endure. Should your sensibility ever awake, remorse will find its way to
 your heart; and, in the midst of business and sensual pleasure, I shall
 appear before you, the victim of your deviation from rectitude.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXX.
 
 Sunday Morning.
 
 I HAVE only to lament, that, when the bitterness of death was past, I was
 inhumanly brought back to life and misery. But a fixed determination is
 not to be baffled by disappointment; nor will I allow that to be a
 frantic attempt, which was one of the calmest acts of reason. In this
 respect, I am only accountable to myself. Did I care for what is termed
 reputation, it is by other circumstances that I should be dishonoured.
 
 You say, "that you know not how to extricate ourselves out of the
 wretchedness into which we have been plunged." You are extricated long
 since.--But I forbear to comment.----If I am condemned to live longer, it
 is a living death.
 
 It appears to me, that you lay much more stress on delicacy, than on
 principle; for I am unable to discover what sentiment of delicacy would
 have been violated, by your visiting a wretched friend--if indeed you
 have any friendship for me.--But since your new attachment is the only
 thing sacred in your eyes, I am silent--Be happy! My complaints shall
 never more damp your enjoyment--perhaps I am mistaken in supposing that
 even my death could, for more than a moment.--This is what you call
 magnanimity--It is happy for yourself, that you possess this quality in
 the highest degree.
 
 Your continually asserting, that you will do all in your power to
 contribute to my comfort (when you only allude to pecuniary assistance),
 appears to me a flagrant breach of delicacy.--I want not such vulgar
 comfort, nor will I accept it. I never wanted but your heart--That gone,
 you have nothing more to give. Had I only poverty to fear, I should not
 shrink from life.--Forgive me then, if I say, that I shall consider any
 direct or indirect attempt to supply my necessities, as an insult which I
 have not merited--and as rather done out of tenderness for your own
 reputation, than for me. Do not mistake me; I do not think that you value
 money (therefore I will not accept what you do not care for) though I do
 much less, because certain privations are not painful to me. When I am
 dead, respect for yourself will make you take care of the child.
 
 I write with difficulty--probably I shall never write to you
 again.--Adieu!
 
 God bless you!
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXXI.
 
 Monday Morning.
 
 I AM compelled at last to say that you treat me ungenerously. I agree
 with you, that--    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 But let the obliquity now fall on me.--I fear neither poverty nor infamy.
 I am unequal to the task of writing--and explanations are not necessary.--
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --    --
 My child may have to blush for her mother's want of prudence--and may
 lament that the rectitude of my heart made me above vulgar precautions;
 but she shall not despise me for meanness.--You are now perfectly
 free.--God bless you.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXXIII.
 
 Saturday Night.
 
 I HAVE been hurt by indirect enquiries, which appear to me not to be
 dictated by any tenderness to me.--You ask "If I am well or
 tranquil?"--They who think me so, must want a heart to estimate my
 feelings by.--I chuse then to be the organ of my own sentiments.
 
 I must tell you, that I am very much mortified by your continually
 offering me pecuniary assistance--and, considering your going to the new
 house, as an open avowal that you abandon me, let me tell you that I
 will sooner perish than receive any thing from you--and I say this at the
 moment when I am disappointed in my first attempt to obtain a temporary
 supply. But this even pleases me; an accumulation of disappointments and
 misfortunes seems to suit the habit of my mind.--
 
 Have but a little patience, and I will remove myself where it will not be
 necessary for you to talk--of course, not to think of me. But let me see,
 written by yourself--for I will not receive it through any other
 medium--that the affair is finished.--It is an insult to me to suppose,
 that I can be reconciled, or recover my spirits; but, if you hear nothing
 of me, it will be the same thing to you.
 
 * * * *
 
 Even your seeing me, has been to oblige other people, and not to sooth my
 distracted mind.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXXIV.
 
 Thursday Afternoon.
 
 MR. ------ having forgot to desire you to send the things of mine which
 were left at the house, I have to request you to let ------ bring them
 onto ------.
 
 I shall go this evening to the lodging; so you need not be restrained
 from coming here to transact your business.--And, whatever I may think,
 and feel--you need not fear that I shall publicly complain--No! If I
 have any criterion to judge of right and wrong, I have been most
 ungenerously treated: but, wishing now only to hide myself, I shall be
 silent as the grave in which I long to forget myself. I shall protect and
 provide for my child.--I only mean by this to say, that you having
 nothing to fear from my desperation.
 
 Farewel.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXXV.
 
 London, November 27.
 
 
 THE letter, without an address, which you put up with the letters you
 returned, did not meet my eyes till just now.--I had thrown the letters
 aside--I did not wish to look over a register of sorrow.
 
 My not having seen it, will account for my having written to you with
 anger--under the impression your departure, without even a line left for
 me, made on me, even after your late conduct, which could not lead me to
 expect much attention to my sufferings.
 
 In fact, "the decided conduct, which appeared to me so unfeeling," has
 almost overturned my reason; my mind is injured--I scarcely know where I
 am, or what I do.--The grief I cannot conquer (for some cruel
 recollections never quit me, banishing almost every other) I labour to
 conceal in total solitude.--My life therefore is but an exercise of
 fortitude, continually on the stretch--and hope never gleams in this
 tomb, where I am buried alive.
 
 But I meant to reason with you, and not to complain.--You tell me, "that
 I shall judge more coolly of your mode of acting, some time hence." But
 is it not possible that _passion_ clouds your reason, as much as it does
 mine?--and ought you not to doubt, whether those principles are so
 "exalted," as you term them, which only lead to your own gratification?
 In other words, whether it be just to have no principle of action, but
 that of following your inclination, trampling on the affection you have
 fostered, and the expectations you have excited?
 
 My affection for you is rooted in my heart.--I know you are not what you
 now seem--nor will you always act, or feel, as you now do, though I may
 never be comforted by the change.--Even at Paris, my image will haunt
 you.--You will see my pale face--and sometimes the tears of anguish will
 drop on your heart, which you have forced from mine.
 
 I cannot write. I thought I could quickly have refuted all your
 _ingenious_ arguments; but my head is confused.--Right or wrong, I am
 miserable!
 
 It seems to me, that my conduct has always been governed by the strictest
 principles of justice and truth.--Yet, how wretched have my social
 feelings, and delicacy of sentiment rendered me!--I have loved with my
 whole soul, only to discover that I had no chance of a return--and that
 existence is a burthen without it.
 
 I do not perfectly understand you.--If, by the offer of your friendship,
 you still only mean pecuniary support--I must again reject it.--Trifling
 are the ills of poverty in the scale of my misfortunes.--God bless you!
 
 * * * *
 
 I have been treated ungenerously--if I understand what is
 generosity.----You seem to me only to have been anxious to shake me
 off--regardless whether you dashed me to atoms by the fall.--In truth I
 have been rudely handled. _Do you judge coolly_, and I trust you will
 not continue to call those capricious feelings "the most refined," which
 would undermine not only the most sacred principles, but the affections
 which unite mankind.----You would render mothers unnatural--and there
 would be no such thing as a father!--If your theory of morals is the most
 "exalted," it is certainly the most easy.--It does not require much
 magnanimity, to determine to please ourselves for the moment, let others
 suffer what they will!
 
 Excuse me for again tormenting you, my heart thirsts for justice from
 you--and whilst I recollect that you approved Miss ------'s conduct--I am
 convinced you will not always justify your own.
 
 Beware of the deceptions of passion! It will not always banish from your
 mind, that you have acted ignobly--and condescended to subterfuge to
 gloss over the conduct you could not excuse.--Do truth and principle
 require such sacrifices?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXXVI.
 
 London, December 8.
 
 HAVING just been informed that ------ is to return immediately to Paris,
 I would not miss a sure opportunity of writing, because I am not certain
 that my last, by Dover has reached you.
 
 Resentment, and even anger, are momentary emotions with me--and I wished
 to tell you so, that if you ever think of me, it may not be in the light
 of an enemy.
 
 That I have not been used _well_ I must ever feel; perhaps, not always
 with the keen anguish I do at present--for I began even now to write
 calmly, and I cannot restrain my tears.
 
 I am stunned!--Your late conduct still appears to me a frightful
 dream.--Ah! ask yourself if you have not condescended to employ a little
 address, I could almost say cunning, unworthy of you?--Principles are
 sacred things--and we never play with truth, with impunity.
 
 The expectation (I have too fondly nourished it) of regaining your
 affection, every day grows fainter and fainter.--Indeed, it seems to me,
 when I am more sad than usual, that I shall never see you more.--Yet you
 will not always forget me.--You will feel something like remorse, for
 having lived only for yourself--and sacrificed my peace to inferior
 gratifications. In a comfortless old age, you will remember that you had
 one disinterested friend, whose heart you wounded to the quick. The hour
 of recollection will come--and you will not be satisfied to act the part
 of a boy, till you fall into that of a dotard. I know that your mind,
 your heart, and your principles of action, are all superior to your
 present conduct. You do, you must, respect me--and you will be sorry to
 forfeit my esteem.
 
 You know best whether I am still preserving the remembrance of an
 imaginary being.--I once thought that I knew you thoroughly--but now I am
 obliged to leave some doubts that involuntarily press on me, to be
 cleared up by time.
 
 You may render me unhappy; but cannot make me contemptible in my own
 eyes.--I shall still be able to support my child, though I am
 disappointed in some other plans of usefulness, which I once believed
 would have afforded you equal pleasure.
 
 Whilst I was with you, I restrained my natural generosity, because I
 thought your property in jeopardy.--When I went to --------, I requested
 you, _if you could conveniently_, not to forget my father, sisters, and
 some other people, whom I was interested about.--Money was lavished away,
 yet not only my requests were neglected, but some trifling debts were not
 discharged, that now come on me.--Was this friendship--or generosity?
 Will you not grant you have forgotten yourself? Still I have an
 affection for you.--God bless you.
 
 * * * *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXXVII.
 
 AS the parting from you for ever is the most serious event of my life, I
 will once expostulate with you, and call not the language of truth and
 feeling ingenuity!
 
 I know the soundness of your understanding--and know that it is
 impossible for you always to confound the caprices of every wayward
 inclination with the manly dictates of principle.
 
 You tell me "that I torment you."--Why do I?----Because you cannot
 estrange your heart entirely from me--and you feel that justice is on my
 side. You urge, "that your conduct was unequivocal."--It was not.--When
 your coolness has hurt me, with what tenderness have you endeavoured to
 remove the impression!--and even before I returned to England, you took
 great pains to convince me, that all my uneasiness was occasioned by the
 effect of a worn-out constitution--and you concluded your letter with
 these words, "Business alone has kept me from you.--Come to any port, and
 I will fly down to my two dear girls with a heart all their own."
 
 With these assurances, is it extraordinary that I should believe what I
 wished? I might--and did think that you had a struggle with old
 propensities; but I still thought that I and virtue should at last
 prevail. I still thought that you had a magnanimity of character, which
 would enable you to conquer yourself.
 
 --------, believe me, it is not romance, you have acknowledged to me
 feelings of this kind.--You could restore me to life and hope, and the
 satisfaction you would feel, would amply repay you.
 
 In tearing myself from you, it is my own heart I pierce--and the time
 will come, when you will lament that you have thrown away a heart, that,
 even in the moment of passion, you cannot despise.--I would owe every
 thing to your generosity--but, for God's sake, keep me no longer in
 suspense!--Let me see you once more!--
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER LXXVIII.
 
 YOU must do as you please with respect to the child.--I could wish that
 it might be done soon, that my name may be no more mentioned to you. It
 is now finished.--Convinced that you have neither regard nor friendship,
 I disdain to utter a reproach, though I have had reason to think, that
 the "forbearance" talked of, has not been very delicate.--It is however
 of no consequence.--I am glad you are satisfied with your own conduct.
 
 I now solemnly assure you, that this is an eternal farewel.--Yet I flinch
 not from the duties which tie me to life.
 
 That there is "sophistry" on one side or other, is certain; but now it
 matters not on which. On my part it has not been a question of words. Yet
 your understanding or mine must be strangely warped--for what you term
 "delicacy," appears to me to be exactly the contrary. I have no criterion
 for morality, and have thought in vain, if the sensations which lead you
 to follow an ancle or step, be the sacred foundation of principle and
 affection. Mine has been of a very different nature, or it would not have
 stood the brunt of your sarcasms.
 
 The sentiment in me is still sacred. If there be any part of me that will
 survive the sense of my misfortunes, it is the purity of my affections.
 The impetuosity of your senses, may have led you to term mere animal
 desire, the source of principle; and it may give zest to some years to
 come.--Whether you will always think so, I shall never know.
 
 It is strange that, in spite of all you do, something like conviction
 forces me to believe, that you are not what you appear to be.
 
 I part with you in peace.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 LETTER
 ON THE
 PRESENT CHARACTER
 OF THE
 FRENCH NATION.
 
 
 LETTER
 
 _Introductory to a Series of Letters on the Present Character of the
 French Nation._
 
 
 Paris, February 15, 1793.
 
 My dear friend,
 
 IT is necessary perhaps for an observer of mankind, to guard as carefully
 the remembrance of the first impression made by a nation, as by a
 countenance; because we imperceptibly lose sight of the national
 character, when we become more intimate with individuals. It is not then
 useless or presumptuous to note, that, when I first entered Paris, the
 striking contrast of riches and poverty, elegance and slovenliness,
 urbanity and deceit, every where caught my eye, and saddened my soul; and
 these impressions are still the foundation of my remarks on the manners,
 which flatter the senses, more than they interest the heart, and yet
 excite more interest than esteem.
 
 The whole mode of life here tends indeed to render the people frivolous,
 and, to borrow their favourite epithet, amiable. Ever on the wing, they
 are always sipping the sparkling joy on the brim of the cup, leaving
 satiety in the bottom for those who venture to drink deep. On all sides
 they trip along, buoyed up by animal spirits, and seemingly so void of
 care, that often, when I am walking on the _Boulevards_, it occurs to me,
 that they alone understand the full import of the term leisure; and they
 trifle their time away with such an air of contentment, I know not how to
 wish them wiser at the expence of their gaiety. They play before me like
 motes in a sunbeam, enjoying the passing ray; whilst an English head,
 searching for more solid happiness, loses, in the analysis of pleasure,
 the volatile sweets of the moment. Their chief enjoyment, it is true,
 rises from vanity: but it is not the vanity that engenders vexation of
 spirit; on the contrary, it lightens the heavy burthen of life, which
 reason too often weighs, merely to shift from one shoulder to the other.
 
 Investigating the modification of the passion, as I would analyze the
 elements that give a form to dead matter, I shall attempt to trace to
 their source the causes which have combined to render this nation the
 most polished, in a physical sense, and probably the most superficial in
 the world; and I mean to follow the windings of the various streams that
 disembogue into a terrific gulf, in which all the dignity of our nature
 is absorbed. For every thing has conspired to make the French the most
 sensual people in the world; and what can render the heart so hard, or so
 effectually stifle every moral emotion, as the refinements of sensuality?
 
 The frequent repetition of the word French, appears invidious; let me
 then make a previous observation, which I beg you not to lose sight of,
 when I speak rather harshly of a land flowing with milk and honey.
 Remember that it is not the morals of a particular people that I would
 decry; for are we not all of the same stock? But I wish calmly to
 consider the stage of civilization in which I find the French, and,
 giving a sketch of their character, and unfolding the circumstances which
 have produced its identity, I shall endeavour to throw some light on the
 history of man, and on the present important subjects of discussion.
 
 I would I could first inform you that, out of the chaos of vices and
 follies, prejudices and virtues, rudely jumbled together, I saw the fair
 form of Liberty slowly rising, and Virtue expanding her wings to shelter
 all her children! I should then hear the account of the barbarities that
 have rent the bosom of France patiently, and bless the firm hand that
 lopt off the rotten limbs. But, if the aristocracy of birth is levelled
 with the ground, only to make room for that of riches, I am afraid that
 the morals of the people will not be much improved by the change, or the
 government rendered less venal. Still it is not just to dwell on the
 misery produced by the present struggle, without adverting to the
 standing evils of the old system. I am grieved--sorely grieved--when I
 think of the blood that has stained the cause of freedom at Paris; but I
 also hear the same live stream cry aloud from the highways, through which
 the retreating armies passed with famine and death in their rear, and I
 hide my face with awe before the inscrutable ways of providence, sweeping
 in such various directions the besom of destruction over the sons of men.
 
 Before I came to France, I cherished, you know, an opinion, that strong
 virtues might exist with the polished manners produced by the progress
 of civilization; and I even anticipated the epoch, when, in the course of
 improvement, men would labour to become virtuous, without being goaded on
 by misery. But now, the perspective of the golden age, fading before the
 attentive eye of observation, almost eludes my sight; and, losing thus in
 part my theory of a more perfect state, start not, my friend, if I bring
 forward an opinion, which at the first glance seems to be levelled
 against the existence of God! I am not become an Atheist, I assure you,
 by residing at Paris: yet I begin to fear that vice, or, if you will,
 evil, is the grand mobile of action, and that, when the passions are
 justly poized, we become harmless, and in the same proportion useless.
 
 The wants of reason are very few; and, were we to consider
 dispassionately the real value of most things, we should probably rest
 satisfied with the simple gratification of our physical necessities, and
 be content with negative goodness: for it is frequently, only that
 wanton, the Imagination, with her artful coquetry, who lures us forward,
 and makes us run over a rough road, pushing aside every obstacle merely
 to catch a disappointment.
 
 The desire also of being useful to others, is continually damped by
 experience; and, if the exertions of humanity were not in some measure
 their own reward, who would endure misery, or struggle with care, to make
 some people ungrateful, and others idle?
 
 You will call these melancholy effusions, and guess that, fatigued by
 the vivacity, which has all the bustling folly of childhood, without the
 innocence which renders ignorance charming, I am too severe in my
 strictures. It may be so; and I am aware that the good effects of the
 revolution will be last felt at Paris; where surely the soul of Epicurus
 has long been at work to root out the simple emotions of the heart,
 which, being natural, are always moral. Rendered cold and artificial by
 the selfish enjoyments of the senses, which the government fostered, is
 it surprising that simplicity of manners, and singleness of heart, rarely
 appear, to recreate me with the wild odour of nature, so passing sweet?
 
 Seeing how deep the fibres of mischief have shot, I sometimes ask, with a
 doubting accent, Whether a nation can go back to the purity of manners
 which has hitherto been maintained unsullied only by the keen air of
 poverty, when, emasculated by pleasure, the luxuries of prosperity are
 become the wants of nature? I cannot yet give up the hope, that a fairer
 day is dawning on Europe, though I must hesitatingly observe, that little
 is to be expected from the narrow principle of commerce which seems every
 where to be shoving aside _the point of honour_ of the _noblesse_. I can
 look beyond the evils of the moment, and do not expect muddied water to
 become clear before it has had time to stand; yet, even for the moment,
 it is the most terrific of all sights, to see men vicious without
 warmth--to see the order that should be the superscription of virtue,
 cultivated to give security to crimes which only thoughtlessness could
 palliate. Disorder is, in fact, the very essence of vice, though with the
 wild wishes of a corrupt fancy humane emotions often kindly mix to soften
 their atrocity. Thus humanity, generosity, and even self-denial,
 sometimes render a character grand, and even useful, when hurried away by
 lawless passions; but what can equal the turpitude of a cold calculator
 who lives for himself alone, and considering his fellow-creatures merely
 as machines of pleasure, never forgets that honesty is the best policy?
 Keeping ever within the pale of the law, he crushes his thousands with
 impunity; but it is with that degree of management, which makes him, to
 borrow a significant vulgarism, a villain _in grain_. The very excess of
 his depravation preserves him, whilst the more respectable beast of prey,
 who prowls about like the lion, and roars to announce his approach,
 falls into a snare.
 
 You may think it too soon to form an opinion of the future government,
 yet it is impossible to avoid hazarding some conjectures, when every
 thing whispers me, that names, not principles, are changed, and when I
 see that the turn of the tide has left the dregs of the old system to
 corrupt the new. For the same pride of office, the same desire of power
 are still visible; with this aggravation, that, fearing to return to
 obscurity after having but just acquired a relish for distinction, each
 hero, or philosopher, for all are dubbed with these new titles,
 endeavours to make hay while the sun shines; and every petty municipal
 officer, become the idol, or rather the tyrant of the day, stalks like a
 cock on a dunghil.
 
 I shall now conclude this desultory letter; which however will enable you
 to foresee that I shall treat more of morals than manners.
 
 Yours ------
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 FRAGMENT
 OF
 LETTERS
 ON THE
 MANAGEMENT OF INFANTS.
 
 
 CONTENTS.
 
 
 Introductory Letter.
 LETTER II. Management of the Mother during pregnancy: bathing.
 LETTER III. Lying-in.
 LETTER IV. The first month: diet: clothing.
 LETTER V. The three following months.
 LETTER VI. The remainder of the first year.
 LETTER VII. The second year, &c: conclusion.
 
 
 LETTERS ON THE MANAGEMENT OF INFANTS.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER I.
 
 I OUGHT to apologize for not having written to you on the subject you
 mentioned; but, to tell you the truth, it grew upon me: and, instead of
 an answer, I have begun a series of letters on the management of children
 in their infancy. Replying then to your question, I have the public in
 my thoughts, and shall endeavour to show what modes appear to me
 necessary, to render the infancy of children more healthy and happy. I
 have long thought, that the cause which renders children as hard to rear
 as the most fragile plant, is our deviation from simplicity. I know that
 some able physicians have recommended the method I have pursued, and I
 mean to point out the good effects I have observed in practice. I am
 aware that many matrons will exclaim against me, and dwell on the number
 of children they have brought up, as their mothers did before them,
 without troubling themselves with new-fangled notions; yet, though, in my
 uncle Toby's words, they should attempt to silence me, by "wishing I had
 seen their large" families, I must suppose, while a third part of the
 human species, according to the most accurate calculation, die during
 their infancy, just at the threshold of life, that there is some error in
 the modes adopted by mothers and nurses, which counteracts their own
 endeavours. I may be mistaken in some particulars; for general rules,
 founded on the soundest reason, demand individual modification; but, if I
 can persuade any of the rising generation to exercise their reason on
 this head, I am content. My advice will probably be found most useful to
 mothers in the middle class; and it is from them that the lower
 imperceptibly gains improvement. Custom, produced by reason in one, may
 safely be the effect of imitation in the other.--    --    --
 --    --    --    --    --    --
 
 
 
 
 LETTERS
 TO
 Mr. JOHNSON,
 _BOOKSELLER_,
 IN
 ST. PAUL'S CHURCH-YARD.
 
 
 LETTERS
 TO
 Mr. JOHNSON.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 LETTER I.
 
 Dublin, April 14, [1787.]
 
 Dear sir,
 
 I AM still an invalid--and begin to believe that I ought never to expect
 to enjoy health. My mind preys on my body--and, when I endeavour to be
 useful, I grow too much interested for my own peace. Confined almost
 entirely to the society of children, I am anxiously solicitous for their
 future welfare, and mortified beyond measure, when counteracted in my
 endeavours to improve them.--I feel all a mother's fears for the swarm of
 little ones which surround me, and observe disorders, without having
 power to apply the proper remedies. How can I be reconciled to life, when
 it is always a painful warfare, and when I am deprived of all the
 pleasures I relish?--I allude to rational conversations, and domestic
 affections. Here, alone, a poor solitary individual in a strange land,
 tied to one spot, and subject to the caprice of another, can I be
 contented? I am desirous to convince you that I have _some_ cause for
 sorrow--and am not without reason detached from life. I shall hope to
 hear that you are well, and am yours sincerely
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER II.
 
 Henley, Thursday, Sept 13.
 
 My dear sir,
 
 SINCE I saw you, I have, literally speaking, _enjoyed_ solitude. My
 sister could not accompany me in my rambles; I therefore wandered alone,
 by the side of the Thames, and in the neighbouring beautiful fields and
 pleasure grounds: the prospects were of such a placid kind, I _caught_
 tranquillity while I surveyed them--my mind was _still_, though active.
 Were I to give you an account how I have spent my time, you would
 smile.--I found an old French bible here, and amused myself with
 comparing it with our English translation; then I would listen to the
 falling leaves, or observe the various tints the autumn gave to them--At
 other times, the singing of a robin, or the noise of a water-mill,
 engaged my attention--partial attention--, for I was, at the same time
 perhaps discussing some knotty point, or straying from this _tiny_ world
 to new systems. After these excursions, I returned to the family meals,
 told the children stories (they think me _vastly_ agreeable), and my
 sister was amused.--Well, will you allow me to call this way of passing
 my days pleasant?
 
 I was just going to mend my pen; but I believe it will enable me to say
 all I have to add to this epistle. Have you yet heard of an habitation
 for me? I often think of my new plan of life; and, lest my sister should
 try to prevail on me to alter it, I have avoided mentioning it to her. I
 am determined!--Your sex generally laugh at female determinations; but
 let me tell you, I never yet resolved to do, any thing of consequence,
 that I did not adhere resolutely to it, till I had accomplished my
 purpose, improbable as it might have appeared to a more timid mind. In
 the course of near nine-and-twenty years, I have gathered some
 experience, and felt many _severe_ disappointments--and what is the
 amount? I long for a little peace and _independence_! Every obligation we
 receive from our fellow-creatures is a new shackle, takes from our native
 freedom, and debases the mind, makes us mere earthworms--I am not fond of
 grovelling!
 
 I am, sir, yours, &c.
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER III.
 
 Market Harborough, Sept. 20.
 
 My dear sir,
 
 YOU left me with three opulent tradesmen; their conversation was not
 calculated to beguile the way, when the sable curtain concealed the
 beauties of nature. I listened to the tricks of trade--and shrunk away,
 without wishing to grow rich; even the novelty of the subjects did not
 render them pleasing; fond as I am of tracing the passions in all their
 different forms--I was not surprised by any glimpse of the sublime, or
 beautiful--though one of them imagined I would be a useful partner in a
 good _firm_. I was very much fatigued, and have scarcely recovered
 myself. I do not expect to enjoy the same tranquil pleasures Henley
 afforded: I meet with new objects to employ my mind; but many painful
 emotions are complicated with the reflections they give rise to.
 
 I do not intend to enter on the _old_ topic, yet hope to hear from
 you--and am yours, &c.
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER IV.
 
 Friday Night.
 
 My dear sir,
 
 THOUGH your remarks are generally judicious--I cannot _now_ concur with
 you, I mean with respect to the preface[67-A], and have not altered it.
 I hate the usual smooth way of exhibiting proud humility. A general rule
 _only_ extends to the majority--and, believe me, the few judicious
 parents who may peruse my book, will not feel themselves hurt--and the
 weak are too vain to mind what is said in a book intended for children.
 
 I return you the Italian MS.--but do not hastily imagine that I am
 indolent. I would not spare any labour to do my duty--and, after the most
 laborious day, that single thought would solace me more than any
 pleasures the senses could enjoy. I find I could not translate the MS.
 well. If it was not a MS, I should not be so easily intimidated; but the
 hand, and errors in orthography, or abbreviations, are a stumbling-block
 at the first setting out.--I cannot bear to do any thing I cannot do
 well--and I should lose time in the vain attempt.
 
 I had, the other day, the satisfaction of again receiving a letter from
 my poor, dear Margaret[69-A].--With all a mother's fondness I could
 transcribe a part of it--She says, every day her affection to me, and
 dependence on heaven increase, &c.--I miss her innocent caresses--and
 sometimes indulge a pleasing hope, that she may be allowed to cheer my
 childless age--if I am to live to be old.--At any rate, I may hear of the
 virtues I may not contemplate--and my reason may permit me to love a
 female.--I now allude to ------. I have received another letter from her,
 and her childish complaints vex me--indeed they do--As usual, good-night.
 
 MARY.
 
 If parents attended to their children, I would not have written the
 stories; for, what are books--compared to conversations which affection
 inforces!--
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER V.
 
 My dear sir,
 
 REMEMBER you are to settle _my account_, as I want to know how much I am
 in your debt--but do not suppose that I feel any uneasiness on that
 score. The generality of people in trade would not be much obliged to me
 for a like civility, _but you were a man_ before you were a
 bookseller--so I am your sincere friend,
 
 MARY.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER VI.
 
 Friday Morning.
 
 I AM sick with vexation--and wish I could knock my foolish head against
 the wall, that bodily pain might make me feel less anguish from
 self-reproach! To say the truth, I was never more displeased with myself,
 and I will tell you the cause.--You may recollect that I did not mention
 to you the circumstance of ------ having a fortune left to him; nor did a
 hint of it drop from me when I conversed with my sister; because I knew
 he had a sufficient motive for concealing it. Last Sunday, when his
 character was aspersed, as I thought, unjustly, in the heat of
 vindication I informed ****** that he was now independent; but, at the
 same time, desired him not to repeat my information to B----; yet, last
 Tuesday, he told him all--and the boy at B----'s gave Mrs. ------ an
 account of it. As Mr. ------ knew he had only made a confident of me (I
 blush to think of it!) he guessed the channel of intelligence, and this
 morning came (not to reproach me, I wish he had!) but to point out the
 injury I have done him.--Let what will be the consequence, I will
 reimburse him, if I deny myself the necessaries of life--and even then my
 folly will sting me.--Perhaps you can scarcely conceive the misery I at
 this moment endure--that I, whose power of doing good is so limited,
 should do harm, galls my very soul. ****** may laugh at these
 qualms--but, supposing Mr. ------ to be unworthy, I am not the less to
 blame. Surely it is hell to despise one's self!--I did not want this
 additional vexation--at this time I have many that hang heavily on my
 spirits. I shall not call on you this month--nor stir out.--My stomach
 has been so suddenly and violently affected, I am unable to lean over the
 desk.
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER VII.
 
 AS I am become a reviewer, I think it right, in the way of business, to
 consider the subject. You have alarmed the editor of the Critical, as the
 advertisement prefixed to the Appendix plainly shows. The Critical
 appears to me to be a timid, mean production, and its success is a
 reflection on the taste and judgment of the public; but, as a body, who
 ever gave it credit for much? The voice of the people is only the voice
 of truth, when some man of abilities has had time to get fast hold of the
 GREAT NOSE of the monster. Of course, local fame is generally a clamour,
 and dies away. The Appendix to the Monthly afforded me more amusement,
 though every article almost wants energy and a _cant_ of virtue and
 liberality is strewed over it; always tame, and eager to pay court to
 established fame. The account of Necker is one unvaried tone of
 admiration. Surely men were born only to provide for the sustenance of
 the body by enfeebling the mind!
 
 MARY.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER VIII.
 
 YOU made me very low-spirited last night, by your manner of talking.--You
 are my only friend--the only person I am _intimate_ with.--I never had a
 father, or a brother--you have been both to me, ever since I knew
 you--yet I have sometimes been very petulant.--I have been thinking of
 those instances of ill-humour and quickness, and they appeared like
 crimes.
 
 Yours sincerely
 
 MARY.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER IX.
 
 Saturday Night.
 
 I AM a mere animal, and instinctive emotions too often silence the
 suggestions of reason. Your note--I can scarcely tell why, hurt me--and
 produced a kind of winterly smile, which diffuses a beam of despondent
 tranquillity over the features. I have been very ill--Heaven knows it was
 more than fancy--After some sleepless, wearisome nights, towards the
 morning I have grown delirious.--Last Thursday, in particular, I imagined
 ------ was thrown into great distress by his folly; and I, unable to
 assist him, was in an agony. My nerves were in such a painful state of
 irritation--I suffered more than I can express--Society was
 necessary--and might have diverted me till I gained more strength; but I
 blushed when I recollected how often I had teazed you with childish
 complaints, and the reveries of a disordered imagination. I even
 _imagined_ that I intruded on you, because you never called on me--though
 you perceived that I was not well.--I have nourished a sickly kind of
 delicacy, which gives me many unnecessary pangs.--I acknowledge that life
 is but a jest--and often a frightful dream--yet catch myself every day
 searching for something serious--and feel real misery from the
 disappointment. I am a strange compound of weakness and resolution!
 However, if I must suffer, I will endeavour to suffer in silence. There
 is certainly a great defect in my mind--my wayward heart creates its own
 misery--Why I am made thus I cannot tell; and, till I can form some idea
 of the whole of my existence, I must be content to weep and dance like a
 child--long for a toy, and be tired of it as soon as I get it.
 
 We must each of us wear a fool's cap; but mine, alas! has lost its bells,
 and is grown so heavy, I find it intolerably troublesome.----Good-night!
 I have been pursuing a number of strange thoughts since I began to write,
 and have actually both wept and laughed immoderately--Surely I am a
 fool--
 
 MARY W.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER X.
 
 Monday Morning.
 
 I REALLY want a German grammar, as I intend to attempt to learn that
 language--and I will tell you the reason why.--While I live, I am
 persuaded, I must exert my understanding to procure an independence, and
 render myself useful. To make the task easier, I ought to store my mind
 with knowledge--The seed time is passing away. I see the necessity of
 labouring now--and of that necessity I do not complain; on the contrary,
 I am thankful that I have more than common incentives to pursue
 knowledge, and draw my pleasures from the employments that are within my
 reach. You perceive this is not a gloomy day--I feel at this moment
 particularly grateful to you--without your humane and _delicate_
 assistance, how many obstacles should I not have had to encounter--too
 often should I have been out of patience with my fellow-creatures, whom I
 wish to love!--Allow me to love you, my dear sir, and call friend a being
 I respect.--Adieu!
 
 MARY W.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XI.
 
 I THOUGHT you _very_ unkind, nay, very unfeeling, last night. My cares
 and vexations--I will say what I allow myself to think--do me honour, as
 they arise from my disinterestedness and _unbending_ principles; nor can
 that mode of conduct be a reflection on my understanding, which enables
 me to bear misery, rather than selfishly live for myself alone. I am not
 the only character deserving of respect, that has had to struggle with
 various sorrows--while inferior minds have enjoyed local fame and present
 comfort.--Dr. Johnson's cares almost drove him mad--but, I suppose, you
 would quietly have told him, he was a fool for not being calm, and that
 wise men striving against the stream, can yet be in good humour. I have
 done with insensible human wisdom,--"indifference cold in wisdom's
 guise,"--and turn to the source of perfection--who perhaps never
 disregarded an almost broken heart, especially when a respect, a
 practical respect, for virtue, sharpened the wounds of adversity. I am
 ill--I stayed in bed this morning till eleven o'clock, only thinking of
 getting money to extricate myself out of some of my difficulties--The
 struggle is now over. I will condescend to try to obtain some in a
 disagreeable way.
 
 Mr. ------ called on me just now--pray did you know his motive for
 calling[82-A]?--I think him impertinently officious.--He had left the
 house before it occurred to me in the strong light it does now, or I
 should have told him so--My poverty makes me proud--I will not be
 insulted by a superficial puppy.--His intimacy with Miss ------ gave him
 a privilege, which he should not have assumed with me--a proposal might
 be made to his cousin, a milliner's girl, which should not have been
 mentioned to me. Pray tell him that I am offended--and do not wish to see
 him again!--When I meet him at your house, I shall leave the room, since
 I cannot pull him by the nose. I can force my spirit to leave my
 body--but it shall never bend to support that body--God of heaven, save
 thy child from this living death!--I scarcely know what I write. My hand
 trembles--I am very sick--sick at heart.----
 
 MARY.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XII.
 
 Tuesday Evening.
 
 Sir,
 
 WHEN you left me this morning, and I reflected a moment--your _officious_
 message, which at first appeared to me a joke--looked so very like an
 insult--I cannot forget it--To prevent then the necessity of forcing a
 smile--when I chance to meet you--I take the earliest opportunity of
 informing you of my real sentiments.
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XIII.
 
 Wednesday, 3 o'clock.
 
 Sir,
 
 IT is inexpressibly disagreeable to me to be obliged to enter again on a
 subject, that has already raised a tumult of _indignant_ emotions in my
 bosom, which I was labouring to suppress when I received your letter. I
 shall now _condescend_ to answer your epistle; but let me first tell you,
 that, in my _unprotected_ situation, I make a point of never forgiving a
 _deliberate insult_--and in that light I consider your late officious
 conduct. It is not according to my nature to mince matters--I will then
 tell you in plain terms, what I think. I have ever considered you in the
 light of a _civil_ acquaintance--on the word friend I lay a peculiar
 emphasis--and, as a mere acquaintance, you were rude and _cruel_, to step
 forward to insult a woman, whose conduct and misfortunes demand respect.
 If my friend, Mr. Johnson, had made the proposal--I should have been
 severely hurt--have thought him unkind and unfeeling, but not
 _impertinent_.--The privilege of intimacy you had no claim to--and should
 have referred the man to myself--if you had not sufficient discernment to
 quash it at once. I am, sir, poor and destitute.--Yet I have a spirit
 that will never bend, or take indirect methods, to obtain the consequence
 I despise; nay, if to support life it was necessary to act contrary to my
 principles, the struggle would soon be over. I can bear any thing but my
 own contempt.
 
 In a few words, what I call an insult, is the bare supposition that I
 could for a moment think of _prostituting_ my person for a maintenance;
 for in that point of view does such a marriage appear to me, who consider
 right and wrong in the abstract, and never by words and local opinions
 shield myself from the reproaches of my own heart and understanding.
 
 It is needless to say more--Only you must excuse me when I add, that I
 wish never to see, but as a perfect stranger, a person who could so
 grossly mistake my character. An apology is not necessary--if you were
 inclined to make one--nor any further expostulations.--I again repeat, I
 cannot overlook an affront; few indeed have sufficient delicacy to
 respect poverty, even where it gives lustre to a character--and I tell
 you sir, I am POOR--yet can live without your benevolent exertions.
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XIV.
 
 I SEND you _all_ the books I had to review except Dr. J--'s Sermons,
 which I have begun. If you wish me to look over any more trash this
 month--you must send it directly. I have been so low-spirited since I saw
 you--I was quite glad, last night, to feel myself affected by some
 passages in Dr. J--'s sermon on the death of his wife--I seemed
 (suddenly) to _find_ my _soul_ again--It has been for some time I cannot
 tell where. Send me the Speaker--and _Mary_, I want one--and I shall soon
 want some paper--you may as well send it at the same time--for I am
 trying to brace my nerves that I may be industrious.--I am afraid reason
 is not a good bracer--for I have been reasoning a long time with my
 untoward spirits--and yet my hand trembles.--I could finish a period very
 _prettily_ now, by saying that it ought to be steady when I add that I am
 yours sincerely,
 
 MARY.
 
 If you do not like the manner in which I reviewed Dr. J--'s s---- on his
 wife, be it known unto you--I _will_ not do it any other way--I felt some
 pleasure in paying a just tribute of respect to the memory of a
 man--who, spite of his faults, I have an affection for--I say _have_, for
 I believe he is somewhere--_where_ my soul has been gadding perhaps;--but
 _you_ do not live on conjectures.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XV.
 
 MY dear sir, I send you a chapter which I am pleased with, now I see it
 in one point of view--and, as I have made free with the author, I hope
 you will not have often to say--what does this mean?
 
 You forgot you were to make out my account--I am, of course, over head
 and ears in debt; but I have not that kind of pride, which makes some
 dislike to be obliged to those they respect.--On the contrary, when I
 involuntarily lament that I have not a father or brother, I thankfully
 recollect that I have received unexpected kindness from you and a few
 others.--So reason allows, what nature impels me to--for I cannot live
 without loving my fellow-creatures--nor can I love them, without
 discovering some virtue.
 
 MARY.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 LETTER XVI.
 
 Paris, December 26, 1792.
 
 I SHOULD immediately on the receipt of your letter, my dear friend, have
 thanked you for your punctuality, for it highly gratified me, had I not
 wished to wait till I could tell you that this day was not stained with
 blood. Indeed the prudent precautions taken by the National Convention to
 prevent a tumult, made me suppose that the dogs of faction would not dare
 to bark, much less to bite, however true to their scent; and I was not
 mistaken; for the citizens, who were all called out, are returning home
 with composed countenances, shouldering their arms. About nine o'clock
 this morning, the king passed by my window, moving silently along
 (excepting now and then a few strokes on the drum, which rendered the
 stillness more awful) through empty streets, surrounded by the national
 guards, who, clustering round the carriage, seemed to deserve their name.
 The inhabitants flocked to their windows, but the casements were all
 shut, not a voice was heard, nor did I see any thing like an insulting
 gesture.--For the first time since I entered France, I bowed to the
 majesty of the people, and respected the propriety of behaviour so
 perfectly in unison with my own feelings. I can scarcely tell you why,
 but an association of ideas made the tears flow insensibly from my eyes,
 when I saw Louis sitting, with more dignity than I expected from his
 character, in a hackney coach, going to meet death, where so many of his
 race have triumphed. My fancy instantly brought Louis XIV before me,
 entering the capital with all his pomp, after one of the victories most
 flattering to his pride, only to see the sunshine of prosperity
 overshadowed by the sublime gloom of misery. I have been alone ever
 since; and, though my mind is calm, I cannot dismiss the lively images
 that have filled my imagination all the day.--Nay, do not smile, but pity
 me; for, once or twice, lifting my eyes from the paper, I have seen eyes
 glare through a glass-door opposite my chair and bloody hands shook at
 me. Not the distant sound of a footstep can I hear.--My apartments are
 remote from those of the servants, the only persons who sleep with me in
 an immense hotel, one folding door opening after another.--I wish I had
 even kept the cat with me!--I want to see something alive; death in so
 many frightful shapes has taken hold of my fancy.--I am going to
 bed--and, for the first time in my life, I cannot put out the candle.
 
 M. W.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [67-A] To Original Stories.
 
 [69-A] Countess Mount Cashel.
 
 [82-A] This alludes to a foolish proposal of marriage for mercenary
 considerations, which the gentleman here mentioned thought proper to
 recommend to her. The two letters which immediately follow, are addressed
 to the gentleman himself.
 
 
 
 
 EXTRACT
 
 OF THE
 
 CAVE OF FANCY.
 
 A TALE.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 [_Begun to be written in the year 1787, but never completed_]
 
 
 CAVE OF FANCY.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. I.
 
 
 YE who expect constancy where every thing is changing, and peace in the
 midst of tumult, attend to the voice of experience, and mark in time the
 footsteps of disappointment, or life will be lost in desultory wishes,
 and death arrive before the dawn of wisdom.
 
 In a sequestered valley, surrounded by rocky mountains that intercepted
 many of the passing clouds, though sunbeams variegated their ample sides,
 lived a sage, to whom nature had unlocked her most hidden secrets. His
 hollow eyes, sunk in their orbits, retired from the view of vulgar
 objects, and turned inwards, overleaped the boundary prescribed to human
 knowledge. Intense thinking during fourscore and ten years, had whitened
 the scattered locks on his head, which, like the summit of the distant
 mountain, appeared to be bound by an eternal frost.
 
 On the sandy waste behind the mountains, the track of ferocious beasts
 might be traced, and sometimes the mangled limbs which they left,
 attracted a hovering flight of birds of prey. An extensive wood the sage
 had forced to rear its head in a soil by no means congenial, and the firm
 trunks of the trees seemed to frown with defiance on time; though the
 spoils of innumerable summers covered the roots, which resembled fangs;
 so closely did they cling to the unfriendly sand, where serpents hissed,
 and snakes, rolling out their vast folds, inhaled the noxious vapours.
 The ravens and owls who inhabited the solitude, gave also a thicker gloom
 to the everlasting twilight, and the croaking of the former a monotony,
 in unison with the gloom; whilst lions and tygers, shunning even this
 faint semblance of day, sought the dark caverns, and at night, when they
 shook off sleep, their roaring would make the whole valley resound,
 confounded with the screechings of the bird of night.
 
 One mountain rose sublime, towering above all, on the craggy sides of
 which a few sea-weeds grew, washed by the ocean, that with tumultuous
 roar rushed to assault, and even undermine, the huge barrier that stopped
 its progress; and ever and anon a ponderous mass, loosened from the
 cliff, to which it scarcely seemed to adhere, always threatening to fall,
 fell into the flood, rebounding as it fell, and the sound was re-echoed
 from rock to rock. Look where you would, all was without form, as if
 nature, suddenly stopping her hand, had left chaos a retreat.
 
 Close to the most remote side of it was the sage's abode. It was a rude
 hut, formed of stumps of trees and matted twigs, to secure him from the
 inclemency of the weather; only through small apertures crossed with
 rushes, the wind entered in wild murmurs, modulated by these
 obstructions. A clear spring broke out of the middle of the adjacent
 rock, which, dropping slowly into a cavity it had hollowed, soon
 overflowed, and then ran, struggling to free itself from the cumbrous
 fragments, till, become a deep, silent stream, it escaped through reeds,
 and roots of trees, whose blasted tops overhung and darkened the current.
 
 One side of the hut was supported by the rock, and at midnight, when the
 sage struck the inclosed part, it yawned wide, and admitted him into a
 cavern in the very bowels of the earth, where never human foot before had
 trod; and the various spirits, which inhabit the different regions of
 nature, were here obedient to his potent word. The cavern had been formed
 by the great inundation of waters, when the approach of a comet forced
 them from their source; then, when the fountains of the great deep were
 broken up, a stream rushed out of the centre of the earth, where the
 spirits, who have lived on it, are confined to purify themselves from
 the dross contracted in their first stage of existence; and it flowed in
 black waves, for ever bubbling along the cave, the extent of which had
 never been explored. From the sides and top, water distilled, and,
 petrifying as it fell, took fantastic shapes, that soon divided it into
 apartments, if so they might be called. In the foam, a wearied spirit
 would sometimes rise, to catch the most distant glimpse of light, or
 taste the vagrant breeze, which the yawning of the rock admitted, when
 Sagestus, for that was the name of the hoary sage, entered. Some, who
 were refined and almost cleared from vicious spots, he would allow to
 leave, for a limited time, their dark prison-house; and, flying on the
 winds across the bleak northern ocean, or rising in an exhalation till
 they reached a sun-beam, they thus re-visited the haunts of men. These
 were the guardian angels, who in soft whispers restrain the vicious, and
 animate the wavering wretch who stands suspended between virtue and vice.
 
 Sagestus had spent a night in the cavern, as he often did, and he left
 the silent vestibule of the grave, just as the sun, emerging from the
 ocean, dispersed the clouds, which were not half so dense as those he had
 left. All that was human in him rejoiced at the sight of reviving life,
 and he viewed with pleasure the mounting sap rising to expand the herbs,
 which grew spontaneously in this wild--when, turning his eyes towards the
 sea, he found that death had been at work during his absence, and
 terrific marks of a furious storm still spread horror around. Though the
 day was serene, and threw bright rays on eyes for ever shut, it dawned
 not for the wretches who hung pendent on the craggy rocks, or were
 stretched lifeless on the sand. Some, struggling, had dug themselves a
 grave; others had resigned their breath before the impetuous surge
 whirled them on shore. A few, in whom the vital spark was not so soon
 dislodged, had clung to loose fragments; it was the grasp of death;
 embracing the stone, they stiffened; and the head, no longer erect,
 rested on the mass which the arms encircled. It felt not the agonizing
 gripe, nor heard the sigh that broke the heart in twain.
 
 Resting his chin on an oaken club, the sage looked on every side, to see
 if he could discern any who yet breathed. He drew nearer, and thought he
 saw, at the first glance, the unclosed eyes glare; but soon perceived
 that they were a mere glassy substance, mute as the tongue; the jaws were
 fallen, and, in some of the tangled locks, hands were clinched; nay, even
 the nails had entered sharpened by despair. The blood flew rapidly to his
 heart; it was flesh; he felt he was still a man, and the big tear paced
 down his iron cheeks, whose muscles had not for a long time been relaxed
 by such humane emotions. A moment he breathed quick, then heaved a sigh,
 and his wonted calm returned with an unaccustomed glow of tenderness; for
 the ways of heaven were not hid from him; he lifted up his eyes to the
 common Father of nature, and all was as still in his bosom, as the smooth
 deep, after having closed over the huge vessel from which the wretches
 had fled.
 
 Turning round a part of the rock that jutted out, meditating on the ways
 of Providence, a weak infantine voice reached his ears; it was lisping
 out the name of mother. He looked, and beheld a blooming child leaning
 over, and kissing with eager fondness, lips that were insensible to the
 warm pressure. Starting at the sight of the sage, she fixed her eyes on
 him, "Wake her, ah! wake her," she cried, "or the sea will catch us."
 Again he felt compassion, for he saw that the mother slept the sleep of
 death. He stretched out his hand, and, smoothing his brow, invited her to
 approach; but she still intreated him to wake her mother, whom she
 continued to call, with an impatient tremulous voice. To detach her from
 the body by persuasion would not have been very easy. Sagestus had a
 quicker method to effect his purpose; he took out a box which contained a
 soporific powder, and as soon as the fumes reached her brain, the powers
 of life were suspended.
 
 He carried her directly to his hut, and left her sleeping profoundly on
 his rushy couch.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. II.
 
 
 AGAIN Sagestus approached the dead, to view them with a more scrutinizing
 eye. He was perfectly acquainted with the construction of the human body,
 knew the traces that virtue or vice leaves on the whole frame; they were
 now indelibly fixed by death; nay more, he knew by the shape of the solid
 structure, how far the spirit could range, and saw the barrier beyond
 which it could not pass: the mazes of fancy he explored, measured the
 stretch of thought, and, weighing all in an even balance, could tell whom
 nature had stamped an hero, a poet, or philosopher.
 
 By their appearance, at a transient glance, he knew that the vessel must
 have contained many passengers, and that some of them were above the
 vulgar, with respect to fortune and education; he then walked leisurely
 among the dead, and narrowly observed their pallid features.
 
 His eye first rested on a form in which proportion reigned, and, stroking
 back the hair, a spacious forehead met his view; warm fancy had revelled
 there, and her airy dance had left vestiges, scarcely visible to a mortal
 eye. Some perpendicular lines pointed out that melancholy had
 predominated in his constitution; yet the straggling hairs of his
 eye-brows showed that anger had often shook his frame; indeed, the four
 temperatures, like the four elements, had resided in this little world,
 and produced harmony. The whole visage was bony, and an energetic frown
 had knit the flexible skin of his brow; the kingdom within had been
 extensive; and the wild creations of fancy had there "a local habitation
 and a name." So exquisite was his sensibility, so quick his
 comprehension, that he perceived various combinations in an instant; he
 caught truth as she darted towards him, saw all her fair proportion at a
 glance, and the flash of his eye spoke the quick senses which conveyed
 intelligence to his mind; the sensorium indeed was capacious, and the
 sage imagined he saw the lucid beam, sparkling with love or ambition, in
 characters of fire, which a graceful curve of the upper eyelid shaded.
 The lips were a little deranged by contempt; and a mixture of vanity and
 self-complacency formed a few irregular lines round them. The chin had
 suffered from sensuality, yet there were still great marks of vigour in
 it, as if advanced with stern dignity. The hand accustomed to command,
 and even tyrannize, was unnerved; but its appearance convinced Sagestus,
 that he had oftener wielded a thought than a weapon; and that he had
 silenced, by irresistible conviction, the superficial disputant, and the
 being, who doubted because he had not strength to believe, who, wavering
 between different borrowed opinions, first caught at one straw, then at
 another, unable to settle into any consistency of character. After gazing
 a few moments, Sagestus turned away exclaiming, How are the stately oaks
 torn up by a tempest, and the bow unstrung, that could force the arrow
 beyond the ken of the eye!
 
 What a different face next met his view! The forehead was short, yet well
 set together; the nose small, but a little turned up at the end; and a
 draw-down at the sides of his mouth, proved that he had been a humourist,
 who minded the main chance, and could joke with his acquaintance, while
 he eagerly devoured a dainty which he was not to pay for. His lips shut
 like a box whose hinges had often been mended; and the muscles, which
 display the soft emotion of the heart on the cheeks, were grown quite
 rigid, so that, the vessels that should have moistened them not having
 much communication with the grand source of passions, the fine volatile
 fluid had evaporated, and they became mere dry fibres, which might be
 pulled by any misfortune that threatened himself, but were not
 sufficiently elastic to be moved by the miseries of others. His joints
 were inserted compactly, and with celerity they had performed all the
 animal functions, without any of the grace which results from the
 imagination mixing with the senses.
 
 A huge form was stretched near him, that exhibited marks of overgrown
 infancy; every part was relaxed; all appeared imperfect. Yet, some
 undulating lines on the puffed-out cheeks, displayed signs of timid,
 servile good nature; and the skin of the forehead had been so often drawn
 up by wonder, that the few hairs of the eyebrows were fixed in a sharp
 arch, whilst an ample chin rested in lobes of flesh on his protuberant
 breast.
 
 By his side was a body that had scarcely ever much life in it--sympathy
 seemed to have drawn them together--every feature and limb was round and
 fleshy, and, if a kind of brutal cunning had not marked the face, it
 might have been mistaken for an automaton, so unmixed was the phlegmatic
 fluid. The vital spark was buried deep in a soft mass of matter,
 resembling the pith in young elder, which, when found, is so equivocal,
 that it only appears a moister part of the same body.
 
 Another part of the beach was covered with sailors, whose bodies
 exhibited marks of strength and brutal courage.--Their characters were
 all different, though of the same class; Sagestus did not stay to
 discriminate them, satisfied with a rough sketch. He saw indolence roused
 by a love of humour, or rather bodily fun; sensuality and prodigality
 with a vein of generosity running through it; a contempt of danger with
 gross superstition; supine senses, only to be kept alive by noisy,
 tumultuous pleasures, or that kind of novelty which borders on absurdity:
 this formed the common outline, and the rest were rather dabs than
 shades.
 
 Sagestus paused, and remembered it had been said by an earthly wit, that
 "many a flower is born to blush unseen, and waste its sweetness on the
 desart air." How little, he exclaimed, did that poet know of the ways of
 heaven! And yet, in this respect, they are direct; the hands before me,
 were designed to pull a rope, knock down a sheep, or perform the servile
 offices of life; no "mute, inglorious poet" rests amongst them, and he
 who is superior to his fellow, does not rise above mediocrity. The genius
 that sprouts from a dunghil soon shakes off the heterogenous mass; those
 only grovel, who have not power to fly.
 
 He turned his step towards the mother of the orphan: another female was
 at some distance; and a man who, by his garb, might have been the
 husband, or brother, of the former, was not far off.
 
 Him the sage surveyed with an attentive eye, and bowed with respect to
 the inanimate clay, that lately had been the dwelling of a most
 benevolent spirit. The head was square, though the features were not very
 prominent; but there was a great harmony in every part, and the turn of
 the nostrils and lips evinced, that the soul must have had taste, to
 which they had served as organs. Penetration and judgment were seated on
 the brows that overhung the eye. Fixed as it was, Sagestus quickly
 discerned the expression it must have had; dark and pensive, rather from
 slowness of comprehension than melancholy, it seemed to absorb the light
 of knowledge, to drink it in ray by ray; nay, a new one was not allowed
 to enter his head till the last was arranged: an opinion was thus
 cautiously received, and maturely weighed, before it was added to the
 general stock. As nature led him to mount from a part to the whole, he
 was most conversant with the beautiful, and rarely comprehended the
 sublime; yet, said Sagestus, with a softened tone, he was all heart, full
 of forbearance, and desirous to please every fellow-creature; but from a
 nobler motive than a love of admiration; the fumes of vanity never
 mounted to cloud his brain, or tarnish his beneficence. The fluid in
 which those placid eyes swam, is now congealed; how often has tenderness
 given them the finest water! Some torn parts of the child's dress hung
 round his arm, which led the sage to conclude, that he had saved the
 child; every line in his face confirmed the conjecture; benevolence
 indeed strung the nerves that naturally were not very firm; it was the
 great knot that tied together the scattered qualities, and gave the
 distinct stamp to the character.
 
 The female whom he next approached, and supposed to be an attendant on
 the other, was below the middle size, and her legs were so
 disproportionably short, that, when she moved, she must have waddled
 along; her elbows were drawn in to touch her long taper, waist, and the
 air of her whole body was an affectation of gentility. Death could not
 alter the rigid hang of her limbs, or efface the simper that had
 stretched her mouth; the lips were thin, as if nature intended she should
 mince her words; her nose was small, and sharp at the end; and the
 forehead, unmarked by eyebrows, was wrinkled by the discontent that had
 sunk her cheeks, on which Sagestus still discerned faint traces of
 tenderness; and fierce good-nature, he perceived had sometimes animated
 the little spark of an eye that anger had oftener lighted. The same
 thought occurred to him that the sight of the sailors had suggested, Men
 and women are all in their proper places--this female was intended to
 fold up linen and nurse the sick.
 
 Anxious to observe the mother of his charge, he turned to the lily that
 had been so rudely snapped, and, carefully observing it, traced every
 fine line to its source. There was a delicacy in her form, so truly
 feminine, that an involuntary desire to cherish such a being, made the
 sage again feel the almost forgotten sensations of his nature. On
 observing her more closely, he discovered that her natural delicacy had
 been increased by an improper education, to a degree that took away all
 vigour from her faculties. And its baneful influence had had such an
 effect on her mind, that few traces of the exertions of it appeared on
 her face, though the fine finish of her features, and particularly the
 form of the forehead, convinced the sage that her understanding might
 have risen considerably above mediocrity, had the wheels ever been put in
 motion; but, clogged by prejudices, they never turned quite round, and,
 whenever she considered a subject, she stopped before she came to a
 conclusion. Assuming a mask of propriety, she had banished nature; yet
 its tendency was only to be diverted, not stifled. Some lines, which took
 from the symmetry of the mouth, not very obvious to a superficial
 observer, struck Sagestus, and they appeared to him characters of
 indolent obstinacy. Not having courage to form an opinion of her own, she
 adhered, with blind partiality, to those she adopted, which she received
 in the lump, and, as they always remained unopened, of course she only
 saw the even gloss on the outside. Vestiges of anger were visible on her
 brow, and the sage concluded, that she had often been offended with, and
 indeed would scarcely make any allowance for, those who did not coincide
 with her in opinion, as things always appear self-evident that have never
 been examined; yet her very weakness gave a charming timidity to her
 countenance; goodness and tenderness pervaded every lineament, and melted
 in her dark blue eyes. The compassion that wanted activity, was sincere,
 though it only embellished her face, or produced casual acts of charity
 when a moderate alms could relieve present distress. Unacquainted with
 life, fictitious, unnatural distress drew the tears that were not shed
 for real misery. In its own shape, human wretchedness excites a little
 disgust in the mind that has indulged sickly refinement. Perhaps the
 sage gave way to a little conjecture in drawing the last conclusion; but
 his conjectures generally arose from distinct ideas, and a dawn of light
 allowed him to see a great way farther than common mortals.
 
 He was now convinced that the orphan was not very unfortunate in having
 lost such a mother. The parent that inspires fond affection without
 respect, is seldom an useful one; and they only are respectable, who
 consider right and wrong abstracted from local forms and accidental
 modifications.
 
 Determined to adopt the child, he named it after himself, Sagesta, and
 retired to the hut where the innocent slept, to think of the best method
 of educating this child, whom the angry deep had spared.
 
 [The last branch of the education of Sagesta, consisted of a variety of
 characters and stories presented to her in the Cave of Fancy, of which
 the following is a specimen.]
 
 
 
 
 CHAP.
 
 
 A FORM now approached that particularly struck and interested Sagesta.
 The sage, observing what passed in her mind, bade her ever trust to the
 first impression. In life, he continued, try to remember the effect the
 first appearance of a stranger has on your mind; and, in proportion to
 your sensibility, you may decide on the character. Intelligence glances
 from eyes that have the same pursuits, and a benevolent heart soon traces
 the marks of benevolence on the countenance of an unknown
 fellow-creature; and not only the countenance, but the gestures, the
 voice, loudly speak truth to the unprejudiced mind.
 
 Whenever a stranger advances towards you with a tripping step, receives
 you with broad smiles, and a profusion of compliments, and yet you find
 yourself embarrassed and unable to return the salutation with equal
 cordiality, be assured that such a person is affected, and endeavours to
 maintain a very good character in the eyes of the world, without really
 practising the social virtues which dress the face in looks of unfeigned
 complacency. Kindred minds are drawn to each other by expressions which
 elude description; and, like the calm breeze that plays on a smooth lake,
 they are rather felt than seen. Beware of a man who always appears in
 good humour; a selfish design too frequently lurks in the smiles the
 heart never curved; or there is an affectation of candour that destroys
 all strength of character, by blending truth and falshood into an
 unmeaning mass. The mouth, in fact, seems to be the feature where you may
 trace every kind of dissimulation, from the simper of vanity, to the
 fixed smile of the designing villain. Perhaps, the modulations of the
 voice will still more quickly give a key to the character than even the
 turns of the mouth, or the words that issue from it; often do the tones
 of unpractised dissemblers give the lie to their assertions. Many people
 never speak in an unnatural voice, but when they are insincere: the
 phrases not corresponding with the dictates of the heart, have nothing to
 keep them in tune. In the course of an argument however, you may easily
 discover whether vanity or conviction stimulates the disputant, though
 his inflated countenance may be turned from you, and you may not see the
 gestures which mark self-sufficiency. He stopped, and the spirit began.
 
 I have wandered through the cave; and, as soon as I have taught you a
 useful lesson, I shall take my flight where my tears will cease to flow,
 and where mine eyes will no more be shocked with the sight of guilt and
 sorrow. Before many moons have changed, thou wilt enter, O mortal! into
 that world I have lately left. Listen to my warning voice, and trust not
 too much to the goodness which I perceive resides in thy breast. Let it
 be reined in by principles, lest thy very virtue sharpen the sting of
 remorse, which as naturally follows disorder in the moral world, as pain
 attends on intemperance in the physical. But my history will afford you
 more instruction than mere advice. Sagestus concurred in opinion with
 her, observing that the senses of children should be the first object of
 improvement; then their passions worked on; and judgment the fruit, must
 be the acquirement of the being itself, when out of leading-strings. The
 spirit bowed assent, and, without any further prelude, entered on her
 history.
 
 My mother was a most respectable character, but she was yoked to a man
 whose follies and vices made her ever feel the weight of her chains. The
 first sensation I recollect, was pity; for I have seen her weep over me
 and the rest of her babes, lamenting that the extravagance of a father
 would throw us destitute on the world. But, though my father was
 extravagant, and seldom thought of any thing but his own pleasures, our
 education was not neglected. In solitude, this employment was my mother's
 only solace; and my father's pride made him procure us masters; nay,
 sometimes he was so gratified by our improvement, that he would embrace
 us with tenderness, and intreat my mother to forgive him, with marks of
 real contrition. But the affection his penitence gave rise to, only
 served to expose her to continual disappointments, and keep hope alive
 merely to torment her. After a violent debauch he would let his beard
 grow, and the sadness that reigned in the house I shall never forget; he
 was ashamed to meet even the eyes of his children. This is so contrary to
 the nature of things, it gave me exquisite pain; I used, at those times,
 to show him extreme respect. I could not bear to see my parent humble
 himself before me. However neither his constitution, nor fortune could
 long bear the constant waste. He had, I have observed, a childish
 affection for his children, which was displayed in caresses that
 gratified him for the moment, yet never restrained the headlong fury of
 his appetites; his momentary repentance wrung his heart, without
 influencing his conduct; and he died, leaving an encumbered wreck of a
 good estate.
 
 As we had always lived in splendid poverty, rather than in affluence, the
 shock was not so great; and my mother repressed her anguish, and
 concealed some circumstances, that she might not shed a destructive
 mildew over the gaiety of youth.
 
 So fondly did I doat on this dear parent, that she engrossed all my
 tenderness; her sorrows had knit me firmly to her, and my chief care was
 to give her proofs of affection. The gallantry that afforded my
 companions, the few young people my mother forced me to mix with, so much
 pleasure, I despised; I wished more to be loved than admired, for I could
 love. I adored virtue; and my imagination, chasing a chimerical object,
 overlooked the common pleasures of life; they were not sufficient for my
 happiness. A latent fire made me burn to rise superior to my
 contemporaries in wisdom and virtue; and tears of joy and emulation
 filled my eyes when I read an account of a great action--I felt
 admiration, not astonishment.
 
 My mother had two particular friends, who endeavoured to settle her
 affairs; one was a middle-aged man, a merchant; the human breast never
 enshrined a more benevolent heart. His manners were rather rough, and he
 bluntly spoke his thoughts without observing the pain it gave; yet he
 possessed extreme tenderness, as far as his discernment went. Men do not
 make sufficient distinction, said she, digressing from her story to
 address Sagestus, between tenderness and sensibility.
 
 To give the shortest definition of sensibility, replied the sage, I
 should say that it is the result of acute senses, finely fashioned
 nerves, which vibrate at the slightest touch, and convey such clear
 intelligence to the brain, that it does not require to be arranged by the
 judgment. Such persons instantly enter into the characters of others, and
 instinctively discern what will give pain to every human being; their own
 feelings are so varied that they seem to contain in themselves, not only
 all the passions of the species, but their various modifications.
 Exquisite pain and pleasure is their portion; nature wears for them a
 different aspect than is displayed to common mortals. One moment it is a
 paradise; all is beautiful: a cloud arises, an emotion receives a sudden
 damp; darkness invades the sky, and the world is an unweeded garden;--but
 go on with your narrative, said Sagestus, recollecting himself.
 
 She proceeded. The man I am describing was humanity itself; but
 frequently he did not understand me; many of my feelings were not to be
 analyzed by his common sense. His friendships, for he had many friends,
 gave him pleasure unmixed with pain; his religion was coldly reasonable,
 because he wanted fancy, and he did not feel the necessity of finding,
 or creating, a perfect object, to answer the one engraved on his heart:
 the sketch there was faint. He went with the stream, and rather caught a
 character from the society he lived in, than spread one around him. In my
 mind many opinions were graven with a pen of brass, which he thought
 chimerical: but time could not erase them, and I now recognize them as
 the seeds of eternal happiness: they will soon expand in those realms
 where I shall enjoy the bliss adapted to my nature; this is all we need
 ask of the Supreme Being; happiness must follow the completion of his
 designs. He however could live quietly, without giving a preponderancy to
 many important opinions that continually obtruded on my mind; not having
 an enthusiastic affection for his fellow creatures, he did them good,
 without suffering from their follies. He was particularly attached to me,
 and I felt for him all the affection of a daughter; often, when he had
 been interesting himself to promote my welfare, have I lamented that he
 was not my father; lamented that the vices of mine had dried up one
 source of pure affection.
 
 The other friend I have already alluded to, was of a very different
 character; greatness of mind, and those combinations of feeling which are
 so difficult to describe, raised him above the throng, that bustle their
 hour out, lie down to sleep, and are forgotten. But I shall soon see him,
 she exclaimed, as much superior to his former self, as he then rose in my
 eyes above his fellow creatures! As she spoke, a glow of delight
 animated each feature; her countenance appeared transparent; and she
 silently anticipated the happiness she should enjoy, when she entered
 those mansions, where death-divided friends should meet, to part no more;
 where human weakness could not damp their bliss, or poison the cup of joy
 that, on earth, drops from the lips as soon as tasted, or, if some daring
 mortal snatches a hasty draught, what was sweet to the taste becomes a
 root of bitterness.
 
 He was unfortunate, had many cares to struggle with, and I marked on his
 cheeks traces of the same sorrows that sunk my own. He was unhappy I say,
 and perhaps pity might first have awoke my tenderness; for, early in
 life, an artful woman worked on his compassionate soul, and he united his
 fate to a being made up of such jarring elements, that he was still
 alone. The discovery did not extinguish that propensity to love, a high
 sense of virtue fed. I saw him sick and unhappy, without a friend to
 sooth the hours languor made heavy; often did I sit a long winter's
 evening by his side, railing at the swift wings of time, and terming my
 love, humanity.
 
 Two years passed in this manner, silently rooting my affection; and it
 might have continued calm, if a fever had not brought him to the very
 verge of the grave. Though still deceived, I was miserable that the
 customs of the world did not allow me to watch by him; when sleep forsook
 his pillow, my wearied eyes were not closed, and my anxious spirit
 hovered round his bed. I saw him, before he had recovered his strength;
 and, when his hand touched mine, life almost retired, or flew to meet
 the touch. The first look found a ready way to my heart, and thrilled
 through every vein. We were left alone, and insensibly began to talk of
 the immortality of the soul; I declared that I could not live without
 this conviction. In the ardour of conversation he pressed my hand to his
 heart; it rested there a moment, and my emotions gave weight to my
 opinion, for the affection we felt was not of a perishable nature.--A
 silence ensued, I know not how long; he then threw my hand from him, as
 if it had been a serpent; formally complained of the weather, and
 adverted to twenty other uninteresting subjects. Vain efforts! Our hearts
 had already spoken to each other.
 
 Feebly did I afterwards combat an affection, which seemed twisted in
 every fibre of my heart. The world stood still when I thought of him; it
 moved heavily at best, with one whose very constitution seemed to mark
 her out for misery. But I will not dwell on the passion I too fondly
 nursed. One only refuge had I on earth; I could not resolutely desolate
 the scene my fancy flew to, when worldly cares, when a knowledge of
 mankind, which my circumstances forced on me, rendered every other
 insipid. I was afraid of the unmarked vacuity of common life; yet, though
 I supinely indulged myself in fairy-land, when I ought to have been more
 actively employed, virtue was still the first mover of my actions; she
 dressed my love in such enchanting colours, and spread the net I could
 never break. Our corresponding feelings confounded our very souls; and
 in many conversations we almost intuitively discerned each other's
 sentiments; the heart opened itself, not chilled by reserve, nor afraid
 of misconstruction. But, if virtue inspired love, love gave new energy to
 virtue, and absorbed every selfish passion. Never did even a wish escape
 me, that my lover should not fulfil the hard duties which fate had
 imposed on him. I only dissembled with him in one particular; I
 endeavoured to soften his wife's too conspicuous follies, and extenuated
 her failings in an indirect manner. To this I was prompted by a loftiness
 of spirit; I should have broken the band of life, had I ceased to respect
 myself. But I will hasten to an important change in my circumstances.
 
 My mother, who had concealed the real state of her affairs from me, was
 now impelled to make me her confident, that I might assist to discharge
 her mighty debt of gratitude. The merchant, my more than father, had
 privately assisted her: but a fatal civil-war reduced his large property
 to a bare competency; and an inflammation in his eyes, that arose from a
 cold he had caught at a wreck, which he watched during a stormy night to
 keep off the lawless colliers, almost deprived him of sight. His life had
 been spent in society, and he scarcely knew how to fill the void; for his
 spirit would not allow him to mix with his former equals as an humble
 companion; he who had been treated with uncommon respect, could not brook
 their insulting pity. From the resource of solitude, reading, the
 complaint in his eyes cut him off, and he became our constant visitor.
 
 Actuated by the sincerest affection, I used to read to him, and he
 mistook my tenderness for love. How could I undeceive him, when every
 circumstance frowned on him! Too soon I found that I was his only
 comfort; I, who rejected his hand when fortune smiled, could not now
 second her blow; and, in a moment of enthusiastic gratitude and tender
 compassion, I offered him my hand.--It was received with pleasure;
 transport was not made for his soul; nor did he discover that nature had
 separated us, by making me alive to such different sensations. My mother
 was to live with us, and I dwelt on this circumstance to banish cruel
 recollections, when the bent bow returned to its former state.
 
 With a bursting heart and a firm voice, I named the day when I was to
 seal my promise. It came, in spite of my regret; I had been previously
 preparing myself for the awful ceremony, and answered the solemn question
 with a resolute tone, that would silence the dictates of my heart; it was
 a forced, unvaried one; had nature modulated it, my secret would have
 escaped. My active spirit was painfully on the watch to repress every
 tender emotion. The joy in my venerable parent's countenance, the
 tenderness of my husband, as he conducted me home, for I really had a
 sincere affection for him, the gratulations of my mind, when I thought
 that this sacrifice was heroic, all tended to deceive me; but the joy of
 victory over the resigned, pallid look of my lover, haunted my
 imagination, and fixed itself in the centre of my brain.--Still I
 imagined, that his spirit was near me, that he only felt sorrow for my
 loss, and without complaint resigned me to my duty.
 
 I was left alone a moment; my two elbows rested on a table to support my
 chin. Ten thousand thoughts darted with astonishing velocity through my
 mind. My eyes were dry; I was on the brink of madness. At this moment a
 strange association was made by my imagination; I thought of Gallileo,
 who when he left the inquisition, looked upwards, and cried out, "Yet it
 moves." A shower of tears, like the refreshing drops of heaven, relieved
 my parched sockets; they fell disregarded on the table; and, stamping
 with my foot, in an agony I exclaimed, "Yet I love." My husband entered
 before I had calmed these tumultuous emotions, and tenderly took my
 hand. I snatched it from him; grief and surprise were marked on his
 countenance; I hastily stretched it out again. My heart smote me, and I
 removed the transient mist by an unfeigned endeavour to please him.
 
 A few months after, my mind grew calmer; and, if a treacherous
 imagination, if feelings many accidents revived, sometimes plunged me
 into melancholy, I often repeated with steady conviction, that virtue was
 not an empty name, and that, in following the dictates of duty, I had not
 bidden adieu to content.
 
 In the course of a few years, the dear object of my fondest affection,
 said farewel, in dying accents. Thus left alone, my grief became dear;
 and I did not feel solitary, because I thought I might, without a crime,
 indulge a passion, that grew more ardent than ever when my imagination
 only presented him to my view, and restored my former activity of soul
 which the late calm had rendered torpid. I seemed to find myself again,
 to find the eccentric warmth that gave me identity of character. Reason
 had governed my conduct, but could not change my nature; this voluptuous
 sorrow was superior to every gratification of sense, and death more
 firmly united our hearts.
 
 Alive to every human affection, I smoothed my mothers passage to
 eternity, and so often gave my husband sincere proofs of affection, he
 never supposed that I was actuated by a more fervent attachment. My
 melancholy, my uneven spirits, he attributed to my extreme sensibility,
 and loved me the better for possessing qualities he could not
 comprehend.
 
 At the close of a summer's day, some years after, I wandered with
 careless steps over a pathless common; various anxieties had rendered the
 hours which the sun had enlightened heavy; sober evening came on; I
 wished to still "my mind, and woo lone quiet in her silent walk." The
 scene accorded with my feelings; it was wild and grand; and the spreading
 twilight had almost confounded the distant sea with the barren, blue
 hills that melted from my sight. I sat down on a rising ground; the rays
 of the departing sun illumined the horizon, but so indistinctly, that I
 anticipated their total extinction. The death of Nature led me to a still
 more interesting subject, that came home to my bosom, the death of him I
 loved. A village-bell was tolling; I listened, and thought of the moment
 when I heard his interrupted breath, and felt the agonizing fear, that
 the same sound would never more reach my ears, and that the intelligence
 glanced from my eyes, would no more be felt. The spoiler had seized his
 prey; the sun was fled, what was this world to me! I wandered to another,
 where death and darkness could not enter; I pursued the sun beyond the
 mountains, and the soul escaped from this vale of tears. My reflections
 were tinged with melancholy, but they were sublime.--I grasped a mighty
 whole, and smiled on the king of terrors; the tie which bound me to my
 friends he could not break; the same mysterious knot united me to the
 source of all goodness and happiness. I had seen the divinity reflected
 in a face I loved; I had read immortal characters displayed on a human
 countenance, and forgot myself whilst I gazed. I could not think of
 immortality, without recollecting the ecstacy I felt, when my heart first
 whispered to me that I was beloved; and again did I feel the sacred tie
 of mutual affection; fervently I prayed to the father of mercies; and
 rejoiced that he could see every turn of a heart, whose movements I could
 not perfectly understand. My passion seemed a pledge of immortality; I
 did not wish to hide it from the all-searching eye of heaven. Where
 indeed could I go from his presence? and, whilst it was dear to me,
 though darkness might reign during the night of life, joy would come when
 I awoke to life everlasting.
 
 I now turned my step towards home, when the appearance of a girl, who
 stood weeping on the common, attracted my attention. I accosted her, and
 soon heard her simple tale; that her father was gone to sea, and her
 mother sick in bed. I followed her to their little dwelling, and relieved
 the sick wretch. I then again sought my own abode; but death did not now
 haunt my fancy. Contriving to give the poor creature I had left more
 effectual relief, I reached my own garden-gate very weary, and rested on
 it.--Recollecting the turns of my mind during the walk, I exclaimed,
 Surely life may thus be enlivened by active benevolence, and the sleep of
 death, like that I am now disposed to fall into, may be sweet!
 
 My life was now unmarked by any extraordinary change, and a few days ago
 I entered this cavern; for through it every mortal must pass; and here I
 have discovered, that I neglected many opportunities of being useful,
 whilst I fostered a devouring flame. Remorse has not reached me, because
 I firmly adhered to my principles, and I have also discovered that I saw
 through a false medium. Worthy as the mortal was I adored, I should not
 long have loved him with the ardour I did, had fate united us, and broken
 the delusion the imagination so artfully wove. His virtues, as they now
 do, would have extorted my esteem; but he who formed the human soul, only
 can fill it, and the chief happiness of an immortal being must arise from
 the same source as its existence. Earthly love leads to heavenly, and
 prepares us for a more exalted state; if it does not change its nature,
 and destroy itself, by trampling on the virtue, that constitutes its
 essence, and allies us to the Deity.
 
 
 
 
 ON
 
 POETRY,
 
 AND
 
 OUR RELISH FOR THE BEAUTIES OF NATURE.
 
 
 ON
 
 POETRY, &c.
 
 
 A TASTE for rural scenes, in the present state of society, appears to be
 very often an artificial sentiment, rather inspired by poetry and
 romances, than a real perception of the beauties of nature. But, as it is
 reckoned a proof of refined taste to praise the calm pleasures which the
 country affords, the theme is never exhausted. Yet it may be made a
 question, whether this romantic kind of declamation, has much effect on
 the conduct of those, who leave, for a season, the crowded cities in
 which they were bred.
 
 I have been led to these reflections, by observing, when I have resided
 for any length of time in the country, how few people seem to contemplate
 nature with their own eyes. I have "brushed the dew away" in the morning;
 but, pacing over the printless grass, I have wondered that, in such
 delightful situations, the sun was allowed to rise in solitary majesty,
 whilst my eyes alone hailed its beautifying beams. The webs of the
 evening have still been spread across the hedged path, unless some
 labouring man, trudging to work, disturbed the fairy structure; yet, in
 spite of this supineness, when I joined the social circle, every tongue
 rang changes on the pleasures of the country.
 
 Having frequently had occasion to make the same observation, I was led to
 endeavour, in one of my solitary rambles, to trace the cause, and
 likewise to enquire why the poetry written in the infancy of society, is
 most natural: which, strictly speaking (for _natural_ is a very
 indefinite expression) is merely to say, that it is the transcript of
 immediate sensations, in all their native wildness and simplicity, when
 fancy, awakened by the sight of interesting objects, was most actively at
 work. At such moments, sensibility quickly furnishes similes, and the
 sublimated spirits combine images, which rising spontaneously, it is not
 necessary coldly to ransack the understanding or memory, till the
 laborious efforts of judgment exclude present sensations, and damp the
 fire of enthusiasm.
 
 The effusions of a vigorous mind, will ever tell us how far the
 understanding has been enlarged by thought, and stored with knowledge.
 The richness of the soil even appears on the surface; and the result of
 profound thinking, often mixing, with playful grace, in the reveries of
 the poet, smoothly incorporates with the ebullitions of animal spirits,
 when the finely fashioned nerve vibrates acutely with rapture, or when,
 relaxed by soft melancholy, a pleasing languor prompts the long-drawn
 sigh, and feeds the slowly falling tear.
 
 The poet, the man of strong feelings, gives us only an image of his mind,
 when he was actually alone, conversing with himself, and marking the
 impression which nature had made on his own heart.--If, at this sacred
 moment, the idea of some departed friend, some tender recollection when
 the soul was most alive to tenderness, intruded unawares into his
 thoughts, the sorrow which it produced is artlessly, yet poetically
 expressed--and who can avoid sympathizing?
 
 Love to man leads to devotion--grand and sublime images strike the
 imagination--God is seen in every floating cloud, and comes from the
 misty mountain to receive the noblest homage of an intelligent
 creature--praise. How solemn is the moment, when all affections and
 remembrances fade before the sublime admiration which the wisdom and
 goodness of God inspires, when he is worshipped in a _temple not made
 with hands_, and the world seems to contain only the mind that formed,
 and the mind that contemplates it! These are not the weak responses of
 ceremonial devotion; nor, to express them, would the poet need another
 poet's aid: his heart burns within him, and he speaks the language of
 truth and nature with resistless energy.
 
 Inequalities, of course, are observable in his effusions; and a less
 vigorous fancy, with more taste, would have produced more elegance and
 uniformity; but, as passages are softened or expunged during the cooler
 moments of reflection, the understanding is gratified at the expence of
 those involuntary sensations, which, like the beauteous tints of an
 evening sky, are so evanescent, that they melt into new forms before they
 can be analyzed. For however eloquently we may boast of our reason, man
 must often be delighted he cannot tell why, or his blunt feelings are not
 made to relish the beauties which nature, poetry, or any of the imitative
 arts, afford.
 
 The imagery of the ancients seems naturally to have been borrowed from
 surrounding objects and their mythology. When a hero is to be transported
 from one place to another, across pathless wastes, is any vehicle so
 natural, as one of the fleecy clouds on which the poet has often gazed,
 scarcely conscious that he wished to make it his chariot? Again, when
 nature seems to present obstacles to his progress at almost every step,
 when the tangled forest and steep mountain stand as barriers, to pass
 over which the mind longs for supernatural aid; an interposing deity, who
 walks on the waves, and rules the storm, severely felt in the first
 attempts to cultivate a country, will receive from the impassioned fancy
 "a local habitation and a name."
 
 It would be a philosophical enquiry, and throw some light on the history
 of the human mind, to trace, as far as our information will allow us to
 trace, the spontaneous feelings and ideas which have produced the images
 that now frequently appear unnatural, because they are remote; and
 disgusting, because they have been servilely copied by poets, whose
 habits of thinking, and views of nature must have been different; for,
 though the understanding seldom disturbs the current of our present
 feelings, without dissipating the gay clouds which fancy has been
 embracing, yet it silently gives the colour to the whole tenour of them,
 and the dream is over, when truth is grossly violated, or images
 introduced, selected from books, and not from local manners or popular
 prejudices.
 
 In a more advanced state of civilization, a poet is rather the creature
 of art, than of nature. The books that he reads in his youth, become a
 hot-bed in which artificial fruits are produced, beautiful to the common
 eye, though they want the true hue and flavour. His images do not arise
 from sensations; they are copies; and, like the works of the painters who
 copy ancient statues when they draw men and women of their own times, we
 acknowledge that the features are fine, and the proportions just; yet
 they are men of stone; insipid figures, that never convey to the mind the
 idea of a portrait taken from life, where the soul gives spirit and
 homogeneity to the whole. The silken wings of fancy are shrivelled by
 rules; and a desire of attaining elegance of diction, occasions an
 attention to words, incompatible with sublime, impassioned thoughts.
 
 A boy of abilities, who has been taught the structure of verse at school,
 and been roused by emulation to compose rhymes whilst he was reading
 works of genius, may, by practice, produce pretty verses, and even become
 what is often termed an elegant poet: yet his readers, without knowing
 what to find fault with, do not find themselves warmly interested. In the
 works of the poets who fasten on their affections, they see grosser
 faults, and the very images which shock their taste in the modern; still
 they do not appear as puerile or extrinsic in one as the
 other.--Why?--because they did not appear so to the author.
 
 It may sound paradoxical, after observing that those productions want
 vigour, that are merely the work of imitation, in which the understanding
 has violently directed, if not extinguished, the blaze of fancy, to
 assert, that, though genius be only another word for exquisite
 sensibility, the first observers of nature, the true poets, exercised
 their understanding much more than their imitators. But they exercised it
 to discriminate things, whilst their followers were busy to borrow
 sentiments and arrange words.
 
 Boys who have received a classical education, load their memory with
 words, and the correspondent ideas are perhaps never distinctly
 comprehended. As a proof of this assertion, I must observe, that I have
 known many young people who could write tolerably smooth verses, and
 string epithets prettily together, when their prose themes showed the
 barrenness of their minds, and how superficial the cultivation must have
 been, which their understanding had received.
 
 Dr. Johnson, I know, has given a definition of genius, which would
 overturn my reasoning, if I were to admit it.--He imagines, that _a
 strong mind, accidentally led to some particular study_ in which it
 excels, is a genius.--Not to stop to investigate the causes which
 produced this happy _strength_ of mind, experience seems to prove, that
 those minds have appeared most vigorous, that have pursued a study, after
 nature had discovered a bent; for it would be absurd to suppose, that a
 slight impression made on the weak faculties of a boy, is the fiat of
 fate, and not to be effaced by any succeeding impression, or unexpected
 difficulty. Dr. Johnson in fact, appears sometimes to be of the same
 opinion (how consistently I shall not now enquire), especially when he
 observes, "that Thomson looked on nature with the eye which she only
 gives to a poet."
 
 But, though it should be allowed that books may produce some poets, I
 fear they will never be the poets who charm our cares to sleep, or extort
 admiration. They may diffuse taste, and polish the language; but I am
 inclined to conclude that they will seldom rouse the passions, or amend
 the heart.
 
 And, to return to the first subject of discussion, the reason why most
 people are more interested by a scene described by a poet, than by a
 view of nature, probably arises from the want of a lively imagination.
 The poet contracts the prospect, and, selecting the most picturesque part
 in his _camera_, the judgment is directed, and the whole force of the
 languid faculty turned towards the objects which excited the most
 forcible emotions in the poet's heart; the reader consequently feels the
 enlivened description, though he was not able to receive a first
 impression from the operations of his own mind.
 
 Besides, it may be further observed, that gross minds are only to be
 moved by forcible representations. To rouse the thoughtless, objects must
 be presented, calculated to produce tumultuous emotions; the
 unsubstantial, picturesque forms which a contemplative man gazes on, and
 often follows with ardour till he is mocked by a glimpse of unattainable
 excellence, appear to them the light vapours of a dreaming enthusiast,
 who gives up the substance for the shadow. It is not within that they
 seek amusement; their eyes are seldom turned on themselves; consequently
 their emotions, though sometimes fervid, are always transient, and the
 nicer perceptions which distinguish the man of genuine taste, are not
 felt, or make such a slight impression as scarcely to excite any
 pleasurable sensations. Is it surprising then that they are often
 overlooked, even by those who are delighted by the same images
 concentrated by the poet?
 
 But even this numerous class is exceeded, by witlings, who, anxious to
 appear to have wit and taste, do not allow their understandings or
 feelings any liberty; for, instead of cultivating their faculties and
 reflecting on their operations, they are busy collecting prejudices; and
 are predetermined to admire what the suffrage of time announces as
 excellent, not to store up a fund of amusement for themselves, but to
 enable them to talk.
 
 These hints will assist the reader to trace some of the causes why the
 beauties of nature are not forcibly felt, when civilization, or rather
 luxury, has made considerable advances--those calm sensations are not
 sufficiently lively to serve as a relaxation to the voluptuary, or even
 to the moderate pursuer of artificial pleasures. In the present state of
 society, the understanding must bring back the feelings to nature, or the
 sensibility must have such native strength, as rather to be whetted than
 destroyed by the strong exercises of passion.
 
 That the most valuable things are liable to the greatest perversion, is
 however as trite as true:--for the same sensibility, or quickness of
 senses, which makes a man relish the tranquil scenes of nature, when
 sensation, rather than reason, imparts delight, frequently makes a
 libertine of him, by leading him to prefer the sensual tumult of love a
 little refined by sentiment, to the calm pleasures of affectionate
 friendship, in whose sober satisfactions, reason, mixing her
 tranquillizing convictions, whispers, that content, not happiness, is the
 reward of virtue in this world.
 
 
 
 
 HINTS.
 
 [_Chiefly designed to have been incorporated in the Second Part of the_
 Vindication of the Rights of Woman.]
 
 
 HINTS.
 
 
 1.
 
 INDOLENCE is the source of nervous complaints, and a whole host of cares.
 This devil might say that his name was legion.
 
 
 2.
 
 It should be one of the employments of women of fortune, to visit
 hospitals, and superintend the conduct of inferiors.
 
 
 3.
 
 It is generally supposed, that the imagination of women is particularly
 active, and leads them astray. Why then do we seek by education only to
 exercise their imagination and feeling, till the understanding, grown
 rigid by disuse, is unable to exercise itself--and the superfluous
 nourishment the imagination and feeling have received, renders the former
 romantic, and the latter weak?
 
 
 4.
 
 Few men have risen to any great eminence in learning, who have not
 received something like a regular education. Why are women expected to
 surmount difficulties that men are not equal to?
 
 
 5.
 
 Nothing can be more absurd than the ridicule of the critic, that the
 heroine of his mock-tragedy was in love with the very man whom she ought
 least to have loved; he could not have given a better reason. How can
 passion gain strength any other way? In Otaheite, love cannot be known,
 where the obstacles to irritate an indiscriminate appetite, and sublimate
 the simple sensations of desire till they mount to passion, are never
 known. There a man or woman cannot love the very person they ought not to
 have loved--nor does jealousy ever fan the flame.
 
 
 6.
 
 It has frequently been observed, that, when women have an object in view,
 they pursue it with more steadiness than men, particularly love. This is
 not a compliment. Passion pursues with more heat than reason, and with
 most ardour during the absence of reason.
 
 
 7.
 
 Men are more subject to the physical love than women. The confined
 education of women makes them more subject to jealousy.
 
 
 8.
 
 Simplicity seems, in general, the consequence of ignorance, as I have
 observed in the characters of women and sailors--the being confined to
 one track of impressions.
 
 
 9.
 
 I know of no other way of preserving the chastity of mankind, than that
 of rendering women rather objects of love than desire. The difference is
 great. Yet, while women are encouraged to ornament their persons at the
 expence of their minds, while indolence renders them helpless and
 lascivious (for what other name can be given to the common intercourse
 between the sexes?) they will be, generally speaking, only objects of
 desire; and, to such women, men cannot be constant. Men, accustomed only
 to have their senses moved, merely seek for a selfish gratification in
 the society of women, and their sexual instinct, being neither supported
 by the understanding nor the heart, must be excited by variety.
 
 
 10.
 
 We ought to respect old opinions; though prejudices, blindly adopted,
 lead to error, and preclude all exercise of the reason.
 
 The emulation which often makes a boy mischievous, is a generous spur;
 and the old remark, that unlucky, turbulent boys, make the wisest and
 best men, is true, spite of Mr. Knox's arguments. It has been observed,
 that the most adventurous horses, when tamed or domesticated, are the
 most mild and tractable.
 
 
 11.
 
 The children who start up suddenly at twelve or fourteen, and fall into
 decays, in consequence, as it is termed, of outgrowing their strength,
 are in general, I believe, those children, who have been bred up with
 mistaken tenderness, and not allowed to sport and take exercise in the
 open air. This is analogous to plants: for it is found that they run up
 sickly, long stalks, when confined.
 
 
 12.
 
 Children should be taught to feel deference, not to practise submission.
 
 
 13.
 
 It is always a proof of false refinement, when a fastidious taste
 overpowers sympathy.
 
 
 14.
 
 Lust appears to be the most natural companion of wild ambition; and love
 of human praise, of that dominion erected by cunning.
 
 
 15.
 
 "Genius decays as judgment increases." Of course, those who have the
 least genius, have the earliest appearance of wisdom.
 
 
 16.
 
 A knowledge of the fine arts, is seldom subservient to the promotion of
 either religion or virtue. Elegance is often indecency; witness our
 prints.
 
 
 17.
 
 There does not appear to be any evil in the world, but what is necessary.
 The doctrine of rewards and punishments, not considered as a means of
 reformation, appears to me an infamous libel on divine goodness.
 
 
 18.
 
 Whether virtue is founded on reason or revelation, virtue is wisdom, and
 vice is folly. Why are positive punishments?
 
 
 19.
 
 Few can walk alone. The staff of Christianity is the necessary support of
 human weakness. But an acquaintance with the nature of man and virtue,
 with just sentiments on the attributes, would be sufficient, without a
 voice from heaven, to lead some to virtue, but not the mob.
 
 
 20.
 
 I only expect the natural reward of virtue, whatever it may be. I rely
 not on a positive reward.
 
 The justice of God can be vindicated by a belief in a future state--but
 a continuation of being vindicates it as clearly, as the positive system
 of rewards and punishments--by evil educing good for the individual, and
 not for an imaginary whole. The happiness of the whole must arise from
 the happiness of the constituent parts, or this world is not a state of
 trial, but a school.
 
 
 21.
 
 The vices acquired by Augustus to retain his power, must have tainted his
 soul, and prevented that increase of happiness a good man expects in the
 next stage of existence. This was a natural punishment.
 
 
 22.
 
 The lover is ever most deeply enamoured, when it is with he knows not
 what--and the devotion of a mystic has a rude Gothic grandeur in it,
 which the respectful adoration of a philosopher will never reach. I may
 be thought fanciful; but it has continually occurred to me, that, though,
 I allow, reason in this world is the mother of wisdom--yet some flights
 of the imagination seem to reach what wisdom cannot teach--and, while
 they delude us here, afford a glorious hope, if not a foretaste, of what
 we may expect hereafter. He that created us, did not mean to mark us with
 ideal images of grandeur, the _baseless fabric of a vision_--No--that
 perfection we follow with hopeless ardour when the whisperings of reason
 are heard, may be found, when not incompatible with our state, in the
 round of eternity. Perfection indeed must, even then, be a comparative
 idea--but the wisdom, the happiness of a superior state, has been
 supposed to be intuitive, and the happiest effusions of human genius have
 seemed like inspiration--the deductions of reason destroy sublimity.
 
 
 23.
 
 I am more and more convinced, that poetry is the first effervescence of
 the imagination, and the forerunner of civilization.
 
 
 24.
 
 When the Arabs had no trace of literature or science, they composed
 beautiful verses on the subjects of love and war. The flights of the
 imagination, and the laboured deductions of reason, appear almost
 incompatible.
 
 
 25.
 
 Poetry certainly flourishes most in the first rude state of society. The
 passions speak most eloquently, when they are not shackled by reason.
 The sublime expression, which has been so often quoted, [Genesis, ch. 1,
 ver. 3.] is perhaps a barbarous flight; or rather the grand conception of
 an uncultivated mind; for it is contrary to nature and experience, to
 suppose that this account is founded on facts--It is doubtless a sublime
 allegory. But a cultivated mind would not thus have described the
 creation--for, arguing from analogy, it appears that creation must have
 been a comprehensive plan, and that the Supreme Being always uses second
 causes, slowly and silently to fulfil his purpose. This is, in reality, a
 more sublime view of that power which wisdom supports: but it is not the
 sublimity that would strike the impassioned mind, in which the
 imagination took place of intellect. Tell a being, whose affections and
 passions have been more exercised than his reason, that God said, _Let
 there be light! and there was light_; and he would prostrate himself
 before the Being who could thus call things out of nothing, as if they
 were: but a man in whom reason had taken place of passion, would not
 adore, till wisdom was conspicuous as well as power, for his admiration
 must be founded on principle.
 
 
 26.
 
 Individuality is ever conspicuous in those enthusiastic flights of fancy,
 in which reason is left behind, without being lost sight of.
 
 
 27.
 
 The mind has been too often brought to the test of enquiries which only
 reach to matter--put into the crucible, though the magnetic and electric
 fluid escapes from the experimental philosopher.
 
 
 28.
 
 Mr. Kant has observed, that the understanding is sublime, the imagination
 beautiful--yet it is evident, that poets, and men who undoubtedly possess
 the liveliest imagination, are most touched by the sublime, while men who
 have cold, enquiring minds, have not this exquisite feeling in any great
 degree, and indeed seem to lose it as they cultivate their reason.
 
 
 29.
 
 The Grecian buildings are graceful--they fill the mind with all those
 pleasing emotions, which elegance and beauty never fail to excite in a
 cultivated mind--utility and grace strike us in unison--the mind is
 satisfied--things appear just what they ought to be: a calm satisfaction
 is felt, but the imagination has nothing to do--no obscurity darkens the
 gloom--like reasonable content, we can say why we are pleased--and this
 kind of pleasure may be lasting, but it is never great.
 
 
 30.
 
 When we say that a person is an original, it is only to say in other
 words that he thinks. "The less a man has cultivated his rational
 faculties, the more powerful is the principle of imitation, over his
 actions, and his habits of thinking. Most women, of course, are more
 influenced by the behaviour, the fashions, and the opinions of those with
 whom they associate, than men." (Smellie.)
 
 When we read a book which supports our favourite opinions, how eagerly do
 we suck in the doctrines, and suffer our minds placidly to reflect the
 images which illustrate the tenets we have embraced? We indolently or
 quietly acquiesce in the conclusion, and our spirit animates and connects
 the various subjects. But, on the contrary, when we peruse a skilful
 writer, who does not coincide in opinion with us, how is the mind on the
 watch to detect fallacy? And this coolness often prevents our being
 carried away by a stream of eloquence, which the prejudiced mind terms
 declamation--a pomp of words.--We never allow ourselves to be warmed;
 and, after contending with the writer, are more confirmed in our own
 opinion, as much perhaps from a spirit of contradiction as from
 reason.--Such is the strength of man!
 
 
 31.
 
 It is the individual manner of seeing and feeling, pourtrayed by a strong
 imagination in bold images that have struck the senses, which creates
 all the charms of poetry. A great reader is always quoting the
 description of another's emotions; a strong imagination delights to paint
 its own. A writer of genius makes us feel; an inferior author reason.
 
 
 32.
 
 Some principle prior to self-love must have existed: the feeling which
 produced the pleasure, must have existed before the experience.
 
 
 THE END.
 
 
 Transcriber's Notes:
 
 1. Obvious punctuation errors repaired.
 
 2. This text contains blank space and lines of "--" and "*" characters.
 These are replicated from the printed pages, presumably they indicate
 censored text from the original source.
 
 3. The listed errata at the beginning of Volume 1 and Volume 4 have been
 applied to the text.
 
 4. The text as printed used incipits and 'long s' font. The incipits have
 not been replicated in this version, but can be viewed on 'long s' HTML
 version of the text or the page images linked from the HTML versions.
 
 5. Corrections:
 Volume 1, Page 33, "accuteness" changed to "acuteness"
 Volume 1, Page 51, "unfortutunate" changed to "unfortunate"
 Volume 1, Page 57, "resource" changed to "recourse"
 Volume 1, Page 90, "hunted" changed to "shunted"
 Volume 1, Page 103, "carreer" changed to "career"
 Volume 1, Page 161, "plased" changed to "pleased"
 Volume 2, Page 116, "and and" changed to "and"
 Volume 3, Page 35, "a r" changed to "air"
 Volume 3, Page 81, "he he" changed to "he"
 Volume 3, Page 120, "explananations" changed to "explanations"
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Judith Boss and David Widger
 
 
 
 
 
 MARIA
 
 or
 
 The Wrongs of Woman
 
 
 by MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT
 
 (1759-1797)
 
 After the edition of 1798
 
 
      ============================================================
      Original Etext Editor's Note:
 
      In editing the electronic text I have put footnotes at the
      bottom of the paragraph to which they refer.  This sometimes
      means that I have moved the text of the footnote to maintain
      proximity to the text to which it refers.
 
      Spellings as in the original are retained; only obvious
      typographical errors have been corrected.
      =============================================================
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 Preface by William S. Godwin
 
 Author's Preface
 
 Maria
 
 
 
 
 MARIA
 
 or
 
 The Wrongs of Woman
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 THE PUBLIC are here presented with the last literary attempt of an
 author, whose fame has been uncommonly extensive, and whose talents have
 probably been most admired, by the persons by whom talents are estimated
 with the greatest accuracy and discrimination. There are few, to whom
 her writings could in any case have given pleasure, that would have
 wished that this fragment should have been suppressed, because it is
 a fragment. There is a sentiment, very dear to minds of taste and
 imagination, that finds a melancholy delight in contemplating these
 unfinished productions of genius, these sketches of what, if they had
 been filled up in a manner adequate to the writer's conception, would
 perhaps have given a new impulse to the manners of a world.
 
 The purpose and structure of the following work, had long formed a
 favourite subject of meditation with its author, and she judged them
 capable of producing an important effect. The composition had been in
 progress for a period of twelve months. She was anxious to do justice
 to her conception, and recommenced and revised the manuscript several
 different times. So much of it as is here given to the public, she was
 far from considering as finished, and, in a letter to a friend directly
 written on this subject, she says, "I am perfectly aware that some of
 the incidents ought to be transposed, and heightened by more harmonious
 shading; and I wished in some degree to avail myself of criticism,
 before I began to adjust my events into a story, the outline of which
 I had sketched in my mind."* The only friends to whom the author
 communicated her manuscript, were Mr. Dyson, the translator of the
 Sorcerer, and the present editor; and it was impossible for the most
 inexperienced author to display a stronger desire of profiting by the
 censures and sentiments that might be suggested.**
 
      * A more copious extract of this letter is subjoined to the
      author's preface.
 
      ** The part communicated consisted of the first fourteen
      chapters.
 
 In revising these sheets for the press, it was necessary for the editor,
 in some places, to connect the more finished parts with the pages of an
 older copy, and a line or two in addition sometimes appeared requisite
 for that purpose. Wherever such a liberty has been taken, the additional
 phrases will be found inclosed in brackets; it being the editor's most
 earnest desire to intrude nothing of himself into the work, but to give
 to the public the words, as well as ideas, of the real author.
 
 What follows in the ensuing pages, is not a preface regularly drawn
 out by the author, but merely hints for a preface, which, though never
 filled up in the manner the writer intended, appeared to be worth
 preserving.
 
 W. GODWIN.
 
 
 
 
 AUTHOR'S PREFACE
 
 THE WRONGS OF WOMAN, like the wrongs of the oppressed part of mankind,
 may be deemed necessary by their oppressors: but surely there are a few,
 who will dare to advance before the improvement of the age, and grant
 that my sketches are not the abortion of a distempered fancy, or the
 strong delineations of a wounded heart.
 
 In writing this novel, I have rather endeavoured to pourtray passions
 than manners.
 
 In many instances I could have made the incidents more dramatic, would I
 have sacrificed my main object, the desire of exhibiting the misery and
 oppression, peculiar to women, that arise out of the partial laws and
 customs of society.
 
 In the invention of the story, this view restrained my fancy; and
 the history ought rather to be considered, as of woman, than of an
 individual.
 
 The sentiments I have embodied.
 
 In many works of this species, the hero is allowed to be mortal, and
 to become wise and virtuous as well as happy, by a train of events and
 circumstances. The heroines, on the contrary, are to be born immaculate,
 and to act like goddesses of wisdom, just come forth highly finished
 Minervas from the head of Jove.
 
 [The following is an extract of a letter from the author to a friend, to
 whom she communicated her manuscript.]
 
 For my part, I cannot suppose any situation more distressing, than for a
 woman of sensibility, with an improving mind, to be bound to such a man
 as I have described for life; obliged to renounce all the humanizing
 affections, and to avoid cultivating her taste, lest her perception of
 grace and refinement of sentiment, should sharpen to agony the pangs of
 disappointment. Love, in which the imagination mingles its bewitching
 colouring, must be fostered by delicacy. I should despise, or rather
 call her an ordinary woman, who could endure such a husband as I have
 sketched.
 
 These appear to me (matrimonial despotism of heart and conduct) to be
 the peculiar Wrongs of Woman, because they degrade the mind. What are
 termed great misfortunes, may more forcibly impress the mind of common
 readers; they have more of what may justly be termed stage-effect;
 but it is the delineation of finer sensations, which, in my opinion,
 constitutes the merit of our best novels. This is what I have in
 view; and to show the wrongs of different classes of women, equally
 oppressive, though, from the difference of education, necessarily
 various.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 1
 
 
 ABODES OF HORROR have frequently been described, and castles, filled
 with spectres and chimeras, conjured up by the magic spell of genius
 to harrow the soul, and absorb the wondering mind. But, formed of such
 stuff as dreams are made of, what were they to the mansion of despair,
 in one corner of which Maria sat, endeavouring to recall her scattered
 thoughts!
 
 Surprise, astonishment, that bordered on distraction, seemed to have
 suspended her faculties, till, waking by degrees to a keen sense of
 anguish, a whirlwind of rage and indignation roused her torpid pulse.
 One recollection with frightful velocity following another, threatened
 to fire her brain, and make her a fit companion for the terrific
 inhabitants, whose groans and shrieks were no unsubstantial sounds of
 whistling winds, or startled birds, modulated by a romantic fancy, which
 amuse while they affright; but such tones of misery as carry a dreadful
 certainty directly to the heart. What effect must they then have
 produced on one, true to the touch of sympathy, and tortured by maternal
 apprehension!
 
 Her infant's image was continually floating on Maria's sight, and the
 first smile of intelligence remembered, as none but a mother, an unhappy
 mother, can conceive. She heard her half speaking half cooing, and felt
 the little twinkling fingers on her burning bosom--a bosom bursting
 with the nutriment for which this cherished child might now be pining
 in vain. From a stranger she could indeed receive the maternal aliment,
 Maria was grieved at the thought--but who would watch her with a
 mother's tenderness, a mother's self-denial?
 
 The retreating shadows of former sorrows rushed back in a gloomy train,
 and seemed to be pictured on the walls of her prison, magnified by
 the state of mind in which they were viewed--Still she mourned for her
 child, lamented she was a daughter, and anticipated the aggravated ills
 of life that her sex rendered almost inevitable, even while dreading she
 was no more. To think that she was blotted out of existence was agony,
 when the imagination had been long employed to expand her faculties;
 yet to suppose her turned adrift on an unknown sea, was scarcely less
 afflicting.
 
 After being two days the prey of impetuous, varying emotions, Maria
 began to reflect more calmly on her present situation, for she had
 actually been rendered incapable of sober reflection, by the discovery
 of the act of atrocity of which she was the victim. She could not
 have imagined, that, in all the fermentation of civilized depravity, a
 similar plot could have entered a human mind. She had been stunned by
 an unexpected blow; yet life, however joyless, was not to be indolently
 resigned, or misery endured without exertion, and proudly termed
 patience. She had hitherto meditated only to point the dart of anguish,
 and suppressed the heart heavings of indignant nature merely by the
 force of contempt. Now she endeavoured to brace her mind to fortitude,
 and to ask herself what was to be her employment in her dreary cell? Was
 it not to effect her escape, to fly to the succour of her child, and to
 baffle the selfish schemes of her tyrant--her husband?
 
 These thoughts roused her sleeping spirit, and the self-possession
 returned, that seemed to have abandoned her in the infernal solitude
 into which she had been precipitated. The first emotions of overwhelming
 impatience began to subside, and resentment gave place to tenderness,
 and more tranquil meditation; though anger once more stopt the calm
 current of reflection when she attempted to move her manacled arms. But
 this was an outrage that could only excite momentary feelings of scorn,
 which evaporated in a faint smile; for Maria was far from thinking
 a personal insult the most difficult to endure with magnanimous
 indifference.
 
 She approached the small grated window of her chamber, and for a
 considerable time only regarded the blue expanse; though it commanded
 a view of a desolate garden, and of part of a huge pile of buildings,
 that, after having been suffered, for half a century, to fall to decay,
 had undergone some clumsy repairs, merely to render it habitable. The
 ivy had been torn off the turrets, and the stones not wanted to patch up
 the breaches of time, and exclude the warring elements, left in heaps
 in the disordered court. Maria contemplated this scene she knew not how
 long; or rather gazed on the walls, and pondered on her situation.
 To the master of this most horrid of prisons, she had, soon after her
 entrance, raved of injustice, in accents that would have justified his
 treatment, had not a malignant smile, when she appealed to his judgment,
 with a dreadful conviction stifled her remonstrating complaints. By
 force, or openly, what could be done? But surely some expedient might
 occur to an active mind, without any other employment, and possessed of
 sufficient resolution to put the risk of life into the balance with the
 chance of freedom.
 
 A woman entered in the midst of these reflections, with a firm,
 deliberate step, strongly marked features, and large black eyes, which
 she fixed steadily on Maria's, as if she designed to intimidate her,
 saying at the same time "You had better sit down and eat your dinner,
 than look at the clouds."
 
 "I have no appetite," replied Maria, who had previously determined to
 speak mildly; "why then should I eat?"
 
 "But, in spite of that, you must and shall eat something. I have had
 many ladies under my care, who have resolved to starve themselves;
 but, soon or late, they gave up their intent, as they recovered their
 senses."
 
 "Do you really think me mad?" asked Maria, meeting the searching glance
 of her eye.
 
 "Not just now. But what does that prove?--Only that you must be the more
 carefully watched, for appearing at times so reasonable. You have
 not touched a morsel since you entered the house."--Maria sighed
 intelligibly.--"Could any thing but madness produce such a disgust for
 food?"
 
 "Yes, grief; you would not ask the question if you knew what it was."
 The attendant shook her head; and a ghastly smile of desperate fortitude
 served as a forcible reply, and made Maria pause, before she added--"Yet
 I will take some refreshment: I mean not to die.--No; I will preserve
 my senses; and convince even you, sooner than you are aware of, that my
 intellects have never been disturbed, though the exertion of them may
 have been suspended by some infernal drug."
 
 Doubt gathered still thicker on the brow of her guard, as she attempted
 to convict her of mistake.
 
 "Have patience!" exclaimed Maria, with a solemnity that inspired awe.
 "My God! how have I been schooled into the practice!" A suffocation of
 voice betrayed the agonizing emotions she was labouring to keep down;
 and conquering a qualm of disgust, she calmly endeavoured to eat enough
 to prove her docility, perpetually turning to the suspicious female,
 whose observation she courted, while she was making the bed and
 adjusting the room.
 
 "Come to me often," said Maria, with a tone of persuasion, in
 consequence of a vague plan that she had hastily adopted, when, after
 surveying this woman's form and features, she felt convinced that she
 had an understanding above the common standard, "and believe me mad,
 till you are obliged to acknowledge the contrary." The woman was no
 fool, that is, she was superior to her class; nor had misery quite
 petrified the life's-blood of humanity, to which reflections on our own
 misfortunes only give a more orderly course. The manner, rather than the
 expostulations, of Maria made a slight suspicion dart into her mind with
 corresponding sympathy, which various other avocations, and the habit
 of banishing compunction, prevented her, for the present, from examining
 more minutely.
 
 But when she was told that no person, excepting the physician appointed
 by her family, was to be permitted to see the lady at the end of the
 gallery, she opened her keen eyes still wider, and uttered a--"hem!"
 before she enquired--"Why?" She was briefly told, in reply, that the
 malady was hereditary, and the fits not occurring but at very long and
 irregular intervals, she must be carefully watched; for the length
 of these lucid periods only rendered her more mischievous, when any
 vexation or caprice brought on the paroxysm of phrensy.
 
 Had her master trusted her, it is probable that neither pity nor
 curiosity would have made her swerve from the straight line of her
 interest; for she had suffered too much in her intercourse with
 mankind, not to determine to look for support, rather to humouring
 their passions, than courting their approbation by the integrity of her
 conduct. A deadly blight had met her at the very threshold of existence;
 and the wretchedness of her mother seemed a heavy weight fastened on her
 innocent neck, to drag her down to perdition. She could not heroically
 determine to succour an unfortunate; but, offended at the bare
 supposition that she could be deceived with the same ease as a common
 servant, she no longer curbed her curiosity; and, though she never
 seriously fathomed her own intentions, she would sit, every moment she
 could steal from observation, listening to the tale, which Maria was
 eager to relate with all the persuasive eloquence of grief.
 
 It is so cheering to see a human face, even if little of the divinity
 of virtue beam in it, that Maria anxiously expected the return of
 the attendant, as of a gleam of light to break the gloom of idleness.
 Indulged sorrow, she perceived, must blunt or sharpen the faculties to
 the two opposite extremes; producing stupidity, the moping melancholy of
 indolence; or the restless activity of a disturbed imagination. She
 sunk into one state, after being fatigued by the other: till the want
 of occupation became even more painful than the actual pressure or
 apprehension of sorrow; and the confinement that froze her into a
 nook of existence, with an unvaried prospect before her, the most
 insupportable of evils. The lamp of life seemed to be spending itself
 to chase the vapours of a dungeon which no art could dissipate.--And
 to what purpose did she rally all her energy?--Was not the world a vast
 prison, and women born slaves?
 
 Though she failed immediately to rouse a lively sense of injustice
 in the mind of her guard, because it had been sophisticated into
 misanthropy, she touched her heart. Jemima (she had only a claim to a
 Christian name, which had not procured her any Christian privileges)
 could patiently hear of Maria's confinement on false pretences; she had
 felt the crushing hand of power, hardened by the exercise of injustice,
 and ceased to wonder at the perversions of the understanding, which
 systematize oppression; but, when told that her child, only four
 months old, had been torn from her, even while she was discharging the
 tenderest maternal office, the woman awoke in a bosom long estranged
 from feminine emotions, and Jemima determined to alleviate all in her
 power, without hazarding the loss of her place, the sufferings of a
 wretched mother, apparently injured, and certainly unhappy. A sense of
 right seems to result from the simplest act of reason, and to preside
 over the faculties of the mind, like the master-sense of feeling, to
 rectify the rest; but (for the comparison may be carried still farther)
 how often is the exquisite sensibility of both weakened or destroyed by
 the vulgar occupations, and ignoble pleasures of life?
 
 The preserving her situation was, indeed, an important object to Jemima,
 who had been hunted from hole to hole, as if she had been a beast of
 prey, or infected with a moral plague. The wages she received, the
 greater part of which she hoarded, as her only chance for independence,
 were much more considerable than she could reckon on obtaining any
 where else, were it possible that she, an outcast from society, could
 be permitted to earn a subsistence in a reputable family. Hearing Maria
 perpetually complain of listlessness, and the not being able to beguile
 grief by resuming her customary pursuits, she was easily prevailed on,
 by compassion, and that involuntary respect for abilities, which those
 who possess them can never eradicate, to bring her some books and
 implements for writing. Maria's conversation had amused and interested
 her, and the natural consequence was a desire, scarcely observed
 by herself, of obtaining the esteem of a person she admired. The
 remembrance of better days was rendered more lively; and the sentiments
 then acquired appearing less romantic than they had for a long period, a
 spark of hope roused her mind to new activity.
 
 How grateful was her attention to Maria! Oppressed by a dead weight of
 existence, or preyed on by the gnawing worm of discontent, with what
 eagerness did she endeavour to shorten the long days, which left no
 traces behind! She seemed to be sailing on the vast ocean of life,
 without seeing any land-mark to indicate the progress of time; to find
 employment was then to find variety, the animating principle of nature.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 2
 
 
 EARNESTLY as Maria endeavoured to soothe, by reading, the anguish of her
 wounded mind, her thoughts would often wander from the subject she was
 led to discuss, and tears of maternal tenderness obscured the reasoning
 page. She descanted on "the ills which flesh is heir to," with
 bitterness, when the recollection of her babe was revived by a tale
 of fictitious woe, that bore any resemblance to her own; and her
 imagination was continually employed, to conjure up and embody the
 various phantoms of misery, which folly and vice had let loose on the
 world. The loss of her babe was the tender string; against other cruel
 remembrances she laboured to steel her bosom; and even a ray of hope,
 in the midst of her gloomy reveries, would sometimes gleam on the dark
 horizon of futurity, while persuading herself that she ought to cease
 to hope, since happiness was no where to be found.--But of her child,
 debilitated by the grief with which its mother had been assailed before
 it saw the light, she could not think without an impatient struggle.
 
 "I, alone, by my active tenderness, could have saved," she would
 exclaim, "from an early blight, this sweet blossom; and, cherishing it,
 I should have had something still to love."
 
 In proportion as other expectations were torn from her, this tender one
 had been fondly clung to, and knit into her heart.
 
 The books she had obtained, were soon devoured, by one who had no
 other resource to escape from sorrow, and the feverish dreams of
 ideal wretchedness or felicity, which equally weaken the intoxicated
 sensibility. Writing was then the only alternative, and she wrote some
 rhapsodies descriptive of the state of her mind; but the events of her
 past life pressing on her, she resolved circumstantially to relate them,
 with the sentiments that experience, and more matured reason, would
 naturally suggest. They might perhaps instruct her daughter, and shield
 her from the misery, the tyranny, her mother knew not how to avoid.
 
 This thought gave life to her diction, her soul flowed into it, and she
 soon found the task of recollecting almost obliterated impressions
 very interesting. She lived again in the revived emotions of youth,
 and forgot her present in the retrospect of sorrows that had assumed an
 unalterable character.
 
 Though this employment lightened the weight of time, yet, never losing
 sight of her main object, Maria did not allow any opportunity to slip
 of winning on the affections of Jemima; for she discovered in her a
 strength of mind, that excited her esteem, clouded as it was by the
 misanthropy of despair.
 
 An insulated being, from the misfortune of her birth, she despised and
 preyed on the society by which she had been oppressed, and loved not her
 fellow-creatures, because she had never been beloved. No mother had ever
 fondled her, no father or brother had protected her from outrage; and
 the man who had plunged her into infamy, and deserted her when she stood
 in greatest need of support, deigned not to smooth with kindness the
 road to ruin. Thus degraded, was she let loose on the world; and
 virtue, never nurtured by affection, assumed the stern aspect of selfish
 independence.
 
 This general view of her life, Maria gathered from her exclamations and
 dry remarks. Jemima indeed displayed a strange mixture of interest
 and suspicion; for she would listen to her with earnestness, and then
 suddenly interrupt the conversation, as if afraid of resigning, by
 giving way to her sympathy, her dear-bought knowledge of the world.
 
 Maria alluded to the possibility of an escape, and mentioned a
 compensation, or reward; but the style in which she was repulsed made
 her cautious, and determine not to renew the subject, till she knew
 more of the character she had to work on. Jemima's countenance, and
 dark hints, seemed to say, "You are an extraordinary woman; but let me
 consider, this may only be one of your lucid intervals." Nay, the very
 energy of Maria's character, made her suspect that the extraordinary
 animation she perceived might be the effect of madness. "Should her
 husband then substantiate his charge, and get possession of her estate,
 from whence would come the promised annuity, or more desired protection?
 Besides, might not a woman, anxious to escape, conceal some of the
 circumstances which made against her? Was truth to be expected from one
 who had been entrapped, kidnapped, in the most fraudulent manner?"
 
 In this train Jemima continued to argue, the moment after compassion
 and respect seemed to make her swerve; and she still resolved not to be
 wrought on to do more than soften the rigour of confinement, till she
 could advance on surer ground.
 
 Maria was not permitted to walk in the garden; but sometimes, from her
 window, she turned her eyes from the gloomy walls, in which she pined
 life away, on the poor wretches who strayed along the walks, and
 contemplated the most terrific of ruins--that of a human soul. What
 is the view of the fallen column, the mouldering arch, of the most
 exquisite workmanship, when compared with this living memento of the
 fragility, the instability, of reason, and the wild luxuriancy of
 noxious passions? Enthusiasm turned adrift, like some rich stream
 overflowing its banks, rushes forward with destructive velocity,
 inspiring a sublime concentration of thought. Thus thought Maria--These
 are the ravages over which humanity must ever mournfully ponder, with a
 degree of anguish not excited by crumbling marble, or cankering brass,
 unfaithful to the trust of monumental fame. It is not over the decaying
 productions of the mind, embodied with the happiest art, we grieve most
 bitterly. The view of what has been done by man, produces a melancholy,
 yet aggrandizing, sense of what remains to be achieved by human
 intellect; but a mental convulsion, which, like the devastation of an
 earthquake, throws all the elements of thought and imagination into
 confusion, makes contemplation giddy, and we fearfully ask on what
 ground we ourselves stand.
 
 Melancholy and imbecility marked the features of the wretches allowed to
 breathe at large; for the frantic, those who in a strong imagination
 had lost a sense of woe, were closely confined. The playful tricks and
 mischievous devices of their disturbed fancy, that suddenly broke out,
 could not be guarded against, when they were permitted to enjoy any
 portion of freedom; for, so active was their imagination, that every new
 object which accidentally struck their senses, awoke to phrenzy their
 restless passions; as Maria learned from the burden of their incessant
 ravings.
 
 Sometimes, with a strict injunction of silence, Jemima would allow
 Maria, at the close of evening, to stray along the narrow avenues that
 separated the dungeon-like apartments, leaning on her arm. What a change
 of scene! Maria wished to pass the threshold of her prison, yet, when
 by chance she met the eye of rage glaring on her, yet unfaithful to its
 office, she shrunk back with more horror and affright, than if she had
 stumbled over a mangled corpse. Her busy fancy pictured the misery of
 a fond heart, watching over a friend thus estranged, absent, though
 present--over a poor wretch lost to reason and the social joys of
 existence; and losing all consciousness of misery in its excess. What
 a task, to watch the light of reason quivering in the eye, or with
 agonizing expectation to catch the beam of recollection; tantalized by
 hope, only to feel despair more keenly, at finding a much loved face
 or voice, suddenly remembered, or pathetically implored, only to be
 immediately forgotten, or viewed with indifference or abhorrence!
 
 The heart-rending sigh of melancholy sunk into her soul; and when she
 retired to rest, the petrified figures she had encountered, the only
 human forms she was doomed to observe, haunting her dreams with tales of
 mysterious wrongs, made her wish to sleep to dream no more.
 
 Day after day rolled away, and tedious as the present moment appeared,
 they passed in such an unvaried tenor, Maria was surprised to find that
 she had already been six weeks buried alive, and yet had such faint
 hopes of effecting her enlargement. She was, earnestly as she had sought
 for employment, now angry with herself for having been amused by writing
 her narrative; and grieved to think that she had for an instant thought
 of any thing, but contriving to escape.
 
 Jemima had evidently pleasure in her society: still, though she often
 left her with a glow of kindness, she returned with the same chilling
 air; and, when her heart appeared for a moment to open, some suggestion
 of reason forcibly closed it, before she could give utterance to the
 confidence Maria's conversation inspired.
 
 Discouraged by these changes, Maria relapsed into despondency, when she
 was cheered by the alacrity with which Jemima brought her a fresh parcel
 of books; assuring her, that she had taken some pains to obtain them
 from one of the keepers, who attended a gentleman confined in the
 opposite corner of the gallery.
 
 Maria took up the books with emotion. "They come," said she, "perhaps,
 from a wretch condemned, like me, to reason on the nature of madness,
 by having wrecked minds continually under his eye; and almost to wish
 himself--as I do--mad, to escape from the contemplation of it." Her
 heart throbbed with sympathetic alarm; and she turned over the leaves
 with awe, as if they had become sacred from passing through the hands of
 an unfortunate being, oppressed by a similar fate.
 
 Dryden's Fables, Milton's Paradise Lost, with several modern
 productions, composed the collection. It was a mine of treasure. Some
 marginal notes, in Dryden's Fables, caught her attention: they were
 written with force and taste; and, in one of the modern pamphlets, there
 was a fragment left, containing various observations on the present
 state of society and government, with a comparative view of the politics
 of Europe and America. These remarks were written with a degree of
 generous warmth, when alluding to the enslaved state of the labouring
 majority, perfectly in unison with Maria's mode of thinking.
 
 She read them over and over again; and fancy, treacherous fancy, began
 to sketch a character, congenial with her own, from these shadowy
 outlines.--"Was he mad?" She reperused the marginal notes, and
 they seemed the production of an animated, but not of a disturbed
 imagination. Confined to this speculation, every time she re-read them,
 some fresh refinement of sentiment, or acuteness of thought impressed
 her, which she was astonished at herself for not having before observed.
 
 What a creative power has an affectionate heart! There are beings who
 cannot live without loving, as poets love; and who feel the electric
 spark of genius, wherever it awakens sentiment or grace. Maria had often
 thought, when disciplining her wayward heart, "that to charm, was to be
 virtuous." "They who make me wish to appear the most amiable and good
 in their eyes, must possess in a degree," she would exclaim, "the graces
 and virtues they call into action."
 
 She took up a book on the powers of the human mind; but, her attention
 strayed from cold arguments on the nature of what she felt, while she
 was feeling, and she snapt the chain of the theory to read Dryden's
 Guiscard and Sigismunda.
 
 Maria, in the course of the ensuing day, returned some of the books,
 with the hope of getting others--and more marginal notes. Thus shut out
 from human intercourse, and compelled to view nothing but the prison of
 vexed spirits, to meet a wretch in the same situation, was more surely
 to find a friend, than to imagine a countryman one, in a strange land,
 where the human voice conveys no information to the eager ear.
 
 "Did you ever see the unfortunate being to whom these books belong?"
 asked Maria, when Jemima brought her slipper. "Yes. He sometimes
 walks out, between five and six, before the family is stirring, in the
 morning, with two keepers; but even then his hands are confined."
 
 "What! is he so unruly?" enquired Maria, with an accent of
 disappointment.
 
 "No, not that I perceive," replied Jemima; "but he has an untamed look,
 a vehemence of eye, that excites apprehension. Were his hands free,
 he looks as if he could soon manage both his guards: yet he appears
 tranquil."
 
 "If he be so strong, he must be young," observed Maria.
 
 "Three or four and thirty, I suppose; but there is no judging of a
 person in his situation."
 
 "Are you sure that he is mad?" interrupted Maria with eagerness. Jemima
 quitted the room, without replying.
 
 "No, no, he certainly is not!" exclaimed Maria, answering herself;
 "the man who could write those observations was not disordered in his
 intellects."
 
 She sat musing, gazing at the moon, and watching its motion as it seemed
 to glide under the clouds. Then, preparing for bed, she thought, "Of
 what use could I be to him, or he to me, if it be true that he is
 unjustly confined?--Could he aid me to escape, who is himself more
 closely watched?--Still I should like to see him." She went to bed,
 dreamed of her child, yet woke exactly at half after five o'clock, and
 starting up, only wrapped a gown around her, and ran to the window. The
 morning was chill, it was the latter end of September; yet she did not
 retire to warm herself and think in bed, till the sound of the servants,
 moving about the house, convinced her that the unknown would not walk
 in the garden that morning. She was ashamed at feeling disappointed; and
 began to reflect, as an excuse to herself, on the little objects which
 attract attention when there is nothing to divert the mind; and how
 difficult it was for women to avoid growing romantic, who have no active
 duties or pursuits.
 
 At breakfast, Jemima enquired whether she understood French? for, unless
 she did, the stranger's stock of books was exhausted. Maria replied in
 the affirmative; but forbore to ask any more questions respecting the
 person to whom they belonged. And Jemima gave her a new subject for
 contemplation, by describing the person of a lovely maniac, just brought
 into an adjoining chamber. She was singing the pathetic ballad of
 old Rob* with the most heart-melting falls and pauses. Jemima had
 half-opened the door, when she distinguished her voice, and Maria stood
 close to it, scarcely daring to respire, lest a modulation should escape
 her, so exquisitely sweet, so passionately wild. She began with sympathy
 to pourtray to herself another victim, when the lovely warbler flew, as
 it were, from the spray, and a torrent of unconnected exclamations and
 questions burst from her, interrupted by fits of laughter, so
 horrid, that Maria shut the door, and, turning her eyes up to heaven,
 exclaimed--"Gracious God!"
 
      * A blank space about ten characters in length occurs here
      in the original edition [Publisher's note].
 
 Several minutes elapsed before Maria could enquire respecting the rumour
 of the house (for this poor wretch was obviously not confined without a
 cause); and then Jemima could only tell her, that it was said, "she
 had been married, against her inclination, to a rich old man, extremely
 jealous (no wonder, for she was a charming creature); and that, in
 consequence of his treatment, or something which hung on her mind, she
 had, during her first lying-in, lost her senses."
 
 What a subject of meditation--even to the very confines of madness.
 
 "Woman, fragile flower! why were you suffered to adorn a world exposed
 to the inroad of such stormy elements?" thought Maria, while the poor
 maniac's strain was still breathing on her ear, and sinking into her
 very soul.
 
 Towards the evening, Jemima brought her Rousseau's Heloise; and she sat
 reading with eyes and heart, till the return of her guard to extinguish
 the light. One instance of her kindness was, the permitting Maria to
 have one, till her own hour of retiring to rest. She had read this work
 long since; but now it seemed to open a new world to her--the only
 one worth inhabiting. Sleep was not to be wooed; yet, far from being
 fatigued by the restless rotation of thought, she rose and opened her
 window, just as the thin watery clouds of twilight made the long
 silent shadows visible. The air swept across her face with a voluptuous
 freshness that thrilled to her heart, awakening indefinable emotions;
 and the sound of a waving branch, or the twittering of a startled bird,
 alone broke the stillness of reposing nature. Absorbed by the sublime
 sensibility which renders the consciousness of existence felicity, Maria
 was happy, till an autumnal scent, wafted by the breeze of morn from the
 fallen leaves of the adjacent wood, made her recollect that the season
 had changed since her confinement; yet life afforded no variety to
 solace an afflicted heart. She returned dispirited to her couch, and
 thought of her child till the broad glare of day again invited her to
 the window. She looked not for the unknown, still how great was her
 vexation at perceiving the back of a man, certainly he, with his two
 attendants, as he turned into a side-path which led to the house!
 A confused recollection of having seen somebody who resembled
 him, immediately occurred, to puzzle and torment her with endless
 conjectures. Five minutes sooner, and she should have seen his face, and
 been out of suspense--was ever any thing so unlucky! His steady, bold
 step, and the whole air of his person, bursting as it were from a
 cloud, pleased her, and gave an outline to the imagination to sketch the
 individual form she wished to recognize.
 
 Feeling the disappointment more severely than she was willing to
 believe, she flew to Rousseau, as her only refuge from the idea of him,
 who might prove a friend, could she but find a way to interest him in
 her fate; still the personification of Saint Preux, or of an ideal lover
 far superior, was after this imperfect model, of which merely a glance
 had been caught, even to the minutiae of the coat and hat of the
 stranger. But if she lent St. Preux, or the demi-god of her fancy,
 his form, she richly repaid him by the donation of all St. Preux's
 sentiments and feelings, culled to gratify her own, to which he
 seemed to have an undoubted right, when she read on the margin of an
 impassioned letter, written in the well-known hand--"Rousseau alone, the
 true Prometheus of sentiment, possessed the fire of genius necessary to
 pourtray the passion, the truth of which goes so directly to the heart."
 
 Maria was again true to the hour, yet had finished Rousseau, and begun
 to transcribe some selected passages; unable to quit either the author
 or the window, before she had a glimpse of the countenance she daily
 longed to see; and, when seen, it conveyed no distinct idea to her
 mind where she had seen it before. He must have been a transient
 acquaintance; but to discover an acquaintance was fortunate, could she
 contrive to attract his attention, and excite his sympathy.
 
 Every glance afforded colouring for the picture she was delineating on
 her heart; and once, when the window was half open, the sound of his
 voice reached her. Conviction flashed on her; she had certainly, in
 a moment of distress, heard the same accents. They were manly, and
 characteristic of a noble mind; nay, even sweet--or sweet they seemed to
 her attentive ear.
 
 She started back, trembling, alarmed at the emotion a strange
 coincidence of circumstances inspired, and wondering why she thought so
 much of a stranger, obliged as she had been by his timely interference;
 [for she recollected, by degrees all the circumstances of their former
 meeting.] She found however that she could think of nothing else; or, if
 she thought of her daughter, it was to wish that she had a father whom
 her mother could respect and love.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 3
 
 
 WHEN PERUSING the first parcel of books, Maria had, with her pencil,
 written in one of them a few exclamations, expressive of compassion and
 sympathy, which she scarcely remembered, till turning over the leaves of
 one of the volumes, lately brought to her, a slip of paper dropped out,
 which Jemima hastily snatched up.
 
 "Let me see it," demanded Maria impatiently, "You surely are not afraid
 of trusting me with the effusions of a madman?" "I must consider,"
 replied Jemima; and withdrew, with the paper in her hand.
 
 In a life of such seclusion, the passions gain undue force; Maria
 therefore felt a great degree of resentment and vexation, which she had
 not time to subdue, before Jemima, returning, delivered the paper.
 
      "Whoever you are, who partake of my fate,
      accept my sincere commiseration--I would have said
      protection; but the privilege of man is denied me.
 
      "My own situation forces a dreadful suspicion on
      my mind--I may not always languish in vain for freedom--
      say are you--I cannot ask the question; yet I will
      remember you when my remembrance can be of any use.
      I will enquire, why you are so mysteriously detained--
      and I will have an answer.
 
      "HENRY DARNFORD."
 
 By the most pressing intreaties, Maria prevailed on Jemima to permit her
 to write a reply to this note. Another and another succeeded, in which
 explanations were not allowed relative to their present situation; but
 Maria, with sufficient explicitness, alluded to a former obligation;
 and they insensibly entered on an interchange of sentiments on the most
 important subjects. To write these letters was the business of the day,
 and to receive them the moment of sunshine. By some means, Darnford
 having discovered Maria's window, when she next appeared at it, he made
 her, behind his keepers, a profound bow of respect and recognition.
 
 Two or three weeks glided away in this kind of intercourse, during
 which period Jemima, to whom Maria had given the necessary information
 respecting her family, had evidently gained some intelligence, which
 increased her desire of pleasing her charge, though she could not yet
 determine to liberate her. Maria took advantage of this favourable
 charge, without too minutely enquiring into the cause; and such was her
 eagerness to hold human converse, and to see her former protector, still
 a stranger to her, that she incessantly requested her guard to gratify
 her more than curiosity.
 
 Writing to Darnford, she was led from the sad objects before her, and
 frequently rendered insensible to the horrid noises around her, which
 previously had continually employed her feverish fancy. Thinking it
 selfish to dwell on her own sufferings, when in the midst of wretches,
 who had not only lost all that endears life, but their very selves, her
 imagination was occupied with melancholy earnestness to trace the mazes
 of misery, through which so many wretches must have passed to this
 gloomy receptacle of disjointed souls, to the grand source of human
 corruption. Often at midnight was she waked by the dismal shrieks of
 demoniac rage, or of excruciating despair, uttered in such wild tones of
 indescribable anguish as proved the total absence of reason, and roused
 phantoms of horror in her mind, far more terrific than all that dreaming
 superstition ever drew. Besides, there was frequently something so
 inconceivably picturesque in the varying gestures of unrestrained
 passion, so irresistibly comic in their sallies, or so heart-piercingly
 pathetic in the little airs they would sing, frequently bursting out
 after an awful silence, as to fascinate the attention, and amuse the
 fancy, while torturing the soul. It was the uproar of the passions which
 she was compelled to observe; and to mark the lucid beam of reason,
 like a light trembling in a socket, or like the flash which divides the
 threatening clouds of angry heaven only to display the horrors which
 darkness shrouded.
 
 Jemima would labour to beguile the tedious evenings, by describing the
 persons and manners of the unfortunate beings, whose figures or voices
 awoke sympathetic sorrow in Maria's bosom; and the stories she told
 were the more interesting, for perpetually leaving room to conjecture
 something extraordinary. Still Maria, accustomed to generalize her
 observations, was led to conclude from all she heard, that it was a
 vulgar error to suppose that people of abilities were the most apt to
 lose the command of reason. On the contrary, from most of the instances
 she could investigate, she thought it resulted, that the passions only
 appeared strong and disproportioned, because the judgment was weak and
 unexercised; and that they gained strength by the decay of reason, as
 the shadows lengthen during the sun's decline.
 
 Maria impatiently wished to see her fellow-sufferer; but Darnford was
 still more earnest to obtain an interview. Accustomed to submit to every
 impulse of passion, and never taught, like women, to restrain the most
 natural, and acquire, instead of the bewitching frankness of nature, a
 factitious propriety of behaviour, every desire became a torrent that
 bore down all opposition.
 
 His travelling trunk, which contained the books lent to Maria, had been
 sent to him, and with a part of its contents he bribed his principal
 keeper; who, after receiving the most solemn promise that he would
 return to his apartment without attempting to explore any part of the
 house, conducted him, in the dusk of the evening, to Maria's room.
 
 Jemima had apprized her charge of the visit, and she expected with
 trembling impatience, inspired by a vague hope that he might again prove
 her deliverer, to see a man who had before rescued her from oppression.
 He entered with an animation of countenance, formed to captivate an
 enthusiast; and, hastily turned his eyes from her to the apartment,
 which he surveyed with apparent emotions of compassionate indignation.
 Sympathy illuminated his eye, and, taking her hand, he respectfully
 bowed on it, exclaiming--"This is extraordinary!--again to meet you,
 and in such circumstances!" Still, impressive as was the coincidence of
 events which brought them once more together, their full hearts did not
 overflow.--*
 
      * The copy which had received the author's last corrections
      breaks off in this place, and the pages which follow, to the
      end of Chap.  IV, are printed from a copy in a less finished
      state. [Godwin's note]
 
 [And though, after this first visit, they were permitted frequently to
 repeat their interviews, they were for some time employed in] a reserved
 conversation, to which all the world might have listened; excepting,
 when discussing some literary subject, flashes of sentiment, inforced
 by each relaxing feature, seemed to remind them that their minds were
 already acquainted.
 
 [By degrees, Darnford entered into the particulars of his story.] In a
 few words, he informed her that he had been a thoughtless, extravagant
 young man; yet, as he described his faults, they appeared to be the
 generous luxuriancy of a noble mind. Nothing like meanness tarnished
 the lustre of his youth, nor had the worm of selfishness lurked in the
 unfolding bud, even while he had been the dupe of others. Yet he
 tardily acquired the experience necessary to guard him against future
 imposition.
 
 "I shall weary you," continued he, "by my egotism; and did not powerful
 emotions draw me to you,"--his eyes glistened as he spoke, and a
 trembling seemed to run through his manly frame,--"I would not waste
 these precious moments in talking of myself.
 
 "My father and mother were people of fashion; married by their parents.
 He was fond of the turf, she of the card-table. I, and two or three
 other children since dead, were kept at home till we became intolerable.
 My father and mother had a visible dislike to each other, continually
 displayed; the servants were of the depraved kind usually found in the
 houses of people of fortune. My brothers and parents all dying, I was
 left to the care of guardians; and sent to Eton. I never knew the sweets
 of domestic affection, but I felt the want of indulgence and frivolous
 respect at school. I will not disgust you with a recital of the vices of
 my youth, which can scarcely be comprehended by female delicacy. I was
 taught to love by a creature I am ashamed to mention; and the other
 women with whom I afterwards became intimate, were of a class of which
 you can have no knowledge. I formed my acquaintance with them at the
 theaters; and, when vivacity danced in their eyes, I was not easily
 disgusted by the vulgarity which flowed from their lips. Having spent,
 a few years after I was of age, [the whole of] a considerable patrimony,
 excepting a few hundreds, I had no resource but to purchase a commission
 in a new-raised regiment, destined to subjugate America. The regret
 I felt to renounce a life of pleasure, was counter-balanced by the
 curiosity I had to see America, or rather to travel; [nor had any
 of those circumstances occurred to my youth, which might have been
 calculated] to bind my country to my heart. I shall not trouble you with
 the details of a military life. My blood was still kept in motion; till,
 towards the close of the contest, I was wounded and taken prisoner.
 
 "Confined to my bed, or chair, by a lingering cure, my only refuge from
 the preying activity of my mind, was books, which I read with great
 avidity, profiting by the conversation of my host, a man of sound
 understanding. My political sentiments now underwent a total change;
 and, dazzled by the hospitality of the Americans, I determined to take
 up my abode with freedom. I, therefore, with my usual impetuosity, sold
 my commission, and travelled into the interior parts of the country, to
 lay out my money to advantage. Added to this, I did not much like the
 puritanical manners of the large towns. Inequality of condition was
 there most disgustingly galling. The only pleasure wealth afforded, was
 to make an ostentatious display of it; for the cultivation of the fine
 arts, or literature, had not introduced into the first circles that
 polish of manners which renders the rich so essentially superior to the
 poor in Europe. Added to this, an influx of vices had been let in by
 the Revolution, and the most rigid principles of religion shaken to the
 centre, before the understanding could be gradually emancipated from the
 prejudices which led their ancestors undauntedly to seek an inhospitable
 clime and unbroken soil. The resolution, that led them, in pursuit
 of independence, to embark on rivers like seas, to search for unknown
 shores, and to sleep under the hovering mists of endless forests,
 whose baleful damps agued their limbs, was now turned into commercial
 speculations, till the national character exhibited a phenomenon in the
 history of the human mind--a head enthusiastically enterprising,
 with cold selfishness of heart. And woman, lovely woman!--they charm
 everywhere--still there is a degree of prudery, and a want of taste and
 ease in the manners of the American women, that renders them, in spite
 of their roses and lilies, far inferior to our European charmers. In the
 country, they have often a bewitching simplicity of character; but, in
 the cities, they have all the airs and ignorance of the ladies who give
 the tone to the circles of the large trading towns in England. They are
 fond of their ornaments, merely because they are good, and not because
 they embellish their persons; and are more gratified to inspire the
 women with jealousy of these exterior advantages, than the men with
 love. All the frivolity which often (excuse me, Madam) renders the
 society of modest women so stupid in England, here seemed to throw still
 more leaden fetters on their charms. Not being an adept in gallantry,
 I found that I could only keep myself awake in their company by making
 downright love to them.
 
 "But, not to intrude on your patience, I retired to the track of land
 which I had purchased in the country, and my time passed pleasantly
 enough while I cut down the trees, built my house, and planted my
 different crops. But winter and idleness came, and I longed for more
 elegant society, to hear what was passing in the world, and to do
 something better than vegetate with the animals that made a very
 considerable part of my household. Consequently, I determined to travel.
 Motion was a substitute for variety of objects; and, passing over
 immense tracks of country, I exhausted my exuberant spirits, without
 obtaining much experience. I every where saw industry the fore-runner
 and not the consequence, of luxury; but this country, everything being
 on an ample scale, did not afford those picturesque views, which a
 certain degree of cultivation is necessary gradually to produce. The eye
 wandered without an object to fix upon over immeasureable plains, and
 lakes that seemed replenished by the ocean, whilst eternal forests
 of small clustering trees, obstructed the circulation of air, and
 embarrassed the path, without gratifying the eye of taste. No cottage
 smiling in the waste, no travellers hailed us, to give life to silent
 nature; or, if perchance we saw the print of a footstep in our path, it
 was a dreadful warning to turn aside; and the head ached as if assailed
 by the scalping knife. The Indians who hovered on the skirts of the
 European settlements had only learned of their neighbours to plunder,
 and they stole their guns from them to do it with more safety.
 
 "From the woods and back settlements, I returned to the towns, and
 learned to eat and drink most valiantly; but without entering into
 commerce (and I detested commerce) I found I could not live there; and,
 growing heartily weary of the land of liberty and vulgar aristocracy,
 seated on her bags of dollars, I resolved once more to visit Europe. I
 wrote to a distant relation in England, with whom I had been educated,
 mentioning the vessel in which I intended to sail. Arriving in London,
 my senses were intoxicated. I ran from street to street, from theater
 to theater, and the women of the town (again I must beg pardon for my
 habitual frankness) appeared to me like angels.
 
 "A week was spent in this thoughtless manner, when, returning very late
 to the hotel in which I had lodged ever since my arrival, I was knocked
 down in a private street, and hurried, in a state of insensibility, into
 a coach, which brought me hither, and I only recovered my senses to
 be treated like one who had lost them. My keepers are deaf to my
 remonstrances and enquiries, yet assure me that my confinement shall not
 last long. Still I cannot guess, though I weary myself with conjectures,
 why I am confined, or in what part of England this house is situated. I
 imagine sometimes that I hear the sea roar, and wished myself again on
 the Atlantic, till I had a glimpse of you."*
 
 A few moments were only allowed to Maria to comment on this narrative,
 when Darnford left her to her own thoughts, to the "never ending, still
 beginning," task of weighing his words, recollecting his tones of voice,
 and feeling them reverberate on her heart.
 
      * The introduction of Darnford as the deliverer of Maria in
      a former instance, appears to have been an after-thought of
      the author.  This has occasioned the omission of any
      allusion to that circumstance in the preceding narration.
      EDITOR. [Godwin's note]
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 4
 
 
 PITY, and the forlorn seriousness of adversity, have both been
 considered as dispositions favourable to love, while satirical writers
 have attributed the propensity to the relaxing effect of idleness; what
 chance then had Maria of escaping, when pity, sorrow, and solitude all
 conspired to soften her mind, and nourish romantic wishes, and, from a
 natural progress, romantic expectations?
 
 Maria was six-and-twenty. But, such was the native soundness of her
 constitution, that time had only given to her countenance the character
 of her mind. Revolving thought, and exercised affections had banished
 some of the playful graces of innocence, producing insensibly that
 irregularity of features which the struggles of the understanding to
 trace or govern the strong emotions of the heart, are wont to imprint on
 the yielding mass. Grief and care had mellowed, without obscuring, the
 bright tints of youth, and the thoughtfulness which resided on her brow
 did not take from the feminine softness of her features; nay, such
 was the sensibility which often mantled over it, that she frequently
 appeared, like a large proportion of her sex, only born to feel; and the
 activity of her well-proportioned, and even almost voluptuous figure,
 inspired the idea of strength of mind, rather than of body. There was a
 simplicity sometimes indeed in her manner, which bordered on infantine
 ingenuousness, that led people of common discernment to underrate her
 talents, and smile at the flights of her imagination. But those who
 could not comprehend the delicacy of her sentiments, were attached
 by her unfailing sympathy, so that she was very generally beloved by
 characters of very different descriptions; still, she was too much under
 the influence of an ardent imagination to adhere to common rules.
 
 There are mistakes of conduct which at five-and-twenty prove the
 strength of the mind, that, ten or fifteen years after, would
 demonstrate its weakness, its incapacity to acquire a sane judgment. The
 youths who are satisfied with the ordinary pleasures of life, and do not
 sigh after ideal phantoms of love and friendship, will never arrive at
 great maturity of understanding; but if these reveries are cherished,
 as is too frequently the case with women, when experience ought to have
 taught them in what human happiness consists, they become as useless as
 they are wretched. Besides, their pains and pleasures are so dependent
 on outward circumstances, on the objects of their affections, that they
 seldom act from the impulse of a nerved mind, able to choose its own
 pursuit.
 
 Having had to struggle incessantly with the vices of mankind, Maria's
 imagination found repose in pourtraying the possible virtues the
 world might contain. Pygmalion formed an ivory maid, and longed for an
 informing soul. She, on the contrary, combined all the qualities of a
 hero's mind, and fate presented a statue in which she might enshrine
 them.
 
 We mean not to trace the progress of this passion, or recount how often
 Darnford and Maria were obliged to part in the midst of an interesting
 conversation. Jemima ever watched on the tip-toe of fear, and frequently
 separated them on a false alarm, when they would have given worlds to
 remain a little longer together.
 
 A magic lamp now seemed to be suspended in Maria's prison, and fairy
 landscapes flitted round the gloomy walls, late so blank. Rushing from
 the depth of despair, on the seraph wing of hope, she found herself
 happy.--She was beloved, and every emotion was rapturous.
 
 To Darnford she had not shown a decided affection; the fear of
 outrunning his, a sure proof of love, made her often assume a coldness
 and indifference foreign from her character; and, even when giving way
 to the playful emotions of a heart just loosened from the frozen bond of
 grief, there was a delicacy in her manner of expressing her sensibility,
 which made him doubt whether it was the effect of love.
 
 One evening, when Jemima left them, to listen to the sound of a distant
 footstep, which seemed cautiously to approach, he seized Maria's
 hand--it was not withdrawn. They conversed with earnestness of their
 situation; and, during the conversation, he once or twice gently drew
 her towards him. He felt the fragrance of her breath, and longed, yet
 feared, to touch the lips from which it issued; spirits of purity seemed
 to guard them, while all the enchanting graces of love sported on her
 cheeks, and languished in her eyes.
 
 Jemima entering, he reflected on his diffidence with poignant regret,
 and, she once more taking alarm, he ventured, as Maria stood near his
 chair, to approach her lips with a declaration of love. She drew back
 with solemnity, he hung down his head abashed; but lifting his eyes
 timidly, they met her's; she had determined, during that instant, and
 suffered their rays to mingle. He took, with more ardour, reassured, a
 half-consenting, half-reluctant kiss, reluctant only from modesty; and
 there was a sacredness in her dignified manner of reclining her glowing
 face on his shoulder, that powerfully impressed him. Desire was lost in
 more ineffable emotions, and to protect her from insult and sorrow--to
 make her happy, seemed not only the first wish of his heart, but the
 most noble duty of his life. Such angelic confidence demanded the
 fidelity of honour; but could he, feeling her in every pulsation, could
 he ever change, could he be a villain? The emotion with which she, for
 a moment, allowed herself to be pressed to his bosom, the tear of
 rapturous sympathy, mingled with a soft melancholy sentiment of
 recollected disappointment, said--more of truth and faithfulness, than
 the tongue could have given utterance to in hours! They were silent--yet
 discoursed, how eloquently? till, after a moment's reflection, Maria
 drew her chair by the side of his, and, with a composed sweetness of
 voice, and supernatural benignity of countenance, said, "I must open my
 whole heart to you; you must be told who I am, why I am here, and why,
 telling you I am a wife, I blush not to"--the blush spoke the rest.
 
 Jemima was again at her elbow, and the restraint of her presence did not
 prevent an animated conversation, in which love, sly urchin, was ever at
 bo-peep.
 
 So much of heaven did they enjoy, that paradise bloomed around them; or
 they, by a powerful spell, had been transported into Armida's garden.
 Love, the grand enchanter, "lapt them in Elysium," and every sense was
 harmonized to joy and social extacy. So animated, indeed, were their
 accents of tenderness, in discussing what, in other circumstances, would
 have been commonplace subjects, that Jemima felt, with surprise, a tear
 of pleasure trickling down her rugged cheeks. She wiped it away, half
 ashamed; and when Maria kindly enquired the cause, with all the
 eager solicitude of a happy being wishing to impart to all nature its
 overflowing felicity, Jemima owned that it was the first tear that
 social enjoyment had ever drawn from her. She seemed indeed to breathe
 more freely; the cloud of suspicion cleared away from her brow; she felt
 herself, for once in her life, treated like a fellow-creature.
 
 Imagination! who can paint thy power; or reflect the evanescent tints
 of hope fostered by thee? A despondent gloom had long obscured Maria's
 horizon--now the sun broke forth, the rainbow appeared, and every
 prospect was fair. Horror still reigned in the darkened cells, suspicion
 lurked in the passages, and whispered along the walls. The yells of
 men possessed, sometimes, made them pause, and wonder that they felt
 so happy, in a tomb of living death. They even chid themselves for such
 apparent insensibility; still the world contained not three happier
 beings. And Jemima, after again patrolling the passage, was so softened
 by the air of confidence which breathed around her, that she voluntarily
 began an account of herself.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 5
 
 
 "MY FATHER," said Jemima, "seduced my mother, a pretty girl, with whom
 he lived fellow-servant; and she no sooner perceived the natural, the
 dreaded consequence, than the terrible conviction flashed on her--that
 she was ruined. Honesty, and a regard for her reputation, had been the
 only principles inculcated by her mother; and they had been so forcibly
 impressed, that she feared shame, more than the poverty to which it
 would lead. Her incessant importunities to prevail upon my father to
 screen her from reproach by marrying her, as he had promised in the
 fervour of seduction, estranged him from her so completely, that her
 very person became distasteful to him; and he began to hate, as well as
 despise me, before I was born.
 
 "My mother, grieved to the soul by his neglect, and unkind treatment,
 actually resolved to famish herself; and injured her health by the
 attempt; though she had not sufficient resolution to adhere to her
 project, or renounce it entirely. Death came not at her call; yet
 sorrow, and the methods she adopted to conceal her condition, still
 doing the work of a house-maid, had such an effect on her constitution,
 that she died in the wretched garret, where her virtuous mistress had
 forced her to take refuge in the very pangs of labour, though my father,
 after a slight reproof, was allowed to remain in his place--allowed by
 the mother of six children, who, scarcely permitting a footstep to be
 heard, during her month's indulgence, felt no sympathy for the poor
 wretch, denied every comfort required by her situation.
 
 "The day my mother, died, the ninth after my birth, I was consigned to
 the care of the cheapest nurse my father could find; who suckled her own
 child at the same time, and lodged as many more as she could get, in two
 cellar-like apartments.
 
 "Poverty, and the habit of seeing children die off her hands, had so
 hardened her heart, that the office of a mother did not awaken the
 tenderness of a woman; nor were the feminine caresses which seem a part
 of the rearing of a child, ever bestowed on me. The chicken has a wing
 to shelter under; but I had no bosom to nestle in, no kindred warmth to
 foster me. Left in dirt, to cry with cold and hunger till I was weary,
 and sleep without ever being prepared by exercise, or lulled by kindness
 to rest; could I be expected to become any thing but a weak and rickety
 babe? Still, in spite of neglect, I continued to exist, to learn to
 curse existence, [her countenance grew ferocious as she spoke,] and
 the treatment that rendered me miserable, seemed to sharpen my wits.
 Confined then in a damp hovel, to rock the cradle of the succeeding
 tribe, I looked like a little old woman, or a hag shrivelling into
 nothing. The furrows of reflection and care contracted the youthful
 cheek, and gave a sort of supernatural wildness to the ever watchful
 eye. During this period, my father had married another fellow-servant,
 who loved him less, and knew better how to manage his passion, than my
 mother. She likewise proving with child, they agreed to keep a shop: my
 step-mother, if, being an illegitimate offspring, I may venture thus
 to characterize her, having obtained a sum of a rich relation, for that
 purpose.
 
 "Soon after her lying-in, she prevailed on my father to take me home, to
 save the expense of maintaining me, and of hiring a girl to assist
 her in the care of the child. I was young, it was true, but appeared a
 knowing little thing, and might be made handy. Accordingly I was brought
 to her house; but not to a home--for a home I never knew. Of this
 child, a daughter, she was extravagantly fond; and it was a part of
 my employment, to assist to spoil her, by humouring all her whims, and
 bearing all her caprices. Feeling her own consequence, before she could
 speak, she had learned the art of tormenting me, and if I ever dared to
 resist, I received blows, laid on with no compunctious hand, or was sent
 to bed dinnerless, as well as supperless. I said that it was a part of
 my daily labour to attend this child, with the servility of a slave;
 still it was but a part. I was sent out in all seasons, and from place
 to place, to carry burdens far above my strength, without being allowed
 to draw near the fire, or ever being cheered by encouragement or
 kindness. No wonder then, treated like a creature of another species,
 that I began to envy, and at length to hate, the darling of the
 house. Yet, I perfectly remember, that it was the caresses, and
 kind expressions of my step-mother, which first excited my jealous
 discontent. Once, I cannot forget it, when she was calling in vain
 her wayward child to kiss her, I ran to her, saying, 'I will kiss you,
 ma'am!' and how did my heart, which was in my mouth, sink, what was
 my debasement of soul, when pushed away with--'I do not want you,
 pert thing!' Another day, when a new gown had excited the highest good
 humour, and she uttered the appropriate dear, addressed unexpectedly to
 me, I thought I could never do enough to please her; I was all alacrity,
 and rose proportionably in my own estimation.
 
 "As her daughter grew up, she was pampered with cakes and fruit, while
 I was, literally speaking, fed with the refuse of the table, with her
 leavings. A liquorish tooth is, I believe, common to children, and I
 used to steal any thing sweet, that I could catch up with a chance of
 concealment. When detected, she was not content to chastize me herself
 at the moment, but, on my father's return in the evening (he was
 a shopman), the principal discourse was to recount my faults, and
 attribute them to the wicked disposition which I had brought into the
 world with me, inherited from my mother. He did not fail to leave the
 marks of his resentment on my body, and then solaced himself by playing
 with my sister.--I could have murdered her at those moments. To save
 myself from these unmerciful corrections, I resorted to falshood, and
 the untruths which I sturdily maintained, were brought in judgment
 against me, to support my tyrant's inhuman charge of my natural
 propensity to vice. Seeing me treated with contempt, and always being
 fed and dressed better, my sister conceived a contemptuous opinion of
 me, that proved an obstacle to all affection; and my father, hearing
 continually of my faults, began to consider me as a curse entailed
 on him for his sins: he was therefore easily prevailed on to bind me
 apprentice to one of my step-mother's friends, who kept a slop-shop in
 Wapping. I was represented (as it was said) in my true colours; but she,
 'warranted,' snapping her fingers, 'that she should break my spirit or
 heart.'
 
 "My mother replied, with a whine, 'that if any body could make me
 better, it was such a clever woman as herself; though, for her own part,
 she had tried in vain; but good-nature was her fault.'
 
 "I shudder with horror, when I recollect the treatment I had now to
 endure. Not only under the lash of my task-mistress, but the drudge
 of the maid, apprentices and children, I never had a taste of human
 kindness to soften the rigour of perpetual labour. I had been introduced
 as an object of abhorrence into the family; as a creature of whom my
 step-mother, though she had been kind enough to let me live in the house
 with her own child, could make nothing. I was described as a wretch,
 whose nose must be kept to the grinding stone--and it was held there
 with an iron grasp. It seemed indeed the privilege of their superior
 nature to kick me about, like the dog or cat. If I were attentive, I
 was called fawning, if refractory, an obstinate mule, and like a mule
 I received their censure on my loaded back. Often has my mistress, for
 some instance of forgetfulness, thrown me from one side of the kitchen
 to the other, knocked my head against the wall, spit in my face, with
 various refinements on barbarity that I forbear to enumerate, though
 they were all acted over again by the servant, with additional insults,
 to which the appellation of bastard, was commonly added, with taunts
 or sneers. But I will not attempt to give you an adequate idea of my
 situation, lest you, who probably have never been drenched with the
 dregs of human misery, should think I exaggerate.
 
 "I stole now, from absolute necessity,--bread; yet whatever else was
 taken, which I had it not in my power to take, was ascribed to me. I was
 the filching cat, the ravenous dog, the dumb brute, who must bear all;
 for if I endeavoured to exculpate myself, I was silenced, without any
 enquiries being made, with 'Hold your tongue, you never tell truth.'
 Even the very air I breathed was tainted with scorn; for I was sent
 to the neighbouring shops with Glutton, Liar, or Thief, written on my
 forehead. This was, at first, the most bitter punishment; but sullen
 pride, or a kind of stupid desperation, made me, at length, almost
 regardless of the contempt, which had wrung from me so many solitary
 tears at the only moments when I was allowed to rest.
 
 "Thus was I the mark of cruelty till my sixteenth year; and then I have
 only to point out a change of misery; for a period I never knew.
 Allow me first to make one observation. Now I look back, I cannot help
 attributing the greater part of my misery, to the misfortune of having
 been thrown into the world without the grand support of life--a mother's
 affection. I had no one to love me; or to make me respected, to enable
 me to acquire respect. I was an egg dropped on the sand; a pauper by
 nature, hunted from family to family, who belonged to nobody--and nobody
 cared for me. I was despised from my birth, and denied the chance of
 obtaining a footing for myself in society. Yes; I had not even the
 chance of being considered as a fellow-creature--yet all the people with
 whom I lived, brutalized as they were by the low cunning of trade, and
 the despicable shifts of poverty, were not without bowels, though they
 never yearned for me. I was, in fact, born a slave, and chained by
 infamy to slavery during the whole of existence, without having any
 companions to alleviate it by sympathy, or teach me how to rise above it
 by their example. But, to resume the thread of my tale--
 
 "At sixteen, I suddenly grew tall, and something like comeliness
 appeared on a Sunday, when I had time to wash my face, and put on clean
 clothes. My master had once or twice caught hold of me in the passage;
 but I instinctively avoided his disgusting caresses. One day however,
 when the family were at a methodist meeting, he contrived to be alone in
 the house with me, and by blows--yes; blows and menaces, compelled me to
 submit to his ferocious desire; and, to avoid my mistress's fury, I was
 obliged in future to comply, and skulk to my loft at his command, in
 spite of increasing loathing.
 
 "The anguish which was now pent up in my bosom, seemed to open a new
 world to me: I began to extend my thoughts beyond myself, and grieve for
 human misery, till I discovered, with horror--ah! what horror!--that I
 was with child. I know not why I felt a mixed sensation of despair and
 tenderness, excepting that, ever called a bastard, a bastard appeared to
 me an object of the greatest compassion in creation.
 
 "I communicated this dreadful circumstance to my master, who was almost
 equally alarmed at the intelligence; for he feared his wife, and public
 censure at the meeting. After some weeks of deliberation had elapsed, I
 in continual fear that my altered shape would be noticed, my master
 gave me a medicine in a phial, which he desired me to take, telling me,
 without any circumlocution, for what purpose it was designed. I burst
 into tears, I thought it was killing myself--yet was such a self as
 I worth preserving? He cursed me for a fool, and left me to my own
 reflections. I could not resolve to take this infernal potion; but I
 wrapped it up in an old gown, and hid it in a corner of my box.
 
 "Nobody yet suspected me, because they had been accustomed to view me as
 a creature of another species. But the threatening storm at last broke
 over my devoted head--never shall I forget it! One Sunday evening when
 I was left, as usual, to take care of the house, my master came home
 intoxicated, and I became the prey of his brutal appetite. His extreme
 intoxication made him forget his customary caution, and my mistress
 entered and found us in a situation that could not have been more
 hateful to her than me. Her husband was 'pot-valiant,' he feared her not
 at the moment, nor had he then much reason, for she instantly turned the
 whole force of her anger another way. She tore off my cap, scratched,
 kicked, and buffetted me, till she had exhausted her strength,
 declaring, as she rested her arm, 'that I had wheedled her husband from
 her.--But, could any thing better be expected from a wretch, whom she
 had taken into her house out of pure charity?' What a torrent of abuse
 rushed out? till, almost breathless, she concluded with saying, 'that I
 was born a strumpet; it ran in my blood, and nothing good could come to
 those who harboured me.'
 
 "My situation was, of course, discovered, and she declared that I should
 not stay another night under the same roof with an honest family. I was
 therefore pushed out of doors, and my trumpery thrown after me, when
 it had been contemptuously examined in the passage, lest I should have
 stolen any thing.
 
 "Behold me then in the street, utterly destitute! Whither could I creep
 for shelter? To my father's roof I had no claim, when not pursued
 by shame--now I shrunk back as from death, from my mother's cruel
 reproaches, my father's execrations. I could not endure to hear him
 curse the day I was born, though life had been a curse to me. Of death
 I thought, but with a confused emotion of terror, as I stood leaning
 my head on a post, and starting at every footstep, lest it should be
 my mistress coming to tear my heart out. One of the boys of the shop
 passing by, heard my tale, and immediately repaired to his master,
 to give him a description of my situation; and he touched the right
 key--the scandal it would give rise to, if I were left to repeat my
 tale to every enquirer. This plea came home to his reason, who had been
 sobered by his wife's rage, the fury of which fell on him when I was out
 of her reach, and he sent the boy to me with half-a-guinea, desiring him
 to conduct me to a house, where beggars, and other wretches, the refuse
 of society, nightly lodged.
 
 "This night was spent in a state of stupefaction, or desperation. I
 detested mankind, and abhorred myself.
 
 "In the morning I ventured out, to throw myself in my master's way, at
 his usual hour of going abroad. I approached him, he 'damned me for a
 b----, declared I had disturbed the peace of the family, and that he
 had sworn to his wife, never to take any more notice of me.' He left me;
 but, instantly returning, he told me that he should speak to his friend,
 a parish-officer, to get a nurse for the brat I laid to him; and advised
 me, if I wished to keep out of the house of correction, not to make free
 with his name.
 
 "I hurried back to my hole, and, rage giving place to despair, sought
 for the potion that was to procure abortion, and swallowed it, with
 a wish that it might destroy me, at the same time that it stopped the
 sensations of new-born life, which I felt with indescribable emotion. My
 head turned round, my heart grew sick, and in the horrors of approaching
 dissolution, mental anguish was swallowed up. The effect of the medicine
 was violent, and I was confined to my bed several days; but, youth and
 a strong constitution prevailing, I once more crawled out, to ask myself
 the cruel question, 'Whither I should go?' I had but two shillings left
 in my pocket, the rest had been expended, by a poor woman who slept in
 the same room, to pay for my lodging, and purchase the necessaries of
 which she partook.
 
 "With this wretch I went into the neighbouring streets to beg, and my
 disconsolate appearance drew a few pence from the idle, enabling me
 still to command a bed; till, recovering from my illness, and taught
 to put on my rags to the best advantage, I was accosted from different
 motives, and yielded to the desire of the brutes I met, with the same
 detestation that I had felt for my still more brutal master. I have
 since read in novels of the blandishments of seduction, but I had not
 even the pleasure of being enticed into vice.
 
 "I shall not," interrupted Jemima, "lead your imagination into all the
 scenes of wretchedness and depravity, which I was condemned to view; or
 mark the different stages of my debasing misery. Fate dragged me through
 the very kennels of society: I was still a slave, a bastard, a common
 property. Become familiar with vice, for I wish to conceal nothing from
 you, I picked the pockets of the drunkards who abused me; and proved by
 my conduct, that I deserved the epithets, with which they loaded me at
 moments when distrust ought to cease.
 
 "Detesting my nightly occupation, though valuing, if I may so use the
 word, my independence, which only consisted in choosing the street in
 which I should wander, or the roof, when I had money, in which I should
 hide my head, I was some time before I could prevail on myself to accept
 of a place in a house of ill fame, to which a girl, with whom I had
 accidentally conversed in the street, had recommended me. I had been
 hunted almost into a fever, by the watchmen of the quarter of the town I
 frequented; one, whom I had unwittingly offended, giving the word to
 the whole pack. You can scarcely conceive the tyranny exercised by these
 wretches: considering themselves as the instruments of the very laws
 they violate, the pretext which steels their conscience, hardens their
 heart. Not content with receiving from us, outlaws of society (let
 other women talk of favours) a brutal gratification gratuitously as a
 privilege of office, they extort a tithe of prostitution, and harrass
 with threats the poor creatures whose occupation affords not the means
 to silence the growl of avarice. To escape from this persecution, I once
 more entered into servitude.
 
 "A life of comparative regularity restored my health; and--do not
 start--my manners were improved, in a situation where vice sought to
 render itself alluring, and taste was cultivated to fashion the person,
 if not to refine the mind. Besides, the common civility of speech,
 contrasted with the gross vulgarity to which I had been accustomed, was
 something like the polish of civilization. I was not shut out from all
 intercourse of humanity. Still I was galled by the yoke of service, and
 my mistress often flying into violent fits of passion, made me dread
 a sudden dismission, which I understood was always the case. I was
 therefore prevailed on, though I felt a horror of men, to accept the
 offer of a gentleman, rather in the decline of years, to keep his house,
 pleasantly situated in a little village near Hampstead.
 
 "He was a man of great talents, and of brilliant wit; but, a worn-out
 votary of voluptuousness, his desires became fastidious in proportion as
 they grew weak, and the native tenderness of his heart was undermined by
 a vitiated imagination. A thoughtless career of libertinism and social
 enjoyment, had injured his health to such a degree, that, whatever
 pleasure his conversation afforded me (and my esteem was ensured by
 proofs of the generous humanity of his disposition), the being his
 mistress was purchasing it at a very dear rate. With such a keen
 perception of the delicacies of sentiment, with an imagination
 invigorated by the exercise of genius, how could he sink into the
 grossness of sensuality!
 
 "But, to pass over a subject which I recollect with pain, I must remark
 to you, as an answer to your often-repeated question, 'Why my sentiments
 and language were superior to my station?' that I now began to read,
 to beguile the tediousness of solitude, and to gratify an inquisitive,
 active mind. I had often, in my childhood, followed a ballad-singer,
 to hear the sequel of a dismal story, though sure of being severely
 punished for delaying to return with whatever I was sent to purchase.
 I could just spell and put a sentence together, and I listened to the
 various arguments, though often mingled with obscenity, which occurred
 at the table where I was allowed to preside: for a literary friend or
 two frequently came home with my master, to dine and pass the night.
 Having lost the privileged respect of my sex, my presence, instead of
 restraining, perhaps gave the reins to their tongues; still I had the
 advantage of hearing discussions, from which, in the common course of
 life, women are excluded.
 
 "You may easily imagine, that it was only by degrees that I could
 comprehend some of the subjects they investigated, or acquire from their
 reasoning what might be termed a moral sense. But my fondness of reading
 increasing, and my master occasionally shutting himself up in this
 retreat, for weeks together, to write, I had many opportunities of
 improvement. At first, considering money (I was right!" exclaimed
 Jemima, altering her tone of voice) "as the only means, after my loss of
 reputation, of obtaining respect, or even the toleration of humanity, I
 had not the least scruple to secrete a part of the sums intrusted to
 me, and to screen myself from detection by a system of falshood. But,
 acquiring new principles, I began to have the ambition of returning
 to the respectable part of society, and was weak enough to suppose it
 possible. The attention of my unassuming instructor, who, without being
 ignorant of his own powers, possessed great simplicity of manners,
 strengthened the illusion. Having sometimes caught up hints for thought,
 from my untutored remarks, he often led me to discuss the subjects he
 was treating, and would read to me his productions, previous to their
 publication, wishing to profit by the criticism of unsophisticated
 feeling. The aim of his writings was to touch the simple springs of
 the heart; for he despised the would-be oracles, the self-elected
 philosophers, who fright away fancy, while sifting each grain of thought
 to prove that slowness of comprehension is wisdom.
 
 "I should have distinguished this as a moment of sunshine, a happy
 period in my life, had not the repugnance the disgusting libertinism of
 my protector inspired, daily become more painful.--And, indeed, I soon
 did recollect it as such with agony, when his sudden death (for he had
 recourse to the most exhilarating cordials to keep up the convivial tone
 of his spirits) again threw me into the desert of human society. Had he
 had any time for reflection, I am certain he would have left the little
 property in his power to me: but, attacked by the fatal apoplexy in
 town, his heir, a man of rigid morals, brought his wife with him to take
 possession of the house and effects, before I was even informed of his
 death,--'to prevent,' as she took care indirectly to tell me, 'such a
 creature as she supposed me to be, from purloining any of them, had I
 been apprized of the event in time.'
 
 "The grief I felt at the sudden shock the information gave me, which at
 first had nothing selfish in it, was treated with contempt, and I was
 ordered to pack up my clothes; and a few trinkets and books, given me by
 the generous deceased, were contested, while they piously hoped, with a
 reprobating shake of the head, 'that God would have mercy on his
 sinful soul!' With some difficulty, I obtained my arrears of wages;
 but asking--such is the spirit-grinding consequence of poverty and
 infamy--for a character for honesty and economy, which God knows I
 merited, I was told by this--why must I call her woman?--'that it would
 go against her conscience to recommend a kept mistress.' Tears started
 in my eyes, burning tears; for there are situations in which a wretch is
 humbled by the contempt they are conscious they do not deserve.
 
 "I returned to the metropolis; but the solitude of a poor lodging was
 inconceivably dreary, after the society I had enjoyed. To be cut off
 from human converse, now I had been taught to relish it, was to wander a
 ghost among the living. Besides, I foresaw, to aggravate the severity of
 my fate, that my little pittance would soon melt away. I endeavoured to
 obtain needlework; but, not having been taught early, and my hands
 being rendered clumsy by hard work, I did not sufficiently excel to
 be employed by the ready-made linen shops, when so many women, better
 qualified, were suing for it. The want of a character prevented my
 getting a place; for, irksome as servitude would have been to me,
 I should have made another trial, had it been feasible. Not that I
 disliked employment, but the inequality of condition to which I must
 have submitted. I had acquired a taste for literature, during the five
 years I had lived with a literary man, occasionally conversing with
 men of the first abilities of the age; and now to descend to the lowest
 vulgarity, was a degree of wretchedness not to be imagined unfelt. I had
 not, it is true, tasted the charms of affection, but I had been familiar
 with the graces of humanity.
 
 "One of the gentlemen, whom I had frequently dined in company with,
 while I was treated like a companion, met me in the street, and enquired
 after my health. I seized the occasion, and began to describe my
 situation; but he was in haste to join, at dinner, a select party of
 choice spirits; therefore, without waiting to hear me, he impatiently
 put a guinea into my hand, saying, 'It was a pity such a sensible woman
 should be in distress--he wished me well from his soul.'
 
 "To another I wrote, stating my case, and requesting advice. He was
 an advocate for unequivocal sincerity; and had often, in my presence,
 descanted on the evils which arise in society from the despotism of rank
 and riches.
 
 "In reply, I received a long essay on the energy of the human mind, with
 continual allusions to his own force of character. He added, 'That the
 woman who could write such a letter as I had sent him, could never be in
 want of resources, were she to look into herself, and exert her powers;
 misery was the consequence of indolence, and, as to my being shut out
 from society, it was the lot of man to submit to certain privations.'
 
 "How often have I heard," said Jemima, interrupting her narrative, "in
 conversation, and read in books, that every person willing to work may
 find employment? It is the vague assertion, I believe, of insensible
 indolence, when it relates to men; but, with respect to women, I am
 sure of its fallacy, unless they will submit to the most menial bodily
 labour; and even to be employed at hard labour is out of the reach of
 many, whose reputation misfortune or folly has tainted.
 
 "How writers, professing to be friends to freedom, and the improvement
 of morals, can assert that poverty is no evil, I cannot imagine."
 
 "No more can I," interrupted Maria, "yet they even expatiate on
 the peculiar happiness of indigence, though in what it can consist,
 excepting in brutal rest, when a man can barely earn a subsistence, I
 cannot imagine. The mind is necessarily imprisoned in its own little
 tenement; and, fully occupied by keeping it in repair, has not time to
 rove abroad for improvement. The book of knowledge is closely clasped,
 against those who must fulfil their daily task of severe manual labour
 or die; and curiosity, rarely excited by thought or information, seldom
 moves on the stagnate lake of ignorance."
 
 "As far as I have been able to observe," replied Jemima, "prejudices,
 caught up by chance, are obstinately maintained by the poor, to the
 exclusion of improvement; they have not time to reason or reflect to
 any extent, or minds sufficiently exercised to adopt the principles
 of action, which form perhaps the only basis of contentment in every
 station."*
 
      * The copy which appears to have received the author's
      last corrections, ends at this place. [Godwin's note]
 
 "And independence," said Darnford, "they are necessarily strangers to,
 even the independence of despising their persecutors. If the poor are
 happy, or can be happy, _things_ _are_ _very_ _well_ _as_ _they_ _are_.
 And I cannot conceive on what principle those writers contend for a
 change of system, who support this opinion. The authors on the other
 side of the question are much more consistent, who grant the fact; yet,
 insisting that it is the lot of the majority to be oppressed in this
 life, kindly turn them over to another, to rectify the false weights
 and measures of this, as the only way to justify the dispensations of
 Providence. I have not," continued Darnford, "an opinion more firmly
 fixed by observation in my mind, than that, though riches may fail to
 produce proportionate happiness, poverty most commonly excludes it, by
 shutting up all the avenues to improvement."
 
 "And as for the affections," added Maria, with a sigh, "how gross, and
 even tormenting do they become, unless regulated by an improving mind!
 The culture of the heart ever, I believe, keeps pace with that of the
 mind. But pray go on," addressing Jemima, "though your narrative gives
 rise to the most painful reflections on the present state of society."
 
 "Not to trouble you," continued she, "with a detailed description of all
 the painful feelings of unavailing exertion, I have only to tell you,
 that at last I got recommended to wash in a few families, who did me the
 favour to admit me into their houses, without the most strict enquiry,
 to wash from one in the morning till eight at night, for eighteen or
 twenty-pence a day. On the happiness to be enjoyed over a washing-tub
 I need not comment; yet you will allow me to observe, that this was
 a wretchedness of situation peculiar to my sex. A man with half my
 industry, and, I may say, abilities, could have procured a decent
 livelihood, and discharged some of the duties which knit mankind
 together; whilst I, who had acquired a taste for the rational, nay, in
 honest pride let me assert it, the virtuous enjoyments of life, was cast
 aside as the filth of society. Condemned to labour, like a machine, only
 to earn bread, and scarcely that, I became melancholy and desperate.
 
 "I have now to mention a circumstance which fills me with remorse, and
 fear it will entirely deprive me of your esteem. A tradesman became
 attached to me, and visited me frequently,--and I at last obtained
 such a power over him, that he offered to take me home to his
 house.--Consider, dear madam, I was famishing: wonder not that I became
 a wolf!--The only reason for not taking me home immediately, was the
 having a girl in the house, with child by him--and this girl--I advised
 him--yes, I did! would I could forget it!--to turn out of doors: and one
 night he determined to follow my advice. Poor wretch! She fell upon her
 knees, reminded him that he had promised to marry her, that her parents
 were honest!--What did it avail?--She was turned out.
 
 "She approached her father's door, in the skirts of London,--listened at
 the shutters,--but could not knock. A watchman had observed her go and
 return several times--Poor wretch!--[The remorse Jemima spoke of, seemed
 to be stinging her to the soul, as she proceeded.]
 
 "She left it, and, approaching a tub where horses were watered, she
 sat down in it, and, with desperate resolution, remained in that
 attitude--till resolution was no longer necessary!
 
 "I happened that morning to be going out to wash, anticipating the
 moment when I should escape from such hard labour. I passed by, just
 as some men, going to work, drew out the stiff, cold corpse--Let me not
 recall the horrid moment!--I recognized her pale visage; I listened to
 the tale told by the spectators, and my heart did not burst. I thought
 of my own state, and wondered how I could be such a monster!--I worked
 hard; and, returning home, I was attacked by a fever. I suffered both in
 body and mind. I determined not to live with the wretch. But he did not
 try me; he left the neighbourhood. I once more returned to the wash-tub.
 
 "Still this state, miserable as it was, admitted of aggravation. Lifting
 one day a heavy load, a tub fell against my shin, and gave me great
 pain. I did not pay much attention to the hurt, till it became a serious
 wound; being obliged to work as usual, or starve. But, finding myself
 at length unable to stand for any time, I thought of getting into an
 hospital. Hospitals, it should seem (for they are comfortless abodes for
 the sick) were expressly endowed for the reception of the friendless;
 yet I, who had on that plea a right to assistance, wanted the
 recommendation of the rich and respectable, and was several weeks
 languishing for admittance; fees were demanded on entering; and, what
 was still more unreasonable, security for burying me, that expence
 not coming into the letter of the charity. A guinea was the stipulated
 sum--I could as soon have raised a million; and I was afraid to apply
 to the parish for an order, lest they should have passed me, I knew
 not whither. The poor woman at whose house I lodged, compassionating
 my state, got me into the hospital; and the family where I received the
 hurt, sent me five shillings, three and six-pence of which I gave at my
 admittance--I know not for what.
 
 "My leg grew quickly better; but I was dismissed before my cure was
 completed, because I could not afford to have my linen washed to
 appear decently, as the virago of a nurse said, when the gentlemen (the
 surgeons) came. I cannot give you an adequate idea of the wretchedness
 of an hospital; every thing is left to the care of people intent on
 gain. The attendants seem to have lost all feeling of compassion in the
 bustling discharge of their offices; death is so familiar to them,
 that they are not anxious to ward it off. Every thing appeared to be
 conducted for the accommodation of the medical men and their pupils, who
 came to make experiments on the poor, for the benefit of the rich. One
 of the physicians, I must not forget to mention, gave me half-a-crown,
 and ordered me some wine, when I was at the lowest ebb. I thought
 of making my case known to the lady-like matron; but her forbidding
 countenance prevented me. She condescended to look on the patients, and
 make general enquiries, two or three times a week; but the nurses knew
 the hour when the visit of ceremony would commence, and every thing was
 as it should be.
 
 "After my dismission, I was more at a loss than ever for a subsistence,
 and, not to weary you with a repetition of the same unavailing attempts,
 unable to stand at the washing-tub, I began to consider the rich and
 poor as natural enemies, and became a thief from principle. I could
 not now cease to reason, but I hated mankind. I despised myself, yet I
 justified my conduct. I was taken, tried, and condemned to six months'
 imprisonment in a house of correction. My soul recoils with horror
 from the remembrance of the insults I had to endure, till, branded with
 shame, I was turned loose in the street, pennyless. I wandered from
 street to street, till, exhausted by hunger and fatigue, I sunk down
 senseless at a door, where I had vainly demanded a morsel of bread. I
 was sent by the inhabitant to the work-house, to which he had surlily
 bid me go, saying, he 'paid enough in conscience to the poor,' when,
 with parched tongue, I implored his charity. If those well-meaning
 people who exclaim against beggars, were acquainted with the treatment
 the poor receive in many of these wretched asylums, they would not
 stifle so easily involuntary sympathy, by saying that they have all
 parishes to go to, or wonder that the poor dread to enter the gloomy
 walls. What are the common run of workhouses, but prisons, in which many
 respectable old people, worn out by immoderate labour, sink into the
 grave in sorrow, to which they are carried like dogs!"
 
 Alarmed by some indistinct noise, Jemima rose hastily to listen, and
 Maria, turning to Darnford, said, "I have indeed been shocked beyond
 expression when I have met a pauper's funeral. A coffin carried on the
 shoulders of three or four ill-looking wretches, whom the imagination
 might easily convert into a band of assassins, hastening to conceal the
 corpse, and quarrelling about the prey on their way. I know it is of
 little consequence how we are consigned to the earth; but I am led by
 this brutal insensibility, to what even the animal creation appears
 forcibly to feel, to advert to the wretched, deserted manner in which
 they died."
 
 "True," rejoined Darnford, "and, till the rich will give more than a
 part of their wealth, till they will give time and attention to the
 wants of the distressed, never let them boast of charity. Let them
 open their hearts, and not their purses, and employ their minds in
 the service, if they are really actuated by humanity; or charitable
 institutions will always be the prey of the lowest order of knaves."
 
 Jemima returning, seemed in haste to finish her tale. "The overseer
 farmed the poor of different parishes, and out of the bowels of poverty
 was wrung the money with which he purchased this dwelling, as a private
 receptacle for madness. He had been a keeper at a house of the same
 description, and conceived that he could make money much more readily
 in his old occupation. He is a shrewd--shall I say it?--villain. He
 observed something resolute in my manner, and offered to take me with
 him, and instruct me how to treat the disturbed minds he meant to
 intrust to my care. The offer of forty pounds a year, and to quit a
 workhouse, was not to be despised, though the condition of shutting my
 eyes and hardening my heart was annexed to it.
 
 "I agreed to accompany him; and four years have I been attendant on many
 wretches, and"--she lowered her voice,--"the witness of many enormities.
 In solitude my mind seemed to recover its force, and many of the
 sentiments which I imbibed in the only tolerable period of my life,
 returned with their full force. Still what should induce me to be the
 champion for suffering humanity?--Who ever risked any thing for me?--Who
 ever acknowledged me to be a fellow-creature?"--
 
 Maria took her hand, and Jemima, more overcome by kindness than she had
 ever been by cruelty, hastened out of the room to conceal her emotions.
 
 Darnford soon after heard his summons, and, taking leave of him, Maria
 promised to gratify his curiosity, with respect to herself, the first
 opportunity.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 6
 
 
 ACTIVE as love was in the heart of Maria, the story she had just heard
 made her thoughts take a wider range. The opening buds of hope closed,
 as if they had put forth too early, and the the happiest day of her life
 was overcast by the most melancholy reflections. Thinking of Jemima's
 peculiar fate and her own, she was led to consider the oppressed state
 of women, and to lament that she had given birth to a daughter.
 Sleep fled from her eyelids, while she dwelt on the wretchedness of
 unprotected infancy, till sympathy with Jemima changed to agony, when
 it seemed probable that her own babe might even now be in the very state
 she so forcibly described.
 
 Maria thought, and thought again. Jemima's humanity had rather been
 benumbed than killed, by the keen frost she had to brave at her entrance
 into life; an appeal then to her feelings, on this tender point, surely
 would not be fruitless; and Maria began to anticipate the delight it
 would afford her to gain intelligence of her child. This project was now
 the only subject of reflection; and she watched impatiently for the dawn
 of day, with that determinate purpose which generally insures success.
 
 At the usual hour, Jemima brought her breakfast, and a tender note from
 Darnford. She ran her eye hastily over it, and her heart calmly hoarded
 up the rapture a fresh assurance of affection, affection such as she
 wished to inspire, gave her, without diverting her mind a moment from
 its design. While Jemima waited to take away the breakfast, Maria
 alluded to the reflections, that had haunted her during the night to
 the exclusion of sleep. She spoke with energy of Jemima's unmerited
 sufferings, and of the fate of a number of deserted females, placed
 within the sweep of a whirlwind, from which it was next to impossible
 to escape. Perceiving the effect her conversation produced on the
 countenance of her guard, she grasped the arm of Jemima with that
 irresistible warmth which defies repulse, exclaiming--"With your heart,
 and such dreadful experience, can you lend your aid to deprive my babe
 of a mother's tenderness, a mother's care? In the name of God, assist me
 to snatch her from destruction! Let me but give her an education--let me
 but prepare her body and mind to encounter the ills which await her sex,
 and I will teach her to consider you as her second mother, and herself
 as the prop of your age. Yes, Jemima, look at me--observe me closely,
 and read my very soul; you merit a better fate;" she held out her hand
 with a firm gesture of assurance; "and I will procure it for you, as a
 testimony of my esteem, as well as of my gratitude."
 
 Jemima had not power to resist this persuasive torrent; and, owning that
 the house in which she was confined, was situated on the banks of the
 Thames, only a few miles from London, and not on the sea-coast, as
 Darnford had supposed, she promised to invent some excuse for her
 absence, and go herself to trace the situation, and enquire concerning
 the health, of this abandoned daughter. Her manner implied an intention
 to do something more, but she seemed unwilling to impart her design; and
 Maria, glad to have obtained the main point, thought it best to leave
 her to the workings of her own mind; convinced that she had the power of
 interesting her still more in favour of herself and child, by a simple
 recital of facts.
 
 In the evening, Jemima informed the impatient mother, that on the morrow
 she should hasten to town before the family hour of rising, and received
 all the information necessary, as a clue to her search. The "Good
 night!" Maria uttered was peculiarly solemn and affectionate. Glad
 expectation sparkled in her eye; and, for the first time since her
 detention, she pronounced the name of her child with pleasureable
 fondness; and, with all the garrulity of a nurse, described her first
 smile when she recognized her mother. Recollecting herself, a still
 kinder "Adieu!" with a "God bless you!"--that seemed to include a
 maternal benediction, dismissed Jemima.
 
 The dreary solitude of the ensuing day, lengthened by impatiently
 dwelling on the same idea, was intolerably wearisome. She listened
 for the sound of a particular clock, which some directions of the wind
 allowed her to hear distinctly. She marked the shadow gaining on
 the wall; and, twilight thickening into darkness, her breath seemed
 oppressed while she anxiously counted nine.--The last sound was a stroke
 of despair on her heart; for she expected every moment, without seeing
 Jemima, to have her light extinguished by the savage female who supplied
 her place. She was even obliged to prepare for bed, restless as she was,
 not to disoblige her new attendant. She had been cautioned not to speak
 too freely to her; but the caution was needless, her countenance would
 still more emphatically have made her shrink back. Such was the ferocity
 of manner, conspicuous in every word and gesture of this hag, that Maria
 was afraid to enquire, why Jemima, who had faithfully promised to see
 her before her door was shut for the night, came not?--and, when the key
 turned in the lock, to consign her to a night of suspence, she felt a
 degree of anguish which the circumstances scarcely justified.
 
 Continually on the watch, the shutting of a door, or the sound of a
 foot-step, made her start and tremble with apprehension, something like
 what she felt, when, at her entrance, dragged along the gallery, she
 began to doubt whether she were not surrounded by demons?
 
 Fatigued by an endless rotation of thought and wild alarms, she looked
 like a spectre, when Jemima entered in the morning; especially as her
 eyes darted out of her head, to read in Jemima's countenance, almost
 as pallid, the intelligence she dared not trust her tongue to demand.
 Jemima put down the tea-things, and appeared very busy in arranging the
 table. Maria took up a cup with trembling hand, then forcibly recovering
 her fortitude, and restraining the convulsive movement which agitated
 the muscles of her mouth, she said, "Spare yourself the pain of
 preparing me for your information, I adjure you!--My child is dead!"
 Jemima solemnly answered, "Yes;" with a look expressive of compassion
 and angry emotions. "Leave me," added Maria, making a fresh effort to
 govern her feelings, and hiding her face in her handkerchief, to conceal
 her anguish--"It is enough--I know that my babe is no more--I will hear
 the particulars when I am"--calmer, she could not utter; and Jemima,
 without importuning her by idle attempts to console her, left the room.
 
 Plunged in the deepest melancholy, she would not admit Darnford's
 visits; and such is the force of early associations even on strong
 minds, that, for a while, she indulged the superstitious notion that she
 was justly punished by the death of her child, for having for an instant
 ceased to regret her loss. Two or three letters from Darnford, full
 of soothing, manly tenderness, only added poignancy to these accusing
 emotions; yet the passionate style in which he expressed, what he termed
 the first and fondest wish of his heart, "that his affection might make
 her some amends for the cruelty and injustice she had endured," inspired
 a sentiment of gratitude to heaven; and her eyes filled with delicious
 tears, when, at the conclusion of his letter, wishing to supply the
 place of her unworthy relations, whose want of principle he execrated,
 he assured her, calling her his dearest girl, "that it should henceforth
 be the business of his life to make her happy."
 
 He begged, in a note sent the following morning, to be permitted to
 see her, when his presence would be no intrusion on her grief, and so
 earnestly intreated to be allowed, according to promise, to beguile the
 tedious moments of absence, by dwelling on the events of her past life,
 that she sent him the memoirs which had been written for her daughter,
 promising Jemima the perusal as soon as he returned them.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 7
 
 
 "ADDRESSING these memoirs to you, my child, uncertain whether I shall
 ever have an opportunity of instructing you, many observations will
 probably flow from my heart, which only a mother--a mother schooled in
 misery, could make.
 
 "The tenderness of a father who knew the world, might be great; but
 could it equal that of a mother--of a mother, labouring under a portion
 of the misery, which the constitution of society seems to have entailed
 on all her kind? It is, my child, my dearest daughter, only such a
 mother, who will dare to break through all restraint to provide for
 your happiness--who will voluntarily brave censure herself, to ward off
 sorrow from your bosom. From my narrative, my dear girl, you may gather
 the instruction, the counsel, which is meant rather to exercise than
 influence your mind.--Death may snatch me from you, before you can weigh
 my advice, or enter into my reasoning: I would then, with fond anxiety,
 lead you very early in life to form your grand principle of action, to
 save you from the vain regret of having, through irresolution, let
 the spring-tide of existence pass away, unimproved, unenjoyed.--Gain
 experience--ah! gain it--while experience is worth having, and acquire
 sufficient fortitude to pursue your own happiness; it includes your
 utility, by a direct path. What is wisdom too often, but the owl of the
 goddess, who sits moping in a desolated heart; around me she shrieks,
 but I would invite all the gay warblers of spring to nestle in your
 blooming bosom.--Had I not wasted years in deliberating, after I
 ceased to doubt, how I ought to have acted--I might now be useful and
 happy.--For my sake, warned by my example, always appear what you are,
 and you will not pass through existence without enjoying its genuine
 blessings, love and respect.
 
 "Born in one of the most romantic parts of England, an enthusiastic
 fondness for the varying charms of nature is the first sentiment I
 recollect; or rather it was the first consciousness of pleasure that
 employed and formed my imagination.
 
 "My father had been a captain of a man of war; but, disgusted with the
 service, on account of the preferment of men whose chief merit was their
 family connections or borough interest, he retired into the country;
 and, not knowing what to do with himself--married. In his family, to
 regain his lost consequence, he determined to keep up the same passive
 obedience, as in the vessels in which he had commanded. His orders were
 not to be disputed; and the whole house was expected to fly, at the word
 of command, as if to man the shrouds, or mount aloft in an elemental
 strife, big with life or death. He was to be instantaneously obeyed,
 especially by my mother, whom he very benevolently married for love;
 but took care to remind her of the obligation, when she dared, in
 the slightest instance, to question his absolute authority. My eldest
 brother, it is true, as he grew up, was treated with more respect by
 my father; and became in due form the deputy-tyrant of the house. The
 representative of my father, a being privileged by nature--a boy, and
 the darling of my mother, he did not fail to act like an heir apparent.
 Such indeed was my mother's extravagant partiality, that, in comparison
 with her affection for him, she might be said not to love the rest
 of her children. Yet none of the children seemed to have so little
 affection for her. Extreme indulgence had rendered him so selfish, that
 he only thought of himself; and from tormenting insects and animals, he
 became the despot of his brothers, and still more of his sisters.
 
 "It is perhaps difficult to give you an idea of the petty cares which
 obscured the morning of my life; continual restraint in the most trivial
 matters; unconditional submission to orders, which, as a mere child,
 I soon discovered to be unreasonable, because inconsistent and
 contradictory. Thus are we destined to experience a mixture of
 bitterness, with the recollection of our most innocent enjoyments.
 
 "The circumstances which, during my childhood, occurred to fashion my
 mind, were various; yet, as it would probably afford me more pleasure
 to revive the fading remembrance of newborn delight, than you, my child,
 could feel in the perusal, I will not entice you to stray with me
 into the verdant meadow, to search for the flowers that youthful hopes
 scatter in every path; though, as I write, I almost scent the fresh
 green of spring--of that spring which never returns!
 
 "I had two sisters, and one brother, younger than myself, my brother
 Robert was two years older, and might truly be termed the idol of his
 parents, and the torment of the rest of the family. Such indeed is the
 force of prejudice, that what was called spirit and wit in him, was
 cruelly repressed as forwardness in me.
 
 "My mother had an indolence of character, which prevented her from
 paying much attention to our education. But the healthy breeze of a
 neighbouring heath, on which we bounded at pleasure, volatilized the
 humours that improper food might have generated. And to enjoy open
 air and freedom, was paradise, after the unnatural restraint of our
 fireside, where we were often obliged to sit three or four hours
 together, without daring to utter a word, when my father was out
 of humour, from want of employment, or of a variety of boisterous
 amusement. I had however one advantage, an instructor, the brother of my
 father, who, intended for the church, had of course received a liberal
 education. But, becoming attached to a young lady of great beauty and
 large fortune, and acquiring in the world some opinions not consonant
 with the profession for which he was designed, he accepted, with the
 most sanguine expectations of success, the offer of a nobleman to
 accompany him to India, as his confidential secretary.
 
 "A correspondence was regularly kept up with the object of his
 affection; and the intricacies of business, peculiarly wearisome to a
 man of a romantic turn of mind, contributed, with a forced absence,
 to increase his attachment. Every other passion was lost in this
 master-one, and only served to swell the torrent. Her relations, such
 were his waking dreams, who had despised him, would court in their turn
 his alliance, and all the blandishments of taste would grace the triumph
 of love.--While he basked in the warm sunshine of love, friendship also
 promised to shed its dewy freshness; for a friend, whom he loved next to
 his mistress, was the confident, who forwarded the letters from one to
 the other, to elude the observation of prying relations. A friend false
 in similar circumstances, is, my dearest girl, an old tale; yet, let not
 this example, or the frigid caution of coldblooded moralists, make you
 endeavour to stifle hopes, which are the buds that naturally unfold
 themselves during the spring of life! Whilst your own heart is sincere,
 always expect to meet one glowing with the same sentiments; for to fly
 from pleasure, is not to avoid pain!
 
 "My uncle realized, by good luck, rather than management, a handsome
 fortune; and returning on the wings of love, lost in the most enchanting
 reveries, to England, to share it with his mistress and his friend, he
 found them--united.
 
 "There were some circumstances, not necessary for me to recite, which
 aggravated the guilt of the friend beyond measure, and the deception,
 that had been carried on to the last moment, was so base, it produced
 the most violent effect on my uncle's health and spirits. His native
 country, the world! lately a garden of blooming sweets, blasted by
 treachery, seemed changed into a parched desert, the abode of hissing
 serpents. Disappointment rankled in his heart; and, brooding over his
 wrongs, he was attacked by a raging fever, followed by a derangement of
 mind, which only gave place to habitual melancholy, as he recovered more
 strength of body.
 
 "Declaring an intention never to marry, his relations were ever
 clustering about him, paying the grossest adulation to a man, who,
 disgusted with mankind, received them with scorn, or bitter sarcasms.
 Something in my countenance pleased him, when I began to prattle. Since
 his return, he appeared dead to affection; but I soon, by showing him
 innocent fondness, became a favourite; and endeavouring to enlarge and
 strengthen my mind, I grew dear to him in proportion as I imbibed his
 sentiments. He had a forcible manner of speaking, rendered more so by
 a certain impressive wildness of look and gesture, calculated to engage
 the attention of a young and ardent mind. It is not then surprising that
 I quickly adopted his opinions in preference, and reverenced him as
 one of a superior order of beings. He inculcated, with great warmth,
 self-respect, and a lofty consciousness of acting right, independent of
 the censure or applause of the world; nay, he almost taught me to brave,
 and even despise its censure, when convinced of the rectitude of my own
 intentions.
 
 "Endeavouring to prove to me that nothing which deserved the name of
 love or friendship, existed in the world, he drew such animated pictures
 of his own feelings, rendered permanent by disappointment, as imprinted
 the sentiments strongly on my heart, and animated my imagination. These
 remarks are necessary to elucidate some peculiarities in my character,
 which by the world are indefinitely termed romantic.
 
 "My uncle's increasing affection led him to visit me often. Still,
 unable to rest in any place, he did not remain long in the country to
 soften domestic tyranny; but he brought me books, for which I had a
 passion, and they conspired with his conversation, to make me form an
 ideal picture of life. I shall pass over the tyranny of my father, much
 as I suffered from it; but it is necessary to notice, that it undermined
 my mother's health; and that her temper, continually irritated by
 domestic bickering, became intolerably peevish.
 
 "My eldest brother was articled to a neighbouring attorney, the
 shrewdest, and, I may add, the most unprincipled man in that part of the
 country. As my brother generally came home every Saturday, to astonish
 my mother by exhibiting his attainments, he gradually assumed a right of
 directing the whole family, not excepting my father. He seemed to take a
 peculiar pleasure in tormenting and humbling me; and if I ever ventured
 to complain of this treatment to either my father or mother, I was
 rudely rebuffed for presuming to judge of the conduct of my eldest
 brother.
 
 "About this period a merchant's family came to settle in our
 neighbourhood. A mansion-house in the village, lately purchased, had
 been preparing the whole spring, and the sight of the costly furniture,
 sent from London, had excited my mother's envy, and roused my father's
 pride. My sensations were very different, and all of a pleasurable kind.
 I longed to see new characters, to break the tedious monotony of my
 life; and to find a friend, such as fancy had pourtrayed. I cannot then
 describe the emotion I felt, the Sunday they made their appearance at
 church. My eyes were rivetted on the pillar round which I expected
 first to catch a glimpse of them, and darted forth to meet a servant who
 hastily preceded a group of ladies, whose white robes and waving plumes,
 seemed to stream along the gloomy aisle, diffusing the light, by which I
 contemplated their figures.
 
 "We visited them in form; and I quickly selected the eldest daughter
 for my friend. The second son, George, paid me particular attention, and
 finding his attainments and manners superior to those of the young men
 of the village, I began to imagine him superior to the rest of mankind.
 Had my home been more comfortable, or my previous acquaintance more
 numerous, I should not probably have been so eager to open my heart to
 new affections.
 
 "Mr. Venables, the merchant, had acquired a large fortune by unremitting
 attention to business; but his health declining rapidly, he was obliged
 to retire, before his son, George, had acquired sufficient experience,
 to enable him to conduct their affairs on the same prudential plan, his
 father had invariably pursued. Indeed, he had laboured to throw off his
 authority, having despised his narrow plans and cautious speculation.
 The eldest son could not be prevailed on to enter the firm; and, to
 oblige his wife, and have peace in the house, Mr. Venables had purchased
 a commission for him in the guards.
 
 "I am now alluding to circumstances which came to my knowledge long
 after; but it is necessary, my dearest child, that you should know the
 character of your father, to prevent your despising your mother; the
 only parent inclined to discharge a parent's duty. In London, George had
 acquired habits of libertinism, which he carefully concealed from his
 father and his commercial connections. The mask he wore, was so complete
 a covering of his real visage, that the praise his father lavished on
 his conduct, and, poor mistaken man! on his principles, contrasted with
 his brother's, rendered the notice he took of me peculiarly flattering.
 Without any fixed design, as I am now convinced, he continued to single
 me out at the dance, press my hand at parting, and utter expressions of
 unmeaning passion, to which I gave a meaning naturally suggested by the
 romantic turn of my thoughts. His stay in the country was short; his
 manners did not entirely please me; but, when he left us, the colouring
 of my picture became more vivid--Whither did not my imagination lead me?
 In short, I fancied myself in love--in love with the disinterestedness,
 fortitude, generosity, dignity, and humanity, with which I had invested
 the hero I dubbed. A circumstance which soon after occurred, rendered
 all these virtues palpable. [The incident is perhaps worth relating on
 other accounts, and therefore I shall describe it distinctly.]
 
 "I had a great affection for my nurse, old Mary, for whom I used often
 to work, to spare her eyes. Mary had a younger sister, married to a
 sailor, while she was suckling me; for my mother only suckled my eldest
 brother, which might be the cause of her extraordinary partiality.
 Peggy, Mary's sister, lived with her, till her husband, becoming a mate
 in a West-Indian trader, got a little before-hand in the world. He
 wrote to his wife from the first port in the Channel, after his most
 successful voyage, to request her to come to London to meet him; he even
 wished her to determine on living there for the future, to save him
 the trouble of coming to her the moment he came on shore; and to turn a
 penny by keeping a green-stall. It was too much to set out on a journey
 the moment he had finished a voyage, and fifty miles by land, was worse
 than a thousand leagues by sea.
 
 "She packed up her alls, and came to London--but did not meet honest
 Daniel. A common misfortune prevented her, and the poor are bound to
 suffer for the good of their country--he was pressed in the river--and
 never came on shore.
 
 "Peggy was miserable in London, not knowing, as she said, 'the face
 of any living soul.' Besides, her imagination had been employed,
 anticipating a month or six weeks' happiness with her husband. Daniel
 was to have gone with her to Sadler's Wells, and Westminster Abbey, and
 to many sights, which he knew she never heard of in the country. Peggy
 too was thrifty, and how could she manage to put his plan in execution
 alone? He had acquaintance; but she did not know the very name of their
 places of abode. His letters were made up of--How do you does, and God
 bless yous,--information was reserved for the hour of meeting.
 
 "She too had her portion of information, near at heart. Molly and Jacky
 were grown such little darlings, she was almost angry that daddy did not
 see their tricks. She had not half the pleasure she should have had from
 their prattle, could she have recounted to him each night the pretty
 speeches of the day. Some stories, however, were stored up--and Jacky
 could say papa with such a sweet voice, it must delight his heart. Yet
 when she came, and found no Daniel to greet her, when Jacky called papa,
 she wept, bidding 'God bless his innocent soul, that did not know what
 sorrow was.'--But more sorrow was in store for Peggy, innocent as she
 was.--Daniel was killed in the first engagement, and then the papa was
 agony, sounding to the heart.
 
 "She had lived sparingly on his wages, while there was any hope of
 his return; but, that gone, she returned with a breaking heart to the
 country, to a little market town, nearly three miles from our village.
 She did not like to go to service, to be snubbed about, after being her
 own mistress. To put her children out to nurse was impossible: how far
 would her wages go? and to send them to her husband's parish, a distant
 one, was to lose her husband twice over.
 
 "I had heard all from Mary, and made my uncle furnish a little cottage
 for her, to enable her to sell--so sacred was poor Daniel's advice, now
 he was dead and gone a little fruit, toys and cakes. The minding of the
 shop did not require her whole time, nor even the keeping her children
 clean, and she loved to see them clean; so she took in washing, and
 altogether made a shift to earn bread for her children, still weeping
 for Daniel, when Jacky's arch looks made her think of his father.--It
 was pleasant to work for her children.--'Yes; from morning till night,
 could she have had a kiss from their father, God rest his soul! Yes; had
 it pleased Providence to have let him come back without a leg or an
 arm, it would have been the same thing to her--for she did not love him
 because he maintained them--no; she had hands of her own.'
 
 "The country people were honest, and Peggy left her linen out to dry
 very late. A recruiting party, as she supposed, passing through, made
 free with a large wash; for it was all swept away, including her own and
 her children's little stock.
 
 "This was a dreadful blow; two dozen of shirts, stocks and
 handkerchiefs. She gave the money which she had laid by for half a
 year's rent, and promised to pay two shillings a week till all was
 cleared; so she did not lose her employment. This two shillings a week,
 and the buying a few necessaries for the children, drove her so hard,
 that she had not a penny to pay her rent with, when a twelvemonth's
 became due.
 
 "She was now with Mary, and had just told her tale, which Mary instantly
 repeated--it was intended for my ear. Many houses in this town,
 producing a borough-interest, were included in the estate purchased by
 Mr. Venables, and the attorney with whom my brother lived, was appointed
 his agent, to collect and raise the rents.
 
 "He demanded Peggy's, and, in spite of her intreaties, her poor goods
 had been seized and sold. So that she had not, and what was worse her
 children, 'for she had known sorrow enough,' a bed to lie on. She knew
 that I was good-natured--right charitable, yet not liking to ask for
 more than needs must, she scorned to petition while people could any how
 be made to wait. But now, should she be turned out of doors, she must
 expect nothing less than to lose all her customers, and then she must
 beg or starve--and what would become of her children?--'had Daniel not
 been pressed--but God knows best--all this could not have happened.'
 
 "I had two mattresses on my bed; what did I want with two, when such a
 worthy creature must lie on the ground? My mother would be angry, but I
 could conceal it till my uncle came down; and then I would tell him all
 the whole truth, and if he absolved me, heaven would.
 
 "I begged the house-maid to come up stairs with me (servants always feel
 for the distresses of poverty, and so would the rich if they knew what
 it was). She assisted me to tie up the mattrass; I discovering, at the
 same time, that one blanket would serve me till winter, could I persuade
 my sister, who slept with me, to keep my secret. She entering in the
 midst of the package, I gave her some new feathers, to silence her.
 We got the mattrass down the back stairs, unperceived, and I helped to
 carry it, taking with me all the money I had, and what I could borrow
 from my sister.
 
 "When I got to the cottage, Peggy declared that she would not take what
 I had brought secretly; but, when, with all the eager eloquence inspired
 by a decided purpose, I grasped her hand with weeping eyes, assuring her
 that my uncle would screen me from blame, when he was once more in the
 country, describing, at the same time, what she would suffer in parting
 with her children, after keeping them so long from being thrown on the
 parish, she reluctantly consented.
 
 "My project of usefulness ended not here; I determined to speak to
 the attorney; he frequently paid me compliments. His character did not
 intimidate me; but, imagining that Peggy must be mistaken, and that
 no man could turn a deaf ear to such a tale of complicated distress, I
 determined to walk to the town with Mary the next morning, and request
 him to wait for the rent, and keep my secret, till my uncle's return.
 
 "My repose was sweet; and, waking with the first dawn of day, I bounded
 to Mary's cottage. What charms do not a light heart spread over nature!
 Every bird that twittered in a bush, every flower that enlivened the
 hedge, seemed placed there to awaken me to rapture--yes; to rapture.
 The present moment was full fraught with happiness; and on futurity
 I bestowed not a thought, excepting to anticipate my success with the
 attorney.
 
 "This man of the world, with rosy face and simpering features, received
 me politely, nay kindly; listened with complacency to my remonstrances,
 though he scarcely heeded Mary's tears. I did not then suspect, that my
 eloquence was in my complexion, the blush of seventeen, or that, in
 a world where humanity to women is the characteristic of advancing
 civilization, the beauty of a young girl was so much more interesting
 than the distress of an old one. Pressing my hand, he promised to let
 Peggy remain in the house as long as I wished.--I more than returned
 the pressure--I was so grateful and so happy. Emboldened by my innocent
 warmth, he then kissed me--and I did not draw back--I took it for a kiss
 of charity.
 
 "Gay as a lark, I went to dine at Mr. Venables'. I had previously
 obtained five shillings from my father, towards re-clothing the poor
 children of my care, and prevailed on my mother to take one of the girls
 into the house, whom I determined to teach to work and read.
 
 "After dinner, when the younger part of the circle retired to the music
 room, I recounted with energy my tale; that is, I mentioned Peggy's
 distress, without hinting at the steps I had taken to relieve her. Miss
 Venables gave me half-a-crown; the heir five shillings; but George sat
 unmoved. I was cruelly distressed by the disappointment--I scarcely
 could remain on my chair; and, could I have got out of the room
 unperceived, I should have flown home, as if to run away from myself.
 After several vain attempts to rise, I leaned my head against the marble
 chimney-piece, and gazing on the evergreens that filled the fire-place,
 moralized on the vanity of human expectations; regardless of the
 company. I was roused by a gentle tap on my shoulder from behind
 Charlotte's chair. I turned my head, and George slid a guinea into my
 hand, putting his finger to his mouth, to enjoin me silence.
 
 "What a revolution took place, not only in my train of thoughts, but
 feelings! I trembled with emotion--now, indeed, I was in love. Such
 delicacy too, to enhance his benevolence! I felt in my pocket every five
 minutes, only to feel the guinea; and its magic touch invested my hero
 with more than mortal beauty. My fancy had found a basis to erect its
 model of perfection on; and quickly went to work, with all the happy
 credulity of youth, to consider that heart as devoted to virtue, which
 had only obeyed a virtuous impulse. The bitter experience was yet to
 come, that has taught me how very distinct are the principles of virtue,
 from the casual feelings from which they germinate."
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 8
 
 
 "I HAVE perhaps dwelt too long on a circumstance, which is only of
 importance as it marks the progress of a deception that has been so
 fatal to my peace; and introduces to your notice a poor girl, whom,
 intending to serve, I led to ruin. Still it is probable that I was
 not entirely the victim of mistake; and that your father, gradually
 fashioned by the world, did not quickly become what I hesitate to call
 him--out of respect to my daughter.
 
 "But, to hasten to the more busy scenes of my life. Mr. Venables and my
 mother died the same summer; and, wholly engrossed by my attention to
 her, I thought of little else. The neglect of her darling, my brother
 Robert, had a violent effect on her weakened mind; for, though boys may
 be reckoned the pillars of the house without doors, girls are often
 the only comfort within. They but too frequently waste their health
 and spirits attending a dying parent, who leaves them in comparative
 poverty. After closing, with filial piety, a father's eyes, they are
 chased from the paternal roof, to make room for the first-born, the
 son, who is to carry the empty family-name down to posterity; though,
 occupied with his own pleasures, he scarcely thought of discharging, in
 the decline of his parent's life, the debt contracted in his childhood.
 My mother's conduct led me to make these reflections. Great as was the
 fatigue I endured, and the affection my unceasing solicitude evinced, of
 which my mother seemed perfectly sensible, still, when my brother, whom
 I could hardly persuade to remain a quarter of an hour in her chamber,
 was with her alone, a short time before her death, she gave him a little
 hoard, which she had been some years accumulating.
 
 "During my mother's illness, I was obliged to manage my father's temper,
 who, from the lingering nature of her malady, began to imagine that
 it was merely fancy. At this period, an artful kind of upper servant
 attracted my father's attention, and the neighbours made many remarks
 on the finery, not honestly got, exhibited at evening service. But I was
 too much occupied with my mother to observe any change in her dress or
 behaviour, or to listen to the whisper of scandal.
 
 "I shall not dwell on the death-bed scene, lively as is the remembrance,
 or on the emotion produced by the last grasp of my mother's cold hand;
 when blessing me, she added, 'A little patience, and all will be over!'
 Ah! my child, how often have those words rung mournfully in my ears--and
 I have exclaimed--'A little more patience, and I too shall be at rest!'
 
 "My father was violently affected by her death, recollected instances of
 his unkindness, and wept like a child.
 
 "My mother had solemnly recommended my sisters to my care, and bid me
 be a mother to them. They, indeed, became more dear to me as they became
 more forlorn; for, during my mother's illness, I discovered the ruined
 state of my father's circumstances, and that he had only been able to
 keep up appearances, by the sums which he borrowed of my uncle.
 
 "My father's grief, and consequent tenderness to his children, quickly
 abated, the house grew still more gloomy or riotous; and my refuge from
 care was again at Mr. Venables'; the young 'squire having taken his
 father's place, and allowing, for the present, his sister to preside at
 his table. George, though dissatisfied with his portion of the fortune,
 which had till lately been all in trade, visited the family as usual.
 He was now full of speculations in trade, and his brow became clouded by
 care. He seemed to relax in his attention to me, when the presence of
 my uncle gave a new turn to his behaviour. I was too unsuspecting, too
 disinterested, to trace these changes to their source.
 
 "My home every day became more and more disagreeable to me; my liberty
 was unnecessarily abridged, and my books, on the pretext that they made
 me idle, taken from me. My father's mistress was with child, and he,
 doating on her, allowed or overlooked her vulgar manner of tyrannizing
 over us. I was indignant, especially when I saw her endeavouring to
 attract, shall I say seduce? my younger brother. By allowing women but
 one way of rising in the world, the fostering the libertinism of men,
 society makes monsters of them, and then their ignoble vices are brought
 forward as a proof of inferiority of intellect.
 
 "The wearisomeness of my situation can scarcely be described. Though
 my life had not passed in the most even tenour with my mother, it was
 paradise to that I was destined to endure with my father's mistress,
 jealous of her illegitimate authority. My father's former occasional
 tenderness, in spite of his violence of temper, had been soothing to
 me; but now he only met me with reproofs or portentous frowns. The
 house-keeper, as she was now termed, was the vulgar despot of the
 family; and assuming the new character of a fine lady, she could never
 forgive the contempt which was sometimes visible in my countenance, when
 she uttered with pomposity her bad English, or affected to be well bred.
 
 "To my uncle I ventured to open my heart; and he, with his wonted
 benevolence, began to consider in what manner he could extricate me out
 of my present irksome situation. In spite of his own disappointment,
 or, most probably, actuated by the feelings that had been petrified, not
 cooled, in all their sanguine fervour, like a boiling torrent of
 lava suddenly dash ing into the sea, he thought a marriage of mutual
 inclination (would envious stars permit it) the only chance for
 happiness in this disastrous world. George Venables had the reputation
 of being attentive to business, and my father's example gave great
 weight to this circumstance; for habits of order in business would, he
 conceived, extend to the regulation of the affections in domestic life.
 George seldom spoke in my uncle's company, except to utter a short,
 judicious question, or to make a pertinent remark, with all due
 deference to his superior judgment; so that my uncle seldom left his
 company without observing, that the young man had more in him than
 people supposed.
 
 "In this opinion he was not singular; yet, believe me, and I am not
 swayed by resentment, these speeches so justly poized, this silent
 deference, when the animal spirits of other young people were throwing
 off youthful ebullitions, were not the effect of thought or humility,
 but sheer barrenness of mind, and want of imagination. A colt of mettle
 will curvet and shew his paces. Yes; my dear girl, these prudent young
 men want all the fire necessary to ferment their faculties, and are
 characterized as wise, only because they are not foolish. It is true,
 that George was by no means so great a favourite of mine as during the
 first year of our acquaintance; still, as he often coincided in
 opinion with me, and echoed my sentiments; and having myself no other
 attachment, I heard with pleasure my uncle's proposal; but thought more
 of obtaining my freedom, than of my lover. But, when George, seemingly
 anxious for my happiness, pressed me to quit my present painful
 situation, my heart swelled with gratitude--I knew not that my uncle had
 promised him five thousand pounds.
 
 "Had this truly generous man mentioned his intention to me, I should
 have insisted on a thousand pounds being settled on each of my sisters;
 George would have contested; I should have seen his selfish soul;
 and--gracious God! have been spared the misery of discovering, when
 too late, that I was united to a heartless, unprincipled wretch. All my
 schemes of usefulness would not then have been blasted. The tenderness
 of my heart would not have heated my imagination with visions of the
 ineffable delight of happy love; nor would the sweet duty of a mother
 have been so cruelly interrupted.
 
 "But I must not suffer the fortitude I have so hardly acquired, to be
 undermined by unavailing regret. Let me hasten forward to describe the
 turbid stream in which I had to wade--but let me exultingly declare
 that it is passed--my soul holds fellowship with him no more. He cut
 the Gordian knot, which my principles, mistaken ones, respected; he
 dissolved the tie, the fetters rather, that ate into my very vitals--and
 I should rejoice, conscious that my mind is freed, though confined in
 hell itself, the only place that even fancy can imagine more dreadful
 than my present abode.
 
 "These varying emotions will not allow me to proceed. I heave sigh after
 sigh; yet my heart is still oppressed. For what am I reserved? Why was I
 not born a man, or why was I born at all?"
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 9
 
 
 "I RESUME my pen to fly from thought. I was married; and we hastened to
 London. I had purposed taking one of my sisters with me; for a strong
 motive for marrying, was the desire of having a home at which I could
 receive them, now their own grew so uncomfortable, as not to deserve the
 cheering appellation. An objection was made to her accompanying me,
 that appeared plausible; and I reluctantly acquiesced. I was however
 willingly allowed to take with me Molly, poor Peggy's daughter. London
 and preferment, are ideas commonly associated in the country; and, as
 blooming as May, she bade adieu to Peggy with weeping eyes. I did not
 even feel hurt at the refusal in relation to my sister, till hearing
 what my uncle had done for me, I had the simplicity to request, speaking
 with warmth of their situation, that he would give them a thousand
 pounds a-piece, which seemed to me but justice. He asked me, giving me
 a kiss, 'If I had lost my senses?' I started back, as if I had found
 a wasp in a rose-bush. I expostulated. He sneered: and the demon of
 discord entered our paradise, to poison with his pestiferous breath
 every opening joy.
 
 "I had sometimes observed defects in my husband's understanding; but,
 led astray by a prevailing opinion, that goodness of disposition is of
 the first importance in the relative situations of life, in proportion
 as I perceived the narrowness of his understanding, fancy enlarged the
 boundary of his heart. Fatal error! How quickly is the so much vaunted
 milkiness of nature turned into gall, by an intercourse with the world,
 if more generous juices do not sustain the vital source of virtue!
 
 "One trait in my character was extreme credulity; but, when my eyes
 were once opened, I saw but too clearly all I had before overlooked. My
 husband was sunk in my esteem; still there are youthful emotions, which,
 for a while, fill up the chasm of love and friendship. Besides, it
 required some time to enable me to see his whole character in a just
 light, or rather to allow it to become fixed. While circumstances were
 ripening my faculties, and cultivating my taste, commerce and gross
 relaxations were shutting his against any possibility of improvement,
 till, by stifling every spark of virtue in himself, he began to imagine
 that it no where existed.
 
 "Do not let me lead you astray, my child, I do not mean to assert, that
 any human being is entirely incapable of feeling the generous emotions,
 which are the foundation of every true principle of virtue; but they are
 frequently, I fear, so feeble, that, like the inflammable quality which
 more or less lurks in all bodies, they often lie for ever dormant; the
 circumstances never occurring, necessary to call them into action.
 
 "I discovered however by chance, that, in consequence of some losses in
 trade, the natural effect of his gambling desire to start suddenly into
 riches, the five thousand pounds given me by my uncle, had been
 paid very opportunely. This discovery, strange as you may think the
 assertion, gave me pleasure; my husband's embarrassments endeared him to
 me. I was glad to find an excuse for his conduct to my sisters, and my
 mind became calmer.
 
 "My uncle introduced me to some literary society; and the theatres were
 a never-failing source of amusement to me. My delighted eye followed
 Mrs. Siddons, when, with dignified delicacy, she played Califta; and
 I involuntarily repeated after her, in the same tone, and with a
 long-drawn sigh,
 
 'Hearts like our's were pair'd--not match'd.'
 
 "These were, at first, spontaneous emotions, though, becoming acquainted
 with men of wit and polished manners, I could not sometimes help
 regretting my early marriage; and that, in my haste to escape from a
 temporary dependence, and expand my newly fledged wings, in an unknown
 sky, I had been caught in a trap, and caged for life. Still the novelty
 of London, and the attentive fondness of my husband, for he had some
 personal regard for me, made several months glide away. Yet, not
 forgetting the situation of my sisters, who were still very young, I
 prevailed on my uncle to settle a thousand pounds on each; and to place
 them in a school near town, where I could frequently visit, as well as
 have them at home with me.
 
 "I now tried to improve my husband's taste, but we had few subjects in
 common; indeed he soon appeared to have little relish for my society,
 unless he was hinting to me the use he could make of my uncle's wealth.
 When we had company, I was disgusted by an ostentatious display of
 riches, and I have often quitted the room, to avoid listening to
 exaggerated tales of money obtained by lucky hits.
 
 "With all my attention and affectionate interest, I perceived that I
 could not become the friend or confident of my husband. Every thing I
 learned relative to his affairs I gathered up by accident; and I vainly
 endeavoured to establish, at our fire-side, that social converse,
 which often renders people of different characters dear to each other.
 Returning from the theatre, or any amusing party, I frequently began to
 relate what I had seen and highly relished; but with sullen taciturnity
 he soon silenced me. I seemed therefore gradually to lose, in his
 society, the soul, the energies of which had just been in action. To
 such a degree, in fact, did his cold, reserved manner affect me, that,
 after spending some days with him alone, I have imagined myself the most
 stupid creature in the world, till the abilities of some casual visitor
 convinced me that I had some dormant animation, and sentiments above the
 dust in which I had been groveling. The very countenance of my husband
 changed; his complexion became sallow, and all the charms of youth were
 vanishing with its vivacity.
 
 "I give you one view of the subject; but these experiments and
 alterations took up the space of five years; during which period, I
 had most reluctantly extorted several sums from my uncle, to save my
 husband, to use his own words, from destruction. At first it was to
 prevent bills being noted, to the injury of his credit; then to bail
 him; and afterwards to prevent an execution from entering the house. I
 began at last to conclude, that he would have made more exertions of his
 own to extricate himself, had he not relied on mine, cruel as was the
 task he imposed on me; and I firmly determined that I would make use of
 no more pretexts.
 
 "From the moment I pronounced this determination, indifference on his
 part was changed into rudeness, or something worse.
 
 "He now seldom dined at home, and continually returned at a late hour,
 drunk, to bed. I retired to another apartment; I was glad, I own, to
 escape from his; for personal intimacy without affection, seemed, to me
 the most degrading, as well as the most painful state in which a
 woman of any taste, not to speak of the peculiar delicacy of fostered
 sensibility, could be placed. But my husband's fondness for women was of
 the grossest kind, and imagination was so wholly out of the question, as
 to render his indulgences of this sort entirely promiscuous, and of the
 most brutal nature. My health suffered, before my heart was entirely
 estranged by the loathsome information; could I then have returned to
 his sullied arms, but as a victim to the prejudices of mankind, who have
 made women the property of their husbands? I discovered even, by his
 conversation, when intoxicated that his favourites were wantons of the
 lowest class, who could by their vulgar, indecent mirth, which he called
 nature, rouse his sluggish spirits. Meretricious ornaments and manners
 were necessary to attract his attention. He seldom looked twice at a
 modest woman, and sat silent in their company; and the charms of youth
 and beauty had not the slightest effect on his senses, unless the
 possessors were initiated in vice. His intimacy with profligate women,
 and his habits of thinking, gave him a contempt for female endowments;
 and he would repeat, when wine had loosed his tongue, most of the
 common-place sarcasms levelled at them, by men who do not allow them to
 have minds, because mind would be an impediment to gross enjoyment.
 Men who are inferior to their fellow men, are always most anxious to
 establish their superiority over women. But where are these reflections
 leading me?
 
 "Women who have lost their husband's affection, are justly reproved for
 neglecting their persons, and not taking the same pains to keep, as to
 gain a heart; but who thinks of giving the same advice to men, though
 women are continually stigmatized for being attached to fops; and from
 the nature of their education, are more susceptible of disgust? Yet why
 a woman should be expected to endure a sloven, with more patience than
 a man, and magnanimously to govern herself, I cannot conceive; unless
 it be supposed arrogant in her to look for respect as well as a
 maintenance. It is not easy to be pleased, because, after promising to
 love, in different circumstances, we are told that it is our duty.
 I cannot, I am sure (though, when attending the sick, I never felt
 disgust) forget my own sensations, when rising with health and spirit,
 and after scenting the sweet morning, I have met my husband at the
 breakfast table. The active attention I had been giving to domestic
 regulations, which were generally settled before he rose, or a walk,
 gave a glow to my countenance, that contrasted with his squallid
 appearance. The squeamishness of stomach alone, produced by the last
 night's intemperance, which he took no pains to conceal, destroyed my
 appetite. I think I now see him lolling in an arm-chair, in a dirty
 powdering gown, soiled linen, ungartered stockings, and tangled hair,
 yawning and stretching himself. The newspaper was immediately called
 for, if not brought in on the tea-board, from which he would scarcely
 lift his eyes while I poured out the tea, excepting to ask for some
 brandy to put into it, or to declare that he could not eat. In answer
 to any question, in his best humour, it was a drawling 'What do you say,
 child?' But if I demanded money for the house expences, which I put off
 till the last moment, his customary reply, often prefaced with an oath,
 was, 'Do you think me, madam, made of money?'--The butcher, the baker,
 must wait; and, what was worse, I was often obliged to witness his surly
 dismission of tradesmen, who were in want of their money, and whom I
 sometimes paid with the presents my uncle gave me for my own use.
 
 "At this juncture my father's mistress, by terrifying his conscience,
 prevailed on him to marry her; he was already become a methodist; and
 my brother, who now practised for himself, had discovered a flaw in
 the settlement made on my mother's children, which set it aside, and he
 allowed my father, whose distress made him submit to any thing, a tithe
 of his own, or rather our fortune.
 
 "My sisters had left school, but were unable to endure home, which my
 father's wife rendered as disagreeable as possible, to get rid of girls
 whom she regarded as spies on her conduct. They were accomplished, yet
 you can (may you never be reduced to the same destitute state!)
 scarcely conceive the trouble I had to place them in the situation of
 governesses, the only one in which even a well-educated woman, with more
 than ordinary talents, can struggle for a subsistence; and even this is
 a dependence next to menial. Is it then surprising, that so many forlorn
 women, with human passions and feelings, take refuge in infamy? Alone
 in large mansions, I say alone, because they had no companions with whom
 they could converse on equal terms, or from whom they could expect the
 endearments of affection, they grew melancholy, and the sound of joy
 made them sad; and the youngest, having a more delicate frame, fell into
 a decline. It was with great difficulty that I, who now almost supported
 the house by loans from my uncle, could prevail on the _master_ of it,
 to allow her a room to die in. I watched her sick bed for some months,
 and then closed her eyes, gentle spirit! for ever. She was pretty, with
 very engaging manners; yet had never an opportunity to marry, excepting
 to a very old man. She had abilities sufficient to have shone in any
 profession, had there been any professions for women, though she shrunk
 at the name of milliner or mantua-maker as degrading to a gentlewoman.
 I would not term this feeling false pride to any one but you, my child,
 whom I fondly hope to see (yes; I will indulge the hope for a moment!)
 possessed of that energy of character which gives dignity to any
 station; and with that clear, firm spirit that will enable you to choose
 a situation for yourself, or submit to be classed in the lowest, if it
 be the only one in which you can be the mistress of your own actions.
 
 "Soon after the death of my sister, an incident occurred, to prove to
 me that the heart of a libertine is dead to natural affection; and to
 convince me, that the being who has appeared all tenderness, to gratify
 a selfish passion, is as regardless of the innocent fruit of it, as
 of the object, when the fit is over. I had casually observed an old,
 meanlooking woman, who called on my husband every two or three months
 to receive some money. One day entering the passage of his little
 counting-house, as she was going out, I heard her say, 'The child is
 very weak; she cannot live long, she will soon die out of your way, so
 you need not grudge her a little physic.'
 
 "'So much the better,' he replied,' and pray mind your own business,
 good woman.'
 
 "I was struck by his unfeeling, inhuman tone of voice, and drew back,
 determined when the woman came again, to try to speak to her, not out
 of curiosity, I had heard enough, but with the hope of being useful to a
 poor, outcast girl.
 
 "A month or two elapsed before I saw this woman again; and then she had
 a child in her hand that tottered along, scarcely able to sustain her
 own weight. They were going away, to return at the hour Mr. Venables
 was expected; he was now from home. I desired the woman to walk into
 the parlour. She hesitated, yet obeyed. I assured her that I should not
 mention to my husband (the word seemed to weigh on my respiration), that
 I had seen her, or his child. The woman stared at me with astonishment;
 and I turned my eyes on the squalid object [that accompanied her.] She
 could hardly support herself, her complexion was sallow, and her eyes
 inflamed, with an indescribable look of cunning, mixed with the wrinkles
 produced by the peevishness of pain.
 
 "Poor child!' I exclaimed. 'Ah! you may well say poor child,' replied
 the woman. 'I brought her here to see whether he would have the heart
 to look at her, and not get some advice. I do not know what they deserve
 who nursed her. Why, her legs bent under her like a bow when she came to
 me, and she has never been well since; but, if they were no better paid
 than I am, it is not to be wondered at, sure enough.'
 
 "On further enquiry I was informed, that this miserable spectacle was
 the daughter of a servant, a country girl, who caught Mr. Venables' eye,
 and whom he seduced. On his marriage he sent her away, her situation
 being too visible. After her delivery, she was thrown on the town;
 and died in an hospital within the year. The babe was sent to a
 parish-nurse, and afterwards to this woman, who did not seem much
 better; but what was to be expected from such a close bargain? She was
 only paid three shillings a week for board and washing.
 
 "The woman begged me to give her some old clothes for the child,
 assuring me, that she was almost afraid to ask master for money to buy
 even a pair of shoes.
 
 "I grew sick at heart. And, fearing Mr. Venables might enter, and
 oblige me to express my abhorrence, I hastily enquired where she lived,
 promised to pay her two shillings a week more, and to call on her in
 a day or two; putting a trifle into her hand as a proof of my good
 intention.
 
 "If the state of this child affected me, what were my feelings at a
 discovery I made respecting Peggy--?"*
 
      * The manuscript is imperfect here.  An episode seems to
      have been intended, which was never committed to paper.
      EDITOR. [Godwin's note]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 10
 
 
 
 "MY FATHER'S situation was now so distressing, that I prevailed on my
 uncle to accompany me to visit him; and to lend me his assistance, to
 prevent the whole property of the family from becoming the prey of
 my brother's rapacity; for, to extricate himself out of present
 difficulties, my father was totally regardless of futurity. I took down
 with me some presents for my step-mother; it did not require an effort
 for me to treat her with civility, or to forget the past.
 
 "This was the first time I had visited my native village, since my
 marriage. But with what different emotions did I return from the busy
 world, with a heavy weight of experience benumbing my imagination, to
 scenes, that whispered recollections of joy and hope most eloquently to
 my heart! The first scent of the wild flowers from the heath, thrilled
 through my veins, awakening every sense to pleasure. The icy hand
 of despair seemed to be removed from my bosom; and--forgetting my
 husband--the nurtured visions of a romantic mind, bursting on me with
 all their original wildness and gay exuberance, were again hailed as
 sweet realities. I forgot, with equal facility, that I ever felt sorrow,
 or knew care in the country; while a transient rainbow stole athwart
 the cloudy sky of despondency. The picturesque form of several favourite
 trees, and the porches of rude cottages, with their smiling hedges, were
 recognized with the gladsome playfulness of childish vivacity. I could
 have kissed the chickens that pecked on the common; and longed to pat
 the cows, and frolic with the dogs that sported on it. I gazed with
 delight on the windmill, and thought it lucky that it should be in
 motion, at the moment I passed by; and entering the dear green lane,
 which led directly to the village, the sound of the well-known rookery
 gave that sentimental tinge to the varying sensations of my active soul,
 which only served to heighten the lustre of the luxuriant scenery. But,
 spying, as I advanced, the spire, peeping over the withered tops of the
 aged elms that composed the rookery, my thoughts flew immediately to
 the churchyard, and tears of affection, such was the effect of my
 imagination, bedewed my mother's grave! Sorrow gave place to devotional
 feelings. I wandered through the church in fancy, as I used sometimes
 to do on a Saturday evening. I recollected with what fervour I addressed
 the God of my youth: and once more with rapturous love looked above
 my sorrows to the Father of nature. I pause--feeling forcibly all the
 emotions I am describing; and (reminded, as I register my sorrows, of
 the sublime calm I have felt, when in some tremendous solitude, my soul
 rested on itself, and seemed to fill the universe) I insensibly breathe
 soft, hushing every wayward emotion, as if fearing to sully with a sigh,
 a contentment so extatic.
 
 "Having settled my father's affairs, and, by my exertions in his favour,
 made my brother my sworn foe, I returned to London. My husband's conduct
 was now changed; I had during my absence, received several affectionate,
 penitential letters from him; and he seemed on my arrival, to wish by
 his behaviour to prove his sincerity. I could not then conceive why he
 acted thus; and, when the suspicion darted into my head, that it might
 arise from observing my increasing influence with my uncle, I almost
 despised myself for imagining that such a degree of debasing selfishness
 could exist.
 
 "He became, unaccountable as was the change, tender and attentive; and,
 attacking my weak side, made a confession of his follies, and lamented
 the embarrassments in which I, who merited a far different fate, might
 be involved. He besought me to aid him with my counsel, praised my
 understanding, and appealed to the tenderness of my heart.
 
 "This conduct only inspired me with compassion. I wished to be his
 friend; but love had spread his rosy pinions and fled far, far away;
 and had not (like some exquisite perfumes, the fine spirit of which
 is continually mingling with the air) left a fragrance behind, to mark
 where he had shook his wings. My husband's renewed caresses then became
 hateful to me; his brutality was tolerable, compared to his distasteful
 fondness. Still, compassion, and the fear of insulting his supposed
 feelings, by a want of sympathy, made me dissemble, and do violence to
 my delicacy. What a task!
 
 "Those who support a system of what I term false refinement, and will
 not allow great part of love in the female, as well as male breast, to
 spring in some respects involuntarily, may not admit that charms are
 as necessary to feed the passion, as virtues to convert the mellowing
 spirit into friendship. To such observers I have nothing to say, any
 more than to the moralists, who insist that women ought to, and can love
 their husbands, because it is their duty. To you, my child, I may
 add, with a heart tremblingly alive to your future conduct, some
 observations, dictated by my present feelings, on calmly reviewing this
 period of my life. When novelists or moralists praise as a virtue, a
 woman's coldness of constitution, and want of passion; and make her
 yield to the ardour of her lover out of sheer compassion, or to promote
 a frigid plan of future comfort, I am disgusted. They may be good women,
 in the ordinary acceptation of the phrase, and do no harm; but they
 appear to me not to have those 'finely fashioned nerves,' which render
 the senses exquisite. They may possess tenderness; but they want that
 fire of the imagination, which produces _active_ sensibility, and
 _positive_ _virtue_. How does the woman deserve to be characterized, who
 marries one man, with a heart and imagination devoted to another? Is she
 not an object of pity or contempt, when thus sacrilegiously violating
 the purity of her own feelings? Nay, it is as indelicate, when she is
 indifferent, unless she be constitutionally insensible; then indeed it
 is a mere affair of barter; and I have nothing to do with the secrets of
 trade. Yes; eagerly as I wish you to possess true rectitude of mind,
 and purity of affection, I must insist that a heartless conduct is the
 contrary of virtuous. Truth is the only basis of virtue; and we cannot,
 without depraving our minds, endeavour to please a lover or husband, but
 in proportion as he pleases us. Men, more effectually to enslave us, may
 inculcate this partial morality, and lose sight of virtue in subdividing
 it into the duties of particular stations; but let us not blush for
 nature without a cause!
 
 "After these remarks, I am ashamed to own, that I was pregnant. The
 greatest sacrifice of my principles in my whole life, was the allowing
 my husband again to be familiar with my person, though to this cruel act
 of self-denial, when I wished the earth to open and swallow me, you owe
 your birth; and I the unutterable pleasure of being a mother. There was
 something of delicacy in my husband's bridal attentions; but now
 his tainted breath, pimpled face, and blood-shot eyes, were not more
 repugnant to my senses, than his gross manners, and loveless familiarity
 to my taste.
 
 "A man would only be expected to maintain; yes, barely grant a
 subsistence, to a woman rendered odious by habitual intoxication; but
 who would expect him, or think it possible to love her? And unless
 'youth, and genial years were flown,' it would be thought equally
 unreasonable to insist, [under penalty of] forfeiting almost every
 thing reckoned valuable in life, that he should not love another:
 whilst woman, weak in reason, impotent in will, is required to moralize,
 sentimentalize herself to stone, and pine her life away, labouring
 to reform her embruted mate. He may even spend in dissipation, and
 intemperance, the very intemperance which renders him so hateful, her
 property, and by stinting her expences, not permit her to beguile in
 society, a wearisome, joyless life; for over their mutual fortune she
 has no power, it must all pass through his hand. And if she be a mother,
 and in the present state of women, it is a great misfortune to be
 prevented from discharging the duties, and cultivating the affections of
 one, what has she not to endure?--But I have suffered the tenderness
 of one to lead me into reflections that I did not think of making, to
 interrupt my narrative--yet the full heart will overflow.
 
 "Mr. Venables' embarrassments did not now endear him to me; still,
 anxious to befriend him, I endeavoured to prevail on him to retrench his
 expences; but he had always some plausible excuse to give, to justify
 his not following my advice. Humanity, compassion, and the interest
 produced by a habit of living together, made me try to relieve, and
 sympathize with him; but, when I recollected that I was bound to live
 with such a being for ever--my heart died within me; my desire of
 improvement became languid, and baleful, corroding melancholy took
 possession of my soul. Marriage had bastilled me for life. I discovered
 in myself a capacity for the enjoyment of the various pleasures
 existence affords; yet, fettered by the partial laws of society, this
 fair globe was to me an universal blank.
 
 "When I exhorted my husband to economy, I referred to himself. I was
 obliged to practise the most rigid, or contract debts, which I had
 too much reason to fear would never be paid. I despised this paltry
 privilege of a wife, which can only be of use to the vicious or
 inconsiderate, and determined not to increase the torrent that was
 bearing him down. I was then ignorant of the extent of his fraudulent
 speculations, whom I was bound to honour and obey.
 
 "A woman neglected by her husband, or whose manners form a striking
 contrast with his, will always have men on the watch to soothe and
 flatter her. Besides, the forlorn state of a neglected woman, not
 destitute of personal charms, is particularly interesting, and rouses
 that species of pity, which is so near akin, it easily slides into love.
 A man of feeling thinks not of seducing, he is himself seduced by
 all the noblest emotions of his soul. He figures to himself all the
 sacrifices a woman of sensibility must make, and every situation in
 which his imagination places her, touches his heart, and fires his
 passions. Longing to take to his bosom the shorn lamb, and bid the
 drooping buds of hope revive, benevolence changes into passion: and
 should he then discover that he is beloved, honour binds him fast,
 though foreseeing that he may afterwards be obliged to pay severe
 damages to the man, who never appeared to value his wife's society, till
 he found that there was a chance of his being indemnified for the loss
 of it.
 
 "Such are the partial laws enacted by men; for, only to lay a stress
 on the dependent state of a woman in the grand question of the comforts
 arising from the possession of property, she is [even in this article]
 much more injured by the loss of the husband's affection, than he by
 that of his wife; yet where is she, condemned to the solitude of a
 deserted home, to look for a compensation from the woman, who seduces
 him from her? She cannot drive an unfaithful husband from his house, nor
 separate, or tear, his children from him, however culpable he may be;
 and he, still the master of his own fate, enjoys the smiles of a world,
 that would brand her with infamy, did she, seeking consolation, venture
 to retaliate.
 
 "These remarks are not dictated by experience; but merely by the
 compassion I feel for many amiable women, the _outlaws_ of the world.
 For myself, never encouraging any of the advances that were made to me,
 my lovers dropped off like the untimely shoots of spring. I did not
 even coquet with them; because I found, on examining myself, I could not
 coquet with a man without loving him a little; and I perceived that I
 should not be able to stop at the line of what are termed _innocent_
 _freedoms_, did I suffer any. My reserve was then the consequence of
 delicacy. Freedom of conduct has emancipated many women's minds; but
 my conduct has most rigidly been governed by my principles, till the
 improvement of my understanding has enabled me to discern the fallacy of
 prejudices at war with nature and reason.
 
 "Shortly after the change I have mentioned in my husband's conduct, my
 uncle was compelled by his declining health, to seek the succour of a
 milder climate, and embark for Lisbon. He left his will in the hands of
 a friend, an eminent solicitor; he had previously questioned me relative
 to my situation and state of mind, and declared very freely, that he
 could place no reliance on the stability of my husband's professions. He
 had been deceived in the unfolding of his character; he now thought
 it fixed in a train of actions that would inevitably lead to ruin and
 disgrace.
 
 "The evening before his departure, which we spent alone together,
 he folded me to his heart, uttering the endearing appellation of
 'child.'--My more than father! why was I not permitted to perform the
 last duties of one, and smooth the pillow of death? He seemed by his
 manner to be convinced that he should never see me more; yet requested
 me, most earnestly, to come to him, should I be obliged to leave my
 husband. He had before expressed his sorrow at hearing of my pregnancy,
 having determined to prevail on me to accompany him, till I informed him
 of that circumstance. He expressed himself unfeignedly sorry that
 any new tie should bind me to a man whom he thought so incapable of
 estimating my value; such was the kind language of affection.
 
 "I must repeat his own words; they made an indelible impression on my
 mind:
 
 "'The marriage state is certainly that in which women, generally
 speaking, can be most useful; but I am far from thinking that a
 woman, once married, ought to consider the engagement as indissoluble
 (especially if there be no children to reward her for sacrificing her
 feelings) in case her husband merits neither her love, nor esteem.
 Esteem will often supply the place of love; and prevent a woman from
 being wretched, though it may not make her happy. The magnitude of a
 sacrifice ought always to bear some proportion to the utility in view;
 and for a woman to live with a man, for whom she can cherish neither
 affection nor esteem, or even be of any use to him, excepting in the
 light of a house-keeper, is an abjectness of condition, the enduring of
 which no concurrence of circumstances can ever make a duty in the sight
 of God or just men. If indeed she submits to it merely to be maintained
 in idleness, she has no right to complain bitterly of her fate; or to
 act, as a person of independent character might, as if she had a title
 to disregard general rules.
 
 "But the misfortune is, that many women only submit in appearance, and
 forfeit their own respect to secure their reputation in the world. The
 situation of a woman separated from her husband, is undoubtedly very
 different from that of a man who has left his wife. He, with lordly
 dignity, has shaken of a clog; and the allowing her food and raiment, is
 thought sufficient to secure his reputation from taint. And, should she
 have been inconsiderate, he will be celebrated for his generosity and
 forbearance. Such is the respect paid to the master-key of property! A
 woman, on the contrary, resigning what is termed her natural protector
 (though he never was so, but in name) is despised and shunned, for
 asserting the independence of mind distinctive of a rational being, and
 spurning at slavery.'
 
 "During the remainder of the evening, my uncle's tenderness led him
 frequently to revert to the subject, and utter, with increasing warmth,
 sentiments to the same purport. At length it was necessary to say
 'Farewell!'--and we parted--gracious God! to meet no more."
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 11
 
 
 "A GENTLEMAN of large fortune and of polished manners, had lately
 visited very frequently at our house, and treated me, if possible,
 with more respect than Mr. Venables paid him; my pregnancy was not yet
 visible, his society was a great relief to me, as I had for some time
 past, to avoid expence, confined myself very much at home. I ever
 disdained unnecessary, perhaps even prudent concealments; and my
 husband, with great ease, discovered the amount of my uncle's parting
 present. A copy of a writ was the stale pretext to extort it from me;
 and I had soon reason to believe that it was fabricated for the purpose.
 I acknowledge my folly in thus suffering myself to be continually
 imposed on. I had adhered to my resolution not to apply to my uncle,
 on the part of my husband, any more; yet, when I had received a sum
 sufficient to supply my own wants, and to enable me to pursue a plan I
 had in view, to settle my younger brother in a respectable employment,
 I allowed myself to be duped by Mr. Venables' shallow pretences, and
 hypocritical professions.
 
 "Thus did he pillage me and my family, thus frustrate all my plans of
 usefulness. Yet this was the man I was bound to respect and esteem: as
 if respect and esteem depended on an arbitrary will of our own! But a
 wife being as much a man's property as his horse, or his ass, she has
 nothing she can call her own. He may use any means to get at what the
 law considers as his, the moment his wife is in possession of it, even
 to the forcing of a lock, as Mr. Venables did, to search for notes in
 my writing-desk--and all this is done with a show of equity, because,
 forsooth, he is responsible for her maintenance.
 
 "The tender mother cannot _lawfully_ snatch from the gripe of the
 gambling spendthrift, or beastly drunkard, unmindful of his offspring,
 the fortune which falls to her by chance; or (so flagrant is the
 injustice) what she earns by her own exertions. No; he can rob her with
 impunity, even to waste publicly on a courtezan; and the laws of her
 country--if women have a country--afford her no protection or redress
 from the oppressor, unless she have the plea of bodily fear; yet how
 many ways are there of goading the soul almost to madness, equally
 unmanly, though not so mean? When such laws were framed, should
 not impartial lawgivers have first decreed, in the style of a great
 assembly, who recognized the existence of an _etre_ _supreme_, to fix
 the national belief, that the husband should always be wiser and more
 virtuous than his wife, in order to entitle him, with a show of justice,
 to keep this idiot, or perpetual minor, for ever in bondage. But I must
 have done--on this subject, my indignation continually runs away with
 me.
 
 "The company of the gentleman I have already mentioned, who had a
 general acquaintance with literature and subjects of taste, was grateful
 to me; my countenance brightened up as he approached, and I unaffectedly
 expressed the pleasure I felt. The amusement his conversation afforded
 me, made it easy to comply with my husband's request, to endeavour to
 render our house agreeable to him.
 
 "His attentions became more pointed; but, as I was not of the number
 of women, whose virtue, as it is termed, immediately takes alarm, I
 endeavoured, rather by raillery than serious expostulation, to give a
 different turn to his conversation. He assumed a new mode of attack, and
 I was, for a while, the dupe of his pretended friendship.
 
 "I had, merely in the style of _badinage_, boasted of my conquest, and
 repeated his lover-like compliments to my husband. But he begged me,
 for God's sake, not to affront his friend, or I should destroy all his
 projects, and be his ruin. Had I had more affection for my husband, I
 should have expressed my contempt of this time-serving politeness: now
 I imagined that I only felt pity; yet it would have puzzled a casuist to
 point out in what the exact difference consisted.
 
 "This friend began now, in confidence, to discover to me the real state
 of my husband's affairs. 'Necessity,' said Mr. S----; why should I
 reveal his name? for he affected to palliate the conduct he could not
 excuse, 'had led him to take such steps, by accommodation bills, buying
 goods on credit, to sell them for ready money, and similar transactions,
 that his character in the commercial world was gone. He was considered,'
 he added, lowering his voice, 'on 'Change as a swindler.'
 
 "I felt at that moment the first maternal pang. Aware of the evils my
 sex have to struggle with, I still wished, for my own consolation, to be
 the mother of a daughter; and I could not bear to think, that the _sins_
 of her father's entailed disgrace, should be added to the ills to which
 woman is heir.
 
 "So completely was I deceived by these shows of friendship (nay, I
 believe, according to his interpretation, Mr. S---- really was my
 friend) that I began to consult him respecting the best mode of
 retrieving my husband's character: it is the good name of a woman only
 that sets to rise no more. I knew not that he had been drawn into a
 whirlpool, out of which he had not the energy to attempt to escape. He
 seemed indeed destitute of the power of employing his faculties in any
 regular pursuit. His principles of action were so loose, and his mind so
 uncultivated, that every thing like order appeared to him in the shape
 of restraint; and, like men in the savage state, he required the strong
 stimulus of hope or fear, produced by wild speculations, in which the
 interests of others went for nothing, to keep his spirits awake. He one
 time professed patriotism, but he knew not what it was to feel honest
 indignation; and pretended to be an advocate for liberty, when, with as
 little affection for the human race as for individuals, he thought of
 nothing but his own gratification. He was just such a citizen, as a
 father. The sums he adroitly obtained by a violation of the laws of
 his country, as well as those of humanity, he would allow a mistress to
 squander; though she was, with the same _sang_ _froid_, consigned, as
 were his children, to poverty, when another proved more attractive.
 
 "On various pretences, his friend continued to visit me; and, observing
 my want of money, he tried to induce me to accept of pecuniary aid; but
 this offer I absolutely rejected, though it was made with such delicacy,
 I could not be displeased.
 
 "One day he came, as I thought accidentally, to dinner. My husband was
 very much engaged in business, and quitted the room soon after the cloth
 was removed. We conversed as usual, till confidential advice led again
 to love. I was extremely mortified. I had a sincere regard for him, and
 hoped that he had an equal friendship for me. I therefore began
 mildly to expostulate with him. This gentleness he mistook for coy
 encouragement; and he would not be diverted from the subject. Perceiving
 his mistake, I seriously asked him how, using such language to me, he
 could profess to be my husband's friend? A significant sneer excited my
 curiosity, and he, supposing this to be my only scruple, took a letter
 deliberately out of his pocket, saying, 'Your husband's honour is not
 inflexible. How could you, with your discernment, think it so? Why,
 he left the room this very day on purpose to give me an opportunity to
 explain myself; _he_ thought me too timid--too tardy.
 
 "I snatched the letter with indescribable emotion. The purport of it was
 to invite him to dinner, and to ridicule his chivalrous respect for
 me. He assured him, 'that every woman had her price, and, with gross
 indecency, hinted, that he should be glad to have the duty of a husband
 taken off his hands. These he termed _liberal_ _sentiments_. He advised
 him not to shock my romantic notions, but to attack my credulous
 generosity, and weak pity; and concluded with requesting him to lend him
 five hundred pounds for a month or six weeks.' I read this letter twice
 over; and the firm purpose it inspired, calmed the rising tumult of my
 soul. I rose deliberately, requested Mr. S---- to wait a moment, and
 instantly going into the counting-house, desired Mr. Venables to return
 with me to the dining-parlour.
 
 "He laid down his pen, and entered with me, without observing any change
 in my countenance. I shut the door, and, giving him the letter, simply
 asked, 'whether he wrote it, or was it a forgery?'
 
 "Nothing could equal his confusion. His friend's eye met his, and
 he muttered something about a joke--But I interrupted him--'It is
 sufficient--We part for ever.'
 
 "I continued, with solemnity, 'I have borne with your tyranny and
 infidelities. I disdain to utter what I have borne with. I thought you
 unprincipled, but not so decidedly vicious. I formed a tie, in the sight
 of heaven--I have held it sacred; even when men, more conformable to my
 taste, have made me feel--I despise all subterfuge!--that I was not
 dead to love. Neglected by you, I have resolutely stifled the enticing
 emotions, and respected the plighted faith you outraged. And you dare
 now to insult me, by selling me to prostitution!--Yes--equally lost to
 delicacy and principle--you dared sacrilegiously to barter the honour of
 the mother of your child.'
 
 "Then, turning to Mr. S----, I added, 'I call on you, Sir, to witness,'
 and I lifted my hands and eyes to heaven, 'that, as solemnly as I took
 his name, I now abjure it,' I pulled off my ring, and put it on the
 table; 'and that I mean immediately to quit his house, never to enter it
 more. I will provide for myself and child. I leave him as free as I am
 determined to be myself--he shall be answerable for no debts of mine.'
 
 "Astonishment closed their lips, till Mr. Venables, gently pushing
 his friend, with a forced smile, out of the room, nature for a moment
 prevailed, and, appearing like himself, he turned round, burning with
 rage, to me: but there was no terror in the frown, excepting when
 contrasted with the malignant smile which preceded it. He bade me
 'leave the house at my peril; told me he despised my threats; I had no
 resource; I could not swear the peace against him!--I was not afraid of
 my life!--he had never struck me!'
 
 "He threw the letter in the fire, which I had incautiously left in his
 hands; and, quitting the room, locked the door on me.
 
 "When left alone, I was a moment or two before I could recollect
 myself--One scene had succeeded another with such rapidity, I almost
 doubted whether I was reflecting on a real event. 'Was it possible? Was
 I, indeed, free?'--Yes; free I termed myself, when I decidedly perceived
 the conduct I ought to adopt. How had I panted for liberty--liberty,
 that I would have purchased at any price, but that of my own esteem! I
 rose, and shook myself; opened the window, and methought the air never
 smelled so sweet. The face of heaven grew fairer as I viewed it, and the
 clouds seemed to flit away obedient to my wishes, to give my soul room
 to expand. I was all soul, and (wild as it may appear) felt as if I
 could have dissolved in the soft balmy gale that kissed my cheek,
 or have glided below the horizon on the glowing, descending beams. A
 seraphic satisfaction animated, without agitating my spirits; and my
 imagination collected, in visions sublimely terrible, or soothingly
 beautiful, an immense variety of the endless images, which nature
 affords, and fancy combines, of the grand and fair. The lustre of these
 bright picturesque sketches faded with the setting sun; but I was still
 alive to the calm delight they had diffused through my heart.
 
 "There may be advocates for matrimonial obedience, who, making a
 distinction between the duty of a wife and of a human being, may blame
 my conduct.--To them I write not--my feelings are not for them
 to analyze; and may you, my child, never be able to ascertain, by
 heart-rending experience, what your mother felt before the present
 emancipation of her mind!
 
 "I began to write a letter to my father, after closing one to my
 uncle; not to ask advice, but to signify my determination; when I was
 interrupted by the entrance of Mr. Venables. His manner was changed. His
 views on my uncle's fortune made him averse to my quitting his house,
 or he would, I am convinced, have been glad to have shaken off even the
 slight restraint my presence imposed on him; the restraint of showing
 me some respect. So far from having an affection for me, he really hated
 me, because he was convinced that I must despise him.
 
 "He told me, that 'As I now had had time to cool and reflect, he did not
 doubt but that my prudence, and nice sense of propriety, would lead me
 to overlook what was passed.'
 
 "'Reflection,' I replied, 'had only confirmed my purpose, and no power
 on earth could divert me from it.'
 
 "Endeavouring to assume a soothing voice and look, when he would
 willingly have tortured me, to force me to feel his power, his
 countenance had an infernal expression, when he desired me, 'Not to
 expose myself to the servants, by obliging him to confine me in my
 apartment; if then I would give my promise not to quit the house
 precipitately, I should be free--and--.' I declared, interrupting him,
 'that I would promise nothing. I had no measures to keep with him--I was
 resolved, and would not condescend to subterfuge.'
 
 "He muttered, 'that I should soon repent of these preposterous airs;'
 and, ordering tea to be carried into my little study, which had a
 communication with my bed-chamber, he once more locked the door upon
 me, and left me to my own meditations. I had passively followed him up
 stairs, not wishing to fatigue myself with unavailing exertion.
 
 "Nothing calms the mind like a fixed purpose. I felt as if I had heaved
 a thousand weight from my heart; the atmosphere seemed lightened; and,
 if I execrated the institutions of society, which thus enable men
 to tyrannize over women, it was almost a disinterested sentiment. I
 disregarded present inconveniences, when my mind had done struggling
 with itself,--when reason and inclination had shaken hands and were at
 peace. I had no longer the cruel task before me, in endless perspective,
 aye, during the tedious for ever of life, of labouring to overcome my
 repugnance--of labouring to extinguish the hopes, the maybes of a lively
 imagination. Death I had hailed as my only chance for deliverance; but,
 while existence had still so many charms, and life promised happiness, I
 shrunk from the icy arms of an unknown tyrant, though far more inviting
 than those of the man, to whom I supposed myself bound without any other
 alternative; and was content to linger a little longer, waiting for I
 knew not what, rather than leave 'the warm precincts of the cheerful
 day,' and all the unenjoyed affection of my nature.
 
 "My present situation gave a new turn to my reflection; and I wondered
 (now the film seemed to be withdrawn, that obscured the piercing
 sight of reason) how I could, previously to the deciding outrage, have
 considered myself as everlastingly united to vice and folly! 'Had an
 evil genius cast a spell at my birth; or a demon stalked out of
 chaos, to perplex my understanding, and enchain my will, with delusive
 prejudices?'
 
 "I pursued this train of thinking; it led me out of myself, to expatiate
 on the misery peculiar to my sex. 'Are not,' I thought, 'the despots for
 ever stigmatized, who, in the wantonness of power, commanded even the
 most atrocious criminals to be chained to dead bodies? though surely
 those laws are much more inhuman, which forge adamantine fetters to bind
 minds together, that never can mingle in social communion! What
 indeed can equal the wretchedness of that state, in which there is no
 alternative, but to extinguish the affections, or encounter infamy?'"
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 12
 
 
 "TOWARDS midnight Mr. Venables entered my chamber; and, with calm
 audacity preparing to go to bed, he bade me make haste, 'for that was
 the best place for husbands and wives to end their differences. He had
 been drinking plentifully to aid his courage.
 
 "I did not at first deign to reply. But perceiving that he affected to
 take my silence for consent, I told him that, 'If he would not go to
 another bed, or allow me, I should sit up in my study all night.' He
 attempted to pull me into the chamber, half joking. But I resisted; and,
 as he had determined not to give me any reason for saying that he used
 violence, after a few more efforts, he retired, cursing my obstinacy, to
 bed.
 
 "I sat musing some time longer; then, throwing my cloak around me,
 prepared for sleep on a sopha. And, so fortunate seemed my deliverance,
 so sacred the pleasure of being thus wrapped up in myself, that I slept
 profoundly, and woke with a mind composed to encounter the struggles of
 the day. Mr. Venables did not wake till some hours after; and then he
 came to me half-dressed, yawning and stretching, with haggard eyes, as
 if he scarcely recollected what had passed the preceding evening. He
 fixed his eyes on me for a moment, then, calling me a fool, asked 'How
 long I intended to continue this pretty farce? For his part, he was
 devilish sick of it; but this was the plague of marrying women who
 pretended to know something.'
 
 "I made no other reply to this harangue, than to say, 'That he ought to
 be glad to get rid of a woman so unfit to be his companion--and that any
 change in my conduct would be mean dissimulation; for maturer reflection
 only gave the sacred seal of reason to my first resolution.'
 
 "He looked as if he could have stamped with impatience, at being obliged
 to stifle his rage; but, conquering his anger (for weak people, whose
 passions seem the most ungovernable, restrain them with the greatest
 ease, when they have a sufficient motive), he exclaimed, 'Very pretty,
 upon my soul! very pretty, theatrical flourishes! Pray, fair Roxana,
 stoop from your altitudes, and remember that you are acting a part in
 real life.'
 
 "He uttered this speech with a self-satisfied air, and went down stairs
 to dress.
 
 "In about an hour he came to me again; and in the same tone said, 'That
 he came as my gentleman-usher to hand me down to breakfast.
 
 "'Of the black rod?' asked I.
 
 "This question, and the tone in which I asked it, a little disconcerted
 him. To say the truth, I now felt no resentment; my firm resolution to
 free myself from my ignoble thraldom, had absorbed the various emotions
 which, during six years, had racked my soul. The duty pointed out by my
 principles seemed clear; and not one tender feeling intruded to make
 me swerve: The dislike which my husband had inspired was strong; but it
 only led me to wish to avoid, to wish to let him drop out of my memory;
 there was no misery, no torture that I would not deliberately have
 chosen, rather than renew my lease of servitude.
 
 "During the breakfast, he attempted to reason with me on the folly of
 romantic sentiments; for this was the indiscriminate epithet he gave
 to every mode of conduct or thinking superior to his own. He asserted,
 'that all the world were governed by their own interest; those who
 pretended to be actuated by different motives, were only deeper knaves,
 or fools crazed by books, who took for gospel all the rodomantade
 nonsense written by men who knew nothing of the world. For his part,
 he thanked God, he was no hypocrite; and, if he stretched a point
 sometimes, it was always with an intention of paying every man his own.'
 
 "He then artfully insinuated, 'that he daily expected a vessel to
 arrive, a successful speculation, that would make him easy for the
 present, and that he had several other schemes actually depending, that
 could not fail. He had no doubt of becoming rich in a few years, though
 he had been thrown back by some unlucky adventures at the setting out.'
 
 "I mildly replied, 'That I wished he might not involve himself still
 deeper.'
 
 "He had no notion that I was governed by a decision of judgment, not to
 be compared with a mere spurt of resentment. He knew not what it was to
 feel indignation against vice, and often boasted of his placable temper,
 and readiness to forgive injuries. True; for he only considered the
 being deceived, as an effort of skill he had not guarded against; and
 then, with a cant of candour, would observe, 'that he did not know how
 he might himself have been tempted to act in the same circumstances.'
 And, as his heart never opened to friendship, it never was wounded by
 disappointment. Every new acquaintance he protested, it is true, was
 'the cleverest fellow in the world; and he really thought so; till the
 novelty of his conversation or manners ceased to have any effect on his
 sluggish spirits. His respect for rank or fortune was more permanent,
 though he chanced to have no design of availing himself of the influence
 of either to promote his own views.
 
 "After a prefatory conversation,--my blood (I thought it had been
 cooler) flushed over my whole countenance as he spoke--he alluded to my
 situation. He desired me to reflect--'and act like a prudent woman,
 as the best proof of my superior understanding; for he must own I had
 sense, did I know how to use it. I was not,' he laid a stress on his
 words, 'without my passions; and a husband was a convenient cloke.--He
 was liberal in his way of thinking; and why might not we, like many
 other married people, who were above vulgar prejudices, tacitly consent
 to let each other follow their own inclination?--He meant nothing more,
 in the letter I made the ground of complaint; and the pleasure which I
 seemed to take in Mr. S.'s company, led him to conclude, that he was not
 disagreeable to me.'
 
 "A clerk brought in the letters of the day, and I, as I often did, while
 he was discussing subjects of business, went to the _piano_ _forte_, and
 began to play a favourite air to restore myself, as it were, to nature,
 and drive the sophisticated sentiments I had just been obliged to listen
 to, out of my soul.
 
 "They had excited sensations similar to those I have felt, in viewing
 the squalid inhabitants of some of the lanes and back streets of
 the metropolis, mortified at being compelled to consider them as my
 fellow-creatures, as if an ape had claimed kindred with me. Or, as when
 surrounded by a mephitical fog, I have wished to have a volley of cannon
 fired, to clear the incumbered atmosphere, and give me room to breathe
 and move.
 
 "My spirits were all in arms, and I played a kind of extemporary
 prelude. The cadence was probably wild and impassioned, while, lost in
 thought, I made the sounds a kind of echo to my train of thinking.
 
 "Pausing for a moment, I met Mr. Venables' eyes. He was observing me
 with an air of conceited satisfaction, as much as to say--'My last
 insinuation has done the business--she begins to know her own interest.'
 Then gathering up his letters, he said, 'That he hoped he should hear
 no more romantic stuff, well enough in a miss just come from boarding
 school;' and went, as was his custom, to the counting-house. I still
 continued playing; and, turning to a sprightly lesson, I executed it
 with uncommon vivacity. I heard footsteps approach the door, and was
 soon convinced that Mr. Venables was listening; the consciousness only
 gave more animation to my fingers. He went down into the kitchen, and
 the cook, probably by his desire, came to me, to know what I would
 please to order for dinner. Mr. Venables came into the parlour again,
 with apparent carelessness. I perceived that the cunning man was
 overreaching himself; and I gave my directions as usual, and left the
 room.
 
 "While I was making some alteration in my dress, Mr. Venables peeped in,
 and, begging my pardon for interrupting me, disappeared. I took up some
 work (I could not read), and two or three messages were sent to me,
 probably for no other purpose, but to enable Mr. Venables to ascertain
 what I was about.
 
 "I listened whenever I heard the street-door open; at last I imagined I
 could distinguish Mr. Venables' step, going out. I laid aside my work;
 my heart palpitated; still I was afraid hastily to enquire; and I waited
 a long half hour, before I ventured to ask the boy whether his master
 was in the counting-house?
 
 "Being answered in the negative, I bade him call me a coach, and
 collecting a few necessaries hastily together, with a little parcel
 of letters and papers which I had collected the preceding evening, I
 hurried into it, desiring the coachman to drive to a distant part of the
 town.
 
 "I almost feared that the coach would break down before I got out of the
 street; and, when I turned the corner, I seemed to breathe a freer air.
 I was ready to imagine that I was rising above the thick atmosphere of
 earth; or I felt, as wearied souls might be supposed to feel on entering
 another state of existence.
 
 "I stopped at one or two stands of coaches to elude pursuit, and then
 drove round the skirts of the town to seek for an obscure lodging, where
 I wished to remain concealed, till I could avail myself of my uncle's
 protection. I had resolved to assume my own name immediately, and openly
 to avow my determination, without any formal vindication, the moment
 I had found a home, in which I could rest free from the daily alarm of
 expecting to see Mr. Venables enter.
 
 "I looked at several lodgings; but finding that I could not, without
 a reference to some acquaintance, who might inform my tyrant, get
 admittance into a decent apartment--men have not all this trouble--I
 thought of a woman whom I had assisted to furnish a little haberdasher's
 shop, and who I knew had a first floor to let.
 
 "I went to her, and though I could not persuade her, that the quarrel
 between me and Mr. Venables would never be made up, still she agreed to
 conceal me for the present; yet assuring me at the same time, shaking
 her head, that, when a woman was once married, she must bear every
 thing. Her pale face, on which appeared a thousand haggard lines and
 delving wrinkles, produced by what is emphatically termed fretting,
 inforced her remark; and I had afterwards an opportunity of observing
 the treatment she had to endure, which grizzled her into patience. She
 toiled from morning till night; yet her husband would rob the till,
 and take away the money reserved for paying bills; and, returning home
 drunk, he would beat her if she chanced to offend him, though she had a
 child at the breast.
 
 "These scenes awoke me at night; and, in the morning, I heard her, as
 usual, talk to her dear Johnny--he, forsooth, was her master; no slave
 in the West Indies had one more despotic; but fortunately she was of the
 true Russian breed of wives.
 
 "My mind, during the few past days, seemed, as it were, disengaged from
 my body; but, now the struggle was over, I felt very forcibly the effect
 which perturbation of spirits produces on a woman in my situation.
 
 "The apprehension of a miscarriage, obliged me to confine myself to my
 apartment near a fortnight; but I wrote to my uncle's friend for money,
 promising 'to call on him, and explain my situation, when I was well
 enough to go out; mean time I earnestly intreated him, not to mention
 my place of abode to any one, lest my husband--such the law considered
 him--should disturb the mind he could not conquer. I mentioned my
 intention of setting out for Lisbon, to claim my uncle's protection, the
 moment my health would permit.'
 
 "The tranquillity however, which I was recovering, was soon interrupted.
 My landlady came up to me one day, with eyes swollen with weeping,
 unable to utter what she was commanded to say. She declared, 'That she
 was never so miserable in her life; that she must appear an ungrateful
 monster; and that she would readily go down on her knees to me, to
 intreat me to forgive her, as she had done to her husband to spare her
 the cruel task.' Sobs prevented her from proceeding, or answering my
 impatient enquiries, to know what she meant.
 
 "When she became a little more composed, she took a newspaper out of
 her pocket, declaring, 'that her heart smote her, but what could she
 do?--she must obey her husband.' I snatched the paper from her. An
 advertisement quickly met my eye, purporting, that 'Maria Venables had,
 without any assignable cause, absconded from her husband; and any person
 harbouring her, was menaced with the utmost severity of the law.'
 
 "Perfectly acquainted with Mr. Venables' meanness of soul, this step
 did not excite my surprise, and scarcely my contempt. Resentment in my
 breast, never survived love. I bade the poor woman, in a kind tone, wipe
 her eyes, and request her husband to come up, and speak to me himself.
 
 "My manner awed him. He respected a lady, though not a woman; and began
 to mutter out an apology.
 
 "'Mr. Venables was a rich gentleman; he wished to oblige me, but he had
 suffered enough by the law already, to tremble at the thought; besides,
 for certain, we should come together again, and then even I should not
 thank him for being accessary to keeping us asunder.--A husband and wife
 were, God knows, just as one,--and all would come round at last.' He
 uttered a drawling 'Hem!' and then with an arch look, added--'Master
 might have had his little frolics--but--Lord bless your heart!--men
 would be men while the world stands.'
 
 "To argue with this privileged first-born of reason, I perceived, would
 be vain. I therefore only requested him to let me remain another day at
 his house, while I sought for a lodging; and not to inform Mr. Venables
 that I had ever been sheltered there.
 
 "He consented, because he had not the courage to refuse a person for
 whom he had an habitual respect; but I heard the pent-up choler burst
 forth in curses, when he met his wife, who was waiting impatiently at
 the foot of the stairs, to know what effect my expostulations would have
 on him.
 
 "Without wasting any time in the fruitless indulgence of vexation, I
 once more set out in search of an abode in which I could hide myself for
 a few weeks.
 
 "Agreeing to pay an exorbitant price, I hired an apartment, without any
 reference being required relative to my character: indeed, a glance at
 my shape seemed to say, that my motive for concealment was sufficiently
 obvious. Thus was I obliged to shroud my head in infamy.
 
 "To avoid all danger of detection--I use the appropriate word, my child,
 for I was hunted out like a felon--I determined to take possession of my
 new lodgings that very evening.
 
 "I did not inform my landlady where I was going. I knew that she had a
 sincere affection for me, and would willingly have run any risk to show
 her gratitude; yet I was fully convinced, that a few kind words from
 Johnny would have found the woman in her, and her dear benefactress,
 as she termed me in an agony of tears, would have been sacrificed, to
 recompense her tyrant for condescending to treat her like an equal. He
 could be kind-hearted, as she expressed it, when he pleased. And this
 thawed sternness, contrasted with his habitual brutality, was the more
 acceptable, and could not be purchased at too dear a rate.
 
 "The sight of the advertisement made me desirous of taking refuge with
 my uncle, let what would be the consequence; and I repaired in a hackney
 coach (afraid of meeting some person who might chance to know me, had I
 walked) to the chambers of my uncle's friend.
 
 "He received me with great politeness (my uncle had already prepossessed
 him in my favour), and listened, with interest, to my explanation of the
 motives which had induced me to fly from home, and skulk in obscurity,
 with all the timidity of fear that ought only to be the companion of
 guilt. He lamented, with rather more gallantry than, in my situation,
 I thought delicate, that such a woman should be thrown away on a man
 insensible to the charms of beauty or grace. He seemed at a loss what to
 advise me to do, to evade my husband's search, without hastening to my
 uncle, whom, he hesitating said, I might not find alive. He uttered this
 intelligence with visible regret; requested me, at least, to wait for
 the arrival of the next packet; offered me what money I wanted, and
 promised to visit me.
 
 "He kept his word; still no letter arrived to put an end to my painful
 state of suspense. I procured some books and music, to beguile the
 tedious solitary days.
 
      'Come, ever smiling Liberty,
      'And with thee bring thy jocund train:'
 
 I sung--and sung till, saddened by the strain of joy, I bitterly
 lamented the fate that deprived me of all social pleasure. Comparative
 liberty indeed I had possessed myself of; but the jocund train lagged
 far behind!"
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 13
 
 
 "BY WATCHING my only visitor, my uncle's friend, or by some other means,
 Mr. Venables discovered my residence, and came to enquire for me. The
 maid-servant assured him there was no such person in the house. A bustle
 ensued--I caught the alarm--listened--distinguished his voice, and
 immediately locked the door. They suddenly grew still; and I waited
 near a quarter of an hour, before I heard him open the parlour door,
 and mount the stairs with the mistress of the house, who obsequiously
 declared that she knew nothing of me.
 
 "Finding my door locked, she requested me to open it, and prepare to go
 home with my husband, poor gentleman! to whom I had already occasioned
 sufficient vexation.' I made no reply. Mr. Venables then, in an assumed
 tone of softness, intreated me, 'to consider what he suffered, and my
 own reputation, and get the better of childish resentment.' He ran on
 in the same strain, pretending to address me, but evidently adapting his
 discourse to the capacity of the landlady; who, at every pause, uttered
 an exclamation of pity; or 'Yes, to be sure--Very true, sir.'
 
 "Sick of the farce, and perceiving that I could not avoid the hated
 interview, I opened the door, and he entered. Advancing with easy
 assurance to take my hand, I shrunk from his touch, with an involuntary
 start, as I should have done from a noisome reptile, with more disgust
 than terror. His conductress was retiring, to give us, as she said, an
 opportunity to accommodate matters. But I bade her come in, or I would
 go out; and curiosity impelled her to obey me.
 
 "Mr. Venables began to expostulate; and this woman, proud of his
 confidence, to second him. But I calmly silenced her, in the midst of a
 vulgar harangue, and turning to him, asked, 'Why he vainly tormented me?
 declaring that no power on earth should force me back to his house.'
 
 "After a long altercation, the particulars of which, it would be to
 no purpose to repeat, he left the room. Some time was spent in loud
 conversation in the parlour below, and I discovered that he had brought
 his friend, an attorney, with him.*
 
      * In the original edition the paragraph following is
      preceded by three lines of asterisks [Publisher's note].
 
 "The tumult on the landing place, brought out a gentleman, who had
 recently taken apartments in the house; he enquired why I was thus
 assailed?* The voluble attorney instantly repeated the trite tale. The
 stranger turned to me, observing, with the most soothing politeness and
 manly interest, that 'my countenance told a very different story.' He
 added, 'that I should not be insulted, or forced out of the house, by
 any body.'
 
      * The introduction of Darnford as the deliverer of Maria, in
      an early stage of the history, is already stated (Chap.
      III.) to have been an after-thought of the author. This has
      probably caused the imperfectness of the manuscript in the
      above passage; though, at the same time, it must be
      acknowledged to be somewhat uncertain, whether Darnford is
      the stranger intended in this place.  It appears from Chap.
      XVII, that an interference of a more decisive nature was
      designed to be attributed to him.  EDITOR. [Godwin's note]
 
 "'Not by her husband?' asked the attorney.
 
 "'No, sir, not by her husband.' Mr. Venables advanced towards him--But
 there was a decision in his attitude, that so well seconded that of his
 voice, * They left the house: at the same time protesting, that any one
 that should dare to protect me, should be prosecuted with the utmost
 rigour.
 
      * Two and a half lines of asterisks appear here in the
      original [Publisher's note].
 
 "They were scarcely out of the house, when my landlady came up to me
 again, and begged my pardon, in a very different tone. For, though Mr.
 Venables had bid her, at her peril, harbour me, he had not attended,
 I found, to her broad hints, to discharge the lodging. I instantly
 promised to pay her, and make her a present to compensate for my abrupt
 departure, if she would procure me another lodging, at a sufficient
 distance; and she, in return, repeating Mr. Venables' plausible tale, I
 raised her indignation, and excited her sympathy, by telling her briefly
 the truth.
 
 "She expressed her commiseration with such honest warmth, that I felt
 soothed; for I have none of that fastidious sensitiveness, which a
 vulgar accent or gesture can alarm to the disregard of real kindness. I
 was ever glad to perceive in others the humane feelings I delighted
 to exercise; and the recollection of some ridiculous characteristic
 circumstances, which have occurred in a moment of emotion, has convulsed
 me with laughter, though at the instant I should have thought it
 sacrilegious to have smiled. Your improvement, my dearest girl, being
 ever present to me while I write, I note these feelings, because women,
 more accustomed to observe manners than actions, are too much alive to
 ridicule. So much so, that their boasted sensibility is often stifled by
 false delicacy. True sensibility, the sensibility which is the auxiliary
 of virtue, and the soul of genius, is in society so occupied with the
 feelings of others, as scarcely to regard its own sensations. With what
 reverence have I looked up at my uncle, the dear parent of my mind! when
 I have seen the sense of his own sufferings, of mind and body, absorbed
 in a desire to comfort those, whose misfortunes were comparatively
 trivial. He would have been ashamed of being as indulgent to himself,
 as he was to others. 'Genuine fortitude,' he would assert, 'consisted in
 governing our own emotions, and making allowance for the weaknesses in
 our friends, that we would not tolerate in ourselves.' But where is my
 fond regret leading me!
 
 "'Women must be submissive,' said my landlady. 'Indeed what could most
 women do? Who had they to maintain them, but their husbands? Every
 woman, and especially a lady, could not go through rough and smooth, as
 she had done, to earn a little bread.'
 
 "She was in a talking mood, and proceeded to inform me how she had been
 used in the world. 'She knew what it was to have a bad husband, or
 she did not know who should.' I perceived that she would be very much
 mortified, were I not to attend to her tale, and I did not attempt to
 interrupt her, though I wished her, as soon as possible, to go out in
 search of a new abode for me, where I could once more hide my head.
 
 "She began by telling me, 'That she had saved a little money in service;
 and was over-persuaded (we must all be in love once in our lives) to
 marry a likely man, a footman in the family, not worth a groat. My
 plan,' she continued, 'was to take a house, and let out lodgings; and
 all went on well, till my husband got acquainted with an impudent slut,
 who chose to live on other people's means--and then all went to rack and
 ruin. He ran in debt to buy her fine clothes, such clothes as I never
 thought of wearing myself, and--would you believe it?--he signed an
 execution on my very goods, bought with the money I worked so hard to
 get; and they came and took my bed from under me, before I heard a word
 of the matter. Aye, madam, these are misfortunes that you gentlefolks
 know nothing of,--but sorrow is sorrow, let it come which way it will.
 
 "'I sought for a service again--very hard, after having a house of my
 own!--but he used to follow me, and kick up such a riot when he was
 drunk, that I could not keep a place; nay, he even stole my clothes, and
 pawned them; and when I went to the pawnbroker's, and offered to take my
 oath that they were not bought with a farthing of his money, they said,
 'It was all as one, my husband had a right to whatever I had.'
 
 "'At last he listed for a soldier, and I took a house, making an
 agreement to pay for the furniture by degrees; and I almost starved
 myself, till I once more got before-hand in the world.
 
 "'After an absence of six years (God forgive me! I thought he was dead)
 my husband returned; found me out, and came with such a penitent face,
 I forgave him, and clothed him from head to foot. But he had not been
 a week in the house, before some of his creditors arrested him; and, he
 selling my goods, I found myself once more reduced to beggary; for I
 was not as well able to work, go to bed late, and rise early, as when I
 quitted service; and then I thought it hard enough. He was soon tired of
 me, when there was nothing more to be had, and left me again.
 
 "I will not tell you how I was buffeted about, till, hearing for certain
 that he had died in an hospital abroad, I once more returned to my old
 occupation; but have not yet been able to get my head above water: so,
 madam, you must not be angry if I am afraid to run any risk, when I know
 so well, that women have always the worst of it, when law is to decide.'
 
 "After uttering a few more complaints, I prevailed on my landlady to go
 out in quest of a lodging; and, to be more secure, I condescended to the
 mean shift of changing my name.
 
 "But why should I dwell on similar incidents!--I was hunted, like an
 infected beast, from three different apartments, and should not have
 been allowed to rest in any, had not Mr. Venables, informed of my
 uncle's dangerous state of health, been inspired with the fear of
 hurrying me out of the world as I advanced in my pregnancy, by thus
 tormenting and obliging me to take sudden journeys to avoid him; and
 then his speculations on my uncle's fortune must prove abortive.
 
 "One day, when he had pursued me to an inn, I fainted, hurrying from
 him; and, falling down, the sight of my blood alarmed him, and obtained
 a respite for me. It is strange that he should have retained any hope,
 after observing my unwavering determination; but, from the mildness of
 my behaviour, when I found all my endeavours to change his disposition
 unavailing, he formed an erroneous opinion of my character, imagining
 that, were we once more together, I should part with the money he
 could not legally force from me, with the same facility as formerly.
 My forbearance and occasional sympathy he had mistaken for weakness
 of character; and, because he perceived that I disliked resistance,
 he thought my indulgence and compassion mere selfishness, and never
 discovered that the fear of being unjust, or of unnecessarily wounding
 the feelings of another, was much more painful to me, than any thing I
 could have to endure myself. Perhaps it was pride which made me imagine,
 that I could bear what I dreaded to inflict; and that it was often
 easier to suffer, than to see the sufferings of others.
 
 "I forgot to mention that, during this persecution, I received a letter
 from my uncle, informing me, 'that he only found relief from continual
 change of air; and that he intended to return when the spring was a
 little more advanced (it was now the middle of February), and then we
 would plan a journey to Italy, leaving the fogs and cares of England
 far behind.' He approved of my conduct, promised to adopt my child,
 and seemed to have no doubt of obliging Mr. Venables to hear reason.
 He wrote to his friend, by the same post, desiring him to call on
 Mr. Venables in his name; and, in consequence of the remonstrances he
 dictated, I was permitted to lie-in tranquilly.
 
 "The two or three weeks previous, I had been allowed to rest in peace;
 but, so accustomed was I to pursuit and alarm, that I seldom closed my
 eyes without being haunted by Mr. Venables' image, who seemed to assume
 terrific or hateful forms to torment me, wherever I turned.--Sometimes
 a wild cat, a roaring bull, or hideous assassin, whom I vainly attempted
 to fly; at others he was a demon, hurrying me to the brink of a
 precipice, plunging me into dark waves, or horrid gulfs; and I woke, in
 violent fits of trembling anxiety, to assure myself that it was all
 a dream, and to endeavour to lure my waking thoughts to wander to the
 delightful Italian vales, I hoped soon to visit; or to picture some
 august ruins, where I reclined in fancy on a mouldering column,
 and escaped, in the contemplation of the heart-enlarging virtues of
 antiquity, from the turmoil of cares that had depressed all the daring
 purposes of my soul. But I was not long allowed to calm my mind by
 the exercise of my imagination; for the third day after your birth, my
 child, I was surprised by a visit from my elder brother; who came in the
 most abrupt manner, to inform me of the death of my uncle. He had left
 the greater part of his fortune to my child, appointing me its guardian;
 in short, every step was taken to enable me to be mistress of his
 fortune, without putting any part of it in Mr. Venables' power. My
 brother came to vent his rage on me, for having, as he expressed
 himself, 'deprived him, my uncle's eldest nephew, of his inheritance;'
 though my uncle's property, the fruit of his own exertion, being all in
 the funds, or on landed securities, there was not a shadow of justice in
 the charge.
 
 "As I sincerely loved my uncle, this intelligence brought on a fever,
 which I struggled to conquer with all the energy of my mind; for, in my
 desolate state, I had it very much at heart to suckle you, my poor
 babe. You seemed my only tie to life, a cherub, to whom I wished to be
 a father, as well as a mother; and the double duty appeared to me to
 produce a proportionate increase of affection. But the pleasure I felt,
 while sustaining you, snatched from the wreck of hope, was cruelly
 damped by melancholy reflections on my widowed state--widowed by the
 death of my uncle. Of Mr. Venables I thought not, even when I thought of
 the felicity of loving your father, and how a mother's pleasure might
 be exalted, and her care softened by a husband's tenderness.--'Ought to
 be!' I exclaimed; and I endeavoured to drive away the tenderness that
 suffocated me; but my spirits were weak, and the unbidden tears would
 flow. 'Why was I,' I would ask thee, but thou didst not heed me,--'cut
 off from the participation of the sweetest pleasure of life?' I imagined
 with what extacy, after the pains of child-bed, I should have presented
 my little stranger, whom I had so long wished to view, to a respectable
 father, and with what maternal fondness I should have pressed them both
 to my heart!--Now I kissed her with less delight, though with the most
 endearing compassion, poor helpless one! when I perceived a slight
 resemblance of him, to whom she owed her existence; or, if any gesture
 reminded me of him, even in his best days, my heart heaved, and I
 pressed the innocent to my bosom, as if to purify it--yes, I blushed to
 think that its purity had been sullied, by allowing such a man to be its
 father.
 
 "After my recovery, I began to think of taking a house in the country,
 or of making an excursion on the continent, to avoid Mr. Venables; and
 to open my heart to new pleasures and affection. The spring was melting
 into summer, and you, my little companion, began to smile--that smile
 made hope bud out afresh, assuring me the world was not a desert. Your
 gestures were ever present to my fancy; and I dwelt on the joy I should
 feel when you would begin to walk and lisp. Watching your wakening mind,
 and shielding from every rude blast my tender blossom, I recovered my
 spirits--I dreamed not of the frost--'the killing frost,' to which you
 were destined to be exposed.--But I lose all patience--and execrate the
 injustice of the world--folly! ignorance!--I should rather call it; but,
 shut up from a free circulation of thought, and always pondering on the
 same griefs, I writhe under the torturing apprehensions, which ought to
 excite only honest indignation, or active compassion; and would, could
 I view them as the natural consequence of things. But, born a woman--and
 born to suffer, in endeavouring to repress my own emotions, I feel more
 acutely the various ills my sex are fated to bear--I feel that the evils
 they are subject to endure, degrade them so far below their oppressors,
 as almost to justify their tyranny; leading at the same time superficial
 reasoners to term that weakness the cause, which is only the consequence
 of short-sighted despotism."
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 14
 
 
 "AS MY MIND grew calmer, the visions of Italy again returned with their
 former glow of colouring; and I resolved on quitting the kingdom for
 a time, in search of the cheerfulness, that naturally results from a
 change of scene, unless we carry the barbed arrow with us, and only see
 what we feel.
 
 "During the period necessary to prepare for a long absence, I sent a
 supply to pay my father's debts, and settled my brothers in eligible
 situations; but my attention was not wholly engrossed by my family,
 though I do not think it necessary to enumerate the common exertions of
 humanity. The manner in which my uncle's property was settled, prevented
 me from making the addition to the fortune of my surviving sister, that
 I could have wished; but I had prevailed on him to bequeath her two
 thousand pounds, and she determined to marry a lover, to whom she had
 been some time attached. Had it not been for this engagement, I should
 have invited her to accompany me in my tour; and I might have escaped
 the pit, so artfully dug in my path, when I was the least aware of
 danger.
 
 "I had thought of remaining in England, till I weaned my child; but this
 state of freedom was too peaceful to last, and I had soon reason to wish
 to hasten my departure. A friend of Mr. Venables, the same attorney
 who had accompanied him in several excursions to hunt me from my hiding
 places, waited on me to propose a reconciliation. On my refusal, he
 indirectly advised me to make over to my husband--for husband he would
 term him--the greater part of the property I had at command, menacing
 me with continual persecution unless I complied, and that, as a last
 resort, he would claim the child. I did not, though intimidated by the
 last insinuation, scruple to declare, that I would not allow him to
 squander the money left to me for far different purposes, but offered
 him five hundred pounds, if he would sign a bond not to torment me any
 more. My maternal anxiety made me thus appear to waver from my first
 determination, and probably suggested to him, or his diabolical agent,
 the infernal plot, which has succeeded but too well.
 
 "The bond was executed; still I was impatient to leave England. Mischief
 hung in the air when we breathed the same; I wanted seas to divide us,
 and waters to roll between, till he had forgotten that I had the means
 of helping him through a new scheme. Disturbed by the late occurrences,
 I instantly prepared for my departure. My only delay was waiting for a
 maid-servant, who spoke French fluently, and had been warmly recommended
 to me. A valet I was advised to hire, when I fixed on my place of
 residence for any time.
 
 "My God, with what a light heart did I set out for Dover!--It was not
 my country, but my cares, that I was leaving behind. My heart seemed
 to bound with the wheels, or rather appeared the centre on which
 they twirled. I clasped you to my bosom, exclaiming 'And you will be
 safe--quite safe--when--we are once on board the packet.--Would we were
 there!' I smiled at my idle fears, as the natural effect of continual
 alarm; and I scarcely owned to myself that I dreaded Mr. Venables's
 cunning, or was conscious of the horrid delight he would feel, at
 forming stratagem after stratagem to circumvent me. I was already in
 the snare--I never reached the packet--I never saw thee more.--I grow
 breathless. I have scarcely patience to write down the details. The
 maid--the plausible woman I had hired--put, doubtless, some stupefying
 potion in what I ate or drank, the morning I left town. All I know is,
 that she must have quitted the chaise, shameless wretch! and taken (from
 my breast) my babe with her. How could a creature in a female form
 see me caress thee, and steal thee from my arms! I must stop, stop to
 repress a mother's anguish; lest, in bitterness of soul, I imprecate the
 wrath of heaven on this tiger, who tore my only comfort from me.
 
 "How long I slept I know not; certainly many hours, for I woke at the
 close of day, in a strange confusion of thought. I was probably roused
 to recollection by some one thundering at a huge, unwieldy gate.
 Attempting to ask where I was, my voice died away, and I tried to
 raise it in vain, as I have done in a dream. I looked for my babe
 with affright; feared that it had fallen out of my lap, while I had so
 strangely forgotten her; and, such was the vague intoxication, I can
 give it no other name, in which I was plunged, I could not recollect
 when or where I last saw you; but I sighed, as if my heart wanted room
 to clear my head.
 
 "The gates opened heavily, and the sullen sound of many locks and
 bolts drawn back, grated on my very soul, before I was appalled by the
 creeking of the dismal hinges, as they closed after me. The gloomy pile
 was before me, half in ruins; some of the aged trees of the avenue were
 cut down, and left to rot where they fell; and as we approached some
 mouldering steps, a monstrous dog darted forwards to the length of his
 chain, and barked and growled infernally.
 
 "The door was opened slowly, and a murderous visage peeped out, with a
 lantern. 'Hush!' he uttered, in a threatning tone, and the affrighted
 animal stole back to his kennel. The door of the chaise flew back, the
 stranger put down the lantern, and clasped his dreadful arms around me.
 It was certainly the effect of the soporific draught, for, instead of
 exerting my strength, I sunk without motion, though not without sense,
 on his shoulder, my limbs refusing to obey my will. I was carried up the
 steps into a close-shut hall. A candle flaring in the socket, scarcely
 dispersed the darkness, though it displayed to me the ferocious
 countenance of the wretch who held me.
 
 "He mounted a wide staircase. Large figures painted on the walls seemed
 to start on me, and glaring eyes to meet me at every turn. Entering a
 long gallery, a dismal shriek made me spring out of my conductor's arms,
 with I know not what mysterious emotion of terror; but I fell on the
 floor, unable to sustain myself.
 
 "A strange-looking female started out of one of the recesses, and
 observed me with more curiosity than interest; till, sternly bid
 retire, she flitted back like a shadow. Other faces, strongly marked,
 or distorted, peeped through the half-opened doors, and I heard some
 incoherent sounds. I had no distinct idea where I could be--I looked on
 all sides, and almost doubted whether I was alive or dead.
 
 "Thrown on a bed, I immediately sunk into insensibility again; and
 next day, gradually recovering the use of reason, I began, starting
 affrighted from the conviction, to discover where I was confined--I
 insisted on seeing the master of the mansion--I saw him--and perceived
 that I was buried alive.--
 
 "Such, my child, are the events of thy mother's life to this dreadful
 moment--Should she ever escape from the fangs of her enemies, she will
 add the secrets of her prison-house--and--"
 
 Some lines were here crossed out, and the memoirs broke off abruptly
 with the names of Jemima and Darnford.
 
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX
 
 ADVERTISEMENT*
 
 
 
 THE performance, with a fragment of which the reader has now been
 presented, was designed to consist of three parts. The preceding sheets
 were considered as constituting one of those parts. Those persons who in
 the perusal of the chapters, already written and in some degree finished
 by the author, have felt their hearts awakened, and their curiosity
 excited as to the sequel of the story, will, of course, gladly accept
 even of the broken paragraphs and half-finished sentences, which have
 been found committed to paper, as materials for the remainder. The
 fastidious and cold-hearted critic may perhaps feel himself repelled
 by the incoherent form in which they are presented. But an inquisitive
 temper willingly accepts the most imperfect and mutilated information,
 where better is not to be had: and readers, who in any degree resemble
 the author in her quick apprehension of sentiment, and of the pleasures
 and pains of imagination, will, I believe, find gratification, in
 contemplating sketches, which were designed in a short time to have
 received the finishing touches of her genius; but which must now for
 ever remain a mark to record the triumphs of mortality, over schemes of
 usefulness, and projects of public interest.
 
      * Presumed to have been written by Godwin [Publisher's note].
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 15
 
 
 DARNFORD returned the memoirs to Maria, with a most affectionate letter,
 in which he reasoned on "the absurdity of the laws respecting matrimony,
 which, till divorces could be more easily obtained, was," he declared,
 "the most insufferable bondage." Ties of this nature could not bind minds
 governed by superior principles; and such beings were privileged to act
 above the dictates of laws they had no voice in framing, if they had
 sufficient strength of mind to endure the natural consequence. In her
 case, to talk of duty, was a farce, excepting what was due to herself.
 Delicacy, as well as reason, forbade her ever to think of returning to
 her husband: was she then to restrain her charming sensibility through
 mere prejudice? These arguments were not absolutely impartial, for he
 disdained to conceal, that, when he appealed to her reason, he felt
 that he had some interest in her heart.--The conviction was not more
 transporting, than sacred--a thousand times a day, he asked himself how
 he had merited such happiness?--and as often he determined to purify the
 heart she deigned to inhabit--He intreated to be again admitted to her
 presence.
 
 He was; and the tear which glistened in his eye, when he respectfully
 pressed her to his bosom, rendered him peculiarly dear to the
 unfortunate mother. Grief had stilled the transports of love, only to
 render their mutual tenderness more touching. In former interviews,
 Darnford had contrived, by a hundred little pretexts, to sit near
 her, to take her hand, or to meet her eyes--now it was all soothing
 affection, and esteem seemed to have rivalled love. He adverted to her
 narrative, and spoke with warmth of the oppression she had endured.--His
 eyes, glowing with a lambent flame, told her how much he wished to
 restore her to liberty and love; but he kissed her hand, as if it had
 been that of a saint; and spoke of the loss of her child, as if it had
 been his own.--What could have been more flattering to Maria?--Every
 instance of self-denial was registered in her heart, and she loved him,
 for loving her too well to give way to the transports of passion.
 
 They met again and again; and Darnford declared, while passion suffused
 his cheeks, that he never before knew what it was to love.--
 
 One morning Jemima informed Maria, that her master intended to wait on
 her, and speak to her without witnesses. He came, and brought a letter
 with him, pretending that he was ignorant of its contents, though he
 insisted on having it returned to him. It was from the attorney already
 mentioned, who informed her of the death of her child, and hinted, "that
 she could not now have a legitimate heir, and that, would she make over
 the half of her fortune during life, she should be conveyed to Dover,
 and permitted to pursue her plan of travelling."
 
 Maria answered with warmth, "That she had no terms to make with the
 murderer of her babe, nor would she purchase liberty at the price of her
 own respect."
 
 She began to expostulate with her jailor; but he sternly bade her "Be
 silent--he had not gone so far, not to go further."
 
 Darnford came in the evening. Jemima was obliged to be absent, and
 she, as usual, locked the door on them, to prevent interruption or
 discovery.--The lovers were, at first, embarrassed; but fell insensibly
 into confidential discourse. Darnford represented, "that they might
 soon be parted," and wished her "to put it out of the power of fate to
 separate them."
 
 As her husband she now received him, and he solemnly pledged himself as
 her protector--and eternal friend.--
 
 There was one peculiarity in Maria's mind: she was more anxious not to
 deceive, than to guard against deception; and had rather trust without
 sufficient reason, than be for ever the prey of doubt. Besides, what
 are we, when the mind has, from reflection, a certain kind of elevation,
 which exalts the contemplation above the little concerns of prudence! We
 see what we wish, and make a world of our own--and, though reality may
 sometimes open a door to misery, yet the moments of happiness procured
 by the imagination, may, without a paradox, be reckoned among the solid
 comforts of life. Maria now, imagining that she had found a being of
 celestial mould--was happy,--nor was she deceived.--He was then plastic
 in her impassioned hand--and reflected all the sentiments which animated
 and warmed her.*
 
      * Two and a half lines of dashes follow here in the original
      [Publisher's note].
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 16
 
 
 ONE morning confusion seemed to reign in the house, and Jemima came
 in terror, to inform Maria, "that her master had left it, with a
 determination, she was assured (and too many circumstances corroborated
 the opinion, to leave a doubt of its truth) of never returning. I am
 prepared then," said Jemima, "to accompany you in your flight."
 
 Maria started up, her eyes darting towards the door, as if afraid that
 some one should fasten it on her for ever.
 
 Jemima continued, "I have perhaps no right now to expect the performance
 of your promise; but on you it depends to reconcile me with the human
 race."
 
 "But Darnford!"--exclaimed Maria, mournfully--sitting down again, and
 crossing her arms--"I have no child to go to, and liberty has lost its
 sweets."
 
 "I am much mistaken, if Darnford is not the cause of my master's
 flight--his keepers assure me, that they have promised to confine him
 two days longer, and then he will be free--you cannot see him; but they
 will give a letter to him the moment he is free.--In that inform
 him where he may find you in London; fix on some hotel. Give me your
 clothes; I will send them out of the house with mine, and we will
 slip out at the garden-gate. Write your letter while I make these
 arrangements, but lose no time!"
 
 In an agitation of spirit, not to be calmed, Maria began to write to
 Darnford. She called him by the sacred name of "husband," and bade him
 "hasten to her, to share her fortune, or she would return to him."--An
 hotel in the Adelphi was the place of rendezvous.
 
 The letter was sealed and given in charge; and with light footsteps, yet
 terrified at the sound of them, she descended, scarcely breathing, and
 with an indistinct fear that she should never get out at the garden
 gate. Jemima went first.
 
 A being, with a visage that would have suited one possessed by a devil,
 crossed the path, and seized Maria by the arm. Maria had no fear but of
 being detained--"Who are you? what are you?" for the form was scarcely
 human. "If you are made of flesh and blood," his ghastly eyes glared on
 her, "do not stop me!"
 
 "Woman," interrupted a sepulchral voice, "what have I to do with
 thee?"--Still he grasped her hand, muttering a curse.
 
 "No, no; you have nothing to do with me," she exclaimed, "this is a
 moment of life and death!"--
 
 With supernatural force she broke from him, and, throwing her arms round
 Jemima, cried, "Save me!" The being, from whose grasp she had loosed
 herself, took up a stone as they opened the door, and with a kind of
 hellish sport threw it after them. They were out of his reach.
 
 When Maria arrived in town, she drove to the hotel already fixed on. But
 she could not sit still--her child was ever before her; and all that had
 passed during her confinement, appeared to be a dream. She went to the
 house in the suburbs, where, as she now discovered, her babe had been
 sent. The moment she entered, her heart grew sick; but she wondered not
 that it had proved its grave. She made the necessary enquiries, and the
 church-yard was pointed out, in which it rested under a turf. A little
 frock which the nurse's child wore (Maria had made it herself) caught
 her eye. The nurse was glad to sell it for half-a-guinea, and Maria
 hastened away with the relic, and, reentering the hackney-coach which
 waited for her, gazed on it, till she reached her hotel.
 
 She then waited on the attorney who had made her uncle's will, and
 explained to him her situation. He readily advanced her some of the
 money which still remained in his hands, and promised to take the whole
 of the case into consideration. Maria only wished to be permitted to
 remain in quiet--She found that several bills, apparently with her
 signature, had been presented to her agent, nor was she for a moment
 at a loss to guess by whom they had been forged; yet, equally averse to
 threaten or intreat, she requested her friend [the solicitor] to call on
 Mr. Venables. He was not to be found at home; but at length his agent,
 the attorney, offered a conditional promise to Maria, to leave her in
 peace, as long as she behaved with propriety, if she would give up the
 notes. Maria inconsiderately consented--Darnford was arrived, and she
 wished to be only alive to love; she wished to forget the anguish she
 felt whenever she thought of her child.
 
 They took a ready furnished lodging together, for she was above
 disguise; Jemima insisting on being considered as her house-keeper, and
 to receive the customary stipend. On no other terms would she remain
 with her friend.
 
 Darnford was indefatigable in tracing the mysterious circumstances of
 his confinement. The cause was simply, that a relation, a very distant
 one, to whom he was heir, had died intestate, leaving a considerable
 fortune. On the news of Darnford's arrival [in England, a person,
 intrusted with the management of the property, and who had the writings
 in his possession, determining, by one bold stroke, to strip Darnford
 of the succession,] had planned his confinement; and [as soon as he had
 taken the measures he judged most conducive to his object, this ruffian,
 together with his instrument,] the keeper of the private mad-house,
 left the kingdom. Darnford, who still pursued his enquiries, at last
 discovered that they had fixed their place of refuge at Paris.
 
 Maria and he determined therefore, with the faithful Jemima, to visit
 that metropolis, and accordingly were preparing for the journey, when
 they were informed that Mr. Venables had commenced an action against
 Darnford for seduction and adultery. The indignation Maria felt cannot
 be explained; she repented of the forbearance she had exercised in
 giving up the notes. Darnford could not put off his journey, without
 risking the loss of his property: Maria therefore furnished him with
 money for his expedition; and determined to remain in London till the
 termination of this affair.
 
 She visited some ladies with whom she had formerly been intimate, but
 was refused admittance; and at the opera, or Ranelagh, they could not
 recollect her. Among these ladies there were some, not her most intimate
 acquaintance, who were generally supposed to avail themselves of the
 cloke of marriage, to conceal a mode of conduct, that would for ever
 have damned their fame, had they been innocent, seduced girls. These
 particularly stood aloof.--Had she remained with her husband, practicing
 insincerity, and neglecting her child to manage an intrigue, she would
 still have been visited and respected. If, instead of openly living
 with her lover, she could have condescended to call into play a thousand
 arts, which, degrading her own mind, might have allowed the people who
 were not deceived, to pretend to be so, she would have been caressed and
 treated like an honourable woman. "And Brutus* is an honourable man!"
 said Mark-Antony with equal sincerity.
 
      * The name in the manuscript is by mistake written Caesar.
      EDITOR. [Godwin's note]
 
 With Darnford she did not taste uninterrupted felicity; there was a
 volatility in his manner which often distressed her; but love gladdened
 the scene; besides, he was the most tender, sympathizing creature in the
 world. A fondness for the sex often gives an appearance of humanity to
 the behaviour of men, who have small pretensions to the reality;
 and they seem to love others, when they are only pursuing their own
 gratification. Darnford appeared ever willing to avail himself of her
 taste and acquirements, while she endeavoured to profit by his decision
 of character, and to eradicate some of the romantic notions, which had
 taken root in her mind, while in adversity she had brooded over visions
 of unattainable bliss.
 
 The real affections of life, when they are allowed to burst forth, are
 buds pregnant with joy and all the sweet emotions of the soul; yet they
 branch out with wild ease, unlike the artificial forms of felicity,
 sketched by an imagination painful alive. The substantial happiness,
 which enlarges and civilizes the mind, may be compared to the pleasure
 experienced in roving through nature at large, inhaling the sweet gale
 natural to the clime; while the reveries of a feverish imagination
 continually sport themselves in gardens full of aromatic shrubs, which
 cloy while they delight, and weaken the sense of pleasure they gratify.
 The heaven of fancy, below or beyond the stars, in this life, or in
 those ever-smiling regions surrounded by the unmarked ocean of futurity,
 have an insipid uniformity which palls. Poets have imagined scenes of
 bliss; but, sencing out sorrow, all the extatic emotions of the Soul,
 and even its grandeur, seem to be equally excluded. We dose over the
 unruffled lake, and long to scale the rocks which fence the happy valley
 of contentment, though serpents hiss in the pathless desert, and danger
 lurks in the unexplored wiles. Maria found herself more indulgent as
 she was happier, and discovered virtues, in characters she had before
 disregarded, while chasing the phantoms of elegance and excellence,
 which sported in the meteors that exhale in the marshes of misfortune.
 The heart is often shut by romance against social pleasure; and,
 fostering a sickly sensibility, grows callous to the soft touches of
 humanity.
 
 To part with Darnford was indeed cruel.--It was to feel most painfully
 alone; but she rejoiced to think, that she should spare him the care and
 perplexity of the suit, and meet him again, all his own. Marriage, as
 at present constituted, she considered as leading to immorality--yet,
 as the odium of society impedes usefulness, she wished to avow her
 affection to Darnford, by becoming his wife according to established
 rules; not to be confounded with women who act from very different
 motives, though her conduct would be just the same without the ceremony
 as with it, and her expectations from him not less firm. The being
 summoned to defend herself from a charge which she was determined to
 plead guilty to, was still galling, as it roused bitter reflections on
 the situation of women in society.
 
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 17
 
 
 SUCH was her state of mind when the dogs of law were let loose on her.
 Maria took the task of conducting Darnford's defence upon herself. She
 instructed his counsel to plead guilty to the charge of adultery; but to
 deny that of seduction.
 
 The counsel for the plaintiff opened the cause, by observing, "that his
 client had ever been an indulgent husband, and had borne with several
 defects of temper, while he had nothing criminal to lay to the charge
 of his wife. But that she left his house without assigning any cause. He
 could not assert that she was then acquainted with the defendant; yet,
 when he was once endeavouring to bring her back to her home, this man
 put the peace-officers to flight, and took her he knew not whither.
 After the birth of her child, her conduct was so strange, and a
 melancholy malady having afflicted one of the family, which delicacy
 forbade the dwelling on, it was necessary to confine her. By some
 means the defendant enabled her to make her escape, and they had lived
 together, in despite of all sense of order and decorum. The adultery was
 allowed, it was not necessary to bring any witnesses to prove it; but
 the seduction, though highly probable from the circumstances which he
 had the honour to state, could not be so clearly proved.--It was of the
 most atrocious kind, as decency was set at defiance, and respect for
 reputation, which shows internal compunction, utterly disregarded."
 
 A strong sense of injustice had silenced every motion, which a mixture
 of true and false delicacy might otherwise have excited in Maria's
 bosom. She only felt in earnest to insist on the privilege of her
 nature. The sarcasms of society, and the condemnations of a mistaken
 world, were nothing to her, compared with acting contrary to those
 feelings which were the foundation of her principles. [She therefore
 eagerly put herself forward, instead of desiring to be absent, on this
 memorable occasion.]
 
 Convinced that the subterfuges of the law were disgraceful, she wrote a
 paper, which she expressly desired might be read in court:
 
 "Married when scarcely able to distinguish the nature of the engagement,
 I yet submitted to the rigid laws which enslave women, and obeyed the
 man whom I could no longer love. Whether the duties of the state are
 reciprocal, I mean not to discuss; but I can prove repeated infidelities
 which I overlooked or pardoned. Witnesses are not wanting to establish
 these facts. I at present maintain the child of a maid servant, sworn
 to him, and born after our marriage. I am ready to allow, that education
 and circumstances lead men to think and act with less delicacy, than the
 preservation of order in society demands from women; but surely I may
 without assumption declare, that, though I could excuse the birth, I
 could not the desertion of this unfortunate babe:--and, while I
 despised the man, it was not easy to venerate the husband. With proper
 restrictions however, I revere the institution which fraternizes the
 world. I exclaim against the laws which throw the whole weight of
 the yoke on the weaker shoulders, and force women, when they claim
 protectorship as mothers, to sign a contract, which renders them
 dependent on the caprice of the tyrant, whom choice or necessity has
 appointed to reign over them. Various are the cases, in which a woman
 ought to separate herself from her husband; and mine, I may be allowed
 emphatically to insist, comes under the description of the most
 aggravated.
 
 "I will not enlarge on those provocations which only the individual can
 estimate; but will bring forward such charges only, the truth of which
 is an insult upon humanity. In order to promote certain destructive
 speculations, Mr. Venables prevailed on me to borrow certain sums of a
 wealthy relation; and, when I refused further compliance, he thought of
 bartering my person; and not only allowed opportunities to, but urged,
 a friend from whom he borrowed money, to seduce me. On the discovery of
 this act of atrocity, I determined to leave him, and in the most
 decided manner, for ever. I consider all obligations as made void by his
 conduct; and hold, that schisms which proceed from want of principles,
 can never be healed.
 
 "He received a fortune with me to the amount of five thousand pounds.
 On the death of my uncle, convinced that I could provide for my child, I
 destroyed the settlement of that fortune. I required none of my property
 to be returned to me, nor shall enumerate the sums extorted from me
 during six years that we lived together.
 
 "After leaving, what the law considers as my home, I was hunted like a
 criminal from place to place, though I contracted no debts, and demanded
 no maintenance--yet, as the laws sanction such proceeding, and make
 women the property of their husbands, I forbear to animadvert. After
 the birth of my daughter, and the death of my uncle, who left a
 very considerable property to myself and child, I was exposed to new
 persecution; and, because I had, before arriving at what is termed years
 of discretion, pledged my faith, I was treated by the world, as bound
 for ever to a man whose vices were notorious. Yet what are the vices
 generally known, to the various miseries that a woman may be subject to,
 which, though deeply felt, eating into the soul, elude description, and
 may be glossed over! A false morality is even established, which
 makes all the virtue of women consist in chastity, submission, and the
 forgiveness of injuries.
 
 "I pardon my oppressor--bitterly as I lament the loss of my child, torn
 from me in the most violent manner. But nature revolts, and my soul
 sickens at the bare supposition, that it could ever be a duty to pretend
 affection, when a separation is necessary to prevent my feeling hourly
 aversion.
 
 "To force me to give my fortune, I was imprisoned--yes; in a private
 mad-house.--There, in the heart of misery, I met the man charged with
 seducing me. We became attached--I deemed, and ever shall deem, myself
 free. The death of my babe dissolved the only tie which subsisted
 between me and my, what is termed, lawful husband.
 
 "To this person, thus encountered, I voluntarily gave myself, never
 considering myself as any more bound to transgress the laws of moral
 purity, because the will of my husband might be pleaded in my excuse,
 than to transgress those laws to which [the policy of artificial society
 has] annexed [positive] punishments.--While no command of a husband can
 prevent a woman from suffering for certain crimes, she must be allowed
 to consult her conscience, and regulate her conduct, in some degree, by
 her own sense of right. The respect I owe to myself, demanded my strict
 adherence to my determination of never viewing Mr. Venables in the light
 of a husband, nor could it forbid me from encouraging another. If I am
 unfortunately united to an unprincipled man, am I for ever to be shut
 out from fulfilling the duties of a wife and mother?--I wish my country
 to approve of my conduct; but, if laws exist, made by the strong to
 oppress the weak, I appeal to my own sense of justice, and declare
 that I will not live with the individual, who has violated every moral
 obligation which binds man to man.
 
 "I protest equally against any charge being brought to criminate the
 man, whom I consider as my husband. I was six-and-twenty when I left
 Mr. Venables' roof; if ever I am to be supposed to arrive at an age to
 direct my own actions, I must by that time have arrived at it.--I acted
 with deliberation.--Mr. Darnford found me a forlorn and oppressed
 woman, and promised the protection women in the present state of society
 want.--But the man who now claims me--was he deprived of my society by
 this conduct? The question is an insult to common sense, considering
 where Mr. Darnford met me.--Mr. Venables' door was indeed open to
 me--nay, threats and intreaties were used to induce me to return; but
 why? Was affection or honour the motive?--I cannot, it is true, dive
 into the recesses of the human heart--yet I presume to assert,
 [borne out as I am by a variety of circumstances,] that he was merely
 influenced by the most rapacious avarice.
 
 "I claim then a divorce, and the liberty of enjoying, free from
 molestation, the fortune left to me by a relation, who was well aware
 of the character of the man with whom I had to contend.--I appeal to the
 justice and humanity of the jury--a body of men, whose private judgment
 must be allowed to modify laws, that must be unjust, because definite
 rules can never apply to indefinite circumstances--and I deprecate
 punishment upon the man of my choice, freeing him, as I solemnly do,
 from the charge of seduction.
 
 "I did not put myself into a situation to justify a charge of adultery,
 till I had, from conviction, shaken off the fetters which bound me to
 Mr. Venables.--While I lived with him, I defy the voice of calumny to
 sully what is termed the fair fame of woman.--Neglected by my husband,
 I never encouraged a lover; and preserved with scrupulous care, what is
 termed my honour, at the expence of my peace, till he, who should have
 been its guardian, laid traps to ensnare me. From that moment I believed
 myself, in the sight of heaven, free--and no power on earth shall force
 me to renounce my resolution."
 
 The judge, in summing up the evidence, alluded to "the fallacy of
 letting women plead their feelings, as an excuse for the violation of
 the marriage-vow. For his part, he had always determined to oppose all
 innovation, and the newfangled notions which incroached on the good old
 rules of conduct. We did not want French principles in public or private
 life--and, if women were allowed to plead their feelings, as an excuse
 or palliation of infidelity, it was opening a flood-gate for immorality.
 What virtuous woman thought of her feelings?--It was her duty to love
 and obey the man chosen by her parents and relations, who were qualified
 by their experience to judge better for her, than she could for
 herself. As to the charges brought against the husband, they were vague,
 supported by no witnesses, excepting that of imprisonment in a private
 madhouse. The proofs of an insanity in the family, might render that
 however a prudent measure; and indeed the conduct of the lady did not
 appear that of a person of sane mind. Still such a mode of proceeding
 could not be justified, and might perhaps entitle the lady [in another
 court] to a sentence of separation from bed and board, during the joint
 lives of the parties; but he hoped that no Englishman would legalize
 adultery, by enabling the adulteress to enrich her seducer. Too many
 restrictions could not be thrown in the way of divorces, if we wished to
 maintain the sanctity of marriage; and, though they might bear a little
 hard on a few, very few individuals, it was evidently for the good of
 the whole."
 
 
 
 
 
 CONCLUSION
 
 BY THE EDITOR *
 
      * i.e., Godwin [Publisher's note].
 
 VERY FEW hints exist respecting the plan of the remainder of the work.
 I find only two detached sentences, and some scattered heads for the
 continuation of the story. I transcribe the whole.
 
 I. "Darnford's letters were affectionate; but circumstances occasioned
 delays, and the miscarriage of some letters rendered the reception of
 wished-for answers doubtful: his return was necessary to calm Maria's
 mind."
 
 II. "As Darnford had informed her that his business was settled, his
 delaying to return seemed extraordinary; but love to excess, excludes
 fear or suspicion."
 
 The scattered heads for the continuation of the story, are as follow. *
 
      * To understand these minutes, it is necessary the reader
      should consider each of them as setting out from the same
      point in the story, viz. the point to which it is brought
      down in the preceding chapter. [Godwin's note]
 
 I. "Trial for adultery--Maria defends herself--A separation from bed and
 board is the consequence--Her fortune is thrown into chancery--Darnford
 obtains a part of his property--Maria goes into the country."
 
 II. "A prosecution for adultery commenced--Trial--Darnford sets out
 for France--Letters--Once more pregnant--He returns--Mysterious
 behaviour--Visit--Expectation--Discovery--Interview--Consequence."
 
 III. "Sued by her husband--Damages awarded to him--Separation from bed
 and board--Darnford goes abroad--Maria into the country--Provides for
 her father--Is shunned--Returns to London--Expects to see her lover--The
 rack of expectation--Finds herself again with child--Delighted--A
 discovery--A visit--A miscarriage--Conclusion."
 
 IV. "Divorced by her husband--Her lover
 unfaithful--Pregnancy--Miscarriage--Suicide."
 
 
 
 [The following passage appears in some respects to deviate from the
 preceding hints. It is superscribed] "THE END.
 
 "She swallowed the laudanum; her soul was calm--the tempest had
 subsided--and nothing remained but an eager longing to forget
 herself--to fly from the anguish she endured to escape from
 thought--from this hell of disappointment.
 
 "Still her eyes closed not--one remembrance with frightful velocity
 followed another--All the incidents of her life were in arms, embodied
 to assail her, and prevent her sinking into the sleep of death.--Her
 murdered child again appeared to her, mourning for the babe of which she
 was the tomb.--'And could it have a nobler?--Surely it is better to
 die with me, than to enter on life without a mother's care!--I
 cannot live!--but could I have deserted my child the moment it was
 born?--thrown it on the troubled wave of life, without a hand to support
 it?'--She looked up: 'What have I not suffered!--may I find a father
 where I am going!--Her head turned; a stupor ensued; a faintness--'Have
 a little patience,' said Maria, holding her swimming head (she thought
 of her mother), 'this cannot last long; and what is a little bodily pain
 to the pangs I have endured?'
 
 "A new vision swam before her. Jemima seemed to enter--leading a little
 creature, that, with tottering footsteps, approached the bed. The voice
 of Jemima sounding as at a distance, called her--she tried to listen, to
 speak, to look!
 
 "'Behold your child!' exclaimed Jemima. Maria started off the bed, and
 fainted.--Violent vomiting followed.
 
 "When she was restored to life, Jemima addressed her with great
 solemnity: '----- led me to suspect, that your husband and brother
 had deceived you, and secreted the child. I would not torment you with
 doubtful hopes, and I left you (at a fatal moment) to search for the
 child!--I snatched her from misery--and (now she is alive again) would
 you leave her alone in the world, to endure what I have endured?'
 
 "Maria gazed wildly at her, her whole frame was convulsed with emotion;
 when the child, whom Jemima had been tutoring all the journey, uttered
 the word 'Mamma!' She caught her to her bosom, and burst into a passion
 of tears--then, resting the child gently on the bed, as if afraid of
 killing it,--she put her hand to her eyes, to conceal as it were the
 agonizing struggle of her soul. She remained silent for five minutes,
 crossing her arms over her bosom, and reclining her head,--then
 exclaimed: 'The conflict is over!--I will live for my child!'"
 
 
 A few readers perhaps, in looking over these hints, will wonder how it
 could have been practicable, without tediousness, or remitting in any
 degree the interest of the story, to have filled, from these slight
 sketches, a number of pages, more considerable than those which have
 been already presented. But, in reality, these hints, simple as they
 are, are pregnant with passion and distress. It is the refuge of barren
 authors only, to crowd their fictions with so great a number of events,
 as to suffer no one of them to sink into the reader's mind. It is
 the province of true genius to develop events, to discover their
 capabilities, to ascertain the different passions and sentiments with
 which they are fraught, and to diversify them with incidents, that give
 reality to the picture, and take a hold upon the mind of a reader of
 taste, from which they can never be loosened. It was particularly
 the design of the author, in the present instance, to make her story
 subordinate to a great moral purpose, that "of exhibiting the misery and
 oppression, peculiar to women, that arise out of the partial laws and
 customs of society.--This view restrained her fancy."* It was necessary
 for her, to place in a striking point of view, evils that are too
 frequently overlooked, and to drag into light those details of
 oppression, of which the grosser and more insensible part of mankind
 make little account.
 
      * See author's preface. [Godwin's note]
 
 THE END.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 E-text prepared by Jonathan Ingram, Janet Blenkinship, and the Project
 Gutenberg Online Distributed Proofreading Team (http://www.pgdp.net/)
 
 
 
 Transcriber's note: The author is Mary Wollstonecraft (1759-1797).
 
 
 
 
 
 MARY,
 
 A Fiction
 
 L'exercice des plus sublimes vertus eleve et nourrit le genie.
                                                      ROUSSEAU.
 
 London,
 Printed for J. Johnson, St. Paul's Church-Yard.
 
 MDCCLXXXVIII
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ADVERTISEMENT.
 
 
 In delineating the Heroine of this Fiction, the Author attempts to
 develop a character different from those generally portrayed. This woman
 is neither a Clarissa, a Lady G----, nor a[A] Sophie.--It would be vain
 to mention the various modifications of these models, as it would to
 remark, how widely artists wander from nature, when they copy the
 originals of great masters. They catch the gross parts; but the subtile
 spirit evaporates; and not having the just ties, affectation disgusts,
 when grace was expected to charm.
 
 Those compositions only have power to delight, and carry us willing
 captives, where the soul of the author is exhibited, and animates the
 hidden springs. Lost in a pleasing enthusiasm, they live in the scenes
 they represent; and do not measure their steps in a beaten track,
 solicitous to gather expected flowers, and bind them in a wreath,
 according to the prescribed rules of art.
 
 These chosen few, wish to speak for themselves, and not to be an
 echo--even of the sweetest sounds--or the reflector of the most sublime
 beams. The[B] paradise they ramble in, must be of their own creating--or
 the prospect soon grows insipid, and not varied by a vivifying
 principle, fades and dies.
 
 In an artless tale, without episodes, the mind of a woman, who has
 thinking powers is displayed. The female organs have been thought too
 weak for this arduous employment; and experience seems to justify the
 assertion. Without arguing physically about _possibilities_--in a
 fiction, such a being may be allowed to exist; whose grandeur is derived
 from the operations of its own faculties, not subjugated to opinion; but
 drawn by the individual from the original source.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [Footnote A: Rousseau.]
 
 [Footnote B: I here give the Reviewers an opportunity of being very
 witty about the Paradise of Fools, &c.]
 
 
 
 
 MARY
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. I.
 
 
 Mary, the heroine of this fiction, was the daughter of Edward, who
 married Eliza, a gentle, fashionable girl, with a kind of indolence in
 her temper, which might be termed negative good-nature: her virtues,
 indeed, were all of that stamp. She carefully attended to the _shews_ of
 things, and her opinions, I should have said prejudices, were such as
 the generality approved of. She was educated with the expectation of a
 large fortune, of course became a mere machine: the homage of her
 attendants made a great part of her puerile amusements, and she never
 imagined there were any relative duties for her to fulfil: notions of
 her own consequence, by these means, were interwoven in her mind, and
 the years of youth spent in acquiring a few superficial accomplishments,
 without having any taste for them. When she was first introduced into
 the polite circle, she danced with an officer, whom she faintly wished
 to be united to; but her father soon after recommending another in a
 more distinguished rank of life, she readily submitted to his will, and
 promised to love, honour, and obey, (a vicious fool,) as in duty bound.
 
 While they resided in London, they lived in the usual fashionable style,
 and seldom saw each other; nor were they much more sociable when they
 wooed rural felicity for more than half the year, in a delightful
 country, where Nature, with lavish hand, had scattered beauties around;
 for the master, with brute, unconscious gaze, passed them by unobserved,
 and sought amusement in country sports. He hunted in the morning, and
 after eating an immoderate dinner, generally fell asleep: this
 seasonable rest enabled him to digest the cumbrous load; he would then
 visit some of his pretty tenants; and when he compared their ruddy glow
 of health with his wife's countenance, which even rouge could not
 enliven, it is not necessary to say which a _gourmand_ would give the
 preference to. Their vulgar dance of spirits were infinitely more
 agreeable to his fancy than her sickly, die-away languor. Her voice was
 but the shadow of a sound, and she had, to complete her delicacy, so
 relaxed her nerves, that she became a mere nothing.
 
 Many such noughts are there in the female world! yet she had a good
 opinion of her own merit,--truly, she said long prayers,--and sometimes
 read her Week's Preparation: she dreaded that horrid place vulgarly
 called _hell_, the regions below; but whether her's was a mounting
 spirit, I cannot pretend to determine; or what sort of a planet would
 have been proper for her, when she left her _material_ part in this
 world, let metaphysicians settle; I have nothing to say to her unclothed
 spirit.
 
 As she was sometimes obliged to be alone, or only with her French
 waiting-maid, she sent to the metropolis for all the new publications,
 and while she was dressing her hair, and she could turn her eyes from
 the glass, she ran over those most delightful substitutes for bodily
 dissipation, novels. I say bodily, or the animal soul, for a rational
 one can find no employment in polite circles. The glare of lights, the
 studied inelegancies of dress, and the compliments offered up at the
 shrine of false beauty, are all equally addressed to the senses.
 
 When she could not any longer indulge the caprices of fancy one way, she
 tried another. The Platonic Marriage, Eliza Warwick, and some other
 interesting tales were perused with eagerness. Nothing could be more
 natural than the developement of the passions, nor more striking than
 the views of the human heart. What delicate struggles! and uncommonly
 pretty turns of thought! The picture that was found on a bramble-bush,
 the new sensitive-plant, or tree, which caught the swain by the
 upper-garment, and presented to his ravished eyes a portrait.--Fatal
 image!--It planted a thorn in a till then insensible heart, and sent a
 new kind of a knight-errant into the world. But even this was nothing to
 the catastrophe, and the circumstance on which it hung, the hornet
 settling on the sleeping lover's face. What a _heart-rending_ accident!
 She planted, in imitation of those susceptible souls, a rose bush; but
 there was not a lover to weep in concert with her, when she watered it
 with her tears.--Alas! Alas!
 
 If my readers would excuse the sportiveness of fancy, and give me credit
 for genius, I would go on and tell them such tales as would force the
 sweet tears of sensibility to flow in copious showers down beautiful
 cheeks, to the discomposure of rouge, &c. &c. Nay, I would make it so
 interesting, that the fair peruser should beg the hair-dresser to
 settle the curls himself, and not interrupt her.
 
 She had besides another resource, two most beautiful dogs, who shared
 her bed, and reclined on cushions near her all the day. These she
 watched with the most assiduous care, and bestowed on them the warmest
 caresses. This fondness for animals was not that kind of
 _attendrissement_ which makes a person take pleasure in providing for
 the subsistence and comfort of a living creature; but it proceeded from
 vanity, it gave her an opportunity of lisping out the prettiest French
 expressions of ecstatic fondness, in accents that had never been attuned
 by tenderness.
 
 She was chaste, according to the vulgar acceptation of the word, that
 is, she did not make any actual _faux pas_; she feared the world, and
 was indolent; but then, to make amends for this seeming self-denial, she
 read all the sentimental novels, dwelt on the love-scenes, and, had she
 thought while she read, her mind would have been contaminated; as she
 accompanied the lovers to the lonely arbors, and would walk with them by
 the clear light of the moon. She wondered her husband did not stay at
 home. She was jealous--why did he not love her, sit by her side, squeeze
 her hand, and look unutterable things? Gentle reader, I will tell thee;
 they neither of them felt what they could not utter. I will not pretend
 to say that they always annexed an idea to a word; but they had none of
 those feelings which are not easily analyzed.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. II.
 
 
 In due time she brought forth a son, a feeble babe; and the following
 year a daughter. After the mother's throes she felt very few sentiments
 of maternal tenderness: the children were given to nurses, and she
 played with her dogs. Want of exercise prevented the least chance of her
 recovering strength; and two or three milk-fevers brought on a
 consumption, to which her constitution tended. Her children all died in
 their infancy, except the two first, and she began to grow fond of the
 son, as he was remarkably handsome. For years she divided her time
 between the sofa, and the card-table. She thought not of death, though
 on the borders of the grave; nor did any of the duties of her station
 occur to her as necessary. Her children were left in the nursery; and
 when Mary, the little blushing girl, appeared, she would send the
 awkward thing away. To own the truth, she was awkward enough, in a house
 without any play-mates; for her brother had been sent to school, and she
 scarcely knew how to employ herself; she would ramble about the garden,
 admire the flowers, and play with the dogs. An old house-keeper told her
 stories, read to her, and, at last, taught her to read. Her mother
 talked of enquiring for a governess when her health would permit; and,
 in the interim desired her own maid to teach her French. As she had
 learned to read, she perused with avidity every book that came in her
 way. Neglected in every respect, and left to the operations of her own
 mind, she considered every thing that came under her inspection, and
 learned to think. She had heard of a separate state, and that angels
 sometimes visited this earth. She would sit in a thick wood in the park,
 and talk to them; make little songs addressed to them, and sing them to
 tunes of her own composing; and her native wood notes wild were sweet
 and touching.
 
 Her father always exclaimed against female acquirements, and was glad
 that his wife's indolence and ill health made her not trouble herself
 about them. She had besides another reason, she did not wish to have a
 fine tall girl brought forward into notice as her daughter; she still
 expected to recover, and figure away in the gay world. Her husband was
 very tyrannical and passionate; indeed so very easily irritated when
 inebriated, that Mary was continually in dread lest he should frighten
 her mother to death; her sickness called forth all Mary's tenderness,
 and exercised her compassion so continually, that it became more than a
 match for self-love, and was the governing propensity of her heart
 through life. She was violent in her temper; but she saw her father's
 faults, and would weep when obliged to compare his temper with her
 own.--She did more; artless prayers rose to Heaven for pardon, when she
 was conscious of having erred; and her contrition was so exceedingly
 painful, that she watched diligently the first movements of anger and
 impatience, to save herself this cruel remorse.
 
 Sublime ideas filled her young mind--always connected with devotional
 sentiments; extemporary effusions of gratitude, and rhapsodies of
 praise would burst often from her, when she listened to the birds, or
 pursued the deer. She would gaze on the moon, and ramble through the
 gloomy path, observing the various shapes the clouds assumed, and listen
 to the sea that was not far distant. The wandering spirits, which she
 imagined inhabited every part of nature, were her constant friends and
 confidants. She began to consider the Great First Cause, formed just
 notions of his attributes, and, in particular, dwelt on his wisdom and
 goodness. Could she have loved her father or mother, had they returned
 her affection, she would not so soon, perhaps, have sought out a new
 world.
 
 Her sensibility prompted her to search for an object to love; on earth
 it was not to be found: her mother had often disappointed her, and the
 apparent partiality she shewed to her brother gave her exquisite
 pain--produced a kind of habitual melancholy, led her into a fondness
 for reading tales of woe, and made her almost realize the fictitious
 distress.
 
 She had not any notion of death till a little chicken expired at her
 feet; and her father had a dog hung in a passion. She then concluded
 animals had souls, or they would not have been subjected to the caprice
 of man; but what was the soul of man or beast? In this style year after
 year rolled on, her mother still vegetating.
 
 A little girl who attended in the nursery fell sick. Mary paid her great
 attention; contrary to her wish, she was sent out of the house to her
 mother, a poor woman, whom necessity obliged to leave her sick child
 while she earned her daily bread. The poor wretch, in a fit of delirium
 stabbed herself, and Mary saw her dead body, and heard the dismal
 account; and so strongly did it impress her imagination, that every
 night of her life the bleeding corpse presented itself to her when the
 first began to slumber. Tortured by it, she at last made a vow, that if
 she was ever mistress of a family she would herself watch over every
 part of it. The impression that this accident made was indelible.
 
 As her mother grew imperceptibly worse and worse, her father, who did
 not understand such a lingering complaint, imagined his wife was only
 grown still more whimsical, and that if she could be prevailed on to
 exert herself, her health would soon be re-established. In general he
 treated her with indifference; but when her illness at all interfered
 with his pleasures, he expostulated in the most cruel manner, and
 visibly harassed the invalid. Mary would then assiduously try to turn
 his attention to something else; and when sent out of the room, would
 watch at the door, until the storm was over, for unless it was, she
 could not rest. Other causes also contributed to disturb her repose: her
 mother's luke-warm manner of performing her religious duties, filled her
 with anguish; and when she observed her father's vices, the unbidden
 tears would flow. She was miserable when beggars were driven from the
 gate without being relieved; if she could do it unperceived, she would
 give them her own breakfast, and feel gratified, when, in consequence of
 it, she was pinched by hunger.
 
 She had once, or twice, told her little secrets to her mother; they were
 laughed at, and she determined never to do it again. In this manner was
 she left to reflect on her own feelings; and so strengthened were they
 by being meditated on, that her character early became singular and
 permanent. Her understanding was strong and clear, when not clouded by
 her feelings; but she was too much the creature of impulse, and the
 slave of compassion.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. III.
 
 
 Near her father's house lived a poor widow, who had been brought up in
 affluence, but reduced to great distress by the extravagance of her
 husband; he had destroyed his constitution while he spent his fortune;
 and dying, left his wife, and five small children, to live on a very
 scanty pittance. The eldest daughter was for some years educated by a
 distant relation, a Clergyman. While she was with him a young gentleman,
 son to a man of property in the neighbourhood, took particular notice of
 her. It is true, he never talked of love; but then they played and sung
 in concert; drew landscapes together, and while she worked he read to
 her, cultivated her taste, and stole imperceptibly her heart. Just at
 this juncture, when smiling, unanalyzed hope made every prospect bright,
 and gay expectation danced in her eyes, her benefactor died. She
 returned to her mother--the companion of her youth forgot her, they took
 no more sweet counsel together. This disappointment spread a sadness
 over her countenance, and made it interesting. She grew fond of
 solitude, and her character appeared similar to Mary's, though her
 natural disposition was very different.
 
 She was several years older than Mary, yet her refinement, her taste,
 caught her eye, and she eagerly sought her friendship: before her return
 she had assisted the family, which was almost reduced to the last ebb;
 and now she had another motive to actuate her.
 
 As she had often occasion to send messages to Ann, her new friend,
 mistakes were frequently made; Ann proposed that in future they should
 be written ones, to obviate this difficulty, and render their
 intercourse more agreeable. Young people are mostly fond of scribbling;
 Mary had had very little instruction; but by copying her friend's
 letters, whose hand she admired, she soon became a proficient; a little
 practice made her write with tolerable correctness, and her genius gave
 force to it. In conversation, and in writing, when she felt, she was
 pathetic, tender and persuasive; and she expressed contempt with such
 energy, that few could stand the flash of her eyes.
 
 As she grew more intimate with Ann, her manners were softened, and she
 acquired a degree of equality in her behaviour: yet still her spirits
 were fluctuating, and her movements rapid. She felt less pain on
 account of her mother's partiality to her brother, as she hoped now to
 experience the pleasure of being beloved; but this hope led her into new
 sorrows, and, as usual, paved the way for disappointment. Ann only felt
 gratitude; her heart was entirely engrossed by one object, and
 friendship could not serve as a substitute; memory officiously retraced
 past scenes, and unavailing wishes made time loiter.
 
 Mary was often hurt by the involuntary indifference which these
 consequences produced. When her friend was all the world to her, she
 found she was not as necessary to her happiness; and her delicate mind
 could not bear to obtrude her affection, or receive love as an alms, the
 offspring of pity. Very frequently has she ran to her with delight, and
 not perceiving any thing of the same kind in Ann's countenance, she has
 shrunk back; and, falling from one extreme into the other, instead of a
 warm greeting that was just slipping from her tongue, her expressions
 seemed to be dictated by the most chilling insensibility.
 
 She would then imagine that she looked sickly or unhappy, and then all
 her tenderness would return like a torrent, and bear away all
 reflection. In this manner was her sensibility called forth, and
 exercised, by her mother's illness, her friend's misfortunes, and her
 own unsettled mind.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. IV.
 
 
 Near to her father's house was a range of mountains; some of them were,
 literally speaking, cloud-capt, for on them clouds continually rested,
 and gave grandeur to the prospect; and down many of their sides the
 little bubbling cascades ran till they swelled a beautiful river.
 Through the straggling trees and bushes the wind whistled, and on them
 the birds sung, particularly the robins; they also found shelter in the
 ivy of an old castle, a haunted one, as the story went; it was situated
 on the brow of one of the mountains, and commanded a view of the sea.
 This castle had been inhabited by some of her ancestors; and many tales
 had the old house-keeper told her of the worthies who had resided there.
 
 When her mother frowned, and her friend looked cool, she would steal to
 this retirement, where human foot seldom trod--gaze on the sea, observe
 the grey clouds, or listen to the wind which struggled to free itself
 from the only thing that impeded its course. When more cheerful, she
 admired the various dispositions of light and shade, the beautiful tints
 the gleams of sunshine gave to the distant hills; then she rejoiced in
 existence, and darted into futurity.
 
 One way home was through the cavity of a rock covered with a thin layer
 of earth, just sufficient to afford nourishment to a few stunted shrubs
 and wild plants, which grew on its sides, and nodded over the summit. A
 clear stream broke out of it, and ran amongst the pieces of rocks
 fallen into it. Here twilight always reigned--it seemed the Temple of
 Solitude; yet, paradoxical as the assertion may appear, when the foot
 sounded on the rock, it terrified the intruder, and inspired a strange
 feeling, as if the rightful sovereign was dislodged. In this retreat she
 read Thomson's Seasons, Young's Night-Thoughts, and Paradise Lost.
 
 At a little distance from it were the huts of a few poor fishermen, who
 supported their numerous children by their precarious labour. In these
 little huts she frequently rested, and denied herself every childish
 gratification, in order to relieve the necessities of the inhabitants.
 Her heart yearned for them, and would dance with joy when she had
 relieved their wants, or afforded them pleasure.
 
 In these pursuits she learned the luxury of doing good; and the sweet
 tears of benevolence frequently moistened her eyes, and gave them a
 sparkle which, exclusive of that, they had not; on the contrary, they
 were rather fixed, and would never have been observed if her soul had
 not animated them. They were not at all like those brilliant ones which
 look like polished diamonds, and dart from every superfice, giving more
 light to the beholders than they receive themselves.
 
 Her benevolence, indeed, knew no bounds; the distress of others carried
 her out of herself; and she rested not till she had relieved or
 comforted them. The warmth of her compassion often made her so diligent,
 that many things occurred to her, which might have escaped a less
 interested observer.
 
 In like manner, she entered with such spirit into whatever she read,
 and the emotions thereby raised were so strong, that it soon became a
 part of her mind.
 
 Enthusiastic sentiments of devotion at this period actuated her; her
 Creator was almost apparent to her senses in his works; but they were
 mostly the grand or solemn features of Nature which she delighted to
 contemplate. She would stand and behold the waves rolling, and think of
 the voice that could still the tumultuous deep.
 
 These propensities gave the colour to her mind, before the passions
 began to exercise their tyrannic sway, and particularly pointed out
 those which the soil would have a tendency to nurse.
 
 Years after, when wandering through the same scenes, her imagination has
 strayed back, to trace the first placid sentiments they inspired, and
 she would earnestly desire to regain the same peaceful tranquillity.
 
 Many nights she sat up, if I may be allowed the expression, _conversing_
 with the Author of Nature, making verses, and singing hymns of her own
 composing. She considered also, and tried to discern what end her
 various faculties were destined to pursue; and had a glimpse of a truth,
 which afterwards more fully unfolded itself.
 
 She thought that only an infinite being could fill the human soul, and
 that when other objects were followed as a means of happiness, the
 delusion led to misery, the consequence of disappointment. Under the
 influence of ardent affections, how often has she forgot this
 conviction, and as often returned to it again, when it struck her with
 redoubled force. Often did she taste unmixed delight; her joys, her
 ecstacies arose from genius.
 
 She was now fifteen, and she wished to receive the holy sacrament; and
 perusing the scriptures, and discussing some points of doctrine which
 puzzled her, she would sit up half the night, her favourite time for
 employing her mind; she too plainly perceived that she saw through a
 glass darkly; and that the bounds set to stop our intellectual
 researches, is one of the trials of a probationary state.
 
 But her affections were roused by the display of divine mercy; and she
 eagerly desired to commemorate the dying love of her great benefactor.
 The night before the important day, when she was to take on herself her
 baptismal vow, she could not go to bed; the sun broke in on her
 meditations, and found her not exhausted by her watching.
 
 The orient pearls were strewed around--she hailed the morn, and sung
 with wild delight, Glory to God on high, good will towards men. She was
 indeed so much affected when she joined in the prayer for her eternal
 preservation, that she could hardly conceal her violent emotions; and
 the recollection never failed to wake her dormant piety when earthly
 passions made it grow languid.
 
 These various movements of her mind were not commented on, nor were the
 luxuriant shoots restrained by culture. The servants and the poor adored
 her.
 
 In order to be enabled to gratify herself in the highest degree, she
 practiced the most rigid oeconomy, and had such power over her
 appetites and whims, that without any great effort she conquered them
 so entirely, that when her understanding or affections had an object,
 she almost forgot she had a body which required nourishment.
 
 This habit of thinking, this kind of absorption, gave strength to the
 passions.
 
 We will now enter on the more active field of life.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. V.
 
 
 A few months after Mary was turned of seventeen, her brother was
 attacked by a violent fever, and died before his father could reach the
 school.
 
 She was now an heiress, and her mother began to think her of
 consequence, and did not call her _the child_. Proper masters were sent
 for; she was taught to dance, and an extraordinary master procured to
 perfect her in that most necessary of all accomplishments.
 
 A part of the estate she was to inherit had been litigated, and the heir
 of the person who still carried on a Chancery suit, was only two years
 younger than our heroine. The fathers, spite of the dispute, frequently
 met, and, in order to settle it amicably, they one day, over a bottle,
 determined to quash it by a marriage, and, by uniting the two estates,
 to preclude all farther enquiries into the merits of their different
 claims.
 
 While this important matter was settling, Mary was otherwise employed.
 Ann's mother's resources were failing; and the ghastly phantom, poverty,
 made hasty strides to catch them in his clutches. Ann had not fortitude
 enough to brave such accumulated misery; besides, the canker-worm was
 lodged in her heart, and preyed on her health. She denied herself every
 little comfort; things that would be no sacrifice when a person is well,
 are absolutely necessary to alleviate bodily pain, and support the
 animal functions.
 
 There were many elegant amusements, that she had acquired a relish for,
 which might have taken her mind off from its most destructive bent; but
 these her indigence would not allow her to enjoy: forced then, by way of
 relaxation, to play the tunes her lover admired, and handle the pencil
 he taught her to hold, no wonder his image floated on her imagination,
 and that taste invigorated love.
 
 Poverty, and all its inelegant attendants, were in her mother's abode;
 and she, though a good sort of a woman, was not calculated to banish, by
 her trivial, uninteresting chat, the delirium in which her daughter was
 lost.
 
 This ill-fated love had given a bewitching softness to her manners, a
 delicacy so truly feminine, that a man of any feeling could not behold
 her without wishing to chase her sorrows away. She was timid and
 irresolute, and rather fond of dissipation; grief only had power to make
 her reflect.
 
 In every thing it was not the great, but the beautiful, or the pretty,
 that caught her attention. And in composition, the polish of style, and
 harmony of numbers, interested her much more than the flights of genius,
 or abstracted speculations.
 
 She often wondered at the books Mary chose, who, though she had a lively
 imagination, would frequently study authors whose works were addressed
 to the understanding. This liking taught her to arrange her thoughts,
 and argue with herself, even when under the influence of the most
 violent passions.
 
 Ann's misfortunes and ill health were strong ties to bind Mary to her;
 she wished so continually to have a home to receive her in, that it
 drove every other desire out of her mind; and, dwelling on the tender
 schemes which compassion and friendship dictated, she longed most
 ardently to put them in practice.
 
 Fondly as she loved her friend, she did not forget her mother, whose
 decline was so imperceptible, that they were not aware of her
 approaching dissolution. The physician, however, observing the most
 alarming symptoms; her husband was apprised of her immediate danger; and
 then first mentioned to her his designs with respect to his daughter.
 
 She approved of them; Mary was sent for; she was not at home; she had
 rambled to visit Ann, and found her in an hysteric fit. The landlord of
 her little farm had sent his agent for the rent, which had long been due
 to him; and he threatened to seize the stock that still remained, and
 turn them out, if they did not very shortly discharge the arrears.
 
 As this man made a private fortune by harassing the tenants of the
 person to whom he was deputy, little was to be expected from his
 forbearance.
 
 All this was told to Mary--and the mother added, she had many other
 creditors who would, in all probability, take the alarm, and snatch from
 them all that had been saved out of the wreck. "I could bear all," she
 cried; "but what will become of my children? Of this child," pointing to
 the fainting Ann, "whose constitution is already undermined by care and
 grief--where will she go?"--Mary's heart ceased to beat while she asked
 the question--She attempted to speak; but the inarticulate sounds died
 away. Before she had recovered herself, her father called himself to
 enquire for her; and desired her instantly to accompany him home.
 
 Engrossed by the scene of misery she had been witness to, she walked
 silently by his side, when he roused her out of her reverie by telling
 her that in all likelihood her mother had not many hours to live; and
 before she could return him any answer, informed her that they had both
 determined to marry her to Charles, his friend's son; he added, the
 ceremony was to be performed directly, that her mother might be witness
 of it; for such a desire she had expressed with childish eagerness.
 
 Overwhelmed by this intelligence, Mary rolled her eyes about, then, with
 a vacant stare, fixed them on her father's face; but they were no longer
 a sense; they conveyed no ideas to the brain. As she drew near the
 house, her wonted presence of mind returned: after this suspension of
 thought, a thousand darted into her mind,--her dying mother,--her
 friend's miserable situation,--and an extreme horror at taking--at being
 forced to take, such a hasty step; but she did not feel the disgust, the
 reluctance, which arises from a prior attachment.
 
 She loved Ann better than any one in the world--to snatch her from the
 very jaws of destruction--she would have encountered a lion. To have
 this friend constantly with her; to make her mind easy with respect to
 her family, would it not be superlative bliss?
 
 Full of these thoughts she entered her mother's chamber, but they then
 fled at the sight of a dying parent. She went to her, took her hand; it
 feebly pressed her's. "My child," said the languid mother: the words
 reached her heart; she had seldom heard them pronounced with accents
 denoting affection; "My child, I have not always treated you with
 kindness--God forgive me! do you?"--Mary's tears strayed in a
 disregarded stream; on her bosom the big drops fell, but did not relieve
 the fluttering tenant. "I forgive you!" said she, in a tone of
 astonishment.
 
 The clergyman came in to read the service for the sick, and afterwards
 the marriage ceremony was performed. Mary stood like a statue of
 Despair, and pronounced the awful vow without thinking of it; and then
 ran to support her mother, who expired the same night in her arms.
 
 Her husband set off for the continent the same day, with a tutor, to
 finish his studies at one of the foreign universities.
 
 Ann was sent for to console her, not on account of the departure of her
 new relation, a boy she seldom took any notice of, but to reconcile her
 to her fate; besides, it was necessary she should have a female
 companion, and there was not any maiden aunt in the family, or cousin of
 the same class.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. VI.
 
 
 Mary was allowed to pay the rent which gave her so much uneasiness, and
 she exerted every nerve to prevail on her father effectually to succour
 the family; but the utmost she could obtain was a small sum very
 inadequate to the purpose, to enable the poor woman to carry into
 execution a little scheme of industry near the metropolis.
 
 Her intention of leaving that part of the country, had much more weight
 with him, than Mary's arguments, drawn from motives of philanthropy and
 friendship; this was a language he did not understand; expressive of
 occult qualities he never thought of, as they could not be seen or
 felt.
 
 After the departure of her mother, Ann still continued to languish,
 though she had a nurse who was entirely engrossed by the desire of
 amusing her. Had her health been re-established, the time would have
 passed in a tranquil, improving manner.
 
 During the year of mourning they lived in retirement; music, drawing,
 and reading, filled up the time; and Mary's taste and judgment were both
 improved by contracting a habit of observation, and permitting the
 simple beauties of Nature to occupy her thoughts.
 
 She had a wonderful quickness in discerning distinctions and combining
 ideas, that at the first glance did not appear to be similar. But these
 various pursuits did not banish all her cares, or carry off all her
 constitutional black bile. Before she enjoyed Ann's society, she
 imagined it would have made her completely happy: she was disappointed,
 and yet knew not what to complain of.
 
 As her friend could not accompany her in her walks, and wished to be
 alone, for a very obvious reason, she would return to her old haunts,
 retrace her anticipated pleasures--and wonder how they changed their
 colour in possession, and proved so futile.
 
 She had not yet found the companion she looked for. Ann and she were not
 congenial minds, nor did she contribute to her comfort in the degree she
 expected. She shielded her from poverty; but this was only a negative
 blessing; when under the pressure it was very grievous, and still more
 so were the apprehensions; but when exempt from them, she was not
 contented.
 
 Such is human nature, its laws were not to be inverted to gratify our
 heroine, and stop the progress of her understanding, happiness only
 flourished in paradise--we cannot taste and live.
 
 Another year passed away with increasing apprehensions. Ann had a hectic
 cough, and many unfavourable prognostics: Mary then forgot every thing
 but the fear of losing her, and even imagined that her recovery would
 have made her happy.
 
 Her anxiety led her to study physic, and for some time she only read
 books of that cast; and this knowledge, literally speaking, ended in
 vanity and vexation of spirit, as it enabled her to foresee what she
 could not prevent.
 
 As her mind expanded, her marriage appeared a dreadful misfortune; she
 was sometimes reminded of the heavy yoke, and bitter was the
 recollection!
 
 In one thing there seemed to be a sympathy between them, for she wrote
 formal answers to his as formal letters. An extreme dislike took root in
 her mind; the found of his name made her turn sick; but she forgot all,
 listening to Ann's cough, and supporting her languid frame. She would
 then catch her to her bosom with convulsive eagerness, as if to save her
 from sinking into an opening grave.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. VII.
 
 
 It was the will of Providence that Mary should experience almost every
 species of sorrow. Her father was thrown from his horse, when his blood
 was in a very inflammatory state, and the bruises were very dangerous;
 his recovery was not expected by the physical tribe.
 
 Terrified at seeing him so near death, and yet so ill prepared for it,
 his daughter sat by his bed, oppressed by the keenest anguish, which her
 piety increased.
 
 Her grief had nothing selfish in it; he was not a friend or protector;
 but he was her father, an unhappy wretch, going into eternity, depraved
 and thoughtless. Could a life of sensuality be a preparation for a
 peaceful death? Thus meditating, she passed the still midnight hour by
 his bedside.
 
 The nurse fell asleep, nor did a violent thunder storm interrupt her
 repose, though it made the night appear still more terrific to Mary. Her
 father's unequal breathing alarmed her, when she heard a long drawn
 breath, she feared it was his last, and watching for another, a dreadful
 peal of thunder struck her ears. Considering the separation of the soul
 and body, this night seemed sadly solemn, and the hours long.
 
 Death is indeed a king of terrors when he attacks the vicious man! The
 compassionate heart finds not any comfort; but dreads an eternal
 separation. No transporting greetings are anticipated, when the
 survivors also shall have finished their course; but all is black!--the
 grave may truly be said to receive the departed--this is the sting of
 death!
 
 Night after night Mary watched, and this excessive fatigue impaired her
 own health, but had a worse effect on Ann; though she constantly went to
 bed, she could not rest; a number of uneasy thoughts obtruded
 themselves; and apprehensions about Mary, whom she loved as well as her
 exhausted heart could love, harassed her mind. After a sleepless,
 feverish night she had a violent fit of coughing, and burst a
 blood-vessel. The physician, who was in the house, was sent for, and
 when he left the patient, Mary, with an authoritative voice, insisted on
 knowing his real opinion. Reluctantly he gave it, that her friend was in
 a critical state; and if she passed the approaching winter in England,
 he imagined she would die in the spring; a season fatal to consumptive
 disorders. The spring!--Her husband was then expected.--Gracious Heaven,
 could she bear all this.
 
 In a few days her father breathed his last. The horrid sensations his
 death occasioned were too poignant to be durable: and Ann's danger, and
 her own situation, made Mary deliberate what mode of conduct she should
 pursue. She feared this event might hasten the return of her husband,
 and prevent her putting into execution a plan she had determined on. It
 was to accompany Ann to a more salubrious climate.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. VIII.
 
 
 I mentioned before, that Mary had never had any particular attachment,
 to give rise to the disgust that daily gained ground. Her friendship for
 Ann occupied her heart, and resembled a passion. She had had, indeed,
 several transient likings; but they did not amount to love. The society
 of men of genius delighted her, and improved her faculties. With beings
 of this class she did not often meet; it is a rare genus; her first
 favourites were men past the meridian of life, and of a philosophic
 turn.
 
 Determined on going to the South of France, or Lisbon; she wrote to the
 man she had promised to obey. The physicians had said change of air was
 necessary for her as well as her friend. She mentioned this, and added,
 "Her comfort, almost her existence, depended on the recovery of the
 invalid she wished to attend; and that should she neglect to follow the
 medical advice she had received, she should never forgive herself, or
 those who endeavoured to prevent her." Full of her design, she wrote
 with more than usual freedom; and this letter was like most of her
 others, a transcript of her heart.
 
 "This dear friend," she exclaimed, "I love for her agreeable qualities,
 and substantial virtues. Continual attention to her health, and the
 tender office of a nurse, have created an affection very like a maternal
 one--I am her only support, she leans on me--could I forsake the
 forsaken, and break the bruised reed--No--I would die first! I must--I
 will go."
 
 She would have added, "you would very much oblige me by consenting;" but
 her heart revolted--and irresolutely she wrote something about wishing
 him happy.--"Do I not wish all the world well?" she cried, as she
 subscribed her name--It was blotted, the letter sealed in a hurry, and
 sent out of her sight; and she began to prepare for her journey.
 
 By the return of the post she received an answer; it contained some
 common-place remarks on her romantic friendship, as he termed it; "But
 as the physicians advised change of air, he had no objection."
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. IX.
 
 
 There was nothing now to retard their journey; and Mary chose Lisbon
 rather than France, on account of its being further removed from the
 only person she wished not to see.
 
 They set off accordingly for Falmouth, in their way to that city. The
 journey was of use to Ann, and Mary's spirits were raised by her
 recovered looks--She had been in despair--now she gave way to hope, and
 was intoxicated with it. On ship-board Ann always remained in the cabin;
 the sight of the water terrified her: on the contrary, Mary, after she
 was gone to bed, or when she fell asleep in the day, went on deck,
 conversed with the sailors, and surveyed the boundless expanse before
 her with delight. One instant she would regard the ocean, the next the
 beings who braved its fury. Their insensibility and want of fear, she
 could not name courage; their thoughtless mirth was quite of an animal
 kind, and their feelings as impetuous and uncertain as the element they
 plowed.
 
 They had only been a week at sea when they hailed the rock of Lisbon,
 and the next morning anchored at the castle. After the customary visits,
 they were permitted to go on shore, about three miles from the city; and
 while one of the crew, who understood the language, went to procure them
 one of the ugly carriages peculiar to the country, they waited in the
 Irish convent, which is situated close to the Tagus.
 
 Some of the people offered to conduct them into the church, where there
 was a fine organ playing; Mary followed them, but Ann preferred staying
 with a nun she had entered into conversation with.
 
 One of the nuns, who had a sweet voice, was singing; Mary was struck
 with awe; her heart joined in the devotion; and tears of gratitude and
 tenderness flowed from her eyes. My Father, I thank thee! burst from
 her--words were inadequate to express her feelings. Silently, she
 surveyed the lofty dome; heard unaccustomed sounds; and saw faces,
 strange ones, that she could not yet greet with fraternal love.
 
 In an unknown land, she considered that the Being she adored inhabited
 eternity, was ever present in unnumbered worlds. When she had not any
 one she loved near her, she was particularly sensible of the presence
 of her Almighty Friend.
 
 The arrival of the carriage put a stop to her speculations; it was to
 conduct them to an hotel, fitted up for the reception of invalids.
 Unfortunately, before they could reach it there was a violent shower of
 rain; and as the wind was very high, it beat against the leather
 curtains, which they drew along the front of the vehicle, to shelter
 themselves from it; but it availed not, some of the rain forced its way,
 and Ann felt the effects of it, for she caught cold, spite of Mary's
 precautions.
 
 As is the custom, the rest of the invalids, or lodgers, sent to enquire
 after their health; and as soon as Ann left her chamber, in which her
 complaints seldom confined her the whole day, they came in person to pay
 their compliments. Three fashionable females, and two gentlemen; the
 one a brother of the eldest of the young ladies, and the other an
 invalid, who came, like themselves, for the benefit of the air. They
 entered into conversation immediately.
 
 People who meet in a strange country, and are all together in a house,
 soon get acquainted, without the formalities which attend visiting in
 separate houses, where they are surrounded by domestic friends. Ann was
 particularly delighted at meeting with agreeable society; a little
 hectic fever generally made her low-spirited in the morning, and lively
 in the evening, when she wished for company. Mary, who only thought of
 her, determined to cultivate their acquaintance, as she knew, that if
 her mind could be diverted, her body might gain strength.
 
 They were all musical, and proposed having little concerts. One of the
 gentlemen played on the violin, and the other on the german-flute. The
 instruments were brought in, with all the eagerness that attends putting
 a new scheme in execution.
 
 Mary had not said much, for she was diffident; she seldom joined in
 general conversations; though her quickness of penetration enabled her
 soon to enter into the characters of those she conversed with; and her
 sensibility made her desirous of pleasing every human creature. Besides,
 if her mind was not occupied by any particular sorrow, or study, she
 caught reflected pleasure, and was glad to see others happy, though
 their mirth did not interest her.
 
 This day she was continually thinking of Ann's recovery, and encouraging
 the cheerful hopes, which though they dissipated the spirits that had
 been condensed by melancholy, yet made her wish to be silent. The music,
 more than the conversation, disturbed her reflections; but not at first.
 The gentleman who played on the german-flute, was a handsome, well-bred,
 sensible man; and his observations, if not original, were pertinent.
 
 The other, who had not said much, began to touch the violin, and played
 a little Scotch ballad; he brought such a thrilling sound out of the
 instrument, that Mary started, and looking at him with more attention
 than she had done before, and saw, in a face rather ugly, strong lines
 of genius. His manners were awkward, that kind of awkwardness which is
 often found in literary men: he seemed a thinker, and delivered his
 opinions in elegant expressions, and musical tones of voice.
 
 When the concert was over, they all retired to their apartments. Mary
 always slept with Ann, as she was subject to terrifying dreams; and
 frequently in the night was obliged to be supported, to avoid
 suffocation. They chatted about their new acquaintance in their own
 apartment, and, with respect to the gentlemen, differed in opinion.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. X.
 
 
 Every day almost they saw their new acquaintance; and civility produced
 intimacy. Mary sometimes left her friend with them; while she indulged
 herself in viewing new modes of life, and searching out the causes which
 produced them. She had a metaphysical turn, which inclined her to
 reflect on every object that passed by her; and her mind was not like a
 mirror, which receives every floating image, but does not retain them:
 she had not any prejudices, for every opinion was examined before it was
 adopted.
 
 The Roman Catholic ceremonies attracted her attention, and gave rise to
 conversations when they all met; and one of the gentlemen continually
 introduced deistical notions, when he ridiculed the pageantry they all
 were surprised at observing. Mary thought of both the subjects, the
 Romish tenets, and the deistical doubts; and though not a sceptic,
 thought it right to examine the evidence on which her faith was built.
 She read Butler's Analogy, and some other authors: and these researches
 made her a christian from conviction, and she learned charity,
 particularly with respect to sectaries; saw that apparently good and
 solid arguments might take their rise from different points of view; and
 she rejoiced to find that those she should not concur with had some
 reason on their side.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XI.
 
 
 When I mentioned the three ladies, I said they were fashionable women;
 and it was all the praise, as a faithful historian, I could bestow on
 them; the only thing in which they were consistent. I forgot to mention
 that they were all of one family, a mother, her daughter, and niece. The
 daughter was sent by her physician, to avoid a northerly winter; the
 mother, her niece, and nephew, accompanied her.
 
 They were people of rank; but unfortunately, though of an ancient
 family, the title had descended to a very remote branch--a branch they
 took care to be intimate with; and servilely copied the Countess's
 airs. Their minds were shackled with a set of notions concerning
 propriety, the fitness of things for the world's eye, trammels which
 always hamper weak people. What will the world say? was the first thing
 that was thought of, when they intended doing any thing they had not
 done before. Or what would the Countess do on such an occasion? And when
 this question was answered, the right or wrong was discovered without
 the trouble of their having any idea of the matter in their own heads.
 This same Countess was a fine planet, and the satellites observed a most
 harmonic dance around her.
 
 After this account it is scarcely necessary to add, that their minds had
 received very little cultivation. They were taught French, Italian, and
 Spanish; English was their vulgar tongue. And what did they learn?
 Hamlet will tell you--words--words. But let me not forget that they
 squalled Italian songs in the true _gusto_. Without having any seeds
 sown in their understanding, or the affections of the heart set to work,
 they were brought out of their nursery, or the place they were secluded
 in, to prevent their faces being common; like blazing stars, to
 captivate Lords.
 
 They were pretty, and hurrying from one party of pleasure to another,
 occasioned the disorder which required change of air. The mother, if we
 except her being near twenty years older, was just the same creature;
 and these additional years only served to make her more tenaciously
 adhere to her habits of folly, and decide with stupid gravity, some
 trivial points of ceremony, as a matter of the last importance; of
 which she was a competent judge, from having lived in the fashionable
 world so long: that world to which the ignorant look up as we do to the
 sun.
 
 It appears to me that every creature has some notion--or rather relish,
 of the sublime. Riches, and the consequent state, are the sublime of
 weak minds:--These images fill, nay, are too big for their narrow souls.
 
 One afternoon, which they had engaged to spend together, Ann was so ill,
 that Mary was obliged to send an apology for not attending the
 tea-table. The apology brought them on the carpet; and the mother, with
 a look of solemn importance, turned to the sick man, whose name was
 Henry, and said;
 
 "Though people of the first fashion are frequently at places of this
 kind, intimate with they know not who; yet I do not choose that my
 daughter, whose family is so respectable, should be intimate with any
 one she would blush to know elsewhere. It is only on that account, for I
 never suffer her to be with any one but in my company," added she,
 sitting more erect; and a smile of self-complacency dressed her
 countenance.
 
 "I have enquired concerning these strangers, and find that the one who
 has the most dignity in her manners, is really a woman of fortune."
 "Lord, mamma, how ill she dresses:" mamma went on; "She is a romantic
 creature, you must not copy her, miss; yet she is an heiress of the
 large fortune in ----shire, of which you may remember to have heard the
 Countess speak the night you had on the dancing-dress that was so much
 admired; but she is married."
 
 She then told them the whole story as she heard it from her maid, who
 picked it out of Mary's servant. "She is a foolish creature, and this
 friend that she pays as much attention to as if she was a lady of
 quality, is a beggar." "Well, how strange!" cried the girls.
 
 "She is, however, a charming creature," said her nephew. Henry sighed,
 and strode across the room once or twice; then took up his violin, and
 played the air which first struck Mary; he had often heard her praise
 it.
 
 The music was uncommonly melodious, "And came stealing on the senses
 like the sweet south." The well-known sounds reached Mary as she sat by
 her friend--she listened without knowing that she did--and shed tears
 almost without being conscious of it. Ann soon fell asleep, as she had
 taken an opiate. Mary, then brooding over her fears, began to imagine
 she had deceived herself--Ann was still very ill; hope had beguiled many
 heavy hours; yet she was displeased with herself for admitting this
 welcome guest.--And she worked up her mind to such a degree of anxiety,
 that she determined, once more, to seek medical aid.
 
 No sooner did she determine, than she ran down with a discomposed look,
 to enquire of the ladies who she should send for. When she entered the
 room she could not articulate her fears--it appeared like pronouncing
 Ann's sentence of death; her faultering tongue dropped some broken
 words, and she remained silent. The ladies wondered that a person of her
 sense should be so little mistress of herself; and began to administer
 some common-place comfort, as, that it was our duty to submit to the
 will of Heaven, and the like trite consolations, which Mary did not
 answer; but waving her hand, with an air of impatience, she exclaimed,
 "I cannot live without her!--I have no other friend; if I lose her, what
 a desart will the world be to me." "No other friend," re-echoed they,
 "have you not a husband?"
 
 Mary shrunk back, and was alternately pale and red. A delicate sense of
 propriety prevented her replying; and recalled her bewildered
 reason.--Assuming, in consequence of her recollection, a more composed
 manner, she made the intended enquiry, and left the room. Henry's eyes
 followed her while the females very freely animadverted on her strange
 behaviour.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XII.
 
 
 The physician was sent for; his prescription afforded Ann a little
 temporary relief; and they again joined the circle. Unfortunately, the
 weather happened to be constantly wet for more than a week, and confined
 them to the house. Ann then found the ladies not so agreeable; when they
 sat whole hours together, the thread-bare topics were exhausted; and,
 but for cards or music, the long evenings would have been yawned away in
 listless indolence.
 
 The bad weather had had as ill an effect on Henry as on Ann. He was
 frequently very thoughtful, or rather melancholy; this melancholy would
 of itself have attracted Mary's notice, if she had not found his
 conversation so infinitely superior to the rest of the group. When she
 conversed with him, all the faculties of her soul unfolded themselves;
 genius animated her expressive countenance and the most graceful,
 unaffected gestures gave energy to her discourse.
 
 They frequently discussed very important subjects, while the rest were
 singing or playing cards, nor were they observed for doing so, as Henry,
 whom they all were pleased with, in the way of gallantry shewed them all
 more attention than her. Besides, as there was nothing alluring in her
 dress or manner, they never dreamt of her being preferred to them.
 
 Henry was a man of learning; he had also studied mankind, and knew many
 of the intricacies of the human heart, from having felt the infirmities
 of his own. His taste was just, as it had a standard--Nature, which he
 observed with a critical eye. Mary could not help thinking that in his
 company her mind expanded, as he always went below the surface. She
 increased her stock of ideas, and her taste was improved.
 
 He was also a pious man; his rational religious sentiments received
 warmth from his sensibility; and, except on very particular occasions,
 kept it in proper bounds; these sentiments had likewise formed his
 temper; he was gentle, and easily to be intreated. The ridiculous
 ceremonies they were every day witness to, led them into what are termed
 grave subjects, and made him explain his opinions, which, at other
 times, he was neither ashamed of, nor unnecessarily brought forward to
 notice.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XIII.
 
 
 When the weather began to clear up, Mary sometimes rode out alone,
 purposely to view the ruins that still remained of the earthquake: or
 she would ride to the banks of the Tagus, to feast her eyes with the
 sight of that magnificent river. At other times she would visit the
 churches, as she was particularly fond of seeing historical paintings.
 
 One of these visits gave rise to the subject, and the whole party
 descanted on it; but as the ladies could not handle it well, they soon
 adverted to portraits; and talked of the attitudes and characters in
 which they should wish to be drawn. Mary did not fix on one--when
 Henry, with more apparent warmth than usual, said, "I would give the
 world for your picture, with the expression I have seen in your face,
 when you have been supporting your friend."
 
 This delicate compliment did not gratify her vanity, but it reached her
 heart. She then recollected that she had once sat for her picture--for
 whom was it designed? For a boy! Her cheeks flushed with indignation, so
 strongly did she feel an emotion of contempt at having been thrown
 away--given in with an estate.
 
 As Mary again gave way to hope, her mind was more disengaged; and her
 thoughts were employed about the objects around her.
 
 She visited several convents, and found that solitude only eradicates
 some passions, to give strength to others; the most baneful ones. She
 saw that religion does not consist in ceremonies; and that many prayers
 may fall from the lips without purifying the heart.
 
 They who imagine they can be religious without governing their tempers,
 or exercising benevolence in its most extensive sense, must certainly
 allow, that their religious duties are only practiced from selfish
 principles; how then can they be called good? The pattern of all
 goodness went about _doing_ good. Wrapped up in themselves, the nuns
 only thought of inferior gratifications. And a number of intrigues were
 carried on to accelerate certain points on which their hearts were
 fixed:
 
 Such as obtaining offices of trust or authority; or avoiding those that
 were servile or laborious. In short, when they could be neither wives
 nor mothers, they aimed at being superiors, and became the most selfish
 creatures in the world: the passions that were curbed gave strength to
 the appetites, or to those mean passions which only tend to provide for
 the gratification of them. Was this seclusion from the world? or did
 they conquer its vanities or avoid its vexations?
 
 In these abodes the unhappy individual, who, in the first paroxysm of
 grief flies to them for refuge, finds too late she took a wrong step.
 The same warmth which determined her will make her repent; and sorrow,
 the rust of the mind, will never have a chance of being rubbed off by
 sensible conversation, or new-born affections of the heart.
 
 She will find that those affections that have once been called forth and
 strengthened by exercise, are only smothered, not killed, by
 disappointment; and that in one form or other discontent will corrode
 the heart, and produce those maladies of the imagination, for which
 there is no specific.
 
 The community at large Mary disliked; but pitied many of them whose
 private distresses she was informed of; and to pity and relieve were the
 same things with her.
 
 The exercise of her various virtues gave vigor to her genius, and
 dignity to her mind; she was sometimes inconsiderate, and violent; but
 never mean or cunning.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XIV.
 
 
 The Portuguese are certainly the most uncivilized nation in Europe. Dr.
 Johnson would have said, "They have the least mind.". And can such serve
 their Creator in spirit and in truth? No, the gross ritual of Romish
 ceremonies is all they can comprehend: they can do penance, but not
 conquer their revenge, or lust. Religion, or love, has never humanized
 their hearts; they want the vital part; the mere body worships. Taste is
 unknown; Gothic finery, and unnatural decorations, which they term
 ornaments, are conspicuous in their churches and dress. Reverence for
 mental excellence is only to be found in a polished nation.
 
 Could the contemplation of such a people gratify Mary's heart? No: she
 turned disgusted from the prospects--turned to a man of refinement.
 Henry had been some time ill and low-spirited; Mary would have been
 attentive to any one in that situation; but to him she was particularly
 so; she thought herself bound in gratitude, on account of his constant
 endeavours to amuse Ann, and prevent her dwelling on the dreary prospect
 before her, which sometimes she could not help anticipating with a kind
 of quiet despair.
 
 She found some excuse for going more frequently into the room they all
 met in; nay, she avowed her desire to amuse him: offered to read to him,
 and tried to draw him into amusing conversations; and when she was full
 of these little schemes, she looked at him with a degree of tenderness
 that she was not conscious of. This divided attention was of use to her,
 and prevented her continually thinking of Ann, whose fluctuating
 disorder often gave rise to false hopes.
 
 A trifling thing occurred now which occasioned Mary some uneasiness. Her
 maid, a well-looking girl, had captivated the clerk of a neighbouring
 compting-house. As the match was an advantageous one, Mary could not
 raise any objection to it, though at this juncture it was very
 disagreeable to her to have a stranger about her person. However, the
 girl consented to delay the marriage, as she had some affection for her
 mistress; and, besides, looked forward to Ann's death as a time of
 harvest.
 
 Henry's illness was not alarming, it was rather pleasing, as it gave
 Mary an excuse to herself for shewing him how much she was interested
 about him; and giving little artless proofs of affection, which the
 purity of her heart made her never wish to restrain.
 
 The only visible return he made was not obvious to common observers. He
 would sometimes fix his eyes on her, and take them off with a sigh that
 was coughed away; or when he was leisurely walking into the room, and
 did not expect to see her, he would quicken his steps, and come up to
 her with eagerness to ask some trivial question. In the same style, he
 would try to detain her when he had nothing to say--or said nothing.
 
 Ann did not take notice of either his or Mary's behaviour, nor did she
 suspect that he was a favourite, on any other account than his
 appearing neither well nor happy. She had often seen that when a person
 was unfortunate, Mary's pity might easily be mistaken for love, and,
 indeed, it was a temporary sensation of that kind. Such it was--why it
 was so, let others define, I cannot argue against instincts. As reason
 is cultivated in man, they are supposed to grow weaker, and this may
 have given rise to the assertion, "That as judgment improves, genius
 evaporates."
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XV.
 
 
 One morning they set out to visit the aqueduct; though the day was very
 fine when they left home, a very heavy shower fell before they reached
 it; they lengthened their ride, the clouds dispersed, and the sun came
 from behind them uncommonly bright.
 
 Mary would fain have persuaded Ann not to have left the carriage; but
 she was in spirits, and obviated all her objections, and insisted on
 walking, tho' the ground was damp. But her strength was not equal to her
 spirits; she was soon obliged to return to the carriage so much
 fatigued, that she fainted, and remained insensible a long time.
 
 Henry would have supported her; but Mary would not permit him; her
 recollection was instantaneous, and she feared sitting on the damp
 ground might do him a material injury: she was on that account positive,
 though the company did not guess the cause of her being so. As to
 herself, she did not fear bodily pain; and, when her mind was agitated,
 she could endure the greatest fatigue without appearing sensible of it.
 
 When Ann recovered, they returned slowly home; she was carried to bed,
 and the next morning Mary thought she observed a visible change for the
 worse. The physician was sent for, who pronounced her to be in the most
 imminent danger.
 
 All Mary's former fears now returned like a torrent, and carried every
 other care away; she even added to her present anguish by upbraiding
 herself for her late tranquillity--it haunted her in the form of a
 crime.
 
 The disorder made the most rapid advances--there was no hope!--Bereft of
 it, Mary again was tranquil; but it was a very different kind of
 tranquillity. She stood to brave the approaching storm, conscious she
 only could be overwhelmed by it.
 
 She did not think of Henry, or if her thoughts glanced towards him, it
 was only to find fault with herself for suffering a thought to have
 strayed from Ann.--Ann!--this dear friend was soon torn from her--she
 died suddenly as Mary was assisting her to walk across the room.--The
 first string was severed from her heart--and this "slow, sudden-death"
 disturbed her reasoning faculties; she seemed stunned by it; unable to
 reflect, or even to feel her misery.
 
 The body was stolen out of the house the second night, and Mary refused
 to see her former companions. She desired her maid to conclude her
 marriage, and request her intended husband to inform her when the first
 merchantman was to leave the port, as the packet had just sailed, and
 she determined not to stay in that hated place any longer than was
 absolutely necessary.
 
 She then sent to request the ladies to visit her; she wished to avoid a
 parade of grief--her sorrows were her own, and appeared to her not to
 admit of increase or softening. She was right; the sight of them did not
 affect her, or turn the stream of her sullen sorrow; the black wave
 rolled along in the same course, it was equal to her where she cast her
 eyes; all was impenetrable gloom.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XVI.
 
 
 Soon after the ladies left her, she received a message from Henry,
 requesting, as she saw company, to be permitted to visit her: she
 consented, and he entered immediately, with an unassured pace. She ran
 eagerly up to him--saw the tear trembling in his eye, and his
 countenance softened by the tenderest compassion; the hand which pressed
 hers seemed that of a fellow-creature. She burst into tears; and, unable
 to restrain them, she hid her face with both her hands; these tears
 relieved her, (she had before had a difficulty in breathing,) and she
 sat down by him more composed than she had appeared since Ann's death;
 but her conversation was incoherent.
 
 She called herself "a poor disconsolate creature!"--"Mine is a selfish
 grief," she exclaimed--"Yet; Heaven is my witness, I do not wish her
 back now she has reached those peaceful mansions, where the weary rest.
 Her pure spirit is happy; but what a wretch am I!"
 
 Henry forgot his cautious reserve. "Would you allow me to call you
 friend?" said he in a hesitating voice. "I feel, dear girl, the tendered
 interest in whatever concerns thee." His eyes spoke the rest. They were
 both silent a few moments; then Henry resumed the conversation. "I have
 also been acquainted with grief! I mourn the loss of a woman who was not
 worthy of my regard. Let me give thee some account of the man who now
 solicits thy friendship; and who, from motives of the purest
 benevolence, wishes to give comfort to thy wounded heart."
 
 "I have myself," said he, mournfully, "shaken hands with happiness, and
 am dead to the world; I wait patiently for my dissolution; but, for
 thee, Mary, there may be many bright days in store."
 
 "Impossible," replied she, in a peevish tone, as if he had insulted her
 by the supposition; her feelings were so much in unison with his, that
 she was in love with misery.
 
 He smiled at her impatience, and went on. "My father died before I knew
 him, and my mother was so attached to my eldest brother, that she took
 very little pains to fit me for the profession to which I was destined:
 and, may I tell thee, I left my family, and, in many different stations,
 rambled about the world; saw mankind in every rank of life; and, in
 order to be independent, exerted those talents Nature has given me:
 these exertions improved my understanding; and the miseries I was
 witness to, gave a keener edge to my sensibility. My constitution is
 naturally weak; and, perhaps, two or three lingering disorders in my
 youth, first gave me a habit of reflecting, and enabled me to obtain
 some dominion over my passions. At least," added he, stifling a sigh,
 "over the violent ones, though I fear, refinement and reflection only
 renders the tender ones more tyrannic.
 
 "I have told you already I have been in love, and disappointed--the
 object is now no more; let her faults sleep with her! Yet this passion
 has pervaded my whole soul, and mixed itself with all my affections and
 pursuits.--I am not peacefully indifferent; yet it is only to my violin
 I tell the sorrows I now confide with thee. The object I loved forfeited
 my esteem; yet, true to the sentiment, my fancy has too frequently
 delighted to form a creature that I could love, that could convey to my
 soul sensations which the gross part of mankind have not any conception
 of."
 
 He stopped, as Mary seemed lost in thought; but as she was still in a
 listening attitude, continued his little narrative. "I kept up an
 irregular correspondence with my mother; my brother's extravagance and
 ingratitude had almost broken her heart, and made her feel something
 like a pang of remorse, on account of her behaviour to me. I hastened to
 comfort her--and was a comfort to her.
 
 "My declining health prevented my taking orders, as I had intended; but
 I with warmth entered into literary pursuits; perhaps my heart, not
 having an object, made me embrace the substitute with more eagerness.
 But, do not imagine I have always been a die-away swain. No: I have
 frequented the cheerful haunts of men, and wit!--enchanting wit! has
 made many moments fly free from care. I am too fond of the elegant arts;
 and woman--lovely woman! thou hast charmed me, though, perhaps, it would
 not be easy to find one to whom my reason would allow me to be constant.
 
 "I have now only to tell you, that my mother insisted on my spending
 this winter in a warmer climate; and I fixed on Lisbon, as I had before
 visited the Continent." He then looked Mary full in the face; and, with
 the most insinuating accents, asked "if he might hope for her
 friendship? If she would rely on him as if he was her father; and that
 the tenderest father could not more anxiously interest himself in the
 fate of a darling child, than he did in her's."
 
 Such a crowd of thoughts all at once rushed into Mary's mind, that she
 in vain attempted to express the sentiments which were most predominant.
 Her heart longed to receive a new guest; there was a void in it:
 accustomed to have some one to love, she was alone, and comfortless, if
 not engrossed by a particular affection.
 
 Henry saw her distress, and not to increase it, left the room. He had
 exerted himself to turn her thoughts into a new channel, and had
 succeeded; she thought of him till she began to chide herself for
 defrauding the dead, and, determining to grieve for Ann, she dwelt on
 Henry's misfortunes and ill health; and the interest he took in her fate
 was a balm to her sick mind. She did not reason on the subject; but she
 felt he was attached to her: lost in this delirium, she never asked
 herself what kind of an affection she had for him, or what it tended to;
 nor did she know that love and friendship are very distinct; she thought
 with rapture, that there was one person in the world who had an
 affection for her, and that person she admired--had a friendship for.
 
 He had called her his dear girl; the words might have fallen from him by
 accident; but they did not fall to the ground. My child! His child,
 what an association of ideas! If I had had a father, such a father!--She
 could not dwell on the thoughts, the wishes which obtruded themselves.
 Her mind was unhinged, and passion unperceived filled her whole soul.
 Lost, in waking dreams, she considered and reconsidered Henry's account
 of himself; till she actually thought she would tell Ann--a bitter
 recollection then roused her out of her reverie; and aloud she begged
 forgiveness of her.
 
 By these kind of conflicts the day was lengthened; and when she went to
 bed, the night passed away in feverish slumbers; though they did not
 refresh her, she was spared the labour of thinking, of restraining her
 imagination; it sported uncontrouled; but took its colour from her
 waking train of thoughts. One instant she was supporting her dying
 mother; then Ann was breathing her last, and Henry was comforting her.
 
 The unwelcome light visited her languid eyes; yet, I must tell the
 truth, she thought she should see Henry, and this hope set her spirits
 in motion: but they were quickly depressed by her maid, who came to tell
 her that she had heard of a vessel on board of which she could be
 accommodated, and that there was to be another female passenger on
 board, a vulgar one; but perhaps she would be more useful on that
 account--Mary did not want a companion.
 
 As she had given orders for her passage to be engaged in the first
 vessel that sailed, she could not now retract; and must prepare for the
 lonely voyage, as the Captain intended taking advantage of the first
 fair wind. She had too much strength of mind to waver in her
 determination but to determine wrung her very heart, opened all her old
 wounds, and made them bleed afresh. What was she to do? where go? Could
 she set a seal to a hasty vow, and tell a deliberate lie; promise to
 love one man, when the image of another was ever present to her--her
 soul revolted. "I might gain the applause of the world by such mock
 heroism; but should I not forfeit my own? forfeit thine, my father!"
 
 There is a solemnity in the shortest ejaculation, which, for a while,
 stills the tumult of passion. Mary's mind had been thrown off its poise;
 her devotion had been, perhaps, more fervent for some time past; but
 less regular. She forgot that happiness was not to be found on earth,
 and built a terrestrial paradise liable to be destroyed by the first
 serious thought: when, she reasoned she became inexpressibly sad, to
 render life bearable she gave way to fancy--this was madness.
 
 In a few days she must again go to sea; the weather was very
 tempestuous--what of that, the tempest in her soul rendered every other
 trifling--it was not the contending elements, but _herself_ she feared!
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XVII.
 
 
 In order to gain strength to support the expected interview, she went
 out in a carriage. The day was fine; but all nature was to her a
 universal blank; she could neither enjoy it, nor weep that she could
 not. She passed by the ruins of an old monastery on a very high hill she
 got out to walk amongst the ruins; the wind blew violently, she did not
 avoid its fury, on the contrary, wildly bid it blow on, and seemed glad
 to contend with it, or rather walk against it. Exhausted she returned to
 the carriage was soon at home, and in the old room.
 
 Henry started at the sight of her altered appearance; the day before her
 complexion had been of the most pallid hue; but now her cheeks were
 flushed, and her eyes enlivened with a false vivacity, an unusual fire.
 He was not well, his illness was apparent in his countenance, and he
 owned he had not closed his eyes all night; this roused her dormant
 tenderness, she forgot they were so soon to part-engrossed by the
 present happiness of seeing, of hearing him.
 
 Once or twice she essayed to tell him that she was, in a few days, to
 depart; but she could not; she was irresolute; it will do to-morrow;
 should the wind change they could not sail in such a hurry; thus she
 thought, and insensibly grew more calm. The Ladies prevailed on her to
 spend the evening with them; but she retired very early to rest, and sat
 on the side of her bed several hours, then threw herself on it, and
 waited for the dreaded to-morrow.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XVIII.
 
 
 The ladies heard that her servant was to be married that day, and that
 she was to sail in the vessel which was then clearing out at the
 Custom-house. Henry heard, but did not make any remarks; and Mary called
 up all her fortitude to support her, and enable her to hide from the
 females her internal struggles. She durst not encounter Henry's glances
 when she found he had been informed of her intention; and, trying to
 draw a veil over her wretched state of mind, she talked incessantly, she
 knew not what; flashes of wit burst from her, and when she began to
 laugh she could not stop herself.
 
 Henry smiled at some of her sallies, and looked at her with such
 benignity and compassion, that he recalled her scattered thoughts; and,
 the ladies going to dress for dinner, they were left alone; and remained
 silent a few moments: after the noisy conversation it appeared solemn.
 Henry began. "You are going, Mary, and going by yourself; your mind is
 not in a state to be left to its own operations--yet I cannot, dissuade
 you; if I attempted to do it, I should ill deserve the title I wish to
 merit. I only think of your happiness; could I obey the strongest
 impulse of my heart, I should accompany thee to England; but such a step
 might endanger your future peace."
 
 Mary, then, with all the frankness which marked her character, explained
 her situation to him and mentioned her fatal tie with such disgust that
 he trembled for her. "I cannot see him; he is not the man formed for me
 to love!" Her delicacy did not restrain her, for her dislike to her
 husband had taken root in her mind long before she knew Henry. Did she
 not fix on Lisbon rather than France on purpose to avoid him? and if Ann
 had been in tolerable health she would have flown with her to some
 remote corner to have escaped from him.
 
 "I intend," said Henry, "to follow you in the next packet; where shall I
 hear of your health?" "Oh! let me hear of thine," replied Mary. "I am
 well, very well; but thou art very ill--thy health is in the most
 precarious state." She then mentioned her intention of going to Ann's
 relations. "I am her representative, I have duties to fulfil for her:
 during my voyage I have time enough for reflection; though I think I
 have already determined."
 
 "Be not too hasty, my child," interrupted Henry; "far be it from me to
 persuade thee to do violence to thy feelings--but consider that all thy
 future life may probably take its colour from thy present mode of
 conduct. Our affections as well as our sentiments are fluctuating; you
 will not perhaps always either think or feel as you do at present: the
 object you now shun may appear in a different light." He paused. "In
 advising thee in this style, I have only thy good at heart, Mary."
 
 She only answered to expostulate. "My affections are involuntary--yet
 they can only be fixed by reflection, and when they are they make quite
 a part of my soul, are interwoven in it, animate my actions, and form
 my taste: certain qualities are calculated to call forth my sympathies,
 and make me all I am capable of being. The governing affection gives its
 stamp to the rest--because I am capable of loving one, I have that kind
 of charity to all my fellow-creatures which is not easily provoked.
 Milton has asserted, That earthly love is the scale by which to heavenly
 we may ascend."
 
 She went on with eagerness. "My opinions on some subjects are not
 wavering; my pursuit through life has ever been the same: in solitude
 were my sentiments formed; they are indelible, and nothing can efface
 them but death--No, death itself cannot efface them, or my soul must be
 created afresh, and not improved. Yet a little while am I parted from
 my Ann--I could not exist without the hope of seeing her again--I could
 not bear to think that time could wear away an affection that was
 founded on what is not liable to perish; you might as well attempt to
 persuade me that my soul is matter, and that its feelings arose from
 certain modifications of it."
 
 "Dear enthusiastic creature," whispered Henry, "how you steal into my
 soul." She still continued. "The same turn of mind which leads me to
 adore the Author of all Perfection--which leads me to conclude that he
 only can fill my soul; forces me to admire the faint image-the shadows
 of his attributes here below; and my imagination gives still bolder
 strokes to them. I knew I am in some degree under the influence of a
 delusion--but does not this strong delusion prove that I myself 'am _of
 subtiler essence than the trodden clod_' these flights of the
 imagination point to futurity; I cannot banish them. Every cause in
 nature produces an effect; and am I an exception to the general rule?
 have I desires implanted in me only to make me miserable? will they
 never be gratified? shall I never be happy? My feelings do not accord
 with the notion of solitary happiness. In a state of bliss, it will be
 the society of beings we can love, without the alloy that earthly
 infirmities mix with our best affections, that will constitute great
 part of our happiness.
 
 "With these notions can I conform to the maxims of worldly wisdom? can
 I listen to the cold dictates of worldly prudence and bid my tumultuous
 passions cease to vex me, be still, find content in grovelling pursuits,
 and the admiration of the misjudging crowd, when it is only one I wish
 to please--one who could be all the world to me. Argue not with me, I am
 bound by human ties; but did my spirit ever promise to love, or could I
 consider when forced to bind myself--to take a vow, that at the awful
 day of judgment I must give an account of. My conscience does not smite
 me, and that Being who is greater than the internal monitor, may approve
 of what the world condemns; sensible that in Him I live, could I brave
 His presence, or hope in solitude to find peace, if I acted contrary to
 conviction, that the world might approve of my conduct--what could the
 world give to compensate for my own esteem? it is ever hostile and armed
 against the feeling heart!
 
 "Riches and honours await me, and the cold moralist might desire me to
 sit down and enjoy them--I cannot conquer my feelings, and till I do,
 what are these baubles to me? you may tell me I follow a fleeting good,
 an _ignis fatuus_; but this chase, these struggles prepare me for
 eternity--when I no longer see through a glass darkly I shall not reason
 about, but _feel_ in what happiness consists."
 
 Henry had not attempted to interrupt her; he saw she was determined, and
 that these sentiments were not the effusion of the moment, but well
 digested ones, the result of strong affections, a high sense of honour,
 and respect for the source of all virtue and truth. He was startled, if
 not entirely convinced by her arguments; indeed her voice, her gestures
 were all persuasive.
 
 Some one now entered the room; he looked an answer to her long harangue;
 it was fortunate for him, or he might have been led to say what in a
 cooler moment he had determined to conceal; but were words necessary to
 reveal it? He wished not to influence her conduct--vain precaution; she
 knew she was beloved; and could she forget that such a man loved her, or
 rest satisfied with any inferior gratification. When passion first
 enters the heart, it is only a return of affection that is sought after,
 and every other remembrance and wish is blotted out.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XIX.
 
 
 Two days passed away without any particular conversation; Henry, trying
 to be indifferent, or to appear so, was more assiduous than ever. The
 conflict was too violent for his present state of health; the spirit was
 willing, but the body suffered; he lost his appetite, and looked
 wretchedly; his spirits were calmly low--the world seemed to fade
 away--what was that world to him that Mary did not inhabit; she lived
 not for him.
 
 He was mistaken; his affection was her only support; without this dear
 prop she had sunk into the grave of her lost--long-loved friend;--his
 attention snatched her from despair. Inscrutable are the ways of
 Heaven!
 
 The third day Mary was desired to prepare herself; for if the wind
 continued in the same point, they should set sail the next evening. She
 tried to prepare her mind, and her efforts were not useless she appeared
 less agitated than could have been expected, and talked of her voyage
 with composure. On great occasions she was generally calm and collected,
 her resolution would brace her unstrung nerves; but after the victory
 she had no triumph; she would sink into a state of moping melancholy,
 and feel ten-fold misery when the heroic enthusiasm was over.
 
 The morning of the day fixed on for her departure she was alone with
 Henry only a few moments, and an awkward kind of formality made them
 slip away without their having said much to each other. Henry was
 afraid to discover his passion, or give any other name to his regard but
 friendship; yet his anxious solicitude for her welfare was ever breaking
 out-while she as artlessly expressed again and again, her fears with
 respect to his declining health.
 
 "We shall soon meet," said he, with a faint smile; Mary smiled too; she
 caught the sickly beam; it was still fainter by being reflected, and not
 knowing what she wished to do, started up and left the room. When she
 was alone she regretted she had left him so precipitately. "The few
 precious moments I have thus thrown away may never return," she
 thought-the reflection led to misery.
 
 She waited for, nay, almost wished for the summons to depart. She could
 not avoid spending the intermediate time with the ladies and Henry; and
 the trivial conversations she was obliged to bear a part in harassed her
 more than can be well conceived.
 
 The summons came, and the whole party attended her to the vessel. For a
 while the remembrance of Ann banished her regret at parting with Henry,
 though his pale figure pressed on her sight; it may seem a paradox, but
 he was more present to her when she sailed; her tears then were all his
 own.
 
 "My poor Ann!" thought Mary, "along this road we came, and near this
 spot you called me your guardian angel--and now I leave thee here! ah!
 no, I do not--thy spirit is not confined to its mouldering tenement!
 Tell me, thou soul of her I love, tell me, ah! whither art thou fled?"
 Ann occupied her until they reached the ship.
 
 The anchor was weighed. Nothing can be more irksome than waiting to say
 farewel. As the day was serene, they accompanied her a little way, and
 then got into the boat; Henry was the last; he pressed her hand, it had
 not any life in it; she leaned over the side of the ship without looking
 at the boat, till it was so far distant, that she could not see the
 countenances of those that were in it: a mist spread itself over her
 sight--she longed to exchange one look--tried to recollect the
 last;--the universe contained no being but Henry!--The grief of parting
 with him had swept all others clean away. Her eyes followed the keel of
 the boat, and when she could no longer perceive its traces: she looked
 round on the wide waste of waters, thought of the precious moments
 which had been stolen from the waste of murdered time.
 
 She then descended into the cabin, regardless of the surrounding
 beauties of nature, and throwing herself on her bed in the little hole
 which was called the state-room--she wished to forget her existence. On
 this bed she remained two days, listening to the dashing waves, unable
 to close her eyes. A small taper made the darkness visible; and the
 third night, by its glimmering light, she wrote the following fragment.
 
 "Poor solitary wretch that I am; here alone do I listen to the whistling
 winds and dashing waves;--on no human support can I rest--when not lost
 to hope I found pleasure in the society of those rough beings; but now
 they appear not like my fellow creatures; no social ties draw me to
 them. How long, how dreary has this day been; yet I scarcely wish it
 over--for what will to-morrow bring--to-morrow, and to-morrow will only
 be marked with unvaried characters of wretchedness.--Yet surely, I am
 not alone!"
 
 Her moistened eyes were lifted up to heaven; a crowd of thoughts darted
 into her mind, and pressing her hand against her forehead, as if to bear
 the intellectual weight, she tried, but tried in vain, to arrange them.
 "Father of Mercies, compose this troubled spirit: do I indeed wish it to
 be composed--to forget my Henry?" the _my_, the pen was directly drawn
 across in an agony.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XX.
 
 
 The mate of the ship, who heard her stir, came to offer her some
 refreshment; and she, who formerly received every offer of kindness or
 civility with pleasure, now shrunk away disgusted: peevishly she desired
 him not to disturb her; but the words were hardly articulated when her
 heart smote her, she called him back, and requested something to drink.
 After drinking it, fatigued by her mental exertions, she fell into a
 death-like slumber, which lasted some hours; but did not refresh her, on
 the contrary, she awoke languid and stupid.
 
 The wind still continued contrary; a week, a dismal week, had she
 struggled with her sorrows; and the struggle brought on a slow fever,
 which sometimes gave her false spirits.
 
 The winds then became very tempestuous, the Great Deep was troubled, and
 all the passengers appalled. Mary then left her bed, and went on deck,
 to survey the contending elements: the scene accorded with the present
 state of her soul; she thought in a few hours I may go home; the
 prisoner may be released. The vessel rose on a wave and descended into a
 yawning gulph--Not slower did her mounting soul return to earth,
 for--Ah! her treasure and her heart was there. The squalls rattled
 amongst the sails, which were quickly taken down; the wind would then
 die away, and the wild undirected waves rushed on every side with a
 tremendous roar. In a little vessel in the midst of such a storm she
 was not dismayed; she felt herself independent.
 
 Just then one of the crew perceived a signal of distress; by the help of
 a glass he could plainly discover a small vessel dismasted, drifted
 about, for the rudder had been broken by the violence of the storm.
 Mary's thoughts were now all engrossed by the crew on the brink of
 destruction. They bore down to the wreck; they reached it, and hailed
 the trembling wretches; at the sound of the friendly greeting, loud
 cries of tumultuous joy were mixed with the roaring of the waves, and
 with ecstatic transport they leaped on the shattered deck, launched
 their boat in a moment, and committed themselves to the mercy of the
 sea. Stowed between two casks, and leaning on a sail, she watched the
 boat, and when a wave intercepted it from her view--she ceased to
 breathe, or rather held her breath until it rose again.
 
 At last the boat arrived safe along-side the ship, and Mary caught the
 poor trembling wretches as they stumbled into it, and joined them in
 thanking that gracious Being, who though He had not thought fit to still
 the raging of the sea, had afforded them unexpected succour.
 
 Amongst the wretched crew was one poor woman, who fainted when she was
 hauled on board: Mary undressed her, and when she had recovered, and
 soothed her, left her to enjoy the rest she required to recruit her
 strength, which fear had quite exhausted. She returned again to view the
 angry deep; and when she gazed on its perturbed state, she thought of
 the Being who rode on the wings of the wind, and stilled the noise of
 the sea; and the madness of the people--He only could speak peace to
 her troubled spirit! she grew more calm; the late transaction had
 gratified her benevolence, and stole her out of herself.
 
 One of the sailors, happening to say to another, "that he believed the
 world was going to be at an end;" this observation led her into a new
 train of thoughts: some of Handel's sublime compositions occurred to
 her, and she sung them to the grand accompaniment. The Lord God
 Omnipotent reigned, and would reign for ever, and ever!--Why then did
 she fear the sorrows that were passing away, when she knew that He would
 bind up the broken-hearted, and receive those who came out of great
 tribulation. She retired to her cabin; and wrote in the little book that
 was now her only confident. It was after midnight.
 
 "At this solemn hour, the great day of judgment fills my thoughts; the
 day of retribution, when the secrets of all hearts will be revealed;
 when all worldly distinctions will fade away, and be no more seen. I
 have not words to express the sublime images which the bare
 contemplation of this awful day raises in my mind. Then, indeed, the
 Lord Omnipotent will reign, and He will wipe the tearful eye, and
 support the trembling heart--yet a little while He hideth his face, and
 the dun shades of sorrow, and the thick clouds of folly separate us from
 our God; but when the glad dawn of an eternal day breaks, we shall know
 even as we are known. Here we walk by faith, and not by sight; and we
 have this alternative, either to enjoy the pleasures of life which are
 but for a season, or look forward to the prize of our high calling, and
 with fortitude, and that wisdom which is from above, endeavour to bear
 the warfare of life. We know that many run the race; but he that
 striveth obtaineth the crown of victory. Our race is an arduous one! How
 many are betrayed by traitors lodged in their own breasts, who wear the
 garb of Virtue, and are so near akin; we sigh to think they should ever
 lead into folly, and slide imperceptibly into vice. Surely any thing
 like happiness is madness! Shall probationers of an hour presume to
 pluck the fruit of immortality, before they have conquered death? it is
 guarded, when the great day, to which I allude, arrives, the way will
 again be opened. Ye dear delusions, gay deceits, farewel! and yet I
 cannot banish ye for ever; still does my panting soul push forward, and
 live in futurity, in the deep shades o'er which darkness hangs.--I try
 to pierce the gloom, and find a resting-place, where my thirst of
 knowledge will be gratified, and my ardent affections find an object to
 fix them. Every thing material must change; happiness and this
 fluctating principle is not compatible. Eternity, immateriality, and
 happiness,--what are ye? How shall I grasp the mighty and fleeting
 conceptions ye create?"
 
 After writing, serenely she delivered her soul into the hands of the
 Father of Spirits; and slept in peace.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXI.
 
 
 Mary rose early, refreshed by the seasonable rest, and went to visit the
 poor woman, whom she found quite recovered: and, on enquiry, heard that
 she had lately buried her husband, a common sailor; and that her only
 surviving child had been washed over-board the day before. Full of her
 own danger, she scarcely thought of her child till that was over; and
 then she gave way to boisterous emotions.
 
 Mary endeavoured to calm her at first, by sympathizing with her; and she
 tried to point out the only solid source of comfort but in doing this
 she encountered many difficulties; she found her grossly ignorant, yet
 she did not despair: and as the poor creature could not receive comfort
 from the operations of her own mind, she laboured to beguile the hours,
 which grief made heavy, by adapting her conversation to her capacity.
 
 There are many minds that only receive impressions through the medium of
 the senses: to them did Mary address herself; she made her some
 presents, and promised to assist her when they should arrive in England.
 This employment roused her out of her late stupor, and again set the
 faculties of her soul in motion; made the understanding contend with the
 imagination, and the heart throbbed not so irregularly during the
 contention. How short-lived was the calm! when the English coast was
 descried, her sorrows returned with redoubled vigor.--She was to visit
 and comfort the mother of her lost friend--And where then should she
 take up her residence? These thoughts suspended the exertions of her
 understanding; abstracted reflections gave way to alarming
 apprehensions; and tenderness undermined fortitude.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXII.
 
 
 In England then landed the forlorn wanderer. She looked round for some
 few moments--her affections were not attracted to any particular part of
 the Island. She knew none of the inhabitants of the vast city to which
 she was going: the mass of buildings appeared to her a huge body without
 an informing soul. As she passed through the streets in an
 hackney-coach, disgust and horror alternately filled her mind. She met
 some women drunk; and the manners of those who attacked the sailors,
 made her shrink into herself, and exclaim, are these my fellow
 creatures!
 
 Detained by a number of carts near the water-side, for she came up the
 river in the vessel, not having reason to hasten on shore, she saw
 vulgarity, dirt, and vice--her soul sickened; this was the first time
 such complicated misery obtruded itself on her sight.--Forgetting her
 own griefs, she gave the world a much indebted tear; mourned for a world
 in ruins. She then perceived, that great part of her comfort must arise
 from viewing the smiling face of nature, and be reflected from the view
 of innocent enjoyments: she was fond of seeing animals play, and could
 not bear to see her own species sink below them.
 
 In a little dwelling in one of the villages near London, lived the
 mother of Ann; two of her children still remained with her; but they did
 not resemble Ann. To her house Mary directed the coach, and told the
 unfortunate mother of her loss. The poor woman, oppressed by it, and her
 many other cares, after an inundation of tears, began to enumerate all
 her past misfortunes, and present cares. The heavy tale lasted until
 midnight, and the impression it made on Mary's mind was so strong, that
 it banished sleep till towards morning; when tired nature sought
 forgetfulness, and the soul ceased to ruminate about many things.
 
 She sent for the poor woman they took up at sea, provided her a lodging,
 and relieved her present necessities. A few days were spent in a kind of
 listless way; then the mother of Ann began to enquire when she thought
 of returning home. She had hitherto treated her with the greatest
 respect, and concealed her wonder at Mary's choosing a remote room in
 the house near the garden, and ordering some alterations to be made, as
 if she intended living in it.
 
 Mary did not choose to explain herself; had Ann lived, it is probable
 she would never have loved Henry so fondly; but if she had, she could
 not have talked of her passion to any human creature. She deliberated,
 and at last informed the family, that she had a reason for not living
 with her husband, which must some time remain a secret--they stared--Not
 live with him! how will you live then? This was a question she could not
 answer; she had only about eighty pounds remaining, of the money she
 took with her to Lisbon; when it was exhausted where could she get more?
 I will work, she cried, do any thing rather than be a slave.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXIII.
 
 
 Unhappy, she wandered about the village, and relieved the poor; it was
 the only employment that eased her aching heart; she became more
 intimate with misery--the misery that rises from poverty and the want of
 education. She was in the vicinity of a great city; the vicious poor in
 and about it must ever grieve a benevolent contemplative mind.
 
 One evening a man who stood weeping in a little lane, near the house she
 resided in, caught her eye. She accosted him; in a confused manner, he
 informed her, that his wife was dying, and his children crying for the
 bread he could not earn. Mary desired to be conducted to his
 habitation; it was not very distant, and was the upper room in an old
 mansion-house, which had been once the abode of luxury. Some tattered
 shreds of rich hangings still remained, covered with cobwebs and filth;
 round the ceiling, through which the rain drop'd, was a beautiful
 cornice mouldering; and a spacious gallery was rendered dark by the
 broken windows being blocked up; through the apertures the wind forced
 its way in hollow sounds, and reverberated along the former scene of
 festivity.
 
 It was crowded with inhabitants: som were scolding, others swearing, or
 singing indecent songs. What a sight for Mary! Her blood ran cold; yet
 she had sufficient resolution to mount to the top of the house. On the
 floor, in one corner of a very small room, lay an emaciated figure of a
 woman; a window over her head scarcely admitted any light, for the
 broken panes were stuffed with dirty rags. Near her were five children,
 all young, and covered with dirt; their sallow cheeks, and languid eyes,
 exhibited none of the charms of childhood. Some were fighting, and
 others crying for food; their yells were mixed with their mother's
 groans, and the wind which rushed through the passage. Mary was
 petrified; but soon assuming more courage, approached the bed, and,
 regardless of the surrounding nastiness, knelt down by the poor wretch,
 and breathed the most poisonous air; for the unfortunate creature was
 dying of a putrid fever, the consequence of dirt and want.
 
 Their state did not require much explanation. Mary sent the husband for
 a poor neighbour, whom she hired to nurse the woman, and take care of
 the children; and then went herself to buy them some necessaries at a
 shop not far distant. Her knowledge of physic had enabled her to
 prescribe for the woman; and she left the house, with a mixture of
 horror and satisfaction.
 
 She visited them every day, and procured them every comfort; contrary to
 her expectation, the woman began to recover; cleanliness and wholesome
 food had a wonderful effect; and Mary saw her rising as it were from the
 grave. Not aware of the danger she ran into, she did not think of it
 till she perceived she had caught the fever. It made such an alarming
 progress, that she was prevailed on to send for a physician; but the
 disorder was so violent, that for some days it baffled his skill; and
 Mary felt not her danger, as she was delirious. After the crisis, the
 symptoms were more favourable, and she slowly recovered, without
 regaining much strength or spirits; indeed they were intolerably low:
 she wanted a tender nurse.
 
 For some time she had observed, that she was not treated with the same
 respect as formerly; her favors were forgotten when no more were
 expected. This ingratitude hurt her, as did a similar instance in the
 woman who came out of the ship. Mary had hitherto supported her; as her
 finances were growing low, she hinted to her, that she ought to try to
 earn her own subsistence: the woman in return loaded her with abuse.
 
 Two months were elapsed; she had not seen, or heard from Henry. He was
 sick--nay, perhaps had forgotten her; all the world was dreary, and all
 the people ungrateful.
 
 She sunk into apathy, and endeavouring to rouse herself out of it, she
 wrote in her book another fragment:
 
 "Surely life is a dream, a frightful one! and after those rude,
 disjointed images are fled, will light ever break in? Shall I ever feel
 joy? Do all suffer like me; or am I framed so as to be particularly
 susceptible of misery? It is true, I have experienced the most rapturous
 emotions--short-lived delight!--ethereal beam, which only serves to shew
 my present misery--yet lie still, my throbbing heart, or burst; and my
 brain--why dost thou whirl about at such a terrifying rate? why do
 thoughts so rapidly rush into my mind, and yet when they disappear
 leave such deep traces? I could almost wish for the madman's happiness,
 and in a strong imagination lose a sense of woe.
 
 "Oh! reason, thou boasted guide, why desert me, like the world, when I
 most need thy assistance! Canst thou not calm this internal tumult, and
 drive away the death-like sadness which presses so sorely on me,--a
 sadness surely very nearly allied to despair. I am now the prey of
 apathy--I could wish for the former storms! a ray of hope sometimes
 illumined my path; I had a pursuit; but now _it visits not my haunts
 forlorn_. Too well have I loved my fellow creatures! I have been wounded
 by ingratitude; from every one it has something of the serpent's tooth.
 
 "When overwhelmed by sorrow, I have met unkindness; I looked for some
 one to have pity on me; but found none!--The healing balm of sympathy is
 denied; I weep, a solitary wretch, and the hot tears scald my cheeks. I
 have not the medicine of life, the dear chimera I have so often chased,
 a friend. Shade of my loved Ann! dost thou ever visit thy poor Mary?
 Refined spirit, thou wouldst weep, could angels weep, to see her
 struggling with passions she cannot subdue; and feelings which corrode
 her small portion of comfort!"
 
 She could not write any more; she wished herself far distant from all
 human society; a thick gloom spread itself over her mind: but did not
 make her forget the very beings she wished to fly from. She sent for the
 poor woman she found in the garret; gave her money to clothe herself
 and children, and buy some furniture for a little hut, in a large
 garden, the master of which agreed to employ her husband, who had been
 bred a gardener. Mary promised to visit the family, and see their new
 abode when she was able to go out.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXIV.
 
 
 Mary still continued weak and low, though it was spring, and all nature
 began to look gay; with more than usual brightness the sun shone, and a
 little robin which she had cherished during the winter sung one of his
 best songs. The family were particularly civil this fine morning, and
 tried to prevail on her to walk out. Any thing like kindness melted her;
 she consented.
 
 Softer emotions banished her melancholy, and she directed her steps to
 the habitation she had rendered comfortable.
 
 Emerging out of a dreary chamber, all nature looked cheerful; when she
 had last walked out, snow covered the ground, and bleak winds pierced
 her through and through: now the hedges were green, the blossoms adorned
 the trees, and the birds sung. She reached the dwelling, without being
 much exhausted and while she rested there, observed the children
 sporting on the grass, with improved complexions. The mother with tears
 thanked her deliverer, and pointed out her comforts. Mary's tears flowed
 not only from sympathy, but a complication of feelings and recollections
 the affections which bound her to her fellow creatures began again to
 play, and reanimated nature. She observed the change in herself, tried
 to account for it, and wrote with her pencil a rhapsody on sensibility.
 
 "Sensibility is the most exquisite feeling of which the human soul is
 susceptible: when it pervades us, we feel happy; and could it last
 unmixed, we might form some conjecture of the bliss of those
 paradisiacal days, when the obedient passions were under the dominion of
 reason, and the impulses of the heart did not need correction.
 
 "It is this quickness, this delicacy of feeling, which enables us to
 relish the sublime touches of the poet, and the painter; it is this,
 which expands the soul, gives an enthusiastic greatness, mixed with
 tenderness, when we view the magnificent objects of nature; or hear of a
 good action. The same effect we experience in the spring, when we hail
 the returning sun, and the consequent renovation of nature; when the
 flowers unfold themselves, and exhale their sweets, and the voice of
 music is heard in the land. Softened by tenderness; the soul is
 disposed to be virtuous. Is any sensual gratification to be compared to
 that of feelings the eves moistened after having comforted the
 unfortunate?
 
 "Sensibility is indeed the foundation of all our happiness; but these
 raptures are unknown to the depraved sensualist, who is only moved by
 what strikes his gross senses; the delicate embellishments of nature
 escape his notice; as do the gentle and interesting affections.--But it
 is only to be felt; it escapes discussion."
 
 She then returned home, and partook of the family meal, which was
 rendered more cheerful by the presence of a man, past the meridian of
 life, of polished manners, and dazzling wit. He endeavoured to draw Mary
 out, and succeeded; she entered into conversation, and some of her
 artless flights of genius struck him with surprise; he found she had a
 capacious mind, and that her reason was as profound as her imagination
 was lively. She glanced from earth to heaven, and caught the light of
 truth. Her expressive countenance shewed what passed in her mind, and
 her tongue was ever the faithful interpreter of her heart; duplicity
 never threw a shade over her words or actions. Mary found him a man of
 learning; and the exercise of her understanding would frequently make
 her forget her griefs, when nothing else could, except benevolence.
 
 This man had known the mistress of the house in her youth; good nature
 induced him to visit her; but when he saw Mary he had another
 inducement. Her appearance, and above all, her genius, and cultivation
 of mind, roused his curiosity; but her dignified manners had such an
 effect on him, he was obliged to suppress it. He knew men, as well as
 books; his conversation was entertaining and improving. In Mary's
 company he doubted whether heaven was peopled with spirits masculine;
 and almost forgot that he had called the sex "the pretty play things
 that render life tolerable."
 
 He had been the slave of beauty, the captive of sense; love he ne'er had
 felt; the mind never rivetted the chain, nor had the purity of it made
 the body appear lovely in his eyes. He was humane, despised meanness;
 but was vain of his abilities, and by no means a useful member of
 society. He talked often of the beauty of virtue; but not having any
 solid foundation to build the practice on, he was only a shining, or
 rather a sparkling character: and though his fortune enabled him to
 hunt down pleasure, he was discontented.
 
 Mary observed his character, and wrote down a train of reflections,
 which these observations led her to make; these reflections received a
 tinge from her mind; the present state of it, was that kind of painful
 quietness which arises from reason clouded by disgust; she had not yet
 learned to be resigned; vague hopes agitated her.
 
 "There are some subjects that are so enveloped in clouds, as you
 dissipate one, another overspreads it. Of this kind are our reasonings
 concerning happiness; till we are obliged to cry out with the Apostle,
 _That it hath not entered into the heart of man to conceive in what it
 could consist_, or how satiety could be prevented. Man seems formed for
 action, though the passions are seldom properly managed; they are
 either so languid as not to serve as a spur, or else so violent, as to
 overleap all bounds.
 
 "Every individual has its own peculiar trials; and anguish, in one shape
 or other, visits every heart. Sensibility produces flights of virtue;
 and not curbed by reason, is on the brink of vice talking, and even
 thinking of virtue.
 
 "Christianity can only afford just principles to govern the wayward
 feelings and impulses of the heart: every good disposition runs wild, if
 not transplanted into this soil; but how hard is it to keep the heart
 diligently, though convinced that the issues of life depend on it.
 
 "It is very difficult to discipline the mind of a thinker, or reconcile
 him to the weakness, the inconsistency of his understanding; and a
 still more laborious task for him to conquer his passions, and learn to
 seek content, instead of happiness. Good dispositions, and virtuous
 propensities, without the light of the Gospel, produce eccentric
 characters: comet-like, they are always in extremes; while revelation
 resembles the laws of attraction, and produces uniformity; but too often
 is the attraction feeble; and the light so obscured by passion, as to
 force the bewildered soul to fly into void space, and wander in
 confusion."
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXV.
 
 
 A few mornings after, as Mary was sitting ruminating, harassed by
 perplexing thoughts, and fears, a letter was delivered to her: the
 servant waited for an answer. Her heart palpitated; it was from Henry;
 she held it some time in her hand, then tore it open; it was not a long
 one; and only contained an account of a relapse, which prevented his
 sailing in the first packet, as he had intended. Some tender enquiries
 were added, concerning her health, and state of mind; but they were
 expressed in rather a formal style: it vexed her, and the more so, as it
 stopped the current of affection, which the account of his arrival and
 illness had made flow to her heart--it ceased to beat for a moment--she
 read the passage over again; but could not tell what she was hurt
 by--only that it did not answer the expectations of her affection. She
 wrote a laconic, incoherent note in return, allowing him to call on her
 the next day--he had requested permission at the conclusion of his
 letter.
 
 Her mind was then painfully active; she could not read or walk; she
 tried to fly from herself, to forget the long hours that were yet to run
 before to-morrow could arrive: she knew not what time he would come;
 certainly in the morning, she concluded; the morning then was anxiously
 wished for; and every wish produced a sigh, that arose from expectation
 on the stretch, damped by fear and vain regret.
 
 To beguile the tedious time, Henry's favorite tunes were sung; the books
 they read together turned over; and the short epistle read at least a
 hundred times.--Any one who had seen her, would have supposed that she
 was trying to decypher Chinese characters.
 
 After a sleepless night, she hailed the tardy day, watched the rising
 sun, and then listened for every footstep, and started if she heard the
 street door opened. At last he came, and she who had been counting the
 hours, and doubting whether the earth moved, would gladly have escaped
 the approaching interview.
 
 With an unequal, irresolute pace, she went to meet him; but when she
 beheld his emaciated countenance, all the tenderness, which the
 formality of his letter had damped, returned, and a mournful
 presentiment stilled the internal conflict. She caught his hand, and
 looking wistfully at him, exclaimed, "Indeed, you are not well!"
 
 "I am very far from well; but it matters not," added he with a smile of
 resignation; "my native air may work wonders, and besides, my mother is
 a tender nurse, and I shall sometimes see thee."
 
 Mary felt for the first time in her life, envy; she wished
 involuntarily, that all the comfort he received should be from her. She
 enquired about the symptoms of his disorder; and heard that he had been
 very ill; she hastily drove away the fears, that former dear bought
 experience suggested: and again and again did she repeat, that she was
 sure he would soon recover. She would then look in his face, to see if
 he assented, and ask more questions to the same purport. She tried to
 avoid speaking of herself, and Henry left her, with, a promise of
 visiting her the next day.
 
 Her mind was now engrossed by one fear--yet she would not allow herself
 to think that she feared an event she could not name. She still saw his
 pale face; the sound of his voice still vibrated on her ears; she tried
 to retain it; she listened, looked round, wept, and prayed.
 
 Henry had enlightened the desolate scene: was this charm of life to fade
 away, and, like the baseless fabric of a vision, leave not a wreck
 behind? These thoughts disturbed her reason, she shook her head, as if
 to drive them out of it; a weight, a heavy one, was on her heart; all
 was not well there.
 
 Out of this reverie she was soon woke to keener anguish, by the arrival
 of a letter from her husband; it came to Lisbon after her departure:
 Henry had forwarded it to her, but did not choose to deliver it
 himself, for a very obvious reason; it might have produced a
 conversation he wished for some time to avoid; and his precaution took
 its rise almost equally from benevolence and love.
 
 She could not muster up sufficient resolution to break the seal: her
 fears were not prophetic, for the contents gave her comfort. He informed
 her that he intended prolonging his tour, as he was now his own master,
 and wished to remain some time on the continent, and in particular to
 visit Italy without any restraint: but his reasons for it appeared
 childish; it was not to cultivate his taste, or tread on classic ground,
 where poets and philosophers caught their lore; but to join in the
 masquerades, and such burlesque amusements.
 
 These instances of folly relieved Mary, in some degree reconciled her
 to herself added fuel to the devouring flame--and silenced something
 like a pang, which reason and conscience made her feel, when she
 reflected, that it is the office of Religion to reconcile us to the
 seemingly hard dispensations of providence; and that no inclination,
 however strong, should oblige us to desert the post assigned us, or
 force us to forget that virtue should be an active principle; and that
 the most desirable station, is the one that exercises our faculties,
 refines our affections, and enables us to be useful.
 
 One reflection continually wounded her repose; she feared not poverty;
 her wants were few; but in giving up a fortune, she gave up the power of
 comforting the miserable, and making the sad heart sing for joy.
 
 Heaven had endowed her with uncommon humanity, to render her one of His
 benevolent agents, a messenger of peace; and should she attend to her
 own inclinations?
 
 These suggestions, though they could not subdue a violent passion,
 increased her misery. One moment she was a heroine, half determined to
 bear whatever fate should inflict; the next, her mind would recoil--and
 tenderness possessed her whole soul. Some instances of Henry's
 affection, his worth and genius, were remembered: and the earth was only
 a vale of tears, because he was not to sojourn with her.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXVI.
 
 
 Henry came the next day, and once or twice in the course of the
 following week; but still Mary kept up some little formality, a certain
 consciousness restrained her; and Henry did not enter on the subject
 which he found she wished to avoid. In the course of conversation,
 however, she mentioned to him, that she earnestly desired to obtain a
 place in one of the public offices for Ann's brother, as the family were
 again in a declining way.
 
 Henry attended, made a few enquiries, and dropped the subject; but the
 following week, she heard him enter with unusual haste; it was to inform
 her, that he had made interest with a person of some consequence, whom
 he had once obliged in a very disagreeable exigency, in a foreign
 country; and that he had procured a place for her friend, which would
 infallibly lead to something better, if he behaved with propriety. Mary
 could not speak to thank him; emotions of gratitude and love suffused
 her face; her blood eloquently spoke. She delighted to receive benefits
 through the medium of her fellow creatures; but to receive them from
 Henry was exquisite pleasure.
 
 As the summer advanced, Henry grew worse; the closeness of the air, in
 the metropolis, affected his breath; and his mother insisted on his
 fixing on some place in the country, where she would accompany him. He
 could not think of going far off, but chose a little village on the
 banks of the Thames, near Mary's dwelling: he then introduced her to his
 mother.
 
 They frequently went down the river in a boat; Henry would take his
 violin, and Mary would sometimes sing, or read, to them. She pleased his
 mother; she inchanted him. It was an advantage to Mary that friendship
 first possessed her heart; it opened it to all the softer sentiments of
 humanity:--and when this first affection was torn away, a similar one
 sprung up, with a still tenderer sentiment added to it.
 
 The last evening they were on the water, the clouds grew suddenly black,
 and broke in violent showers, which interrupted the solemn stillness
 that had prevailed previous to it. The thunder roared; and the oars
 plying quickly, in order to reach the shore, occasioned a not
 unpleasing sound. Mary drew still nearer Henry; she wished to have
 sought with him a watry grave; to have escaped the horror of surviving
 him.--She spoke not, but Henry saw the workings of her mind--he felt
 them; threw his arm round her waist--and they enjoyed the luxury of
 wretchedness.--As they touched the shore, Mary perceived that Henry was
 wet; with eager anxiety she cried, What shall I do!--this day will kill
 thee, and I shall not die with thee!
 
 This accident put a stop to their pleasurable excursions; it had injured
 him, and brought on the spitting of blood he was subject to--perhaps it
 was not the cold that he caught, that occasioned it. In vain did Mary
 try to shut her eyes; her fate pursued her! Henry every day grew worse
 and worse.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXVII.
 
 
 Oppressed by her foreboding fears, her sore mind was hurt by new
 instances of ingratitude: disgusted with the family, whose misfortunes
 had often disturbed her repose, and lost in anticipated sorrow, she
 rambled she knew not where; when turning down a shady walk, she
 discovered her feet had taken the path they delighted to tread. She saw
 Henry sitting in his garden alone; he quickly opened the garden-gate,
 and she sat down by him.
 
 "I did not," said he, "expect to see thee this evening, my dearest Mary;
 but I was thinking of thee. Heaven has endowed thee with an uncommon
 portion of fortitude, to support one of the most affectionate hearts in
 the world. This is not a time for disguise; I know I am dear to
 thee--and my affection for thee is twisted with every fibre of my
 heart.--I loved thee ever since I have been acquainted with thine: thou
 art the being my fancy has delighted to form; but which I imagined
 existed only there! In a little while the shades of death will encompass
 me--ill-fated love perhaps added strength to my disease, and smoothed
 the rugged path. Try, my love, to fulfil thy destined course--try to add
 to thy other virtues patience. I could have wished, for thy sake, that
 we could have died together--or that I could live to shield thee from
 the assaults of an unfeeling world! Could I but offer thee an asylum in
 these arms--a faithful bosom, in which thou couldst repose all thy
 griefs--" He pressed her to it, and she returned the pressure--he felt her
 throbbing heart. A mournful silence ensued! when he resumed the
 conversation. "I wished to prepare thee for the blow--too surely do I
 feel that it will not be long delayed! The passion I have nursed is so
 pure, that death cannot extinguish it--or tear away the impression thy
 virtues have made on my soul. I would fain comfort thee--"
 
 "Talk not of comfort," interrupted Mary, "it will be in heaven with thee
 and Ann--while I shall remain on earth the veriest wretch!"--She grasped
 his hand.
 
 "There we shall meet, my love, my Mary, in our Father's--" His voice
 faultered; he could not finish the sentence; he was almost
 suffocated--they both wept, their tears relieved them; they walked
 slowly to the garden-gate (Mary would not go into the house); they could
 not say farewel when they reached it--and Mary hurried down the lane; to
 spare Henry the pain of witnessing her emotions.
 
 When she lost sight of the house she sat down on the ground, till it
 grew late, thinking of all that had passed. Full of these thoughts, she
 crept along, regardless of the descending rain; when lifting up her eyes
 to heaven, and then turning them wildly on the prospects around, without
 marking them; she only felt that the scene accorded with her present
 state of mind. It was the last glimmering of twilight, with a full moon,
 over which clouds continually flitted. Where am I wandering, God of
 Mercy! she thought; she alluded to the wanderings of her mind. In what a
 labyrinth am I lost! What miseries have I already encountered--and what
 a number lie still before me.
 
 Her thoughts flew rapidly to something. I could be happy listening to
 him, soothing his cares.--Would he not smile upon me--call me his own
 Mary? I am not his--said she with fierceness--I am a wretch! and she
 heaved a sigh that almost broke her heart, while the big tears rolled
 down her burning cheeks; but still her exercised mind, accustomed to
 think, began to observe its operation, though the barrier of reason was
 almost carried away, and all the faculties not restrained by her, were
 running into confusion. Wherefore am I made thus? Vain are my
 efforts--I cannot live without loving--and love leads to madness.--Yet
 I will not weep; and her eyes were now fixed by despair, dry and
 motionless; and then quickly whirled about with a look of distraction.
 
 She looked for hope; but found none--all was troubled waters.--No where
 could she find rest. I have already paced to and fro in the earth; it is
 not my abiding place--may I not too go home! Ah! no. Is this complying
 with my Henry's request, could a spirit thus disengaged expect to
 associate with his? Tears of tenderness strayed down her relaxed
 countenance, and her softened heart heaved more regularly. She felt the
 rain, and turned to her solitary home.
 
 Fatigued by the tumultuous emotions she had endured, when she entered
 the house she ran to her own room, sunk on the bed; and exhausted
 nature soon closed her eyes; but active fancy was still awake, and a
 thousand fearful dreams interrupted her slumbers.
 
 Feverish and languid, she opened her eyes, and saw the unwelcome sun
 dart his rays through a window, the curtains of which she had forgotten
 to draw. The dew hung on the adjacent trees, and added to the lustre;
 the little robin began his song, and distant birds joined. She looked;
 her countenance was still vacant--her sensibility was absorbed by one
 object.
 
 Did I ever admire the rising sun, she slightly thought, turning from the
 Window, and shutting her eyes: she recalled to view the last night's
 scene. His faltering voice, lingering step, and the look of tender woe,
 were all graven on her heart; as were the words "Could these arms
 shield thee from sorrow--afford thee an asylum from an unfeeling world."
 The pressure to his bosom was not forgot. For a moment she was happy;
 but in a long-drawn sigh every delightful sensation evaporated.
 Soon--yes, very soon, will the grave again receive all I love! and the
 remnant of my days--she could not proceed--Were there then days to come
 after that?
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXVIII.
 
 
 Just as she was going to quit her room, to visit Henry, his mother
 called on her.
 
 "My son is worse to-day," said she, "I come to request you to spend not
 only this day, but a week or two with me.--Why should I conceal any
 thing from you? Last night my child made his mother his confident, and,
 in the anguish of his heart, requested me to be thy friend--when I shall
 be childless. I will not attempt to describe what I felt when he talked
 thus to me. If I am to lose the support of my age, and be again a
 widow--may I call her Child whom my Henry wishes me to adopt?"
 
 This new instance of Henry's disinterested affection, Mary felt most
 forcibly; and striving to restrain the complicated emotions, and sooth
 the wretched mother, she almost fainted: when the unhappy parent forced
 tears from her, by saying, "I deserve this blow; my partial fondness
 made me neglect him, when most he wanted a mother's care; this neglect,
 perhaps, first injured his constitution: righteous Heaven has made my
 crime its own punishment; and now I am indeed a mother, I shall loss my
 child--my only child!"
 
 When they were a little more composed they hastened to the invalide; but
 during the short ride, the mother related several instances of Henry's
 goodness of heart. Mary's tears were not those of unmixed anguish; the
 display of his virtues gave her extreme delight--yet human nature
 prevailed; she trembled to think they would soon unfold themselves in a
 more genial clime.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXIX.
 
 
 She found Henry very ill. The physician had some weeks before declared
 he never knew a person with a similar pulse recover. Henry was certain
 he could not live long; all the rest he could obtain, was procured by
 opiates. Mary now enjoyed the melancholy pleasure of nursing him, and
 softened by her tenderness the pains she could not remove. Every sigh
 did she stifle, every tear restrain, when he could see or hear them. She
 would boast of her resignation--yet catch eagerly at the least ray of
 hope. While he slept she would support his pillow, and rest her head
 where she could feel his breath. She loved him better than herself--she
 could not pray for his recovery; she could only say, The will of Heaven
 be done.
 
 While she was in this state, she labored to acquire fortitude; but one
 tender look destroyed it all--she rather labored, indeed, to make him
 believe he was resigned, than really to be so.
 
 She wished to receive the sacrament with him, as a bond of union which
 was to extend beyond the grave. She did so, and received comfort from
 it; she rose above her misery.
 
 His end was now approaching. Mary sat on the side of the bed. His eyes
 appeared fixed--no longer agitated by passion, he only felt that it was
 a fearful thing to die. The soul retired to the citadel; but it was not
 now solely filled by the image of her who in silent despair watched for
 his last breath. Collected, a frightful calmness stilled every turbulent
 emotion.
 
 The mother's grief was more audible. Henry had for some time only
 attended to Mary--Mary pitied the parent, whose stings of conscience
 increased her sorrow; she whispered him, "Thy mother weeps, disregarded
 by thee; oh! comfort her!--My mother, thy son blesses thee.--" The
 oppressed parent left the room. And Mary _waited_ to see him die.
 
 She pressed with trembling eagerness his parched lips--he opened his
 eyes again; the spreading film retired, and love returned them--he gave
 a look--it was never forgotten. My Mary, will you be comforted?
 
 Yes, yes, she exclaimed in a firm voice; you go to be happy--I am not a
 complete wretch! The words almost choked her.
 
 He was a long time silent; the opiate produced a kind of stupor. At
 last, in an agony, he cried, It is dark; I cannot see thee; raise me up.
 Where is Mary? did she not say she delighted to support me? let me die
 in her arms.
 
 Her arms were opened to receive him; they trembled not. Again he was
 obliged to lie down, resting on her: as the agonies increased he leaned
 towards her: the soul seemed flying to her, as it escaped out of its
 prison. The breathing was interrupted; she heard distinctly the last
 sigh--and lifting up to Heaven her eyes, Father, receive his spirit, she
 calmly cried.
 
 The attendants gathered round; she moved not, nor heard the clamor; the
 hand seemed yet to press hers; it still was warm. A ray of light from
 an opened window discovered the pale face.
 
 She left the room, and retired to one very near it; and sitting down on
 the floor, fixed her eyes on the door of the apartment which contained
 the body. Every event of her life rushed across her mind with wonderful
 rapidity--yet all was still--fate had given the finishing stroke. She
 sat till midnight.--Then rose in a phrensy, went into the apartment, and
 desired those who watched the body to retire.
 
 She knelt by the bed side;--an enthusiastic devotion overcame the
 dictates of despair.--She prayed most ardently to be supported, and
 dedicated herself to the service of that Being into whose hands, she had
 committed the spirit she almost adored--again--and again,--she prayed
 wildly--and fervently--but attempting to touch the lifeless hand--her
 head swum--she sunk--
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXX.
 
 
 Three months after, her only friend, the mother of her lost Henry began
 to be alarmed, at observing her altered appearance; and made her own
 health a pretext for travelling. These complaints roused Mary out of her
 torpid state; she imagined a new duty now forced her to exert herself--a
 duty love made sacred!--
 
 They went to Bath, from that to Bristol; but the latter place they
 quickly left; the sight of the sick that resort there, they neither of
 them could bear. From Bristol they flew to Southampton. The road was
 pleasant--yet Mary shut her eyes;--or if they were open, green fields
 and commons, passed in quick succession, and left no more traces behind
 than if they had been waves of the sea.
 
 Some time after they were settled at Southampton, they met the man who
 took so much notice of Mary, soon after her return to England. He
 renewed his acquaintance; he was really interested in her fate, as he
 had heard her uncommon story; besides, he knew her husband; knew him to
 be a good-natured, weak man. He saw him soon after his arrival in his
 native country, and prevented his hastening to enquire into the reasons
 of Mary's strange conduct. He desired him not to be too precipitate, if
 he ever wished to possess an invaluable treasure. He was guided by him,
 and allowed him to follow Mary to Southampton, and speak first to her
 friend.
 
 This friend determined to trust to her native strength of mind, and
 informed her of the circumstance; but she overrated it: Mary was not
 able, for a few days after the intelligence, to fix on the mode of
 conduct she ought now to pursue. But at last she conquered her disgust,
 and wrote her _husband_ an account of what had passed since she had
 dropped his correspondence.
 
 He came in person to answer the letter. Mary fainted when he approached
 her unexpectedly. Her disgust returned with additional force, in spite
 of previous reasonings, whenever he appeared; yet she was prevailed on
 to promise to live with him, if he would permit her to pass one year,
 travelling from place to place; he was not to accompany her.
 
 The time too quickly elapsed, and she gave him her hand--the struggle
 was almost more than she could endure. She tried to appear calm; time
 mellowed her grief, and mitigated her torments; but when her husband
 would take her hand, or mention any thing like love, she would instantly
 feel a sickness, a faintness at her heart, and wish, involuntarily, that
 the earth would open and swallow her.
 
 
 
 
 CHAP. XXXI.
 
 
 Mary visited the continent, and sought health in different climates; but
 her nerves were not to be restored to their former state. She then
 retired to her house in the country, established manufactories, threw
 the estate into small farms; and continually employed herself this way
 to dissipate care, and banish unavailing regret. She visited the sick,
 supported the old, and educated the young.
 
 These occupations engrossed her mind; but there were hours when all her
 former woes would return and haunt her.--Whenever she did, or said, any
 thing she thought Henry would have approved of--she could not avoid
 thinking with anguish, of the rapture his approbation ever conveyed to
 her heart--a heart in which there was a void, that even benevolence and
 religion could not fill. The latter taught her to struggle for
 resignation; and the former rendered life supportable.
 
 Her delicate state of health did not promise long life. In moments of
 solitary sadness, a gleam of joy would dart across her mind--She thought
 she was hastening to that world _where there is neither marrying_, nor
 giving in marriage.
 

 
 
 
 Produced by The Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
 http://www.pgdp.net (This file was produced from images
 generously made available by The Internet Archive/American
 Libraries.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   The Love Letters
   OF
   Mary Wollstonecraft
   TO GILBERT IMLAY
 
   WITH A PREFATORY MEMOIR
   By Roger Ingpen
 
   _ILLUSTRATED WITH PORTRAITS_
 
   Philadelphia
   J. B. LIPPINCOTT COMPANY
   London: HUTCHINSON & CO.
   1908
 
 
 
   PRINTED IN GREAT BRITAIN
 
 
 
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT'S LETTERS
 
 
 
 
 EDITED BY ROGER INGPEN
 
 LEIGH HUNT'S AUTOBIOGRAPHY. Illustrated Edition. 2 Vols. A. CONSTABLE &
 CO.
 
 ONE THOUSAND POEMS FOR CHILDREN: A Collection of Verse Old and New.
 HUTCHINSON & CO.
 
 FORSTER'S LIFE OF OLIVER GOLDSMITH. _Abridged._ (Standard Biographies.)
 HUTCHINSON & CO.
 
 BOSWELL'S LIFE OF SAMUEL JOHNSON. _Abridged._ (Standard Biographies.)
 HUTCHINSON & CO.
 
 BOSWELL'S LIFE OF SAMUEL JOHNSON. Complete. Illustrated Edition. 2 Vols.
 PITMAN.
 
 
 
 
 [Illustration: Mary Wollstonecraft
 
 _From an engraving, after the painting by John Opie, R.A._]
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 I
 
 Of Mary Wollstonecraft's ancestors little is known, except that they were
 of Irish descent. Her father, Edward John Wollstonecraft, was the son of a
 prosperous Spitalfields manufacturer of Irish birth, from whom he
 inherited the sum of ten thousand pounds. He married towards the middle of
 the eighteenth century Elizabeth Dixon, the daughter of a gentleman in
 good position, of Ballyshannon, by whom he had six children: Edward, Mary,
 Everina, Eliza, James, and Charles. Mary, the eldest daughter and second
 child, was born on April 27, 1759, the birth year of Burns and Schiller,
 and the last year of George II.'s reign. She passed her childhood, until
 she was five years old, in the neighbourhood of Epping Forest, but it is
 doubtful whether she was born there or at Hoxton. Mr. Wollstonecraft
 followed no profession in particular, although from time to time he
 dabbled in a variety of pursuits when seized with a desire to make money.
 He is described as of idle, dissipated habits, and possessed of an
 ungovernable temper and a restless spirit that urged him to perpetual
 changes of residence. From Hoxton, where he squandered most of his
 fortune, he wandered to Essex, and then, among other places, in 1768 to
 Beverley, in Yorkshire. Later he took up farming at Laugharne in
 Pembrokeshire, but he at length grew tired of this experiment and returned
 once more to London. As his fortunes declined, his brutality and
 selfishness increased, and Mary was frequently compelled to defend her
 mother from his acts of personal violence, sometimes by thrusting herself
 bodily between him and his victim. Mrs. Wollstonecraft herself was far
 from being an amiable woman; a petty tyrant and a stern but incompetent
 ruler of her household, she treated Mary as the scapegoat of the family.
 Mary's early years therefore were far from being happy; what little
 schooling she had was spasmodic, owing to her father's migratory habits.
 
 In her sixteenth year, when the Wollstonecrafts were once more in London,
 Mary formed a friendship with Fanny Blood, a young girl about her own age,
 which was destined to be one of the happiest events of her life. There was
 a strong bond of sympathy between the two friends, for Fanny contrived by
 her work as an artist to be the chief support of her family, as her
 father, like Mr. Wollstonecraft, was a lazy, drunken fellow.
 
 Mary's new friend was an intellectual and cultured girl. She loved music,
 sang agreeably, was well-read too, for her age, and wrote interesting
 letters. It was by comparing Fanny Blood's letters with her own, that Mary
 first recognised how defective her education had been. She applied herself
 therefore to the task of increasing her slender stock of
 knowledge--hoping ultimately to become a governess. At length, at the age
 of nineteen, Mary went to Bath as companion to a tiresome and exacting old
 lady, a Mrs. Dawson, the widow of a wealthy London tradesman. In spite of
 many difficulties, she managed to retain her situation for some two years,
 leaving it only to attend the deathbed of her mother.
 
 Mrs. Wollstonecraft's death (in 1780) was followed by the break-up of the
 home. Mary went to live temporarily with the Bloods at Walham Green, and
 assisted Mrs. Blood, who took in needle-work; Everina became for a short
 time housekeeper to her brother Edward, a solicitor; and Eliza married a
 Mr. Bishop.
 
 Mr. Kegan Paul has pointed out that "all the Wollstonecraft sisters were
 enthusiastic, excitable, and hasty tempered, apt to exaggerate trifles,
 sensitive to magnify inattention into slights, and slights into studied
 insults. All had bad health of a kind which is especially trying to the
 nerves, and Eliza had in excess the family temperament and constitution."
 Mrs. Bishop's married life from the first was one of utter misery; they
 were an ill-matched pair, and her peculiar temperament evidently
 exasperated her husband's worst nature. His outbursts of fury and the
 scenes of violence of daily occurrence, for which he was responsible, were
 afterwards described with realistic fidelity by Mary in her novel, "The
 Wrongs of Women." It was plainly impossible for Mrs. Bishop to continue
 to live with such a man, and when, in 1782, she became dangerously ill,
 Mary, with her characteristic good nature, went to nurse her, and soon
 after assisted her in her flight from her husband.
 
 In the following year (1783) Mary set up a school at Islington with Fanny
 Blood, and she was thus in a position to offer a home to her sisters, Mrs.
 Bishop and Everina. The school was afterwards moved to Newington Green,
 where Mary soon had an establishment with some twenty day scholars. After
 a time, emboldened by her success, she took a larger house; but
 unfortunately the number of her pupils did not increase in proportion to
 her obligations, which were now heavier than she could well meet.
 
 While Mary was living at Newington Green, she was introduced to Dr.
 Johnson, who, Godwin says, treated her with particular kindness and
 attention, and with whom she had a long conversation. He desired her to
 repeat her visit, but she was prevented from seeing him again by his last
 illness and death.
 
 In the meantime Fanny Blood had impaired her health by overwork, and signs
 of consumption were already evident. A Mr. Hugh Skeys, who was engaged in
 business at Lisbon, though somewhat of a weak lover, had long admired
 Fanny, and wanted to marry her. It was thought that the climate of
 Portugal might help to restore her health, and she consented, perhaps more
 on that account than on any other, to become his wife. She left England
 in February 1785, but her health continued to grow worse. Mary's anxiety
 for her friend's welfare was such that, on hearing of her grave condition,
 she at once went off to Lisbon, and arrived after a stormy passage, only
 in time to comfort Fanny in her dying moments. Mary was almost
 broken-hearted at the loss of her friend, and she made her stay in Lisbon
 as short as possible, remaining only as long as was necessary for Mrs.
 Skeys's funeral.
 
 She returned to England to find that the school had greatly suffered by
 neglect during her absence. In a letter to Mrs. Skeys's brother, George
 Blood, she says: "The loss of Fanny was sufficient to have thrown a cloud
 over my brightest days: what effect then must it have, when I am bereft of
 every other comfort? I have too many debts, the rent is so enormous, and
 where to go, without money or friends, who can point out?"
 
 She thus realised that to continue her school was useless. But her
 experience as a schoolmistress was to bear fruit in the future. She had
 observed some of the defects of the educational methods of her time, and
 her earliest published effort was a pamphlet entitled, "Thoughts on the
 Education of Daughters," (1787). For this essay she received ten guineas,
 a sum that she gave to the parents of her friend, Mr. and Mrs. Blood, who
 were desirous of going over to Ireland.
 
 She soon went to Ireland herself, for in the October of 1787 she became
 governess to the daughters of Lord Kingsborough at Michaelstown, with a
 salary of forty pounds a year. Lady Kingsborough in Mary's opinion was "a
 shrewd clever woman, a great talker.... She rouges, and in short is a fine
 lady without fancy or sensibility. I am almost tormented to death by
 dogs...." Lady Kingsborough was rather selfish and uncultured, and her
 chief object was the pursuit of pleasure. She pampered her dogs, much to
 the disgust of Mary Wollstonecraft, and neglected her children. What views
 she had on education were narrow. She had been accustomed to submission
 from her governess, but she learnt before long that Mary was not of a
 tractable disposition. The children, at first unruly and defiant,
 "literally speaking, wild Irish, unformed and not very pleasing," soon
 gave Mary their confidence, and before long their affection. One of her
 pupils, Margaret King, afterwards Lady Mountcashel, always retained the
 warmest regard for Mary Wollstonecraft. Lady Mountcashel continued her
 acquaintance with William Godwin after Mary's death, and later came across
 Shelley and his wife in Italy. Mary won from the children the affection
 that they withheld from their mother, consequently, in the autumn of 1788,
 when she had been with Lady Kingsborough for about a year, she received
 her dismissal. She had completed by this time the novel to which she gave
 the name of "Mary," which is a tribute to the memory of her friend Fanny
 Blood.
 
 
 II
 
 And now, in her thirtieth year, Mary Wollstonecraft had concluded her
 career as a governess, and was resolved henceforth to devote herself to
 literature. Her chances of success were slender indeed, for she had
 written nothing to encourage her for such a venture. It was her fortune,
 however, to make the acquaintance of Joseph Johnson, the humanitarian
 publisher and bookseller of St. Paul's Churchyard, who issued the works of
 Priestley, Horne Tooke, Gilbert Wakefield, and other men of advanced
 thought, and she met at his table many of the authors for whom he
 published, and such eminent men of the day as William Blake, Fuseli, and
 Tom Paine. Mr. Johnson, who afterwards proved one of her best friends,
 encouraged her in her literary plans. He was the publisher of her
 "Thoughts on the Education of Daughters," and had recognised in that
 little book so much promise, that when she sought his advice, he at once
 offered to assist her with employment.
 
 Mary therefore settled at Michaelmas 1788 in a house in George Street,
 Blackfriars. She had brought to London the manuscript of her novel "Mary,"
 and she set to work on a book for children entitled "Original Stories from
 Real Life." Both of these books appeared before the year was out, the
 latter with quaint plates by William Blake. Mary also occupied some of her
 time with translations from the French, German, and even Dutch, one of
 which was an abridged edition of Saltzmann's "Elements of Morality," for
 which Blake also supplied the illustrations. Besides this work, Johnson
 engaged Mary as his literary adviser or "reader," and secured her services
 in connexion with _The Analytical Review_, a periodical that he had
 recently founded.
 
 While she was at George Street she also wrote her "Vindication of the
 Rights of Man" in a letter to Edmund Burke. Her chief satisfaction in
 keeping up this house was to have a home where her brothers and sisters
 could always come when out of employment. She was never weary of assisting
 them either with money, or by exerting her influence to find them
 situations. One of her first acts when she settled in London was to send
 Everina Wollstonecraft to Paris to improve her French accent. Mr. Johnson,
 who wrote a short account of Mary's life in London at this time, says she
 often spent her afternoons and evenings at his house, and used to seek his
 advice, or unburden her troubles to him. Among the many duties she imposed
 on herself was the charge of her father's affairs, which must indeed have
 been a profitless undertaking.
 
 The most important of Mary Wollstonecraft's labours while she was living
 at Blackfriars was the writing of the book that is chiefly associated with
 her name, "A Vindication of the Rights of Woman." This volume--now much
 better known by its title than its contents--was dedicated to the astute
 M. Talleyrand de Perigord, late Bishop of Autun, apparently on account of
 his authorship of a pamphlet on National Education. It is unnecessary to
 attempt an analysis of this strikingly original but most unequal
 book--modern reprints of the work have appeared under the editorship both
 of Mrs. Fawcett and Mrs. Pennell. It is sufficient to say that it is
 really a plea for a more enlightened system of education, affecting not
 only her own sex, but also humanity in its widest sense. Many of her
 suggestions have long since been put to practical use, such as that of a
 system of free national education, with equal advantages for boys and
 girls. The book contains too much theory and is therefore to a great
 extent obsolete. Mary Wollstonecraft protests against the custom that
 recognises woman as the plaything of man; she pleads rather for a friendly
 footing of equality between the sexes, besides claiming a new order of
 things for women, in terms which are unusually frank. Such a book could
 not fail to create a sensation, and it speedily made her notorious, not
 only in this country, but on the Continent, where it was translated into
 French. It was of course the outcome of the French Revolution; the whole
 work is permeated with the ideas and ideals of that movement, but whereas
 the French patriots demanded rights for men, she made the same demands
 also for women.
 
 It is evident that the great historical drama then being enacted in France
 had made a deep impression on Mary's mind--its influence is stamped on
 every page of her book, and it was her desire to visit France with Mr.
 Johnson and Fuseli. Her friends were, however, unable to accompany her, so
 she went alone in the December of 1792, chiefly with the object of
 perfecting her French. Godwin states, though apparently in error, that
 Fuseli was the cause of her going to France, the acquaintance with the
 painter having grown into something warmer than mere friendship. Fuseli,
 however, had a wife and was happily married, so Mary "prudently resolved
 to retire into another country, far remote from the object who had
 unintentionally excited the tender passion in her breast."
 
 She certainly arrived in Paris at a dramatic moment; she wrote on December
 24 to her sister Everina: "The day after to-morrow I expect to see the
 King at the bar, and the consequences that will follow I am almost afraid
 to anticipate." On the day in question, the 26th, Louis XVI. appeared in
 the Hall of the Convention to plead his cause through his advocate,
 Desize, and on the same day she wrote that letter to Mr. Johnson which has
 so often been quoted: "About nine o'clock this morning," she says, "the
 King passed by my window, moving silently along (excepting now and then a
 few strokes on the drum, which rendered the stillness more awful) through
 empty streets, surrounded by the national guards, who, clustering round
 the carriage, seemed to deserve their name. The inhabitants flocked to
 their windows, but the casements were all shut, not a voice was heard, nor
 did I see anything like an insulting gesture. For the first time since I
 entered France I bowed to the majesty of the people, and respected the
 propriety of behaviour so perfectly in unison with my own feelings. I can
 scarcely tell you why, but an association of ideas made the tears flow
 insensibly from my eyes, when I saw Louis sitting, with more dignity than
 I expected from his character, in a hackney coach, going to meet death,
 where so many of his race had triumphed. My fancy instantly brought Louis
 XIV. before me, entering the capital with all his pomp, after one of his
 victories so flattering to his pride, only to see the sunshine of
 prosperity overshadowed by the sublime gloom of misery...."
 
 Mary first went to stay at the house of Madame Filiettaz, the daughter of
 Madame Bregantz, in whose school at Putney both Mrs. Bishop and Everina
 Wollstonecraft had been teachers. Mary was now something of a
 celebrity--"Authorship," she writes, "is a heavy weight for female
 shoulders, especially in the sunshine of prosperity"--and she carried with
 her letters of introduction to several influential people in Paris. She
 renewed her acquaintance with Tom Paine, became intimate with Helen Maria
 Williams (who is said to have once lived with Imlay), and visited, among
 others, the house of Mr. Thomas Christie. It was her intention to go to
 Switzerland, but there was some trouble about her passport, so she
 settled at Neuilly, then a village three miles from Paris. "Her
 habitation here," says Godwin, "was a solitary house in the midst of a
 garden, with no other habitant than herself and the gardener, an old man
 who performed for her many offices of a domestic, and would sometimes
 contend for the honour of making her bed. The gardener had a great
 veneration for his guest, and would set before her, when alone, some
 grapes of a particularly fine sort, which she could not without the
 greatest difficulty obtain of him when she had any person with her as a
 visitor. Here it was that she conceived, and for the most part executed,
 her historical and moral view of the French Revolution, into which she
 incorporated most of the observations she had collected for her letters,
 and which was written with more sobriety and cheerfulness than the tone in
 which they had been commenced. In the evening she was accustomed to
 refresh herself by a walk in a neighbouring wood, from which her host in
 vain endeavoured to dissuade her, by recounting divers horrible robberies
 and murders that had been committed there."
 
 
 [Illustration: From an engraving by Ridley, dated 1796, after a painting
 by John Opie, R.A.
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
 This picture was purchased for the National Gallery at the sale of the
 late Mr. William Russell. The reason for supposing that it represents Mary
 Wollstonecraft rests solely on testimony of the engraving in the _Monthly
 Mirror_ (published during her lifetime), from which this reproduction was
 made. Mrs. Merritt made an etching of the picture for Mr. Kegan Paul's
 edition of the "Letters to Imlay."
 
 _To face p. xvi_]
 
 
 It is probable that in March 1793 Mary Wollstonecraft first saw Gilbert
 Imlay. The meeting occurred at Mr. Christie's house, and her immediate
 impression was one of dislike, so that on subsequent occasions she avoided
 him. However, her regard for him rapidly changed into friendship, and
 later into love. Gilbert Imlay was born in New Jersey about 1755. He
 served as a captain in the American army during the Revolutionary war, and
 was the author of "A Topographical Description of the Western Territory of
 North America," 1792, and a novel entitled "The Emigrants," 1793. In the
 latter work, as an American, he proposes to "place a mirror to the view of
 Englishmen, that they may behold the decay of these features that were
 once so lovely," and further "to prevent the sacrilege which the present
 practice of matrimonial engagements necessarily produce." It is not known
 whether these views regarding marriage preceded, or were the result of,
 his connexion with Mary Wollstonecraft. In 1793 he was engaged in
 business, probably in the timber trade with Sweden and Norway.
 
 In deciding to devote herself to Imlay, Mary sought no advice and took no
 one into her confidence. She was evidently deeply in love with him, and
 felt that their mutual confidence shared by no one else gave a sacredness
 to their union. Godwin, who is our chief authority on the Imlay episode,
 states that "the origin of the connexion was about the middle of April
 1793, and it was carried on in a private manner for about three months."
 Imlay had no property whatever, and Mary had objected to marry him,
 because she would not burden him with her own debts, or "involve him in
 certain family embarrassments," for which she believed herself
 responsible. She looked upon her connexion with Imlay, however, "as of the
 most inviolable nature." Then the French Government passed a decree that
 all British subjects resident in France should go to prison until a
 general declaration of peace. It therefore became expedient, not that a
 marriage should take place, for that would necessitate Mary declaring her
 nationality, but that she should take the name of Imlay, "which," says
 Godwin, "from the nature of their connexion (formed on her part at least,
 with no capricious or fickle design), she conceived herself entitled to
 do, and obtain a certificate from the American Ambassador, as the wife of
 a native of that country. Their engagement being thus avowed, they thought
 proper to reside under the same roof, and for that purpose removed to
 Paris."
 
 In a letter from Mary Wollstonecraft to her sister Everina, dated from
 Havre, March 10, 1794, she describes the climate of France as "uncommonly
 fine," and praises the common people for their manners; but she is also
 saddened by the scenes that she had witnessed and adds that "death and
 misery, in every shape of terror, haunt this devoted country.... If any of
 the many letters I have written have come to your hands or Eliza's, you
 know that I am safe, through the protection of an American, a most worthy
 man who joins to uncommon tenderness of heart and quickness of feeling, a
 soundness of understanding, and reasonableness of temper rarely to be met
 with. Having been brought up in the interior parts of America, he is a
 most natural, unaffected creature."
 
 Mary has expressed in the "Rights of Woman" her ideal of the relations
 between man and wife; she now looked forward to such a life of domestic
 happiness as she had cherished for some time. She had known much
 unhappiness in the past. Godwin says: "She brought in the present
 instance, a wounded and sick heart, to take refuge in the attachment of a
 chosen friend. Let it not, however, be imagined, that she brought a heart,
 querulous, and ruined in its taste for pleasure. No; her whole character
 seemed to change with a change of fortune. Her sorrows, the depression of
 her spirits, were forgotten, and she assumed all the simplicity and the
 vivacity of a youthful mind. She was playful, full of confidence,
 kindness, and sympathy. Her eyes assumed new lustre, and her cheeks new
 colour and smoothness. Her voice became cheerful; her temper overflowing
 with universal kindness; and that smile of bewitching tenderness from day
 to day illuminated her countenance, which all who knew her will so well
 recollect, and which won, both heart and soul, the affections of almost
 every one that beheld it." She had now met the man to whom she earnestly
 believed she could surrender herself with entire devotion. Naturally of an
 affectionate nature, for the first time in her life, with her impulsive
 Irish spirit, as Godwin says, "she gave way to all the sensibilities of
 her nature."
 
 The affair was nevertheless doomed to failure from the first. Mary had
 taken her step without much forethought. She attributed to Imlay
 "uncommon tenderness of heart," but she did not detect his instability of
 character. He certainly fascinated her, as he fascinated other women, both
 before and after his attachment to Mary. He was not the man to be
 satisfied with one woman as his life-companion. A typical American, he was
 deeply immersed in business, but his affairs may not have claimed as much
 of his time as he represented. In the September after he set up house with
 Mary, that is in '93, the year of the Terror, he left her in Paris while
 he went to Havre, formerly known as Havre de Grace, but then altered to
 Havre Marat. It is awful to think what must have been the life of this
 lonely stranger in Paris at such a time. Yet her letters to Imlay contain
 hardly a reference to the events of the Revolution.
 
 Mary, tired of waiting for Imlay's return to Paris, and sickened with the
 "growing cruelties of Robespierre," joined him at Havre in January 1794,
 and on May 14 she gave birth to a girl, whom she named Frances in memory
 of Fanny Blood, the friend of her youth. There is every evidence
 throughout her letters to Imlay of how tenderly she loved the little one.
 In a letter to Everina, dated from Paris on September 20, she speaks thus
 of little Fanny:
 
 "I want you to see my little girl, who is more like a boy. She is ready to
 fly away with spirits, and has eloquent health in her cheeks and eyes. She
 does not promise to be a beauty, but appears wonderfully intelligent, and
 though I am sure she has her father's quick temper and feelings, her good
 humour runs away with all the credit of my good nursing."
 
 In September Imlay left Havre for London, and now that the Terror had
 subsided Mary returned to Paris. This separation really meant the end of
 their camaraderie. They were to meet again, but never on the old footing.
 The journey proved the most fatiguing that she ever made, the carriage in
 which she travelled breaking down four times between Havre and Paris.
 Imlay promised to come to Paris in the course of two months, and she
 expected him till the end of the year with cheerfulness. With the press of
 business and other distractions his feelings for her and the child had
 cooled, as the tone of his letters betrayed. For three months longer Imlay
 put her off with unsatisfactory explanations, but her suspense came to an
 end in April, when she went to London at his request. Her gravest
 forebodings proved too true. Imlay was already living with a young actress
 belonging to a company of strolling players; and it was evident, though at
 first he protested to the contrary, that Mary was only a second
 consideration in his life. He provided her, however, with a furnished
 house, and she did not at once abandon hope of a reconciliation: but when
 she realised that hope was useless, in her despair she resolved to take
 her life. Whether she actually attempted suicide, or whether Imlay learnt
 of her intention in time to prevent her, is not actually known. Imlay was
 at this time engaged in trade with Norway, and requiring a trustworthy
 representative to transact some confidential business, it was thought that
 the journey would restore Mary's health and spirits. She therefore
 consented to take the voyage, and set out early in April 1795, with a
 document drawn up by Imlay appointing her as his representative, and
 describing her as "Mary Imlay, my best friend, and wife," and concluding:
 "Thus, confiding in the talent, zeal, and earnestness of my dearly beloved
 friend and companion; I submit the management of these affairs entirely
 and implicitly to her discretion: Remaining most sincerely and
 affectionately hers truly, G. Imlay."
 
 The letters describing her travels, excluding any personal matters, were
 issued in 1796, as "Letters from Sweden and Norway," one of her most
 readable books. The portions eliminated from these letters were printed by
 Godwin in his wife's posthumous works, and are given in the present
 volume. She returned to England early in October with a heavy heart. Imlay
 had promised to meet her on the homeward journey, possibly at Hamburg, and
 to take her to Switzerland, but she hastened to London to find her
 suspicions confirmed. He provided her with a lodging, but entirely
 neglected her for some woman with whom he was living. On first making the
 discovery of his fresh intrigue, and in her agony of mind, she sought
 Imlay at the house he had furnished for his new companion. The conference
 resulted in her utter despair, and she decided to drown herself. She
 first went to Battersea Bridge, but found too many people there; and
 therefore walked on to Putney. It was night and raining when she arrived
 there, and after wandering up and down the bridge for half-an-hour until
 her clothing was thoroughly drenched she threw herself into the river. She
 was, however, rescued from the water and, although unconscious, her life
 was saved.
 
 Mary met Imlay casually on two or three other occasions; probably her last
 sight of him was in the New Road (now Marylebone Road), when "he alighted
 from his horse, and walked with her some time; and the re-encounter
 passed," she assured Godwin, "without producing in her any oppressive
 emotion." Mary refused to accept any pecuniary assistance for herself from
 Imlay, but he gave a bond for a sum to be settled on her, the interest to
 be devoted to the maintenance of their child; neither principal nor
 interest, however, was ever paid. What ultimately became of Imlay is not
 known.
 
 Mary at length resigned herself to the inevitable. Her old friend and
 publisher, Mr. Johnson, came to her aid, and she resolved to resume her
 literary work for the support of herself and her child. She was once more
 seen in literary society. Among the people whom she met at this time was
 William Godwin. Three years her senior, he was one of the most advanced
 republicans of the time, the author of "Political Justice" and the novel
 "Caleb Williams." They had met before, for the first time in November
 1791, but she displeased Godwin, because her vivacious gossip silenced the
 naturally quiet Thomas Paine, whom he was anxious to hear talk. Although
 they met occasionally afterwards, it was not until 1796 that they became
 friendly. There must have been something about Godwin that made him
 extremely attractive to his friends, for he numbered among them some of
 the most charming women of the day, and such men as Wordsworth, Lamb,
 Hazlitt, and Shelley were proud to be of his circle. To the members of his
 family he was of a kind, even affectionate, disposition. Unfortunately, he
 appears to the worst advantage--a kind of early Pecksniff--in his later
 correspondence and relations with Shelley, and it is by this
 correspondence at the present day that he is best known. The fine
 side-face portrait of Godwin by Northcote, in the National Portrait
 Gallery, preserves for us all the beauty of his intellectual brow and
 eyes. Another portrait of Godwin, full-face, with a long sad nose, by
 Pickersgill, once to be seen in the National Portrait Gallery, is not so
 pleasing. In a letter to Cottle, Southey gives an unflattering portrait of
 Godwin at the time of his marriage, which seems to suggest the full-face
 portrait of the philosopher--"he has large noble eyes, and a _nose_--oh,
 most abominable nose! Language is not vituperatious enough to describe the
 effect of its downward elongation."
 
 Godwin describes his courtship with Mary as "friendship melting into
 love." They agreed to live together, but Godwin took rooms about twenty
 doors from their home in the Polygon, Somers Town, as it was one of his
 theories that living together under the same roof is destructive of family
 happiness. Godwin went to his rooms as soon as he rose in the morning,
 generally without taking breakfast with Mary, and he sometimes slept at
 his lodgings. They rarely met again until dinner-time, unless to take a
 walk together. During the day this extraordinary couple would communicate
 with each other by means of short letters or notes. Mr. Kegan Paul prints
 some of these; such as Godwin's:
 
 "I will have the honour to dine with you. You ask me whether I can get you
 four orders. I do not know, but I do not think the thing impossible. How
 do you do?"
 
 And Mary's: "Fanny is delighted with the thought of dining with you. But I
 wish you to eat your meat first, and let her come up with the pudding. I
 shall probably knock at your door on my way to Opie's; but should I not
 find you, let me request you not to be too late this evening. Do not give
 Fanny butter with her pudding." This note is dated April 20, 1797, and
 probably fixes the time when Mary was sitting for her portrait to Opie.
 
 On the whole, Godwin and Mary lived happily together, with very occasional
 clouds, mainly due to her over-sensitive nature, and his confirmed
 bachelor habits.
 
 Although both were opposed to matrimony on principle, they were married at
 Old St. Pancras Church on March 29, 1797, the clerk of the church being
 witness. Godwin does not mention the event in his carefully registered
 diary. The reason for the marriage was that Mary was about to become a
 mother, and it was for the sake of the child that they deemed it prudent
 to go through the ceremony. But it was not made public at once, chiefly
 for fear that Johnson should cease to help Mary. Mrs. Inchbald and Mrs.
 Reveley, two of Godwin's admirers, were so upset at the announcement of
 his marriage that they shed tears.
 
 An interesting description of Mary at this time is given in Southey's
 letter to Cottle, quoted above, dated March 13, 1797. He says, "Of all the
 lions or _literati_ I have seen here, Mary Imlay's countenance is the
 best, infinitely the best: the only fault in it is an expression somewhat
 similar to what the prints of Horne Tooke display--an expression
 indicating superiority; not haughtiness, not sarcasm, in Mary Imlay, but
 still it is unpleasant. Her eyes are light brown, and although the lid of
 one of them is affected by a little paralysis, they are the most meaning I
 ever saw."
 
 Mary busied herself with literary work; otherwise her short married life
 was uneventful. Godwin made a journey with his friend Basil Montagu to
 Staffordshire from June 3 to 20, and the correspondence between husband
 and wife during this time, which Mr. Paul prints, is most delightful
 reading, and shows how entirely in sympathy they were.
 
 
 [Illustration: From a photo by Emery, Walker after the picture by Opie
 (probably painted in April, 1797) in the National Portrait Gallery.
 
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
 This picture passed from Godwin's hands on his death to his grandson, Sir
 Percy Florence Shelley. It was afterwards bequeathed to the nation by his
 widow, Lady Shelley. It was engraved by Heath (Jan. 1, 1798) for Godwin's
 memoir of his wife. An engraving of it also appeared in the _Lady's
 Magazine_, from which the frontispiece to this book was made, and a
 mezzotint by W. T. Annis was published in 1802. Mrs. Merritt also made an
 etching of the picture for Mr. Paul's edition of the "Letters to Imlay."
 
 _To face p. xxvi_]
 
 
 On August 30, Mary's child was born, not the William so much desired by
 them both but Mary, who afterwards became Mrs. Shelley. All seemed well
 with the mother until September 3, when alarming symptoms appeared. The
 best medical advice was obtained, but after a week's illness, on Sunday
 morning, the 10th, at twenty minutes to eight, she sank and died. During
 her illness, when in great agony, an anodyne was administered, which gave
 Mary some relief, when she exclaimed, "Oh, Godwin, I am in heaven." But,
 as Mr. Kegan Paul says, "even at that moment Godwin declined to be
 entrapped into the admission that heaven existed," and his instant reply
 was: "You mean, my dear, that your physical sensations are somewhat
 easier." Mary Godwin, however, did not share her husband's religious
 doubts. Her sufferings had been great, but her death was a peaceful one.
 
 Godwin's grief was very deep, as the letters that he wrote immediately
 after her death, and his tribute to her memory in the "Memoirs" testify.
 Mary Godwin was buried in Old St. Pancras churchyard on September 15, in
 the presence of most of her friends. Godwin lived till 1836, when he was
 laid beside her. Many years afterwards, at the same graveside, Shelley is
 said to have plighted his troth to Mary Godwin's daughter. In 1851, when
 the Metropolitan and Midland Railways were constructed at St. Pancras,
 the graveyard was destroyed, but the bodies of Mary and William Godwin
 were removed by their grandson, Sir Percy Shelley, to Bournemouth, where
 they now rest with his remains, and those of his mother, Mrs. Shelley.
 
 In the year following Mary's death (1798) Godwin edited his wife's
 "Posthumous Works," in four volumes, in which appeared the letters to
 Imlay, and her incomplete novel "The Wrongs of Woman." His tribute to Mary
 Godwin's memory was also published in 1798, under the title of "Memoirs of
 the Author of _A Vindication of the Rights of Woman_." Godwin's novel,
 "St. Leon" came out in 1799; his tragedy "Antonio" was produced only to
 fail, in 1800, and in 1801, he was wooed and won by Mrs. Clairmont, a
 widow. The Godwin household was a somewhat mixed one, consisting, as it
 did, of Fanny Imlay, Mary Godwin, Mrs. Godwin's two children, Charles and
 Claire Clairmont, and also of William, the only child born of her marriage
 with Godwin. In 1812 Shelley began a correspondence with Godwin, which
 ultimately led to Mary Godwin's elopement with the poet. Poor Fanny Imlay,
 or Godwin, as she was called after her mother's death, died at the age of
 nineteen by her own hand, in October 1816. Her life had been far from
 happy in this strange household. She had grown to love Shelley, but his
 choice had fallen on her half-sister, so she bravely kept her secret to
 herself. One day she suddenly left home and travelled to Swansea, where
 she was found lying dead the morning after her arrival, in the inn where
 she had taken a room, "her long brown hair about her face; a bottle of
 laudanum upon the table, and a note which ran thus: 'I have long
 determined that the best thing I could do was to put an end to the
 existence of a being whose birth was unfortunate, and whose life has only
 been a series of pain to those persons who have hurt their health in
 endeavouring to promote her welfare.' She had with her the little Genevan
 watch, a gift of travel from Mary and Shelley: and in her purse were a few
 shillings."[1]
 
 Shelley, afterwards recalling his last interview with Fanny in London,
 wrote this stanza:
 
   "Her voice did quiver as we parted;
     Yet knew I not that heart was broken
   From whence it came, and I departed
     Heeding not the words then spoken.
   Misery--O Misery,
   This world is all too wide for thee!"
 
 
 III
 
 The vicissitudes to which Mary Wollstonecraft was so largely a prey during
 her lifetime seem to have pursued her after death. In her own day
 recognised as a public character, reviled by most of her contemporaries in
 terms not less ungentle than Horace Walpole's epithets, "a hyena in
 petticoats" or "a philosophising serpent," posterity has proved hardly
 more lenient to her. But the vigorous work of this "female patriot" has
 saved her name from that descent into obscurity which is the reward of
 many men and women more talented than Mary Wollstonecraft. Reputed chiefly
 as an unsexed being, who had written "A Vindication of the Rights of
 Women," she was not the first woman to hold views on the emancipation of
 her sex; but her chief crimes were in expressing them for the instruction
 of the public, and having the courage to live up to her opinions. Whether
 right or wrong, she paid the penalty of violating custom by discussing
 forbidden subjects. It is true that she detected many social evils, and
 suggested some excellent remedies for their amelioration, but the time was
 not ripe for her book, and she suffered the usual fate of the pioneer.
 Moreover, her memoir by William Godwin, beautiful as it is in many
 respects, exercised a distinctly harmful influence in regard to her
 memory. The very fact that she became the wife of so notorious a man, was
 sufficient reason to condemn her in the eyes of her countrymen.
 
 For two generations after her death practically no attempt was made to
 remove the stigma from her name. But at length the late Mr. Kegan Paul, a
 man of wide and generous sympathies, made a serious effort to obtain
 something like justice for Mary Wollstonecraft. In his book on William
 Godwin, published in 1876, the true story of Mary's life was told for the
 first time. It was somewhat of a revelation, for it recorded the history
 of an unhappy but brave and loyal woman, whose faults proceeded from
 excessive sensibility and from a heart that was over-susceptible. Mary
 Wollstonecraft was an idealist in a very matter-of-fact age, and her
 outlook on life, like that of most idealists, was strongly affected by her
 imagination. She saw people and events in brilliant lights or sombre
 shadows--it was a power akin to enthusiasm which enabled her to produce
 some of her best writing, but it also prevented her from seeing the
 defects of her worst work. Since Mr. Kegan Paul's memoir, Mary
 Wollstonecraft has been viewed from an entirely different aspect, and many
 there are who have come under the spell of her fascinating personality. It
 is not, however, her message alone that now interests us, but the woman
 herself, her desires, her aspirations, her struggles, and her love.
 Pathetic and lonely, she stands out in the faint mists of the past, a
 woman that will continue to evoke sympathy when her books are no longer
 read. But it is safe to predict that the pages reprinted in this volume
 are not destined to share the fate of the rest of her work. Other writers
 have been unhappy and have known the pains of unrequited love, but Mary
 Wollstonecraft addressed these letters with a breaking heart to the man
 whom she adored, the most passionate love letters in our literature. It is
 true that she was a votary of Rousseau, and that she had probably
 assimilated from the study of his work not only many of his views, but
 something of his style; it does not, however, appear that she had any
 motive in writing these letters other than to plead her cause with Imlay.
 She was far too sensitive to have intended them for publication, and it
 was only by a mere chance that they were rescued from oblivion.
 
 _December 1907._
 
 
 
 
 PORTRAITS
 
 
   MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT (Photogravure)                _Frontispiece_
 
   MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT, by Opie. From an engraving
                        by Ridley                    _facing p._ xvi
 
   MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT, from the picture by Opie     _facing p._ xxvi
 
 
 
 
 LETTERS TO GILBERT IMLAY
 
 
 
 
 LETTER I
 
 _Two o'Clock [Paris, June 1793]._
 
 
 My dear love, after making my arrangements for our snug dinner to-day, I
 have been taken by storm, and obliged to promise to dine, at an early
 hour, with the Miss ----s, the _only_ day they intend to pass here. I
 shall however leave the key in the door, and hope to find you at my
 fire-side when I return, about eight o'clock. Will you not wait for poor
 Joan?--whom you will find better, and till then think very affectionately
 of her.
 
   Yours, truly,
     MARY.
 
 I am sitting down to dinner; so do not send an answer.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER II
 
 
   _Past Twelve o'Clock, Monday Night
   [Paris, Aug. 1793]._
 
 
 I obey an emotion of my heart, which made me think of wishing thee, my
 love, good-night! before I go to rest, with more tenderness than I can
 to-morrow, when writing a hasty line or two under Colonel ----'s eye. You
 can scarcely imagine with what pleasure I anticipate the day, when we are
 to begin almost to live together; and you would smile to hear how many
 plans of employment I have in my head, now that I am confident my heart
 has found peace in your bosom.--Cherish me with that dignified tenderness,
 which I have only found in you; and your own dear girl will try to keep
 under a quickness of feeling, that has sometimes given you pain.--Yes, I
 will be _good_, that I may deserve to be happy; and whilst you love me, I
 cannot again fall into the miserable state, which rendered life a burthen
 almost too heavy to be borne.
 
 But, good-night!--God bless you! Sterne says, that is equal to a kiss--yet
 I would rather give you the kiss into the bargain, glowing with gratitude
 to Heaven, and affection to you. I like the word affection, because it
 signifies something habitual; and we are soon to meet, to try whether we
 have mind enough to keep our hearts warm.
 
   MARY.
 
 I will be at the barrier a little after ten o'clock to-morrow.[2]--Yours--
 
 
 
 
 LETTER III
 
 
 _Wednesday Morning [Paris, Aug. 1793]._
 
 You have often called me, dear girl, but you would now say good, did you
 know how very attentive I have been to the ---- ever since I came to
 Paris. I am not however going to trouble you with the account, because I
 like to see your eyes praise me; and Milton insinuates, that, during such
 recitals, there are interruptions, not ungrateful to the heart, when the
 honey that drops from the lips is not merely words.
 
 Yet, I shall not (let me tell you before these people enter, to force me
 to huddle away my letter) be content with only a kiss of DUTY--you _must_
 be glad to see me--because you are glad--or I will make love to the
 _shade_ of Mirabeau, to whom my heart continually turned, whilst I was
 talking with Madame ----, forcibly telling me, that it will ever have
 sufficient warmth to love, whether I will or not, sentiment, though I so
 highly respect principle.----
 
 Not that I think Mirabeau utterly devoid of principles--Far from it--and,
 if I had not begun to form a new theory respecting men, I should, in the
 vanity of my heart, have _imagined_ that _I_ could have made something of
 his----it was composed of such materials--Hush! here they come--and love
 flies away in the twinkling of an eye, leaving a little brush of his wing
 on my pale cheeks.
 
 I hope to see Dr. ---- this morning; I am going to Mr. ----'s to meet him.
 ----, and some others, are invited to dine with us to-day; and to-morrow I
 am to spend the day with ----.
 
 I shall probably not be able to return to ---- to-morrow; but it is no
 matter, because I must take a carriage, I have so many books, that I
 immediately want, to take with me.--On Friday then I shall expect you to
 dine with me--and, if you come a little before dinner, it is so long since
 I have seen you, you will not be scolded by yours affectionately,
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER IV[3]
 
 
 _Friday Morning [Paris, Sept. 1793]._
 
 A man, whom a letter from Mr. ---- previously announced, called here
 yesterday for the payment of a draft; and, as he seemed disappointed at
 not finding you at home, I sent him to Mr. ----. I have since seen him,
 and he tells me that he has settled the business.
 
 So much for business!--May I venture to talk a little longer about less
 weighty affairs?--How are you?--I have been following you all along the
 road this comfortless weather; for, when I am absent from those I love, my
 imagination is as lively, as if my senses had never been gratified by
 their presence--I was going to say caresses--and why should I not? I have
 found out that I have more mind than you, in one respect; because I can,
 without any violent effort of reason, find food for love in the same
 object, much longer than you can.--The way to my senses is through my
 heart; but, forgive me! I think there is sometimes a shorter cut to yours.
 
 With ninety-nine men out of a hundred, a very sufficient dash of folly is
 necessary to render a woman _piquante_, a soft word for desirable; and,
 beyond these casual ebullitions of sympathy, few look for enjoyment by
 fostering a passion in their hearts. One reason, in short, why I wish my
 whole sex to become wiser, is, that the foolish ones may not, by their
 pretty folly, rob those whose sensibility keeps down their vanity, of the
 few roses that afford them some solace in the thorny road of life.
 
 I do not know how I fell into these reflections, excepting one thought
 produced it--that these continual separations were necessary to warm your
 affection.--Of late, we are always separating.--Crack!--crack!--and away
 you go.--This joke wears the sallow cast of thought; for, though I began
 to write cheerfully, some melancholy tears have found their way into my
 eyes, that linger there, whilst a glow of tenderness at my heart whispers
 that you are one of the best creatures in the world.--Pardon then the
 vagaries of a mind, that has been almost "crazed by care," as well as
 "crossed in hapless love," and bear with me a _little_ longer!--When we
 are settled in the country together, more duties will open before me, and
 my heart, which now, trembling into peace, is agitated by every emotion
 that awakens the remembrance of old griefs, will learn to rest on yours,
 with that dignity your character, not to talk of my own, demands.
 
 Take care of yourself--and write soon to your own girl (you may add dear,
 if you please) who sincerely loves you, and will try to convince you of
 it, by becoming happier.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER V
 
 
 _Sunday Night [Paris, 1793]._
 
 I have just received your letter, and feel as if I could not go to bed
 tranquilly without saying a few words in reply--merely to tell you, that
 my mind is serene and my heart affectionate.
 
 Ever since you last saw me inclined to faint, I have felt some gentle
 twitches, which make me begin to think, that I am nourishing a creature
 who will soon be sensible of my care.--This thought has not only produced
 an overflowing of tenderness to you, but made me very attentive to calm my
 mind and take exercise, lest I should destroy an object, in whom we are to
 have a mutual interest, you know. Yesterday--do not smile!--finding that
 I had hurt myself by lifting precipitately a large log of wood, I sat
 down in an agony, till I felt those said twitches again.
 
 Are you very busy?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 So you may reckon on its being finished soon, though not before you come
 home, unless you are detained longer than I now allow myself to believe
 you will.--
 
 Be that as it may, write to me, my best love, and bid me be
 patient--kindly--and the expressions of kindness will again beguile the
 time, as sweetly as they have done to-night.--Tell me also over and over
 again, that your happiness (and you deserve to be happy!) is closely
 connected with mine, and I will try to dissipate, as they rise, the fumes
 of former discontent, that have too often clouded the sunshine, which you
 have endeavoured to diffuse through my mind. God bless you! Take care of
 yourself, and remember with tenderness your affectionate
 
   MARY.
 
 I am going to rest very happy, and you have made me so.--This is the
 kindest good-night I can utter.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER VI
 
 
 _Friday Morning [Paris, Dec. 1793]._
 
 I am glad to find that other people can be unreasonable, as well as
 myself--for be it known to thee, that I answered thy _first_ letter, the
 very night it reached me (Sunday), though thou couldst not receive it
 before Wednesday, because it was not sent off till the next day.--There is
 a full, true, and particular account.--
 
 Yet I am not angry with thee, my love, for I think that it is a proof of
 stupidity, and likewise of a milk-and-water affection, which comes to the
 same thing, when the temper is governed by a square and compass.--There
 is nothing picturesque in this straight-lined equality, and the passions
 always give grace to the actions.
 
 Recollection now makes my heart bound to thee; but, it is not to thy
 money-getting face, though I cannot be seriously displeased with the
 exertion which increases my esteem, or rather is what I should have
 expected from thy character.--No; I have thy honest countenance before
 me--Pop--relaxed by tenderness; a little--little wounded by my whims; and
 thy eyes glistening with sympathy.--Thy lips then feel softer than
 soft--and I rest my cheek on thine, forgetting all the world.--I have not
 left the hue of love out of the picture--the rosy glow; and fancy has
 spread it over my own cheeks, I believe, for I feel them burning, whilst a
 delicious tear trembles in my eye, that would be all your own, if a
 grateful emotion directed to the Father of nature, who has made me thus
 alive to happiness, did not give more warmth to the sentiment it
 divides--I must pause a moment.
 
 Need I tell you that I am tranquil after writing thus?--I do not know why,
 but I have more confidence in your affection, when absent, than present;
 nay, I think that you must love me, for, in the sincerity of my heart let
 me say it, I believe I deserve your tenderness, because I am true, and
 have a degree of sensibility that you can see and relish.
 
   Yours sincerely,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER VII.
 
 
 _Sunday Morning [Paris, Dec. 29, 1793]._
 
 You seem to have taken up your abode at Havre. Pray sir! when do you think
 of coming home? or, to write very considerately, when will business permit
 you? I shall expect (as the country people say in England) that you will
 make a _power_ of money to indemnify me for your absence.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Well! but, my love, to the old story--am I to see you this week, or this
 month?--I do not know what you are about--for, as you did not tell me, I
 would not ask Mr. ----, who is generally pretty communicative.
 
 I long to see Mrs. ----; not to hear from you, so do not give yourself
 airs, but to get a letter from Mr. ----. And I am half angry with you for
 not informing me whether she had brought one with her or not.--On this
 score I will cork up some of the kind things that were ready to drop from
 my pen, which has never been dipt in gall when addressing you; or, will
 only suffer an exclamation--"The creature!" or a kind look to escape me,
 when I pass the slippers--which I could not remove from my _falle_ door,
 though they are not the handsomest of their kind.
 
 _Be not too anxious to get money!--for nothing worth having is to be
 purchased._ God bless you.
 
   Yours affectionately,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER VIII
 
 
 _Monday Night [Paris, Dec. 30, 1793]._
 
 My best love, your letter to-night was particularly grateful to my heart,
 depressed by the letters I received by ----, for he brought me several,
 and the parcel of books directed to Mr. ---- was for me. Mr. ----'s letter
 was long and very affectionate; but the account he gives me of his own
 affairs, though he obviously makes the best of them, has vexed me.
 
 A melancholy letter from my sister ---- has also harrassed my mind--that
 from my brother would have given me sincere pleasure; but for
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 There is a spirit of independence in his letter, that will please you; and
 you shall see it, when we are once more over the fire together.--I think
 that you would hail him as a brother, with one of your tender looks, when
 your heart not only gives a lustre to your eye, but a dance of
 playfulness, that he would meet with a glow half made up of bashfulness,
 and a desire to please the----where shall I find a word to express the
 relationship which subsists between us?--Shall I ask the little
 twitcher?--But I have dropt half the sentence that was to tell you how
 much he would be inclined to love the man loved by his sister. I have been
 fancying myself sitting between you, ever since I began to write, and my
 heart has leaped at the thought! You see how I chat to you.
 
 I did not receive your letter till I came home; and I did not expect it,
 for the post came in much later than usual. It was a cordial to me--and I
 wanted one.
 
 Mr. ---- tells me that he has written again and again.--Love him a
 little!--It would be a kind of separation, if you did not love those I
 love.
 
 There was so much considerate tenderness in your epistle to-night, that,
 if it has not made you dearer to me, it has made me forcibly feel how very
 dear you are to me, by charming away half my cares.
 
   Yours affectionately.
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER IX
 
 
 _Tuesday Morning [Paris, Dec. 31, 1793]._
 
 Though I have just sent a letter off, yet, as captain ---- offers to take
 one, I am not willing to let him go without a kind greeting, because
 trifles of this sort, without having any effect on my mind, damp my
 spirits:--and you, with all your struggles to be manly, have some of his
 same sensibility.--Do not bid it begone, for I love to see it striving to
 master your features; besides, these kind of sympathies are the life of
 affection: and why, in cultivating our understandings, should we try to
 dry up these springs of pleasure, which gush out to give a freshness to
 days browned by care!
 
 The books sent to me are such as we may read together; so I shall not look
 into them till you return; when you shall read, whilst I mend my
 stockings.
 
   Yours truly,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER X
 
 
 _Wednesday Night [Paris, Jan. 1, 1794]._
 
 As I have been, you tell me, three days without writing, I ought not to
 complain of two: yet, as I expected to receive a letter this afternoon, I
 am hurt; and why should I, by concealing it, affect the heroism I do not
 feel?
 
 I hate commerce. How differently must ----'s head and heart be organized
 from mine! You will tell me, that exertions are necessary: I am weary of
 them! The face of things, public and private, vexes me. The "peace" and
 clemency which seemed to be dawning a few days ago, disappear again. "I am
 fallen," as Milton said, "on evil days;" for I really believe that Europe
 will be in a state of convulsion, during half a century at least. Life is
 but a labour of patience: it is always rolling a great stone up a hill;
 for, before a person can find a resting-place, imagining it is lodged,
 down it comes again, and all the work is to be done over anew!
 
 Should I attempt to write any more, I could not change the strain. My head
 aches, and my heart is heavy. The world appears an "unweeded garden,"
 where "things rank and vile" flourish best.
 
 If you do not return soon--or, which is no such mighty matter, talk of
 it--I will throw your slippers out at window, and be off--nobody knows
 where.
 
   MARY.
 
 Finding that I was observed, I told the good women, the two Mrs. ----s,
 simply that I was with child: and let them stare! and ----, and ----, nay,
 all the world, may know it for aught I care!--Yet I wish to avoid ----'s
 coarse jokes.
 
 Considering the care and anxiety a woman must have about a child before it
 comes into the world, it seems to me, by a _natural right_, to belong to
 her. When men get immersed in the world, they seem to lose all sensations,
 excepting those necessary to continue or produce life!--Are these the
 privileges of reason? Amongst the feathered race, whilst the hen keeps
 the young warm, her mate stays by to cheer her; but it is sufficient for
 man to condescend to get a child, in order to claim it.--A man is a
 tyrant!
 
 You may now tell me, that, if it were not for me, you would be laughing
 away with some honest fellows in London. The casual exercise of social
 sympathy would not be sufficient for me--I should not think such an
 heartless life worth preserving.--It is necessary to be in good-humour
 with you, to be pleased with the world.
 
 
 _Thursday Morning [Paris, Jan. 2, 1794]._
 
 I was very low-spirited last night, ready to quarrel with your cheerful
 temper, which makes absence easy to you.--And, why should I mince the
 matter? I was offended at your not even mentioning it--I do not want to be
 loved like a goddess but I wish to be necessary to you. God bless you![4]
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XI
 
 
 _Monday Night [Paris, Jan. 1794]._
 
 I have just received your kind and rational letter, and would fain hide my
 face, glowing with shame for my folly.--I would hide it in your bosom, if
 you would again open it to me, and nestle closely till you bade my
 fluttering heart be still, by saying that you forgave me. With eyes
 overflowing with tears, and in the humblest attitude, I entreat you.--Do
 not turn from me, for indeed I love you fondly, and have been very
 wretched, since the night I was so cruelly hurt by thinking that you had
 no confidence in me----
 
 It is time for me to grow more reasonable, a few more of these caprices
 of sensibility would destroy me. I have, in fact, been very much
 indisposed for a few days past, and the notion that I was tormenting, or
 perhaps killing, a poor little animal, about whom I am grown anxious and
 tender, now I feel it alive, made me worse. My bowels have been dreadfully
 disordered, and every thing I ate or drank disagreed with my stomach;
 still I feel intimations of its existence, though they have been fainter.
 
 Do you think that the creature goes regularly to sleep? I am ready to ask
 as many questions as Voltaire's Man of Forty Crowns. Ah! do not continue
 to be angry with me! You perceive that I am already smiling through my
 tears--You have lightened my heart, and my frozen spirits are melting into
 playfulness.
 
 Write the moment you receive this. I shall count the minutes. But drop not
 an angry word--I cannot now bear it. Yet, if you think I deserve a
 scolding (it does not admit of a question, I grant), wait till you come
 back--and then, if you are angry one day, I shall be sure of seeing you
 the next.
 
 ---- did not write to you, I suppose, because he talked of going to Havre.
 Hearing that I was ill, he called very kindly on me, not dreaming that it
 was some words that he incautiously let fall, which rendered me so.
 
 God bless you, my love; do not shut your heart against a return of
 tenderness; and, as I now in fancy cling to you, be more than ever my
 support.--Feel but as affectionate when you read this letter, as I did
 writing it, and you will make happy your
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XII
 
 
 _Wednesday Morning [Paris, Jan. 1794]._
 
 I will never, if I am not entirely cured of quarrelling, begin to
 encourage "quick-coming fancies," when we are separated. Yesterday, my
 love, I could not open your letter for some time; and, though it was not
 half as severe as I merited, it threw me into such a fit of trembling, as
 seriously alarmed me. I did not, as you may suppose, care for a little
 pain on my own account; but all the fears which I have had for a few days
 past, returned with fresh force. This morning I am better; will you not be
 glad to hear it? You perceive that sorrow has almost made a child of me,
 and that I want to be soothed to peace.
 
 One thing you mistake in my character, and imagine that to be coldness
 which is just the contrary. For, when I am hurt by the person most dear to
 me, I must let out a whole torrent of emotions, in which tenderness would
 be uppermost, or stifle them altogether; and it appears to me almost a
 duty to stifle them, when I imagine _that I am treated with coldness_.
 
 I am afraid that I have vexed you, my own [Imlay]. I know the quickness of
 your feelings--and let me, in the sincerity of my heart, assure you, there
 is nothing I would not suffer to make you happy. My own happiness wholly
 depends on you--and, knowing you, when my reason is not clouded, I look
 forward to a rational prospect of as much felicity as the earth
 affords--with a little dash of rapture into the bargain, if you will look
 at me, when we work again, as you have sometimes greeted, your humbled,
 yet most affectionate
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XIII
 
 
 _Thursday Night [Paris, Jan. 1794]._
 
 I have been wishing the time away, my kind love, unable to rest till I
 knew that my penitential letter had reached your hand--and this afternoon,
 when your tender epistle of Tuesday gave such exquisite pleasure to your
 poor sick girl, her heart smote her to think that you were still to
 receive another cold one.--Burn it also, my [Imlay]; yet do not forget
 that even those letters were full of love; and I shall ever recollect,
 that you did not wait to be mollified by my penitence, before you took me
 again to your heart.
 
 I have been unwell, and would not, now I am recovering, take a journey,
 because I have been seriously alarmed and angry with myself, dreading
 continually the fatal consequence of my folly.--But, should you think it
 right to remain at Havre, I shall find some opportunity, in the course of
 a fortnight, or less perhaps, to come to you, and before then I shall be
 strong again.--Yet do not be uneasy! I am really better, and never took
 such care of myself, as I have done since you restored my peace of mind.
 The girl is come to warm my bed--so I will tenderly say, good-night! and
 write a line or two in the morning.
 
 
 _Morning._
 
 I wish you were here to walk with me this fine morning! yet your absence
 shall not prevent me. I have stayed at home too much; though, when I was
 so dreadfully out of spirits, I was careless of every thing.
 
 I will now sally forth (you will go with me in my heart) and try whether
 this fine bracing air will not give the vigour to the poor babe, it had,
 before I so inconsiderately gave way to the grief that deranged my bowels,
 and gave a turn to my whole system.
 
   Yours truly
     MARY IMLAY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XIV
 
 
 _Saturday Morning [Paris, Feb. 1794]._
 
 The two or three letters, which I have written to you lately, my love,
 will serve as an answer to your explanatory one. I cannot but respect your
 motives and conduct. I always respected them; and was only hurt, by what
 seemed to me a want of confidence, and consequently affection.--I thought
 also, that if you were obliged to stay three months at Havre, I might as
 well have been with you.--Well! well, what signifies what I brooded
 over--Let us now be friends!
 
 I shall probably receive a letter from you to-day, sealing my pardon--and
 I will be careful not to torment you with my querulous humours, at least,
 till I see you again. Act as circumstances direct, and I will not enquire
 when they will permit you to return, convinced that you will hasten to
 your Mary, when you have attained (or lost sight of) the object of your
 journey.
 
 What a picture have you sketched of our fire-side! Yes, my love, my fancy
 was instantly at work, and I found my head on your shoulder, whilst my
 eyes were fixed on the little creatures that were clinging about your
 knees. I did not absolutely determine that there should be six--if you
 have not set your heart on this round number.
 
 I am going to dine with Mrs. ----. I have not been to visit her since the
 first day she came to Paris. I wish indeed to be out in the air as much as
 I can; for the exercise I have taken these two or three days past, has
 been of such service to me, that I hope shortly to tell you, that I am
 quite well. I have scarcely slept before last night, and then not
 much.--The two Mrs. ----s have been very anxious and tender.
 
   Yours truly
     MARY.
 
 I need not desire you to give the colonel a good bottle of wine.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XV
 
 
 _Sunday Morning [Paris, Feb. 1794]._
 
 I wrote to you yesterday, my [Imlay]; but, finding that the colonel is
 still detained (for his passport was forgotten at the office yesterday) I
 am not willing to let so many days elapse without your hearing from me,
 after having talked of illness and apprehensions.
 
 I cannot boast of being quite recovered, yet I am (I must use my Yorkshire
 phrase; for, when my heart is warm, pop come the expressions of childhood
 into my head) so _lightsome_, that I think it will not _go badly with
 me_.--And nothing shall be wanting on my part, I assure you; for I am
 urged on, not only by an enlivened affection for you, but by a new-born
 tenderness that plays cheerly round my dilating heart.
 
 I was therefore, in defiance of cold and dirt, out in the air the greater
 part of yesterday; and, if I get over this evening without a return of the
 fever that has tormented me, I shall talk no more of illness. I have
 promised the little creature, that its mother, who ought to cherish it,
 will not again plague it, and begged it to pardon me; and, since I could
 not hug either it or you to my breast, I have to my heart.--I am afraid to
 read over this prattle--but it is only for your eye.
 
 I have been seriously vexed, to find that, whilst you were harrassed by
 impediments in your undertakings, I was giving you additional
 uneasiness.--If you can make any of your plans answer--it is well, I do
 not think a _little_ money inconvenient; but, should they fail, we will
 struggle cheerfully together--drawn closer by the pinching blasts of
 poverty.
 
 Adieu, my love! Write often to your poor girl, and write long letters; for
 I not only like them for being longer, but because more heart steals into
 them; and I am happy to catch your heart whenever I can.
 
   Yours sincerely
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XVI
 
 
 _Tuesday Morning [Paris, Feb. 1794]._
 
 I seize this opportunity to inform you, that I am to set out on Thursday
 with Mr. ----, and hope to tell you soon (on your lips) how glad I shall
 be to see you. I have just got my passport, for I do not foresee any
 impediment to my reaching Havre, to bid you good-night next Friday in my
 new apartment--where I am to meet you and love, in spite of care, to smile
 me to sleep--for I have not caught much rest since we parted.
 
 You have, by your tenderness and worth, twisted yourself more artfully
 round my heart, than I supposed possible.--Let me indulge the thought,
 that I have thrown out some tendrils to cling to the elm by which I wish
 to be supported.--This is talking a new language for me!--But, knowing
 that I am not a parasite-plant, I am willing to receive the proofs of
 affection, that every pulse replies to, when I think of being once more in
 the same house with you. God bless you!
 
   Yours truly
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XVII
 
 
 _Wednesday Morning [Paris, Feb. 1794]._
 
 I only send this as an _avant-coureur_, without jack-boots, to tell you,
 that I am again on the wing, and hope to be with you a few hours after you
 receive it. I shall find you well, and composed, I am sure; or, more
 properly speaking, cheerful.--What is the reason that my spirits are not
 as manageable as yours? Yet, now I think of it, I will not allow that your
 temper is even, though I have promised myself, in order to obtain my own
 forgiveness, that I will not ruffle it for a long, long time--I am afraid
 to say never.
 
 Farewell for a moment!--Do not forget that I am driving towards you in
 person! My mind, unfettered, has flown to you long since, or rather has
 never left you.
 
 I am well, and have no apprehension that I shall find the journey too
 fatiguing, when I follow the lead of my heart.--With my face turned to
 Havre my spirits will not sink--and my mind has always hitherto enabled my
 body to do whatever I wished.
 
   Yours affectionately,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XVIII
 
 
 _Thursday Morning, Havre, March 12 [1794]._
 
 We are such creatures of habit, my love, that, though I cannot say I was
 sorry, childishly so, for your going,[5] when I knew that you were to stay
 such a short time, and I had a plan of employment; yet I could not
 sleep.--I turned to your side of the bed, and tried to make the most of
 the comfort of the pillow, which you used to tell me I was churlish about;
 but all would not do.--I took nevertheless my walk before breakfast,
 though the weather was not very inviting--and here I am, wishing you a
 finer day, and seeing you peep over my shoulder, as I write, with one of
 your kindest looks--when your eyes glisten, and a suffusion creeps over
 your relaxing features.
 
 But I do not mean to dally with you this morning--So God bless you! Take
 care of yourself--and sometimes fold to your heart your affectionate
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XIX
 
 
 _[Havre, March, 1794]._
 
 Do not call me stupid, for leaving on the table the little bit of paper I
 was to inclose.--This comes of being in love at the fag-end of a letter
 of business.--You know, you say, they will not chime together.--I had got
 you by the fire-side, with the _gigot_ smoking on the board, to lard your
 poor bare ribs--and behold, I closed my letter without taking the paper
 up, that was directly under my eyes! What had I got in them to render me
 so blind?--I give you leave to answer the question, if you will not scold;
 for I am,
 
   Yours most affectionately,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XX
 
 
 _[Havre] Sunday, August 17 [1794]._
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I have promised ---- to go with him to his country-house, where he is now
 permitted to dine--I, and the little darling, to be sure[6]--whom I cannot
 help kissing with more fondness, since you left us. I think I shall enjoy
 the fine prospect, and that it will rather enliven, than satiate my
 imagination.
 
 I have called on Mrs. ----. She has the manners of a gentlewoman, with a
 dash of the easy French coquetry, which renders her _piquante_.--But
 _Monsieur_ her husband, whom nature never dreamed of casting in either the
 mould of a gentleman or lover, makes but an aukward figure in the
 foreground of the picture.
 
 The H----s are very ugly, without doubt--and the house smelt of commerce
 from top to toe--so that his abortive attempt to display taste, only
 proved it to be one of the things not to be bought with gold. I was in a
 room a moment alone, and my attention was attracted by the _pendule_--A
 nymph was offering up her vows before a smoking altar, to a fat-bottomed
 Cupid (saving your presence), who was kicking his heels in the air.--Ah!
 kick on, thought I; for the demon of traffic will ever fright away the
 loves and graces, that streak with the rosy beams of infant fancy the
 _sombre_ day of life--whilst the imagination, not allowing us to see
 things as they are, enables us to catch a hasty draught of the running
 stream of delight, the thirst for which seems to be given only to
 tantalize us.
 
 But I am philosophizing; nay, perhaps you will call me severe, and bid me
 let the square-headed money-getters alone.--Peace to them! though none of
 the social sprites (and there are not a few of different descriptions, who
 sport about the various inlets to my heart) gave me a twitch to restrain
 my pen.
 
 I have been writing on, expecting poor ---- to come; for, when I began, I
 merely thought of business; and, as this is the idea that most naturally
 associates with your image, I wonder I stumbled on any other.
 
 Yet, as common life, in my opinion, is scarcely worth having, even with a
 _gigot_ every day, and a pudding added thereunto, I will allow you to
 cultivate my judgment, if you will permit me to keep alive the sentiments
 in your heart, which may be termed romantic, because, the offspring of the
 senses and the imagination, they resemble the mother more than the
 father,[7] when they produce the suffusion I admire.--In spite of icy age,
 I hope still to see it, if you have not determined only to eat and drink,
 and be stupidly useful to the stupid--
 
   Yours,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXI
 
 
 _Havre, August 19 [1794] Tuesday._
 
 I received both your letters to-day--I had reckoned on hearing from you
 yesterday, therefore was disappointed, though I imputed your silence to
 the right cause. I intended answering your kind letter immediately, that
 you might have felt the pleasure it gave me; but ---- came in, and some
 other things interrupted me; so that the fine vapour has evaporated--yet,
 leaving a sweet scent behind, I have only to tell you, what is
 sufficiently obvious, that the earnest desire I have shown to keep my
 place, or gain more ground in your heart, is a sure proof how necessary
 your affection is to my happiness.--Still I do not think it false
 delicacy, or foolish pride, to wish that your attention to my happiness
 should arise _as much_ from love, which is always rather a selfish
 passion, as reason--that is, I want you to promote my felicity, by seeking
 your own.--For, whatever pleasure it may give me to discover your
 generosity of soul, I would not be dependent for your affection on the
 very quality I most admire. No; there are qualities in your heart, which
 demand my affection; but, unless the attachment appears to me clearly
 mutual, I shall labour only to esteem your character, instead of
 cherishing a tenderness for your person.
 
 I write in a hurry, because the little one, who has been sleeping a long
 time, begins to call for me. Poor thing! when I am sad, I lament that all
 my affections grow on me, till they become too strong for my peace, though
 they all afford me snatches of exquisite enjoyment--This for our little
 girl was at first very reasonable--more the effect of reason, a sense of
 duty, than feeling--now, she has got into my heart and imagination, and
 when I walk out without her, her little figure is ever dancing before me.
 
 You too have somehow clung round my heart--I found I could not eat my
 dinner in the great room--and, when I took up the large knife to carve for
 myself, tears rushed into my eyes.--Do not however suppose that I am
 melancholy--for, when you are from me, I not only wonder how I can find
 fault with you--but how I can doubt your affection.
 
 I will not mix any comments on the inclosed (it roused my indignation)
 with the effusion of tenderness, with which I assure you, that you are the
 friend of my bosom, and the prop of my heart.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXII
 
 
 _Havre, August 20 [1794]._
 
 I want to know what steps you have taken respecting ----. Knavery always
 rouses my indignation--I should be gratified to hear that the law had
 chastised ---- severely; but I do not wish you to see him, because the
 business does not now admit of peaceful discussion, and I do not exactly
 know how you would express your contempt.
 
 Pray ask some questions about Tallien--I am still pleased with the dignity
 of his conduct.--The other day, in the cause of humanity, he made use of
 a degree of address, which I admire--and mean to point out to you, as one
 of the few instances of address which do credit to the abilities of the
 man, without taking away from that confidence in his openness of heart,
 which is the true basis of both public and private friendship.
 
 Do not suppose that I mean to allude to a little reserve of temper in you,
 of which I have sometimes complained! You have been used to a cunning
 woman, and you almost look for cunning--Nay, in _managing_ my happiness,
 you now and then wounded my sensibility, concealing yourself, till honest
 sympathy, giving you to me without disguise, lets me look into a heart,
 which my half-broken one wishes to creep into, to be revived and
 cherished.--You have frankness of heart, but not often exactly that
 overflowing (_epanchement de coeur_), which becoming almost childish,
 appears a weakness only to the weak.
 
 But I have left poor Tallien. I wanted you to enquire likewise whether, as
 a member declared in the convention, Robespierre really maintained a
 _number_ of mistresses.--Should it prove so, I suspect that they rather
 flattered his vanity than his senses.
 
 Here is a chatting, desultory epistle! But do not suppose that I mean to
 close it without mentioning the little damsel--who has been almost
 springing out of my arm--she certainly looks very like you--but I do not
 love her the less for that, whether I am angry or pleased with you.
 
   Yours affectionately,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXIII[8]
 
 
 _[Paris] September 22 [1794]._
 
 I have just written two letters, that are going by other conveyances, and
 which I reckon on your receiving long before this. I therefore merely
 write, because I know I should be disappointed at seeing any one who had
 left you, if you did not send a letter, were it ever so short, to tell me
 why you did not write a longer--and you will want to be told, over and
 over again, that our little Hercules is quite recovered.
 
 Besides looking at me, there are three other things, which delight her--to
 ride in a coach, to look at a scarlet waistcoat, and hear loud
 music--yesterday, at the _fete_, she enjoyed the two latter; but, to
 honour J. J. Rousseau, I intend to give her a sash, the first she has ever
 had round her--and why not?--for I have always been half in love with him.
 
 Well, this you will say is trifling--shall I talk about alum or soap?
 There is nothing picturesque in your present pursuits; my imagination then
 rather chuses to ramble back to the barrier with you, or to see you
 coming to meet me, and my basket of grapes.--With what pleasure do I
 recollect your looks and words, when I have been sitting on the window,
 regarding the waving corn!
 
 Believe me, sage sir, you have not sufficient respect for the
 imagination--I could prove to you in a trice that it is the mother of
 sentiment, the great distinction of our nature, the only purifier of the
 passions--animals have a portion of reason, and equal, if not more
 exquisite, senses; but no trace of imagination, or her offspring taste,
 appears in any of their actions. The impulse of the senses, passions, if
 you will, and the conclusions of reason, draw men together; but the
 imagination is the true fire, stolen from heaven, to animate this cold
 creature of clay, producing all those fine sympathies that lead to
 rapture, rendering men social by expanding their hearts, instead of
 leaving them leisure to calculate how many comforts society affords.
 
 If you call these observations romantic, a phrase in this place which
 would be tantamount to nonsensical, I shall be apt to retort, that you are
 embruted by trade, and the vulgar enjoyments of life--Bring me then back
 your barrier-face, or you shall have nothing to say to my barrier-girl;
 and I shall fly from you, to cherish the remembrances that will ever be
 dear to me; for I am yours truly,
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXIV
 
 
 _[Paris] Evening, Sept. 23, [1794]._
 
 I have been playing and laughing with the little girl so long, that I
 cannot take up my pen to address you without emotion. Pressing her to my
 bosom, she looked so like you (_entre nous_, your best looks, for I do not
 admire your commercial face) every nerve seemed to vibrate to the touch,
 and I began to think that there was something in the assertion of man and
 wife being one--for you seemed to pervade my whole frame, quickening the
 beat of my heart, and lending me the sympathetic tears you excited.
 
 Have I any thing more to say to you? No; not for the present--the rest is
 all flown away; and, indulging tenderness for you, I cannot now complain
 of some people here, who have ruffled my temper for two or three days
 past.
 
 
 _[Paris, 1794] Morning._
 
 Yesterday B---- sent to me for my packet of letters. He called on me
 before; and I like him better than I did--that is, I have the same opinion
 of his understanding, but I think with you, he has more tenderness and
 real delicacy of feeling with respect to women, than are commonly to be
 met with. His manner too of speaking of his little girl, about the age of
 mine, interested me. I gave him a letter for my sister, and requested him
 to see her.
 
 I have been interrupted. Mr. ---- I suppose will write about business.
 Public affairs I do not descant on, except to tell you that they write now
 with great freedom and truth; and this liberty of the press will overthrow
 the Jacobins, I plainly perceive.
 
 I hope you take care of your health. I have got a habit of restlessness at
 night, which arises, I believe, from activity of mind; for, when I am
 alone, that is, not near one to whom I can open my heart, I sink into
 reveries and trains of thinking, which agitate and fatigue me.
 
 This is my third letter; when am I to hear from you? I need not tell you,
 I suppose, that I am now writing with somebody in the room with me, and
 ---- is waiting to carry this to Mr. ----'s. I will then kiss the girl
 for you, and bid you adieu.
 
 I desired you, in one of my other letters, to bring back to me your
 barrier-face--or that you should not be loved by my barrier-girl. I know
 that you will love her more and more, for she is a little affectionate,
 intelligent creature, with as much vivacity, I should think, as you could
 wish for.
 
 I was going to tell you of two or three things which displease me here;
 but they are not of sufficient consequence to interrupt pleasing
 sensations. I have received a letter from Mr. ----. I want you to bring
 ---- with you. Madame S---- is by me, reading a German translation of your
 letters--she desires me to give her love to you, on account of what you
 say of the negroes.
 
   Yours most affectionately,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXV
 
 
 _Paris, Sept. 28 [1794]._
 
 I have written to you three or four letters; but different causes have
 prevented my sending them by the persons who promised to take or forward
 them. The inclosed is one I wrote to go by B----; yet, finding that he
 will not arrive, before I hope, and believe, you will have set out on your
 return, I inclose it to you, and shall give it in charge to ----, as Mr.
 ---- is detained, to whom I also gave a letter.
 
 I cannot help being anxious to hear from you; but I shall not harrass you
 with accounts of inquietudes, or of cares that arise from peculiar
 circumstances.--I have had so many little plagues here, that I have almost
 lamented that I left Havre. ----, who is at best a most helpless creature,
 is now, on account of her pregnancy, more trouble than use to me, so that
 I still continue to be almost a slave to the child.--She indeed rewards
 me, for she is a sweet little creature; for, setting aside a mother's
 fondness (which, by the bye, is growing on me, her little intelligent
 smiles sinking into my heart), she has an astonishing degree of
 sensibility and observation. The other day by B----'s child, a fine one,
 she looked like a little sprite.--She is all life and motion, and her eyes
 are not the eyes of a fool--I will swear.
 
 I slept at St. Germain's, in the very room (if you have not forgot) in
 which you pressed me very tenderly to your heart.--I did not forget to
 fold my darling to mine, with sensations that are almost too sacred to be
 alluded to.
 
 Adieu, my love! Take care of yourself, if you wish to be the protector of
 your child, and the comfort of her mother.
 
 I have received, for you, letters from ----. I want to hear how that
 affair finishes, though I do not know whether I have most contempt for his
 folly or knavery.
 
   Your own
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXVI
 
 
 _[Paris] October 1 [1794]._
 
 It is a heartless task to write letters, without knowing whether they will
 ever reach you.--I have given two to ----, who has been a-going, a-going,
 every day, for a week past; and three others, which were written in a
 low-spirited strain, a little querulous or so, I have not been able to
 forward by the opportunities that were mentioned to me. _Tant mieux!_ you
 will say, and I will not say nay; for I should be sorry that the contents
 of a letter, when you are so far away, should damp the pleasure that the
 sight of it would afford--judging of your feelings by my own. I just now
 stumbled on one of the kind letters, which you wrote during your last
 absence. You are then a dear affectionate creature, and I will not plague
 you. The letter which you chance to receive, when the absence is so long,
 ought to bring only tears of tenderness, without any bitter alloy, into
 your eyes.
 
 After your return I hope indeed, that you will not be so immersed in
 business, as during the last three or four months past--for even money,
 taking into the account all the future comforts it is to procure, may be
 gained at too dear a rate, if painful impressions are left on the
 mind.--These impressions were much more lively, soon after you went away,
 than at present--for a thousand tender recollections efface the melancholy
 traces they left on my mind--and every emotion is on the same side as my
 reason, which always was on yours.--Separated, it would be almost impious
 to dwell on real or imaginary imperfections of character.--I feel that I
 love you; and, if I cannot be happy with you, I will seek it no where
 else.
 
 My little darling grows every day more dear to me--and she often has a
 kiss, when we are alone together, which I give her for you, with all my
 heart.
 
 I have been interrupted--and must send off my letter. The liberty of the
 press will produce a great effect here--the _cry of blood will not be
 vain_!--Some more monsters will perish--and the Jacobins are
 conquered.--Yet I almost fear the last flap of the tail of the beast.
 
 I have had several trifling teazing inconveniences here, which I shall not
 now trouble you with a detail of.--I am sending ---- back; her pregnancy
 rendered her useless. The girl I have got has more vivacity, which is
 better for the child.
 
 I long to hear from you.--Bring a copy of ---- and ---- with you.
 
 ---- is still here: he is a lost man.--He really loves his wife, and is
 anxious about his children; but his indiscriminate hospitality and social
 feelings have given him an inveterate habit of drinking, that destroys his
 health, as well as renders his person disgusting.--If his wife had more
 sense, or delicacy, she might restrain him: as it is, nothing will save
 him.
 
   Yours most truly and affectionately
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXVII
 
 
 _[Paris] October 26 [1794]._
 
 My dear love, I began to wish so earnestly to hear from you, that the
 sight of your letters occasioned such pleasurable emotions, I was obliged
 to throw them aside till the little girl and I were alone together; and
 this said little girl, our darling, is become a most intelligent little
 creature, and as gay as a lark, and that in the morning too, which I do
 not find quite so convenient. I once told you, that the sensations before
 she was born, and when she is sucking, were pleasant; but they do not
 deserve to be compared to the emotions I feel, when she stops to smile
 upon me, or laughs outright on meeting me unexpectedly in the street, or
 after a short absence. She has now the advantage of having two good
 nurses, and I am at present able to discharge my duty to her, without
 being the slave of it.
 
 I have therefore employed and amused myself since I got rid of ----, and
 am making a progress in the language amongst other things. I have also
 made some new acquaintance. I have almost _charmed_ a judge of the
 tribunal, R----, who, though I should not have thought it possible, has
 humanity, if not _beaucoup d'esprit_. But let me tell you, if you do not
 make haste back, I shall be half in love with the author of the
 _Marseillaise_, who is a handsome man, a little too broad-faced or so, and
 plays sweetly on the violin.
 
 What do you say to this threat?--why, _entre nous_, I like to give way to
 a sprightly vein, when writing to you, that is, when I am pleased with
 you. "The devil," you know, is proverbially said to be "in a good humour,
 when he is pleased." Will you not then be a good boy, and come back
 quickly to play with your girls? but I shall not allow you to love the
 new-comer best.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 My heart longs for your return, my love, and only looks for, and seeks
 happiness with you; yet do not imagine that I childishly wish you to come
 back, before you have arranged things in such a manner, that it will not
 be necessary for you to leave us soon again, or to make exertions which
 injure your constitution.
 
   Yours most truly and tenderly,
     MARY.
 
 P.S. You would oblige me by delivering the inclosed to Mr. ----, and pray
 call for an answer.--It is for a person uncomfortably situated.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXVIII
 
 
 _[Paris] Dec. 26 [1794]._
 
 I have been, my love, for some days tormented by fears, that I would not
 allow to assume a form--I had been expecting you daily--and I heard that
 many vessels had been driven on shore during the late gale.--Well, I now
 see your letter--and find that you are safe; I will not regret then that
 your exertions have hitherto been so unavailing.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Be that as it may, return to me when you have arranged the other matters,
 which ---- has been crowding on you. I want to be sure that you are
 safe--and not separated from me by a sea that must be passed. For, feeling
 that I am happier than I ever was, do you wonder at my sometimes dreading
 that fate has not done persecuting me? Come to me, my dearest friend,
 husband, father of my child!--All these fond ties glow at my heart at this
 moment, and dim my eyes.--With you an independence is desirable; and it is
 always within our reach, if affluence escapes us--without you the world
 again appears empty to me. But I am recurring to some of the melancholy
 thoughts that have flitted across my mind for some days past, and haunted
 my dreams.
 
 My little darling is indeed a sweet child; and I am sorry that you are not
 here, to see her little mind unfold itself. You talk of "dalliance;" but
 certainly no lover was ever more attached to his mistress, than she is to
 me. Her eyes follow me every where, and by affection I have the most
 despotic power over her. She is all vivacity or softness--yes; I love her
 more than I thought I should. When I have been hurt at your stay, I have
 embraced her as my only comfort--when pleased with you, for looking and
 laughing like you; nay, I cannot, I find, long be angry with you, whilst I
 am kissing her for resembling you. But there would be no end to these
 details. Fold us both to your heart; for I am truly and affectionately
 
   Yours,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXIX
 
 
 _[Paris] December 28 [1794]._
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I do, my love, indeed sincerely sympathize with you in all your
 disappointments.--Yet, knowing that you are well, and think of me with
 affection, I only lament other disappointments, because I am sorry that
 you should thus exert yourself in vain, and that you are kept from me.
 
 ----, I know, urges you to stay, and is continually branching out into new
 projects, because he has the idle desire to amass a large fortune, rather
 an immense one, merely to have the credit of having made it. But we who
 are governed by other motives, ought not to be led on by him. When we
 meet, we will discuss this subject--You will listen to reason, and it has
 probably occurred to you, that it will be better, in future, to pursue
 some sober plan, which may demand more time, and still enable you to
 arrive at the same end. It appears to me absurd to waste life in preparing
 to live.
 
 Would it not now be possible to arrange your business in such a manner as
 to avoid the inquietudes, of which I have had my share since your
 departure? Is it not possible to enter into business, as an employment
 necessary to keep the faculties awake, and (to sink a little in the
 expressions) the pot boiling, without suffering what must ever be
 considered as a secondary object, to engross the mind, and drive sentiment
 and affection out of the heart?
 
 I am in a hurry to give this letter to the person who has promised to
 forward it with ----'s. I wish then to counteract, in some measure, what
 he has doubtless recommended most warmly.
 
 Stay, my friend, whilst it is _absolutely_ necessary.--I will give you no
 tenderer name, though it glows at my heart, unless you come the moment the
 settling the _present_ objects permit.--_I do not consent_ to your taking
 any other journey--or the little woman and I will be off, the Lord knows
 where. But, as I had rather owe every thing to your affection, and, I may
 add, to your reason, (for this immoderate desire of wealth, which makes
 ---- so eager to have you remain, is contrary to your principles of
 action), I will not importune you.--I will only tell you, that I long to
 see you--and, being at peace with you, I shall be hurt, rather than made
 angry, by delays.--Having suffered so much in life, do not be surprised if
 I sometimes, when left to myself, grow gloomy, and suppose that it was all
 a dream, and that my happiness is not to last. I say happiness, because
 remembrance retrenches all the dark shades of the picture.
 
 My little one begins to show her teeth, and use her legs--She wants you to
 bear your part in the nursing business, for I am fatigued with dancing
 her, and yet she is not satisfied--she wants you to thank her mother for
 taking such care of her, as you only can.
 
   Yours truly,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXX
 
 
 _[Paris] December 29 [1794]._
 
 Though I suppose you have later intelligence, yet, as ---- has just
 informed me that he has an opportunity of sending immediately to you, I
 take advantage of it to inclose you
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 How I hate this crooked business! This intercourse with the world, which
 obliges one to see the worst side of human nature! Why cannot you be
 content with the object you had first in view, when you entered into this
 wearisome labyrinth?--I know very well that you have imperceptibly been
 drawn on; yet why does one project, successful or abortive, only give
 place to two others? Is it not sufficient to avoid poverty?--I am
 contented to do my part; and, even here, sufficient to escape from
 wretchedness is not difficult to obtain. And, let me tell you, I have my
 project also--and, if you do not soon return, the little girl and I will
 take care of ourselves; we will not accept any of your cold kindness--your
 distant civilities--no; not we.
 
 This is but half jesting, for I am really tormented by the desire which
 ---- manifests to have you remain where you are.--Yet why do I talk to
 you?--If he can persuade you--let him!--for, if you are not happier with
 me, and your own wishes do not make you throw aside these eternal
 projects, I am above using any arguments, though reason as well as
 affection seems to offer them--if our affection be mutual, they will occur
 to you--and you will act accordingly.
 
 Since my arrival here, I have found the German lady, of whom you have
 heard me speak. Her first child died in the month; but she has another,
 about the age of my Fanny, a fine little creature. They are still but
 contriving to live--earning their daily bread--yet, though they are but
 just above poverty, I envy them.--She is a tender, affectionate
 mother--fatigued even by her attention.--However she has an affectionate
 husband in her turn, to render her care light, and to share her pleasure.
 
 I will own to you that, feeling extreme tenderness for my little girl, I
 grow sad very often when I am playing with her, that you are not here, to
 observe with me how her mind unfolds, and her little heart becomes
 attached!--These appear to me to be true pleasures--and still you suffer
 them to escape you, in search of what we may never enjoy.--It is your own
 maxim to "live in the present moment."--_If you do_--stay, for God's sake;
 but tell me the truth--if not, tell me when I may expect to see you, and
 let me not be always vainly looking for you, till I grow sick at heart.
 
 Adieu! I am a little hurt.--I must take my darling to my bosom to comfort
 me.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXI
 
 
 _[Paris] December 30 [1794]._
 
 Should you receive three or four of the letters at once which I have
 written lately, do not think of Sir John Brute, for I do not mean to wife
 you. I only take advantage of every occasion, that one out of three of my
 epistles may reach your hands, and inform you that I am not of ----'s
 opinion, who talks till he makes me angry, of the necessity of your
 staying two or three months longer. I do not like this life of continual
 inquietude--and, _entre nous_, I am determined to try to earn some money
 here myself, in order to convince you that, if you chuse to run about the
 world to get a fortune, it is for yourself--for the little girl and I will
 live without your assistance, unless you are with us. I may be termed
 proud--Be it so--but I will never abandon certain principles of action.
 
 The common run of men have such an ignoble way of thinking, that, if they
 debauch their hearts, and prostitute their persons, following perhaps a
 gust of inebriation, they suppose the wife, slave rather, whom they
 maintain, has no right to complain, and ought to receive the sultan,
 whenever he deigns to return, with open arms, though his have been
 polluted by half an hundred promiscuous amours during his absence.
 
 I consider fidelity and constancy as two distinct things; yet the former
 is necessary, to give life to the other--and such a degree of respect do I
 think due to myself, that, if only probity, which is a good thing in its
 place, brings you back, never return!--for, if a wandering of the heart,
 or even a caprice of the imagination detains you--there is an end of all
 my hopes of happiness--I could not forgive it, if I would.
 
 I have gotten into a melancholy mood, you perceive. You know my opinion of
 men in general; you know that I think them systematic tyrants, and that it
 is the rarest thing in the world, to meet with a man with sufficient
 delicacy of feeling to govern desire. When I am thus sad, I lament that my
 little darling, fondly as I doat on her, is a girl.--I am sorry to have a
 tie to a world that for me is ever sown with thorns.
 
 You will call this an ill-humoured letter, when, in fact, it is the
 strongest proof of affection I can give, to dread to lose you. ---- has
 taken such pains to convince me that you must and ought to stay, that it
 has inconceivably depressed my spirits--You have always known my
 opinion--I have ever declared, that two people, who mean to live together,
 ought not to be long separated.--If certain things are more necessary to
 you than me--search for them--Say but one word, and you shall never hear
 of me more.--If not--for God's sake, let us struggle with poverty--with
 any evil, but these continual inquietudes of business, which I have been
 told were to last but a few months, though every day the end appears more
 distant! This is the first letter in this strain that I have determined to
 forward to you; the rest lie by, because I was unwilling to give you pain,
 and I should not now write, if I did not think that there would be no
 conclusion to the schemes, which demand, as I am told, your presence.
 
   MARY.[9]
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXII
 
 
 _[Paris] January 9 [1795]._
 
 I just now received one of your hasty _notes_; for business so entirely
 occupies you, that you have not time, or sufficient command of thought, to
 write letters. Beware! you seem to be got into a whirl of projects and
 schemes, which are drawing you into a gulph, that, if it do not absorb
 your happiness, will infallibly destroy mine.
 
 Fatigued during my youth by the most arduous struggles, not only to obtain
 independence, but to render myself useful, not merely pleasure, for which
 I had the most lively taste, I mean the simple pleasures that flow from
 passion and affection, escaped me, but the most melancholy views of life
 were impressed by a disappointed heart on my mind. Since I knew you, I
 have been endeavouring to go back to my former nature, and have allowed
 some time to glide away, winged with the delight which only spontaneous
 enjoyment can give.--Why have you so soon dissolved the charm.
 
 I am really unable to bear the continual inquietude which your and ----'s
 never-ending plans produce. This you may term want of firmness--but you
 are mistaken--I have still sufficient firmness to pursue my principle of
 action. The present misery, I cannot find a softer word to do justice to
 my feelings, appears to me unnecessary--and therefore I have not firmness
 to support it as you may think I ought. I should have been content, and
 still wish, to retire with you to a farm--My God! any thing, but these
 continual anxieties--any thing but commerce, which debases the mind, and
 roots out affection from the heart.
 
 I do not mean to complain of subordinate inconveniences----yet I will
 simply observe, that, led to expect you every week, I did not make the
 arrangements required by the present circumstances, to procure the
 necessaries of life. In order to have them, a servant, for that purpose
 only, is indispensible--The want of wood, has made me catch the most
 violent cold I ever had; and my head is so disturbed by continual
 coughing, that I am unable to write without stopping frequently to
 recollect myself.--This however is one of the common evils which must be
 borne with----bodily pain does not touch the heart, though it fatigues the
 spirits.
 
 Still as you talk of your return, even in February, doubtingly, I have
 determined, the moment the weather changes, to wean my child.--It is too
 soon for her to begin to divide sorrow!--And as one has well said,
 "despair is a freeman," we will go and seek our fortune together.
 
 This is not a caprice of the moment--for your absence has given new
 weight to some conclusions, that I was very reluctantly forming before you
 left me.--I do not chuse to be a secondary object.--If your feelings were
 in unison with mine, you would not sacrifice so much to visionary
 prospects of future advantage.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXIII
 
 
 _[Paris] Jan. 15 [1795]._
 
 I was just going to begin my letter with the fag end of a song, which
 would only have told you, what I may as well say simply, that it is
 pleasant to forgive those we love. I have received your two letters, dated
 the 26th and 28th of December, and my anger died away. You can scarcely
 conceive the effect some of your letters have produced on me. After
 longing to hear from you during a tedious interval of suspense, I have
 seen a superscription written by you.--Promising myself pleasure, and
 feeling emotion, I have laid it by me, till the person who brought it,
 left the room--when, behold! on opening it, I have found only half a dozen
 hasty lines, that have damped all the rising affection of my soul.
 
 Well, now for business--
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 My animal is well; I have not yet taught her to eat, but nature is doing
 the business. I gave her a crust to assist the cutting of her teeth; and
 now she has two, she makes good use of them to gnaw a crust, biscuit, &c.
 You would laugh to see her; she is just like a little squirrel; she will
 guard a crust for two hours; and, after fixing her eye on an object for
 some time, dart on it with an aim as sure as a bird of prey--nothing can
 equal her life and spirits. I suffer from a cold; but it does not affect
 her. Adieu! do not forget to love us--and come soon to tell us that you
 do.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXIV
 
 
 _[Paris] Jan. 30 [1795]._
 
 From the purport of your last letters, I should suppose that this will
 scarcely reach you; and I have already written so many letters, that you
 have either not received, or neglected to acknowledge, I do not find it
 pleasant, or rather I have no inclination, to go over the same ground
 again. If you have received them, and are still detained by new projects,
 it is useless for me to say any more on the subject. I have done with it
 for ever; yet I ought to remind you that your pecuniary interest suffers
 by your absence.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 For my part, my head is turned giddy, by only hearing of plans to make
 money, and my contemptuous feelings have sometimes burst out. I therefore
 was glad that a violent cold gave me a pretext to stay at home, lest I
 should have uttered unseasonable truths.
 
 My child is well, and the spring will perhaps restore me to myself.--I
 have endured many inconveniences this winter, which should I be ashamed to
 mention, if they had been unavoidable. "The secondary pleasures of life,"
 you say, "are very necessary to my comfort:" it may be so; but I have ever
 considered them as secondary. If therefore you accuse me of wanting the
 resolution necessary to bear the _common_[10] evils of life; I should
 answer, that I have not fashioned my mind to sustain them, because I would
 avoid them, cost what it would----
 
 Adieu!
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXV
 
 
 _[Paris] February 9 [1795]._
 
 The melancholy presentiment has for some time hung on my spirits, that we
 were parted for ever; and the letters I received this day, by Mr. ----,
 convince me that it was not without foundation. You allude to some other
 letters, which I suppose have miscarried; for most of those I have got,
 were only a few hasty lines, calculated to wound the tenderness the sight
 of the superscriptions excited.
 
 I mean not however to complain; yet so many feelings are struggling for
 utterance, and agitating a heart almost bursting with anguish, that I find
 it very difficult to write with any degree of coherence.
 
 You left me indisposed, though you have taken no notice of it; and the
 most fatiguing journey I ever had, contributed to continue it. However, I
 recovered my health; but a neglected cold, and continual inquietude during
 the last two months, have reduced me to a state of weakness I never before
 experienced. Those who did not know that the canker-worm was at work at
 the core, cautioned me about suckling my child too long.--God preserve
 this poor child, and render her happier than her mother!
 
 But I am wandering from my subject: indeed my head turns giddy, when I
 think that all the confidence I have had in the affection of others is
 come to this.--I did not expect this blow from you. I have done my duty to
 you and my child; and if I am not to have any return of affection to
 reward me, I have the sad consolation of knowing that I deserved a better
 fate. My soul is weary--I am sick at heart; and, but for this little
 darling, I would cease to care about a life, which is now stripped of
 every charm.
 
 You see how stupid I am, uttering declamation, when I meant simply to tell
 you, that I consider your requesting me to come to you, as merely dictated
 by honour.--Indeed, I scarcely understand you.--You request me to come,
 and then tell me, that you have not given up all thoughts of returning to
 this place.
 
 When I determined to live with you, I was only governed by affection.--I
 would share poverty with you, but I turn with affright from the sea of
 trouble on which you are entering.--I have certain principles of action: I
 know what I look for to found my happiness on.--It is not money.--With you
 I wished for sufficient to procure the comforts of life--as it is, less
 will do.--I can still exert myself to obtain the necessaries of life for
 my child, and she does not want more at present.--I have two or three
 plans in my head to earn our subsistence; for do not suppose that,
 neglected by you, I will lie under obligations of a pecuniary kind to
 you!--No; I would sooner submit to menial service.--I wanted the support
 of your affection--that gone, all is over!--I did not think, when I
 complained of ----'s contemptible avidity to accumulate money, that he
 would have dragged you into his schemes.
 
 I cannot write.--I inclose a fragment of a letter, written soon after your
 departure, and another which tenderness made me keep back when it was
 written.--You will see then the sentiments of a calmer, though not a more
 determined, moment.--Do not insult me by saying, that "our being together
 is paramount to every other consideration!" Were it, you would not be
 running after a bubble, at the expence of my peace of mind.
 
 Perhaps this is the last letter you will ever receive from me.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXVI
 
 
 _[Paris] Feb. 10 [1795]._
 
 You talk of "permanent views and future comfort"--not for me, for I am
 dead to hope. The inquietudes of the last winter have finished the
 business, and my heart is not only broken, but my constitution destroyed.
 I conceive myself in a galloping consumption, and the continual anxiety I
 feel at the thought of leaving my child, feeds the fever that nightly
 devours me. It is on her account that I again write to you, to conjure
 you, by all that you hold sacred, to leave her here with the German lady
 you may have heard me mention! She has a child of the same age, and they
 may be brought up together, as I wish her to be brought up. I shall write
 more fully on the subject. To facilitate this, I shall give up my present
 lodgings, and go into the same house. I can live much cheaper there,
 which is now become an object. I have had 3000 livres from ----, and I
 shall take one more, to pay my servant's wages, &c. and then I shall
 endeavour to procure what I want by my own exertions. I shall entirely
 give up the acquaintance of the Americans.
 
 ---- and I have not been on good terms a long time. Yesterday he very
 unmanlily exulted over me, on account of your determination to stay. I had
 provoked it, it is true, by some asperities against commerce, which have
 dropped from me, when we have argued about the propriety of your remaining
 where you are; and it is no matter, I have drunk too deep of the bitter
 cup to care about trifles.
 
 When you first entered into these plans, you bounded your views to the
 gaining of a thousand pounds. It was sufficient to have procured a farm in
 America, which would have been an independence. You find now that you did
 not know yourself, and that a certain situation in life is more necessary
 to you than you imagined--more necessary than an uncorrupted heart--For a
 year or two, you may procure yourself what you call pleasure; eating,
 drinking, and women; but in the solitude of declining life, I shall be
 remembered with regret--I was going to say with remorse, but checked my
 pen.
 
 As I have never concealed the nature of my connection with you, your
 reputation will not suffer. I shall never have a confident: I am content
 with the approbation of my own mind; and, if there be a searcher of
 hearts, mine will not be despised. Reading what you have written relative
 to the desertion of women, I have often wondered how theory and practice
 could be so different, till I recollected, that the sentiments of passion,
 and the resolves of reason, are very distinct. As to my sisters, as you
 are so continually hurried with business, you need not write to them--I
 shall, when my mind is calmer. God bless you! Adieu!
 
   MARY.
 
 This has been such a period of barbarity and misery, I ought not to
 complain of having my share. I wish one moment that I had never heard of
 the cruelties that have been practised here, and the next envy the mothers
 who have been killed with their children. Surely I had suffered enough in
 life, not to be cursed with a fondness, that burns up the vital stream I
 am imparting. You will think me mad: I would I were so, that I could
 forget my misery--so that my head or heart would be still.----
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXVII
 
 
 _[Paris] Feb. 19 [1795]._
 
 When I first received your letter, putting off your return to an
 indefinite time, I felt so hurt, that I know not what I wrote. I am now
 calmer, though it was not the kind of wound over which time has the
 quickest effect; on the contrary, the more I think, the sadder I grow.
 Society fatigues me inexpressibly--So much so, that finding fault with
 every one, I have only reason enough, to discover that the fault is in
 myself. My child alone interests me, and, but for her, I should not take
 any pains to recover my health.
 
 As it is, I shall wean her, and try if by that step (to which I feel a
 repugnance, for it is my only solace) I can get rid of my cough.
 Physicians talk much of the danger attending any complaint on the lungs,
 after a woman has suckled for some months. They lay a stress also on the
 necessity of keeping the mind tranquil--and, my God! how has mine be
 harrassed! But whilst the caprices of other women are gratified, "the wind
 of heaven not suffered to visit them too rudely," I have not found a
 guardian angel, in heaven or on earth, to ward off sorrow or care from my
 bosom.
 
 What sacrifices have you not made for a woman you did not respect!--But I
 will not go over this ground--I want to tell you that I do not understand
 you. You say that you have not given up all thoughts of returning
 here--and I know that it will be necessary--nay, is. I cannot explain
 myself; but if you have not lost your memory, you will easily divine my
 meaning. What! is our life then only to be made up of separations? and am
 I only to return to a country, that has not merely lost all charms for me,
 but for which I feel a repugnance that almost amounts to horror, only to
 be left there a prey to it!
 
 Why is it so necessary that I should return?--brought up here, my girl
 would be freer. Indeed, expecting you to join us, I had formed some plans
 of usefulness that have now vanished with my hopes of happiness.
 
 In the bitterness of my heart, I could complain with reason, that I am
 left here dependent on a man, whose avidity to acquire a fortune has
 rendered him callous to every sentiment connected with social or
 affectionate emotions.--With a brutal insensibility, he cannot help
 displaying the pleasure your determination to stay gives him, in spite of
 the effect it is visible it has had on me.
 
 Till I can earn money, I shall endeavour to borrow some, for I want to
 avoid asking him continually for the sum necessary to maintain me.--Do not
 mistake me, I have never been refused.--Yet I have gone half a dozen times
 to the house to ask for it, and come away without speaking--you must guess
 why--Besides, I wish to avoid hearing of the eternal projects to which
 you have sacrificed my peace--not remembering--but I will be silent for
 ever.----
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXVIII
 
 
 _[Havre] April 7 [1795]._
 
 Here I am at Havre, on the wing towards you, and I write now, only to tell
 you, that you may expect me in the course of three or four days; for I
 shall not attempt to give vent to the different emotions which agitate my
 heart--You may term a feeling, which appears to me to be a degree of
 delicacy that naturally arises from sensibility, pride--Still I cannot
 indulge the very affectionate tenderness which glows in my bosom, without
 trembling, till I see, by your eyes, that it is mutual.
 
 I sit, lost in thought, looking at the sea--and tears rush into my eyes,
 when I find that I am cherishing any fond expectations.--I have indeed
 been so unhappy this winter, I find it as difficult to acquire fresh
 hopes, as to regain tranquillity.--Enough of this--lie still, foolish
 heart!--But for the little girl, I could almost wish that it should cease
 to beat, to be no more alive to the anguish of disappointment.
 
 Sweet little creature! I deprived myself of my only pleasure, when I
 weaned her, about ten days ago.--I am however glad I conquered my
 repugnance.--It was necessary it should be done soon, and I did not wish
 to embitter the renewal of your acquaintance with her, by putting it off
 till we met.--It was a painful exertion to me, and I thought it best to
 throw this inquietude with the rest, into the sack that I would fain throw
 over my shoulder.--I wished to endure it alone, in short--Yet, after
 sending her to sleep in the next room for three or four nights, you cannot
 think with what joy I took her back again to sleep in my bosom!
 
 I suppose I shall find you, when I arrive, for I do not see any necessity
 for your coming to me.--Pray inform Mr. ----, that I have his little
 friend with me.--My wishing to oblige him, made me put myself to some
 inconvenience----and delay my departure; which was irksome to me, who have
 not quite as much philosophy, I would not for the world say indifference,
 as you. God bless you!
 
   Yours truly
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXXIX
 
 
 _Brighthelmstone, Saturday, April 11 [1795]._
 
 Here we are, my love, and mean to set out early in the morning; and, if I
 can find you, I hope to dine with you to-morrow.--I shall drive to ----'s
 hotel, where ---- tells me you have been--and, if you have left it, I hope
 you will take care to be there to receive us.
 
 I have brought with me Mr. ----'s little friend, and a girl whom I like to
 take care of our little darling--not on the way, for that fell to my
 share.--But why do I write about trifles?--or any thing?--Are we not to
 meet soon?--What does your heart say?
 
   Yours truly
     MARY.
 
 I have weaned my Fanny, and she is now eating away at the white bread.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XL
 
 
   _[26 Charlotte Street, Rathbone Place]
   London, Friday, May 22 [1795]._
 
 I have just received your affectionate letter, and am distressed to think
 that I have added to your embarrassments at this troublesome juncture,
 when the exertion of all the faculties of your mind appears to be
 necessary, to extricate you out of your pecuniary difficulties. I suppose
 it was something relative to the circumstance you have mentioned, which
 made ---- request to see me to-day, to _converse about a matter of great
 importance_. Be that as it may, his letter (such is the state of my
 spirits) inconceivably alarmed me, and rendered the last night as
 distressing, as the two former had been.
 
 I have laboured to calm my mind since you left me--Still I find that
 tranquillity is not to be obtained by exertion; it is a feeling so
 different from the resignation of despair!--I am however no longer angry
 with you--nor will I ever utter another complaint--there are arguments
 which convince the reason, whilst they carry death to the heart.--We have
 had too many cruel explanations, that not only cloud every future
 prospect; but embitter the remembrances which alone give life to
 affection.--Let the subject never be revived!
 
 It seems to me that I have not only lost the hope, but the power of
 being happy.--Every emotion is now sharpened by anguish.--My soul has been
 shook, and my tone of feelings destroyed.--I have gone out--and sought for
 dissipation, if not amusement, merely to fatigue still more, I find, my
 irritable nerves----
 
 My friend--my dear friend--examine yourself well--I am out of the
 question; for, alas! I am nothing--and discover what you wish to do--what
 will render you most comfortable--or, to be more explicit--whether you
 desire to live with me, or part for ever? When you can once ascertain it,
 tell me frankly, I conjure you!--for, believe me, I have very
 involuntarily interrupted your peace.
 
 I shall expect you to dinner on Monday, and will endeavour to assume a
 cheerful face to greet you--at any rate I will avoid conversations, which
 only tend to harrass your feelings, because I am most affectionately
 yours,
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLI
 
 
 _[May 27, 1795] Wednesday._
 
 I inclose you the letter, which you desired me to forward, and I am
 tempted very laconically to wish you a good morning--not because I am
 angry, or have nothing to say; but to keep down a wounded spirit.--I shall
 make every effort to calm my mind--yet a strong conviction seems to whirl
 round in the very centre of my brain, which, like the fiat of fate,
 emphatically assures me, that grief has a firm hold of my heart.
 
 God bless you!
 
   Yours sincerely,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLII
 
 
   _[Hull] Wednesday, Two o'Clock
   [May 27, 1795]._
 
 We arrived here about an hour ago. I am extremely fatigued with the
 child, who would not rest quiet with any body but me, during the
 night--and now we are here in a comfortless, damp room, in a sort of a
 tomb-like house. This however I shall quickly remedy, for, when I have
 finished this letter, (which I must do immediately, because the post goes
 out early), I shall sally forth, and enquire about a vessel and an inn.
 
 I will not distress you by talking of the depression of my spirits, or the
 struggle I had to keep alive my dying heart.--It is even now too full to
 allow me to write with composure.--Imlay,--dear Imlay,--am I always to be
 tossed about thus?--shall I never find an asylum to rest _contented_ in?
 How can you love to fly about continually--dropping down, as it were, in a
 new world--cold and strange!--every other day? Why do you not attach those
 tender emotions round the idea of home, which even now dim my eyes?--This
 alone is affection--every thing else is only humanity, electrified by
 sympathy.
 
 I will write to you again to-morrow, when I know how long I am to be
 detained--and hope to get a letter quickly from you, to cheer yours
 sincerely and affectionately
 
   MARY.
 
 Fanny is playing near me in high spirits. She was so pleased with the
 noise of the mail-horn, she has been continually imitating it.----Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLIII
 
 
 _[Hull, May 28, 1795] Thursday._
 
 A lady has just sent to offer to take me to Beverley. I have then only a
 moment to exclaim against the vague manner in which people give
 information
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 But why talk of inconveniences, which are in fact trifling, when compared
 with the sinking of the heart I have felt! I did not intend to touch this
 painful string--God bless you!
 
   Yours truly,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLIV
 
 
 _[Hull] Friday, June 12 [1795]._
 
 I have just received yours dated the 9th, which I suppose was a mistake,
 for it could scarcely have loitered so long on the road. The general
 observations which apply to the state of your own mind, appear to me just,
 as far as they go; and I shall always consider it as one of the most
 serious misfortunes of my life, that I did not meet you, before satiety
 had rendered your senses so fastidious, as almost to close up every tender
 avenue of sentiment and affection that leads to your sympathetic heart.
 You have a heart, my friend, yet, hurried away by the impetuosity of
 inferior feelings, you have sought in vulgar excesses, for that
 gratification which only the heart can bestow.
 
 The common run of men, I know, with strong health and gross appetites,
 must have variety to banish _ennui_, because the imagination never lends
 its magic wand, to convert appetite into love, cemented by according
 reason.--Ah! my friend, you know not the ineffable delight, the exquisite
 pleasure, which arises from a unison of affection and desire, when the
 whole soul and senses are abandoned to a lively imagination, that renders
 every emotion delicate and rapturous. Yes; these are emotions, over which
 satiety has no power, and the recollection of which, even disappointment
 cannot disenchant; but they do not exist without self-denial. These
 emotions, more or less strong, appear to me to be the distinctive
 characteristic of genius, the foundation of taste, and of that exquisite
 relish for the beauties of nature, of which the common herd of eaters and
 drinkers and _child-begeters_, certainly have no idea. You will smile at
 an observation that has just occurred to me:--I consider those minds as
 the most strong and original, whose imagination acts as the stimulus to
 their senses.
 
 Well! you will ask, what is the result of all this reasoning? Why I cannot
 help thinking that it is possible for you, having great strength of mind,
 to return to nature, and regain a sanity of constitution, and purity of
 feeling--which would open your heart to me.--I would fain rest there!
 
 Yet, convinced more than ever of the sincerity and tenderness of my
 attachment to you, the involuntary hopes, which a determination to live
 has revived, are not sufficiently strong to dissipate the cloud, that
 despair has spread over futurity. I have looked at the sea, and at my
 child, hardly daring to own to myself the secret wish, that it might
 become our tomb; and that the heart, still so alive to anguish, might
 there be quieted by death. At this moment ten thousand complicated
 sentiments press for utterance, weigh on my heart, and obscure my sight.
 
 Are we ever to meet again? and will you endeavour to render that meeting
 happier than the last? Will you endeavour to restrain your caprices, in
 order to give vigour to affection, and to give play to the checked
 sentiments that nature intended should expand your heart? I cannot indeed,
 without agony, think of your bosom's being continually contaminated; and
 bitter are the tears which exhaust my eyes, when I recollect why my child
 and I are forced to stray from the asylum, in which, after so many storms,
 I had hoped to rest, smiling at angry fate.--These are not common sorrows;
 nor can you perhaps conceive, how much active fortitude it requires to
 labour perpetually to blunt the shafts of disappointment.
 
 Examine now yourself, and ascertain whether you can live in something like
 a settled stile. Let our confidence in future be unbounded; consider
 whether you find it necessary to sacrifice me to what you term "the zest
 of life;" and, when you have once a clear view of your own motives, of
 your own incentive to action, do not deceive me!
 
 The train of thoughts which the writing of this epistle awoke, makes me so
 wretched, that I must take a walk, to rouse and calm my mind. But first,
 let me tell you, that, if you really wish to promote my happiness, you
 will endeavour to give me as much as you can of yourself. You have great
 mental energy; and your judgment seems to me so just, that it is only the
 dupe of your inclination in discussing one subject.
 
 The post does not go out to-day. To-morrow I may write more tranquilly. I
 cannot yet say when the vessel will sail in which I have determined to
 depart.
 
 
   _[Hull, June 13, 1795]
   Saturday Morning._
 
 Your second letter reached me about an hour ago. You were certainly wrong,
 in supposing that I did not mention you with respect; though, without my
 being conscious of it, some sparks of resentment may have animated the
 gloom of despair--Yes; with less affection, I should have been more
 respectful. However the regard which I have for you, is so unequivocal to
 myself, I imagine that it must be sufficiently obvious to every body else.
 Besides, the only letter I intended for the public eye was to ----, and
 that I destroyed from delicacy before you saw them, because it was only
 written (of course warmly in your praise) to prevent any odium being
 thrown on you.[11]
 
 I am harrassed by your embarrassments, and shall certainly use all my
 efforts, to make the business terminate to your satisfaction in which I am
 engaged.
 
 My friend--my dearest friend--I feel my fate united to yours by the most
 sacred principles of my soul, and the yearns of--yes, I will say it--a
 true, unsophisticated heart.
 
   Yours most truly
     MARY.
 
 If the wind be fair, the captain talks of sailing on Monday; but I am
 afraid I shall be detained some days longer. At any rate, continue to
 write, (I want this support) till you are sure I am where I cannot expect
 a letter; and, if any should arrive after my departure, a gentleman (not
 Mr. ----'s friend, I promise you) from whom I have received great
 civilities, will send them after me.
 
 Do write by every occasion! I am anxious to hear how your affairs go on;
 and, still more, to be convinced that you are not separating yourself from
 us. For my little darling is calling papa, and adding her parrot
 word--Come, Come! And will you not come, and let us exert ourselves?--I
 shall recover all my energy, when I am convinced that my exertions will
 draw us more closely together. Once more adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLV
 
 
 _[Hull] Sunday, June 14 [1795]._
 
 I rather expected to hear from you to-day--I wish you would not fail to
 write to me for a little time, because I am not quite well--Whether I have
 any good sleep or not, I wake in the morning in violent fits of
 trembling--and, in spite of all my efforts, the child--every
 thing--fatigues me, in which I seek for solace or amusement.
 
 Mr. ---- forced on me a letter to a physician of this place; it was
 fortunate, for I should otherwise have had some difficulty to obtain the
 necessary information. His wife is a pretty woman (I can admire, you know,
 a pretty woman, when I am alone) and he an intelligent and rather
 interesting man.--They have behaved to me with great hospitality; and poor
 Fanny was never so happy in her life, as amongst their young brood.
 
 They took me in their carriage to Beverley, and I ran over my favourite
 walks, with a vivacity that would have astonished you.--The town did not
 please me quite so well as formerly--It appeared so diminutive; and, when
 I found that many of the inhabitants had lived in the same houses ever
 since I left it, I could not help wondering how they could thus have
 vegetated, whilst I was running over a world of sorrow, snatching at
 pleasure, and throwing off prejudices. The place where I at present am, is
 much improved; but it is astonishing what strides aristocracy and
 fanaticism have made, since I resided in this country.
 
 The wind does not appear inclined to change, so I am still forced to
 linger--When do you think that you shall be able to set out for France? I
 do not entirely like the aspect of your affairs, and still less your
 connections on either side of the water. Often do I sigh, when I think of
 your entanglements in business, and your extreme restlessness of
 mind.--Even now I am almost afraid to ask you, whether the pleasure of
 being free, does not overbalance the pain you felt at parting with me?
 Sometimes I indulge the hope that you will feel me necessary to you--or
 why should we meet again?--but, the moment after, despair damps my rising
 spirits, aggravated by the emotions of tenderness, which ought to soften
 the cares of life.----God bless you!
 
   Yours sincerely and affectionately
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLVI
 
 
 _[Hull] June 15 [1795]._
 
 I want to know how you have settled with respect to ----. In short, be
 very particular in your account of all your affairs--let our confidence,
 my dear, be unbounded.--The last time we were separated, was a separation
 indeed on your part--Now you have acted more ingenuously, let the most
 affectionate interchange of sentiments fill up the aching void of
 disappointment. I almost dread that your plans will prove abortive--yet
 should the most unlucky turn send you home to us, convinced that a true
 friend is a treasure, I should not much mind having to struggle with the
 world again. Accuse me not of pride--yet sometimes, when nature has opened
 my heart to its author, I have wondered that you did not set a higher
 value on my heart.
 
 Receive a kiss from Fanny, I was going to add, if you will not take one
 from me, and believe me yours
 
   Sincerely
     MARY.
 
 The wind still continues in the same quarter.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLVII
 
 
 _[Hull, June, 1795] Tuesday Morning._
 
 The captain has just sent to inform me, that I must be on board in the
 course of a few hours.--I wished to have stayed till to-morrow. It would
 have been a comfort to me to have received another letter from you--Should
 one arrive, it will be sent after me.
 
 My spirits are agitated, I scarcely know why----The quitting England seems
 to be a fresh parting.--Surely you will not forget me.--A thousand weak
 forebodings assault my soul, and the state of my health renders me
 sensible to every thing. It is surprising that in London, in a continual
 conflict of mind, I was still growing better--whilst here, bowed down by
 the despotic hand of fate, forced into resignation by despair, I seem to
 be fading away--perishing beneath a cruel blight, that withers up all my
 faculties.
 
 The child is perfectly well. My hand seems unwilling to add adieu! I know
 not why this inexpressible sadness has taken possession of me.--It is not
 a presentiment of ill. Yet, having been so perpetually the sport of
 disappointment,--having a heart that has been as it were a mark for
 misery, I dread to meet wretchedness in some new shape.--Well, let it
 come--I care not!--what have I to dread, who have so little to hope for!
 God bless you--I am most affectionately and sincerely yours
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLVIII
 
 
 _[June 17, 1795] Wednesday Morning._
 
 I was hurried on board yesterday about three o'clock, the wind having
 changed. But before evening it veered round to the old point; and here we
 are, in the midst of mists and water, only taking advantage of the tide to
 advance a few miles.
 
 You will scarcely suppose that I left the town with reluctance--yet it was
 even so--for I wished to receive another letter from you, and I felt pain
 at parting, for ever perhaps, from the amiable family, who had treated me
 with so much hospitality and kindness. They will probably send me your
 letter, if it arrives this morning; for here we are likely to remain, I am
 afraid to think how long.
 
 The vessel is very commodious, and the captain a civil, open-hearted kind
 of man. There being no other passengers, I have the cabin to myself,
 which is pleasant; and I have brought a few books with me to beguile
 weariness; but I seem inclined, rather to employ the dead moments of
 suspence in writing some effusions, than in reading.
 
 What are you about? How are your affairs going on? It may be a long time
 before you answer these questions. My dear friend, my heart sinks within
 me!--Why am I forced thus to struggle continually with my affections and
 feelings?--Ah! why are those affections and feelings the source of so much
 misery, when they seem to have been given to vivify my heart, and extend
 my usefulness! But I must not dwell on this subject.--Will you not
 endeavour to cherish all the affection you can for me? What am I
 saying?--Rather forget me, if you can--if other gratifications are dearer
 to you.--How is every remembrance of mine embittered by disappointment?
 What a world is this!--They only seem happy, who never look beyond
 sensual or artificial enjoyments.--Adieu!
 
 Fanny begins to play with the cabin-boy, and is as gay as a lark.--I will
 labour to be tranquil; and am in every mood,
 
   Yours sincerely
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XLIX
 
 
 _[June 18, 1795] Thursday._
 
 Here I am still--and I have just received your letter of Monday by the
 pilot, who promised to bring it to me, if we were detained, as he
 expected, by the wind.--It is indeed wearisome to be thus tossed about
 without going forward.--I have a violent headache--yet I am obliged to
 take care of the child, who is a little tormented by her teeth, because
 ---- is unable to do any thing, she is rendered so sick by the motion of
 the ship, as we ride at anchor.
 
 These are however trifling inconveniences, compared with anguish of
 mind--compared with the sinking of a broken heart.--To tell you the truth,
 I never suffered in my life so much from depression of spirits--from
 despair.--I do not sleep--or, if I close my eyes, it is to have the most
 terrifying dreams, in which I often meet you with different casts of
 countenance.
 
 I will not, my dear Imlay, torment you by dwelling on my sufferings--and
 will use all my efforts to calm my mind, instead of deadening it--at
 present it is most painfully active. I find I am not equal to these
 continual struggles--yet your letter this morning has afforded me some
 comfort--and I will try to revive hope. One thing let me tell you--when we
 meet again--surely we are to meet!--it must be to part no more. I mean not
 to have seas between us--it is more than I can support.
 
 The pilot is hurrying me--God bless you.
 
 In spite of the commodiousness of the vessel, every thing here would
 disgust my senses, had I nothing else to think of--"When the mind's free,
 the body's delicate;"--mine has been too much hurt to regard trifles.
 
   Yours most truly
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER L
 
 
 _[June 20, 1795] Saturday._
 
 This is the fifth dreary day I have been imprisoned by the wind, with
 every outward object to disgust the senses, and unable to banish the
 remembrances that sadden my heart.
 
 How am I altered by disappointment!--When going to Lisbon, ten years ago,
 the elasticity of my mind was sufficient to ward off weariness--and the
 imagination still could dip her brush in the rainbow of fancy, and sketch
 futurity in smiling colours. Now I am going towards the North in search
 of sunbeams!--Will any ever warm this desolated heart? All nature seems to
 frown--or rather mourn with me.--Every thing is cold--cold as my
 expectations! Before I left the shore, tormented, as I now am, by these
 North east _chillers_, I could not help exclaiming--Give me, gracious
 Heaven! at least, genial weather, if I am never to meet the genial
 affection that still warms this agitated bosom--compelling life to linger
 there.
 
 I am now going on shore with the captain, though the weather be rough, to
 seek for milk, &c. at a little village, and to take a walk--after which I
 hope to sleep--for, confined here, surrounded by disagreeable smells, I
 have lost the little appetite I had; and I lie awake, till thinking almost
 drives me to the brink of madness--only to the brink, for I never forget,
 even in the feverish slumbers I sometimes fall into, the misery I am
 labouring to blunt the sense of, by every exertion in my power.
 
 Poor ---- still continues sick, and ---- grows weary when the weather will
 not allow her to remain on deck.
 
 I hope this will be the last letter I shall write from England to you--are
 you not tired of this lingering adieu?
 
   Yours truly
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LI
 
 
 _[Hull, June 21, 1795] Sunday Morning._
 
 The captain last night, after I had written my letter to you intended to
 be left at a little village, offered to go to ---- to pass to-day. We had
 a troublesome sail--and now I must hurry on board again, for the wind has
 changed.
 
 I half expected to find a letter from you here. Had you written one
 haphazard, it would have been kind and considerate--you might have known,
 had you thought, that the wind would not permit me to depart. These are
 attentions, more grateful to the heart than offers of service--But why do
 I foolishly continue to look for them?
 
 Adieu! adieu! My friend--your friendship is very cold--you see I am
 hurt.--God bless you! I may perhaps be, some time or other, independent in
 every sense of the word--Ah! there is but one sense of it of consequence.
 I will break or bend this weak heart--yet even now it is full.
 
   Yours sincerely
     MARY.
 
 The child is well; I did not leave her on board.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LII
 
 
 _[Gothenburg] June 27, Saturday, [1795]._
 
 I arrived in Gothenburg this afternoon, after vainly attempting to land
 at Arendall. I have now but a moment, before the post goes out, to inform
 you we have got here; though not without considerable difficulty, for we
 were set ashore in a boat above twenty miles below.
 
 What I suffered in the vessel I will not now descant upon--nor mention the
 pleasure I received from the sight of the rocky coast.--This morning
 however, walking to join the carriage that was to transport us to this
 place, I fell, without any previous warning, senseless on the rocks--and
 how I escaped with life I can scarcely guess. I was in a stupour for a
 quarter of an hour; the suffusion of blood at last restored me to my
 senses--the contusion is great, and my brain confused. The child is well.
 
 Twenty miles ride in the rain, after my accident, has sufficiently
 deranged me--and here I could not get a fire to warm me, or any thing warm
 to eat; the inns are mere stables--I must nevertheless go to bed. For
 God's sake, let me hear from you immediately, my friend! I am not well,
 and yet you see I cannot die.
 
   Yours sincerely
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LIII
 
 
 _[Gothenburg] June 29 [1795]._
 
 I wrote to you by the last post, to inform you of my arrival; and I
 believe I alluded to the extreme fatigue I endured on ship-board, owing to
 ----'s illness, and the roughness of the weather--I likewise mentioned to
 you my fall, the effects of which I still feel, though I do not think it
 will have any serious consequences.
 
 ---- will go with me, if I find it necessary to go to ----. The inns here
 are so bad, I was forced to accept of an apartment in his house. I am
 overwhelmed with civilities on all sides, and fatigued with the endeavours
 to amuse me, from which I cannot escape.
 
 My friend--my friend, I am not well--a deadly weight of sorrow lies
 heavily on my heart. I am again tossed on the troubled billows of life;
 and obliged to cope with difficulties, without being buoyed up by the
 hopes that alone render them bearable. "How flat, dull, and unprofitable,"
 appears to me all the bustle into which I see people here so eagerly
 enter! I long every night to go to bed, to hide my melancholy face in my
 pillow; but there is a canker-worm in my bosom that never sleeps.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LIV
 
 
 _[Sweden] July 1 [1795]._
 
 I labour in vain to calm my mind--my soul has been overwhelmed by sorrow
 and disappointment. Every thing fatigues me--this is a life that cannot
 last long. It is you who must determine with respect to futurity--and,
 when you have, I will act accordingly--I mean, we must either resolve to
 live together, or part for ever, I cannot bear these continual
 struggles.--But I wish you to examine carefully your own heart and mind;
 and, if you perceive the least chance of being happier without me than
 with me, or if your inclination leans capriciously to that side, do not
 dissemble; but tell me frankly that you will never see me more. I will
 then adopt the plan I mentioned to you--for we must either live together,
 or I will be entirely independent.
 
 My heart is so oppressed, I cannot write with precision--You know however
 that what I so imperfectly express, are not the crude sentiments of the
 moment--You can only contribute to my comfort (it is the consolation I am
 in need of) by being with me--and, if the tenderest friendship is of any
 value, why will you not look to me for a degree of satisfaction that
 heartless affections cannot bestow?
 
 Tell me then, will you determine to meet me at Basle?--I shall, I should
 imagine, be at ---- before the close of August; and, after you settle your
 affairs at Paris, could we not meet there?
 
 God bless you!
 
   Yours truly
     MARY.
 
 Poor Fanny has suffered during the journey with her teeth.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LV
 
 
 _[Sweden] July 3 [1795]._
 
 There was a gloominess diffused through your last letter, the impression
 of which still rests on my mind--though, recollecting how quickly you
 throw off the forcible feelings of the moment, I flatter myself it has
 long since given place to your usual cheerfulness.
 
 Believe me (and my eyes fill with tears of tenderness as I assure you)
 there is nothing I would not endure in the way of privation, rather than
 disturb your tranquillity.--If I am fated to be unhappy, I will labour to
 hide my sorrows in my own bosom; and you shall always find me a faithful,
 affectionate friend.
 
 I grow more and more attached to my little girl--and I cherish this
 affection without fear, because it must be a long time before it can
 become bitterness of soul.--She is an interesting creature.--On
 ship-board, how often as I gazed at the sea, have I longed to bury my
 troubled bosom in the less troubled deep; asserting with Brutus, "that the
 virtue I had followed too far, was merely an empty name!" and nothing but
 the sight of her--her playful smiles, which seemed to cling and twine
 round my heart--could have stopped me.
 
 What peculiar misery has fallen to my share! To act up to my principles, I
 have laid the strictest restraint on my very thoughts--yes; not to sully
 the delicacy of my feelings, I have reined in my imagination; and started
 with affright from every sensation, (I allude to ----) that stealing with
 balmy sweetness into my soul, led me to scent from afar the fragrance of
 reviving nature.
 
 My friend, I have dearly paid for one conviction.--Love, in some minds, is
 an affair of sentiment, arising from the same delicacy of perception (or
 taste) as renders them alive to the beauties of nature, poetry, &c., alive
 to the charms of those evanescent graces that are, as it were,
 impalpable--they must be felt, they cannot be described.
 
 Love is a want of my heart. I have examined myself lately with more care
 than formerly, and find, that to deaden is not to calm the mind--Aiming at
 tranquillity, I have almost destroyed all the energy of my soul--almost
 rooted out what renders it estimable--Yes, I have damped that enthusiasm
 of character, which converts the grossest materials into a fuel, that
 imperceptibly feeds hopes, which aspire above common enjoyment. Despair,
 since the birth of my child, has rendered me stupid--soul and body seemed
 to be fading away before the withering touch of disappointment.
 
 I am now endeavouring to recover myself--and such is the elasticity of my
 constitution, and the purity of the atmosphere here, that health unsought
 for, begins to reanimate my countenance.
 
 I have the sincerest esteem and affection for you--but the desire of
 regaining peace, (do you understand me?) has made me forget the respect
 due to my own emotions--sacred emotions, that are the sure harbingers of
 the delights I was formed to enjoy--and shall enjoy, for nothing can
 extinguish the heavenly spark.
 
 Still, when we meet again, I will not torment you, I promise you. I blush
 when I recollect my former conduct--and will not in future confound myself
 with the beings whom I feel to be my inferiors.--I will listen to
 delicacy, or pride.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LVI
 
 
 _[Sweden] July 4 [1795]._
 
 I hope to hear from you by to-morrow's mail. My dearest friend! I cannot
 tear my affections from you--and, though every remembrance stings me to
 the soul, I think of you, till I make allowance for the very defects of
 character, that have given such a cruel stab to my peace.
 
 Still however I am more alive, than you have seen me for a long, long
 time. I have a degree of vivacity, even in my grief, which is preferable
 to the benumbing stupour that, for the last year, has frozen up all my
 faculties.--Perhaps this change is more owing to returning health, than to
 the vigour of my reason--for, in spite of sadness (and surely I have had
 my share), the purity of this air, and the being continually out in it,
 for I sleep in the country every night, has made an alteration in my
 appearance that really surprises me.--The rosy fingers of health already
 streak my cheeks--and I have seen a _physical_ life in my eyes, after I
 have been climbing the rocks, that resembled the fond, credulous hopes of
 youth.
 
 With what a cruel sigh have I recollected that I had forgotten to
 hope!--Reason, or rather experience, does not thus cruelly damp poor
 ----'s pleasures; she plays all day in the garden with ----'s children,
 and makes friends for herself.
 
 Do not tell me, that you are happier without us--Will you not come to us
 in Switzerland? Ah, why do not you love us with more sentiment?--why are
 you a creature of such sympathy, that the warmth of your feelings, or
 rather quickness of your senses, hardens your heart?--It is my
 misfortune, that my imagination is perpetually shading your defects, and
 lending you charms, whilst the grossness of your senses makes you (call me
 not vain) overlook graces in me, that only dignity of mind, and the
 sensibility of an expanded heart can give.--God bless you! Adieu.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LVII
 
 
 _[Sweden] July 7 [1795]._
 
 I could not help feeling extremely mortified last post, at not receiving a
 letter from you. My being at ---- was but a chance, and you might have
 hazarded it; and would a year ago.
 
 I shall not however complain--There are misfortunes so great, as to
 silence the usual expressions of sorrow--Believe me, there is such a thing
 as a broken heart! There are characters whose very energy preys upon them;
 and who, ever inclined to cherish by reflection some passion, cannot rest
 satisfied with the common comforts of life. I have endeavoured to fly from
 myself and launched into all the dissipation possible here, only to feel
 keener anguish, when alone with my child.
 
 Still, could any thing please me--had not disappointment cut me off from
 life, this romantic country, these fine evenings, would interest me.--My
 God! can any thing? and am I ever to feel alive only to painful
 sensations?--But it cannot--it shall not last long.
 
 The post is again arrived; I have sent to seek for letters, only to be
 wounded to the soul by a negative.--My brain seems on fire. I must go into
 the air.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LVIII
 
 
 _[Laurvig, Norway] July 14 [1795]._
 
 I am now on my journey to Tonsberg. I felt more at leaving my child, than
 I thought I should--and, whilst at night I imagined every instant that I
 heard the half-formed sounds of her voice,--I asked myself how I could
 think of parting with her for ever, of leaving her thus helpless?
 
 Poor lamb! It may run very well in a tale, that "God will temper the winds
 to the shorn lamb!" but how can I expect that she will be shielded, when
 my naked bosom has had to brave continually the pitiless storm? Yes; I
 could add, with poor Lear--What is the war of elements to the pangs of
 disappointed affection, and the horror arising from a discovery of a
 breach of confidence, that snaps every social tie!
 
 All is not right somewhere!--When you first knew me, I was not thus lost.
 I could still confide--for I opened my heart to you--of this only comfort
 you have deprived me, whilst my happiness, you tell me, was your first
 object. Strange want of judgment!
 
 I will not complain; but, from the soundness of your understanding, I am
 convinced, if you give yourself leave to reflect, you will also feel, that
 your conduct to me, so far from being generous, has not been just.--I mean
 not to allude to factitious principles of morality; but to the simple
 basis of all rectitude.--However I did not intend to argue--Your not
 writing is cruel--and my reason is perhaps disturbed by constant
 wretchedness.
 
 Poor ---- would fain have accompanied me, out of tenderness; for my
 fainting, or rather convulsion, when I landed, and my sudden changes of
 countenance since, have alarmed her so much, that she is perpetually
 afraid of some accident.--But it would have injured the child this warm
 season, as she is cutting her teeth.
 
 I hear not of your having written to me at Stromstad. Very well! Act as
 you please--there is nothing I fear or care for! When I see whether I
 can, or cannot obtain the money I am come here about, I will not trouble
 you with letters to which you do not reply.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LIX
 
 
 _[Tonsberg] July 18 [1795]._
 
 I am here in Tonsberg, separated from my child--and here I must remain a
 month at least, or I might as well never have come.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I have begun ---- which will, I hope, discharge all my obligations of a
 pecuniary kind.--I am lowered in my own eyes, on account of my not having
 done it sooner.
 
 I shall make no further comments on your silence. God bless you!
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LX
 
 
 _[Tonsberg] July 30 [1795]._
 
 I have just received two of your letters, dated the 26th and 30th of
 June; and you must have received several from me, informing you of my
 detention, and how much I was hurt by your silence.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Write to me then, my friend, and write explicitly. I have suffered, God
 knows, since I left you. Ah! you have never felt this kind of sickness of
 heart!--My mind however is at present painfully active, and the sympathy I
 feel almost rises to agony. But this is not a subject of complaint, it has
 afforded me pleasure,--and reflected pleasure is all I have to hope
 for--if a spark of hope be yet alive in my forlorn bosom.
 
 I will try to write with a degree of composure. I wish for us to live
 together, because I want you to acquire an habitual tenderness for my poor
 girl. I cannot bear to think of leaving her alone in the world, or that
 she should only be protected by your sense of duty. Next to preserving
 her, my most earnest wish is not to disturb your peace. I have nothing to
 expect, and little to fear, in life--There are wounds that can never be
 healed--but they may be allowed to fester in silence without wincing.
 
 When we meet again, you shall be convinced that I have more resolution
 than you give me credit for. I will not torment you. If I am destined
 always to be disappointed and unhappy, I will conceal the anguish I cannot
 dissipate; and the tightened cord of life or reason will at last snap, and
 set me free.
 
 Yes; I shall be happy--This heart is worthy of the bliss its feelings
 anticipate--and I cannot even persuade myself, wretched as they have made
 me, that my principles and sentiments are not founded in nature and truth.
 But to have done with these subjects.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I have been seriously employed in this way since I came to Tonsberg; yet
 I never was so much in the air.--I walk, I ride on horseback--row, bathe,
 and even sleep in the fields; my health is consequently improved. The
 child, ---- informs me, is well, I long to be with her.
 
 Write to me immediately--were I only to think of myself, I could wish you
 to return to me, poor, with the simplicity of character, part of which you
 seem lately to have lost, that first attached to you.
 
   Yours most affectionately
     MARY IMLAY
 
 I have been subscribing other letters--so I mechanically did the same to
 yours.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXI
 
 
 _[Tonsberg] August 5 [1795]._
 
 Employment and exercise have been of great service to me; and I have
 entirely recovered the strength and activity I lost during the time of my
 nursing. I have seldom been in better health; and my mind, though
 trembling to the touch of anguish, is calmer--yet still the same.--I have,
 it is true, enjoyed some tranquillity, and more happiness here, than for a
 long--long time past.--(I say happiness, for I can give no other
 appellation to the exquisite delight this wild country and fine summer
 have afforded me.)--Still, on examining my heart, I find that it is so
 constituted, I cannot live without some particular affection--I am afraid
 not without a passion--and I feel the want of it more in society, than in
 solitude.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Writing to you, whenever an affectionate epithet occurs--my eyes fill with
 tears, and my trembling hand stops--you may then depend on my resolution,
 when with you. If I am doomed to be unhappy, I will confine my anguish in
 my own bosom--tenderness, rather than passion, has made me sometimes
 overlook delicacy--the same tenderness will in future restrain me. God
 bless you!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXII
 
 
 _[Tonsberg] August 7 [1795]._
 
 Air, exercise, and bathing, have restored me to health, braced my muscles,
 and covered my ribs, even whilst I have recovered my former activity.--I
 cannot tell you that my mind is calm, though I have snatched some moments
 of exquisite delight, wandering through the woods, and resting on the
 rocks.
 
 This state of suspense, my friend, is intolerable; we must determine on
 something--and soon;--we must meet shortly, or part for ever. I am
 sensible that I acted foolishly--but I was wretched--when we were
 together--Expecting too much, I let the pleasure I might have caught, slip
 from me. I cannot live with you--I ought not--if you form another
 attachment. But I promise you, mine shall not be intruded on you. Little
 reason have I to expect a shadow of happiness, after the cruel
 disappointments that have rent my heart; but that of my child seems to
 depend on our being together. Still I do not wish you to sacrifice a
 chance of enjoyment for an uncertain good. I feel a conviction, that I can
 provide for her, and it shall be my object--if we are indeed to part to
 meet no more. Her affection must not be divided. She must be a comfort to
 me--if I am to have no other--and only know me as her support. I feel that
 I cannot endure the anguish of corresponding with you--if we are only to
 correspond.--No; if you seek for happiness elsewhere, my letters shall not
 interrupt your repose. I will be dead to you. I cannot express to you what
 pain it gives me to write about an eternal separation.--You must
 determine--examine yourself--But, for God's sake! spare me the anxiety of
 uncertainty!--I may sink under the trial; but I will not complain.
 
 Adieu! If I had any thing more to say to you, it is all flown, and
 absorbed by the most tormenting apprehensions; yet I scarcely know what
 new form of misery I have to dread.
 
 I ought to beg your pardon for having sometimes written peevishly; but you
 will impute it to affection, if you understand anything of the heart of
 
   Yours truly
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXIII
 
 
 _[Tonsberg] August 9 [1795]._
 
 Five of your letters have been sent after me from ----. One, dated the
 14th of July, was written in a style which I may have merited, but did not
 expect from you. However this is not a time to reply to it, except to
 assure you that you shall not be tormented with any more complaints. I am
 disgusted with myself for having so long importuned you with my
 affection.----
 
 My child is very well. We shall soon meet, to part no more, I hope--I
 mean, I and my girl.--I shall wait with some degree of anxiety till I am
 informed how your affairs terminate.
 
   Yours sincerely
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXIV
 
 
 _[Gothenburg] August 26 [1795]._
 
 I arrived here last night, and with the most exquisite delight, once more
 pressed my babe to my heart. We shall part no more. You perhaps cannot
 conceive the pleasure it gave me, to see her run about, and play alone.
 Her increasing intelligence attaches me more and more to her. I have
 promised her that I will fulfil my duty to her; and nothing in future
 shall make me forget it. I will also exert myself to obtain an
 independence for her; but I will not be too anxious on this head.
 
 I have already told you, that I have recovered my health. Vigour, and even
 vivacity of mind, have returned with a renovated constitution. As for
 peace, we will not talk of it. I was not made, perhaps, to enjoy the calm
 contentment so termed.--
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 You tell me that my letters torture you; I will not describe the effect
 yours have on me. I received three this morning, the last dated the 7th of
 this month. I mean not to give vent to the emotions they
 produced.--Certainly you are right; our minds are not congenial. I have
 lived in an ideal world, and fostered sentiments that you do not
 comprehend--or you would not treat me thus. I am not, I will not be,
 merely an object of compassion--a clog, however light, to teize you.
 Forget that I exist: I will never remind you. Something emphatical
 whispers me to put an end to these struggles. Be free--I will not torment,
 when I cannot please. I can take care of my child; you need not
 continually tell me that our fortune is inseparable, _that you will try to
 cherish tenderness_ for me. Do no violence to yourself! When we are
 separated, our interest, since you give so much weight to pecuniary
 considerations, will be entirely divided. I want not protection without
 affection; and support I need not, whilst my faculties are undisturbed. I
 had a dislike to living in England; but painful feelings must give way to
 superior considerations. I may not be able to acquire the sum necessary to
 maintain my child and self elsewhere. It is too late to go to
 Switzerland. I shall not remain at ----, living expensively. But be not
 alarmed! I shall not force myself on you any more.
 
 Adieu! I am agitated--my whole frame is convulsed--my lips tremble, as if
 shook by cold, though fire seems to be circulating in my veins.
 
 God bless you.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXV
 
 
 _[Copenhagen] September 6 [1795]._
 
 I received just now your letter of the 20th. I had written you a letter
 last night, into which imperceptibly slipt some of my bitterness of soul.
 I will copy the part relative to business. I am not sufficiently vain to
 imagine that I can, for more than a moment, cloud your enjoyment of
 life--to prevent even that, you had better never hear from me--and repose
 on the idea that I am happy.
 
 Gracious God! It is impossible for me to stifle something like
 resentment, when I receive fresh proofs of your indifference. What I have
 suffered this last year, is not to be forgotten! I have not that happy
 substitute for wisdom, insensibility--and the lively sympathies which bind
 me to my fellow-creatures, are all of a painful kind.--They are the
 agonies of a broken heart--pleasure and I have shaken hands.
 
 I see here nothing but heaps of ruins, and only converse with people
 immersed in trade and sensuality.
 
 I am weary of travelling--yet seem to have no home--no resting-place to
 look to.--I am strangely cast off.--How often, passing through the rocks,
 I have thought, "But for this child, I would lay my head on one of them,
 and never open my eyes again!" With a heart feelingly alive to all the
 affections of my nature--I have never met with one, softer than the stone
 that I would fain take for my last pillow. I once thought I had, but it
 was all a delusion. I meet with families continually, who are bound
 together by affection or principle--and, when I am conscious that I have
 fulfilled the duties of my station, almost to a forgetfulness of myself, I
 am ready to demand, in a murmuring tone, of Heaven, "Why am I thus
 abandoned?"
 
 You say now
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I do not understand you. It is necessary for you to write more
 explicitly--and determine on some mode of conduct.--I cannot endure this
 suspense--Decide--Do you fear to strike another blow? We live together, or
 eternally part!--I shall not write to you again, till I receive an answer
 to this. I must compose my tortured soul, before I write on indifferent
 subjects.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I do not know whether I write intelligibly, for my head is disturbed. But
 this you ought to pardon--for it is with difficulty frequently that I make
 out what you mean to say--You write, I suppose, at Mr. ----'s after
 dinner, when your head is not the clearest--and as for your heart, if you
 have one, I see nothing like the dictates of affection, unless a glimpse
 when you mention the child--Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXVI
 
 
 _[Hamburg] September 25 [1795]._
 
 I have just finished a letter, to be given in charge to captain ----. In
 that I complained of your silence, and expressed my surprise that three
 mails should have arrived without bringing a line for me. Since I closed
 it, I hear of another, and still no letter.--I am labouring to write
 calmly--this silence is a refinement on cruelty. Had captain ---- remained
 a few days longer, I would have returned with him to England. What have I
 to do here? I have repeatedly written to you fully. Do you do the
 same--and quickly. Do not leave me in suspense. I have not deserved this
 of you. I cannot write, my mind is so distressed. Adieu!
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXVII
 
 
 _[Hamburg] September 27 [1795]._
 
 When you receive this, I shall either have landed, or be hovering on the
 British coast--your letter of the 18th decided me.
 
 By what criterion of principle or affection, you term my questions
 extraordinary and unnecessary, I cannot determine.--You desire me to
 decide--I had decided. You must have had long ago two letters of mine,
 from ----, to the same purport, to consider.--In these, God knows! there
 was but too much affection, and the agonies of a distracted mind were but
 too faithfully pourtrayed!--What more then had I to say?--The negative was
 to come from you.--You had perpetually recurred to your promise of meeting
 me in the autumn--Was it extraordinary that I should demand a yes, or
 no?--Your letter is written with extreme harshness, coldness I am
 accustomed to, in it I find not a trace of the tenderness of humanity,
 much less of friendship.--I only see a desire to heave a load off your
 shoulders.
 
 I am above disputing about words.--It matters not in what terms you
 decide.
 
 The tremendous power who formed this heart, must have foreseen that, in a
 world in which self-interest, in various shapes, is the principal mobile,
 I had little chance of escaping misery.--To the fiat of fate I submit.--I
 am content to be wretched; but I will not be contemptible.--Of me you have
 no cause to complain, but for having had too much regard for you--for
 having expected a degree of permanent happiness, when you only sought for
 a momentary gratification.
 
 I am strangely deficient in sagacity.--Uniting myself to you, your
 tenderness seemed to make me amends for all my former misfortunes.--On
 this tenderness and affection with what confidence did I rest!--but I
 leaned on a spear, that has pierced me to the heart.--You have thrown off
 a faithful friend, to pursue the caprices of the moment.--We certainly are
 differently organized; for even now, when conviction has been stamped on
 my soul by sorrow, I can scarcely believe it possible. It depends at
 present on you, whether you will see me or not.--I shall take no step,
 till I see or hear from you.
 
 Preparing myself for the worst--I have determined, if your next letter be
 like the last, to write to Mr. ---- to procure me an obscure lodging, and
 not to inform any body of my arrival.--There I will endeavour in a few
 months to obtain the sum necessary to take me to France--from you I will
 not receive any more.--I am not yet sufficiently humbled to depend on your
 beneficence.
 
 Some people, whom my unhappiness has interested, though they know not the
 extent of it, will assist me to attain the object I have in view, the
 independence of my child. Should a peace take place, ready money will go a
 great way in France--and I will borrow a sum, which my industry _shall_
 enable me to pay at my leisure, to purchase a small estate for my
 girl.--The assistance I shall find necessary to complete her education, I
 can get at an easy rate at Paris--I can introduce her to such society as
 she will like--and thus, securing for her all the chance for happiness,
 which depends on me, I shall die in peace, persuaded that the felicity
 which has hitherto cheated my expectation, will not always elude my grasp.
 No poor temptest-tossed mariner ever more earnestly longed to arrive at
 his port.
 
   MARY.
 
 I shall not come up in the vessel all the way, because I have no place to
 go to. Captain ---- will inform you where I am. It is needless to add,
 that I am not in a state of mind to bear suspense--and that I wish to see
 you, though it be for the last time.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXVIII
 
 
 _[Dover] Sunday, October 4 [1795]._
 
 I wrote to you by the packet, to inform you, that your letter of the 18th
 of last month, had determined me to set out with captain ----; but, as we
 sailed very quick, I take it for granted, that you have not yet received
 it.
 
 You say, I must decide for myself.--I had decided, that it was most for
 the interest of my little girl, and for my own comfort, little as I
 expect, for us to live together; and I even thought that you would be
 glad, some years hence, when the tumult of business was over, to repose in
 the society of an affectionate friend, and mark the progress of our
 interesting child, whilst endeavouring to be of use in the circle you at
 last resolved to rest in: for you cannot run about for ever.
 
 From the tenour of your last letter however, I am led to imagine, that you
 have formed some new attachment.--If it be so, let me earnestly request
 you to see me once more, and immediately. This is the only proof I require
 of the friendship you profess for me. I will then decide, since you boggle
 about a mere form.
 
 I am labouring to write with calmness--but the extreme anguish I feel, at
 landing without having any friend to receive me, and even to be conscious
 that the friend whom I most wish to see, will feel a disagreeable
 sensation at being informed of my arrival, does not come under the
 description of common misery. Every emotion yields to an overwhelming
 flood of sorrow--and the playfulness of my child distresses me.--On her
 account, I wished to remain a few days here, comfortless as is my
 situation.--Besides, I did not wish to surprise you. You have told me,
 that you would make any sacrifice to promote my happiness--and, even in
 your last unkind letter, you talk of the ties which bind you to me and my
 child.--Tell me, that you wish it, and I will cut this Gordian knot.
 
 I now most earnestly intreat you to write to me, without fail, by the
 return of the post. Direct your letter to be left at the post-office, and
 tell me whether you will come to me here, or where you will meet me. I can
 receive your letter on Wednesday morning.
 
 Do not keep me in suspense.--I expect nothing from you, or any human
 being: my die is cast!--I have fortitude enough to determine to do my
 duty; yet I cannot raise my depressed spirits, or calm my trembling
 heart.--That being who moulded it thus, knows that I am unable to tear up
 by the roots the propensity to affection which has been the torment of my
 life--but life will have an end!
 
 Should you come here (a few months ago I could not have doubted it) you
 will find me at ----. If you prefer meeting me on the road, tell me where.
 
   Yours affectionately,
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXIX
 
 
 _[London, Nov. 1795]._
 
 I write to you now on my knees; imploring you to send my child and the
 maid with ----, to Paris, to be consigned to the care of Madame ----, rue
 ----, section de ----. Should they be removed, ---- can give their
 direction.
 
 Let the maid have all my clothes, without distinction.
 
 Pray pay the cook her wages, and do not mention the confession which I
 forced from her--a little sooner or later is of no consequence. Nothing
 but my extreme stupidity could have rendered me blind so long. Yet, whilst
 you assured me that you had no attachment, I thought we might still have
 lived together.
 
 I shall make no comments on your conduct; or any appeal to the world. Let
 my wrongs sleep with me! Soon, very soon shall I be at peace. When you
 receive this, my burning head will be cold.
 
 I would encounter a thousand deaths, rather than a night like the last.
 Your treatment has thrown my mind into a state of chaos; yet I am serene.
 I go to find comfort, and my only fear is, that my poor body will be
 insulted by an endeavour to recal my hated existence. But I shall plunge
 into the Thames where there is the least chance of my being snatched from
 the death I seek.
 
 God bless you! May you never know by experience what you have made me
 endure. Should your sensibility ever awake, remorse will find its way to
 your heart; and, in the midst of business and sensual pleasure, I shall
 appear before you, the victim of your deviation from rectitude.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXX
 
 
 _[London, Nov. 1795] Sunday Morning._
 
 I have only to lament, that, when the bitterness of death was past, I was
 inhumanly brought back to life and misery. But a fixed determination is
 not to be baffled by disappointment; nor will I allow that to be a frantic
 attempt, which was one of the calmest acts of reason. In this respect, I
 am only accountable to myself. Did I care for what is termed reputation,
 it is by other circumstances that I should be dishonoured.
 
 You say, "that you know not how to extricate ourselves out of the
 wretchedness into which we have been plunged." You are extricated long
 since.--But I forbear to comment.--If I am condemned to live longer, it is
 a living death.
 
 It appears to me, that you lay much more stress on delicacy, than on
 principle; for I am unable to discover what sentiment of delicacy would
 have been violated, by your visiting a wretched friend--if indeed you have
 any friendship for me.--But since your new attachment is the only thing
 sacred in your eyes, I am silent--Be happy! My complaints shall never more
 damp your enjoyment--perhaps I am mistaken in supposing that even my death
 could, for more than a moment.--This is what you call magnanimity.--It is
 happy for yourself, that you possess this quality in the highest degree.
 
 Your continually asserting, that you will do all in your power to
 contribute to my comfort (when you only allude to pecuniary assistance),
 appears to me a flagrant breach of delicacy.--I want not such vulgar
 comfort, nor will I accept it. I never wanted but your heart--That gone,
 you have nothing more to give. Had I only poverty to fear, I should not
 shrink from life.--Forgive me then, if I say, that I shall consider any
 direct or indirect attempt to supply my necessities, as an insult which I
 have not merited--and as rather done out of tenderness for your own
 reputation, than for me. Do not mistake me; I do not think that you value
 money (therefore I will not accept what you do not care for) though I do
 much less, because certain privations are not painful to me. When I am
 dead, respect for yourself will make you take care of the child.
 
 I write with difficulty--probably I shall never write to you
 again.--Adieu!
 
 God bless you!
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXXI
 
 
 _[London, Nov. 1795] Monday Morning._
 
 I am compelled at last to say that you treat me ungenerously. I agree with
 you, that
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 But let the obliquity now fall on me.--I fear neither poverty nor infamy.
 I am unequal to the task of writing--and explanations are not necessary.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 My child may have to blush for her mother's want of prudence--and may
 lament that the rectitude of my heart made me above vulgar precautions;
 but she shall not despise me for meanness.--You are now perfectly
 free.--God bless you.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXXII
 
 
 _[London, Nov. 1795] Saturday Night._
 
 I have been hurt by indirect enquiries, which appear to me not to be
 dictated by any tenderness to me.--You ask "If I am well or
 tranquil?"--They who think me so, must want a heart to estimate my
 feelings by.--I chuse then to be the organ of my own sentiments.
 
 I must tell you, that I am very much mortified by your continually
 offering me pecuniary assistance--and, considering your going to the new
 house, as an open avowal that you abandon me, let me tell you that I will
 sooner perish than receive any thing from you--and I say this at the
 moment when I am disappointed in my first attempt to obtain a temporary
 supply. But this even pleases me; an accumulation of disappointments and
 misfortunes seems to suit the habit of my mind.--
 
 Have but a little patience, and I will remove myself where it will not be
 necessary for you to talk--of course, not to think of me. But let me see,
 written by yourself--for I will not receive it through any other
 medium--that the affair is finished.--It is an insult to me to suppose,
 that I can be reconciled, or recover my spirits; but, if you hear nothing
 of me, it will be the same thing to you.
 
   MARY.
 
 Even your seeing me, has been to oblige other people, and not to sooth my
 distracted mind.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXXIII
 
 
 _[London, Nov. 1795] Thursday Afternoon._
 
 Mr. ---- having forgot to desire you to send the things of mine which
 were left at the house, I have to request you to let ---- bring them to
 ----
 
 I shall go this evening to the lodging; so you need not be restrained from
 coming here to transact your business.--And, whatever I may think, and
 feel--you need not fear that I shall publicly complain--No! If I have any
 criterion to judge of right and wrong, I have been most ungenerously
 treated: but, wishing now only to hide myself, I shall be silent as the
 grave in which I long to forget myself. I shall protect and provide for my
 child.--I only mean by this to say, that you have nothing to fear from my
 desperation.
 
   Farewel.
     MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXXIV
 
 
 _London, November 27 [1795]._
 
 The letter, without an address, which you put up with the letters you
 returned, did not meet my eyes till just now.--I had thrown the letters
 aside--I did not wish to look over a register of sorrow.
 
 My not having seen it, will account for my having written to you with
 anger--under the impression your departure, without even a line left for
 me, made on me, even after your late conduct, which could not lead me to
 expect much attention to my sufferings.
 
 In fact, "the decided conduct, which appeared to me so unfeeling," has
 almost overturned my reason; my mind is injured--I scarcely know where I
 am, or what I do.--The grief I cannot conquer (for some cruel
 recollections never quit me, banishing almost every other) I labour to
 conceal in total solitude.--My life therefore is but an exercise of
 fortitude, continually on the stretch--and hope never gleams in this tomb,
 where I am buried alive.
 
 But I meant to reason with you, and not to complain.--You tell me, that I
 shall judge more coolly of your mode of acting, some time hence." But is
 it not possible that _passion_ clouds your reason, as much as it does
 mine?--and ought you not to doubt, whether those principles are so
 "exalted," as you term them, which only lead to your own gratification? In
 other words, whether it be just to have no principle of action, but that
 of following your inclination, trampling on the affection you have
 fostered, and the expectations you have excited?
 
 My affection for you is rooted in my heart.--I know you are not what you
 now seem--nor will you always act, or feel, as you now do, though I may
 never be comforted by the change.--Even at Paris, my image will haunt
 you.--You will see my pale face--and sometimes the tears of anguish will
 drop on your heart; which you have forced from mine.
 
 I cannot write. I thought I could quickly have refuted all your
 _ingenious_ arguments; but my head is confused.--Right or wrong, I am
 miserable!
 
 It seems to me, that my conduct has always been governed by the strictest
 principles of justice and truth.--Yet, how wretched have my social
 feelings, and delicacy of sentiment rendered me!--I have loved with my
 whole soul, only to discover that I had no chance of a return--and that
 existence is a burthen without it.
 
 I do not perfectly understand you.--If, by the offer of your friendship,
 you still only mean pecuniary support--I must again reject it.--Trifling
 are the ills of poverty in the scale of my misfortunes.--God bless you!
 
   MARY.
 
 I have been treated ungenerously--if I understand what is generosity.--You
 seem to me only to have been anxious to shake me off--regardless whether
 you dashed me to atoms by the fall.--In truth I have been rudely handled.
 _Do you judge coolly_, and I trust you will not continue to call those
 capricious feelings "the most refined," which would undermine not only the
 most sacred principles, but the affections which unite mankind.--You would
 render mothers unnatural--and there would be no such thing as a
 father!--If your theory of morals is the most "exalted," it is certainly
 the most easy.--It does not require much magnanimity, to determine to
 please ourselves for the moment, let others suffer what they will!
 
 Excuse me for again tormenting you, my heart thirsts for justice from
 you--and whilst I recollect that you approved Miss ----'s conduct--I am
 convinced you will not always justify your own.
 
 Beware of the deceptions of passion! It will not always banish from your
 mind, that you have acted ignobly--and condescended to subterfuge to
 gloss over the conduct you could not excuse.--Do truth and principle
 require such sacrifices?
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXXV
 
 
 _London, December 8 [1795]._
 
 Having just been informed that ---- is to return immediately to Paris, I
 would not miss a sure opportunity of writing, because I am not certain
 that my last, by Dover has reached you.
 
 Resentment, and even anger, are momentary emotions with me--and I wished
 to tell you so, that if you ever think of me, it may not be in the light
 of an enemy.
 
 That I have not been used _well_ I must ever feel; perhaps, not always
 with the keen anguish I do at present--for I began even now to write
 calmly, and I cannot restrain my tears.
 
 I am stunned!--Your late conduct still appears to me a frightful
 dream.--Ah! ask yourself if you have not condescended to employ a little
 address, I could almost say cunning, unworthy of you?--Principles are
 sacred things--and we never play with truth, with impunity.
 
 The expectation (I have too fondly nourished it) of regaining your
 affection, every day grows fainter and fainter.--Indeed, it seems to me,
 when I am more sad than usual, that I shall never see you more.--Yet you
 will not always forget me.--You will feel something like remorse, for
 having lived only for yourself--and sacrificed my peace to inferior
 gratifications. In a comfortless old age, you will remember that you had
 one disinterested friend, whose heart you wounded to the quick. The hour
 of recollection will come--and you will not be satisfied to act the part
 of a boy, till you fall into that of a dotard. I know that your mind, your
 heart, and your principles of action, are all superior to your present
 conduct. You do, you must, respect me--and you will be sorry to forfeit my
 esteem.
 
 You know best whether I am still preserving the remembrance of an
 imaginary being.--I once thought that I knew you thoroughly--but now I am
 obliged to leave some doubts that involuntarily press on me, to be cleared
 up by time.
 
 You may render me unhappy; but cannot make me contemptible in my own
 eyes.--I shall still be able to support my child, though I am disappointed
 in some other plans of usefulness, which I once believed would have
 afforded you equal pleasure.
 
 Whilst I was with you, I restrained my natural generosity, because I
 thought your property in jeopardy.--When I went to [Sweden], I requested
 you, _if you could conveniently_, not to forget my father, sisters, and
 some other people, whom I was interested about.--Money was lavished away,
 yet not only my requests were neglected, but some trifling debts were not
 discharged, that now come on me.--Was this friendship--or generosity? Will
 you not grant you have forgotten yourself? Still I have an affection for
 you.--God bless you.
 
   MARY.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXXVI
 
 _[London, Dec. 1795.]_
 
 As the parting from you for ever is the most serious event of my life, I
 will once expostulate with you, and call not the language of truth and
 feeling ingenuity!
 
 I know the soundness of your understanding--and know that it is impossible
 for you always to confound the caprices of every wayward inclination with
 the manly dictates of principle.
 
 You tell me "that I torment you."--Why do I?----Because you cannot
 estrange your heart entirely from me--and you feel that justice is on my
 side. You urge, "that your conduct was unequivocal."--It was not.--When
 your coolness has hurt me, with what tenderness have you endeavoured to
 remove the impression!--and even before I returned to England, you took
 great pains to convince me, that all my uneasiness was occasioned by the
 effect of a worn-out constitution--and you concluded your letter with
 these words, "Business alone has kept me from you.--Come to any port, and
 I will fly down to my two dear girls with a heart all their own."
 
 With these assurances, is it extraordinary that I should believe what I
 wished? I might--and did think that you had a struggle with old
 propensities; but I still thought that I and virtue should at last
 prevail. I still thought that you had a magnanimity of character, which
 would enable you to conquer yourself.
 
 Imlay, believe me, it is not romance, you have acknowledged to me
 feelings of this kind.--You could restore me to life and hope, and the
 satisfaction you would feel, would amply repay you.
 
 In tearing myself from you, it is my own heart I pierce--and the time will
 come, when you will lament that you have thrown away a heart, that, even
 in the moment of passion, you cannot despise.--I would owe every thing to
 your generosity--but, for God's sake, keep me no longer in suspense!--Let
 me see you once more!--
 
 
 
 
 LETTER LXXVII
 
 
 _[London, Dec. 1795.]_
 
 You must do as you please with respect to the child.--I could wish that it
 might be done soon, that my name may be no more mentioned to you. It is
 now finished.--Convinced that you have neither regard nor friendship, I
 disdain to utter a reproach, though I have had reason to think, that the
 "forbearance" talked of, has not been very delicate.--It is however of no
 consequence.--I am glad you are satisfied with your own conduct.
 
 I now solemnly assure you, that this is an eternal farewel.--Yet I flinch
 not from the duties which tie me to life.
 
 That there is "sophistry" on one side or other, is certain; but now it
 matters not on which. On my part it has not been a question of words. Yet
 your understanding or mine must be strangely warped--for what you term
 "delicacy," appears to me to be exactly the contrary. I have no criterion
 for morality, and have thought in vain, if the sensations which lead you
 to follow an ancle or step, be the sacred foundation of principle and
 affection. Mine has been of a very different nature, or it would not have
 stood the brunt of your sarcasms.
 
 The sentiment in me is still sacred. If there be any part of me that will
 survive the sense of my misfortunes, it is the purity of my affections.
 The impetuosity of your senses, may have led you to term mere animal
 desire, the source of principle; and it may give zest to some years to
 come.--Whether you will always think so, I shall never know.
 
 It is strange that, in spite of all you do, something like conviction
 forces me to believe, that you are not what you appear to be.
 
 I part with you in peace.
 
 
 _Printed by Hazell, Watson & Viney, Ld., London and Aylesbury._
 
 
 
 
 Footnotes:
 
 [1] Dowden's "Life of Shelley."
 
 [2] The child is in a subsequent letter called the "barrier girl,"
 probably from a supposition that she owed her existence to this
 interview.--W. G.
 
 [3] This and the thirteen following letters appear to have been written
 during a separation of several months; the date, Paris.--W. G.
 
 [4] Some further letters, written during the remainder of the week, in a
 similar strain to the preceding, appear to have been destroyed by the
 person to whom they were addressed.--W. G.
 
 [5] Imlay went to Paris on March 11, after spending a fortnight at Havre,
 but he returned to Mary soon after the date of Letter XIX. In August he
 went to Paris, where he was followed by Mary. In September Imlay visited
 London on business.
 
 [6] The child spoken of in some preceding letters, had now been born a
 considerable time. She was born, May 14, 1794, and was named Fanny.--W. G.
 
 [7] She means, "the latter more than the former."--W. G.
 
 [8] This is the first of a series of letters written during a separation
 of many months, to which no cordial meeting ever succeeded. They were sent
 from Paris, and bear the address of London.--W. G.
 
 [9] The person to whom the letters are addressed [Imlay], was about this
 time at Ramsgate, on his return, as he professed, to Paris, when he was
 recalled, as it should seem, to London, by the further pressure of
 business now accumulated upon him.--W. G.
 
 [10] This probably alludes to some expression of [Imlay] the person to
 whom the letters are addressed, in which he treated as common evils,
 things upon which the letter-writer was disposed to bestow a different
 appellation.--W. G.
 
 [11] This passage refers to letters written under a purpose of suicide,
 and not intended to be opened till after the catastrophe.--W. G.
 
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Notes:
 
 Passages in italics are indicated by _italics_.
 
 The word "an" was corrected to "am" on page 151.
 
 The unmatched closing quotation mark on page 167 is presented as in the
 original text.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Love Letters of Mary
RESIDENCE IN SWEDEN, NORWAY, AND DENMARK***
 
 
 Transcribed from the 1889 Cassell & Company edition by David Price, email
 ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 CASSELL'S NATIONAL LIBRARY.
 
 
 
 
 
 LETTERS
 WRITTEN
 _DURING A SHORT RESIDENCE_
 IN
 SWEDEN, NORWAY, AND
 DENMARK
 
 
 BY
 MARY WOLLSTONECRAFT.
 
 CASSELL & COMPANY, Limited:
 _LONDON_, _PARIS_, _NEW YORK & MELBOURNE_.
 1889.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 Mary Wollstonecraft was born on the 27th of April, 1759.  Her father--a
 quick-tempered and unsettled man, capable of beating wife, or child, or
 dog--was the son of a manufacturer who made money in Spitalfields, when
 Spitalfields was prosperous.  Her mother was a rigorous Irishwoman, of
 the Dixons of Ballyshannon.  Edward John Wollstonecraft--of whose
 children, besides Mary, the second child, three sons and two daughters
 lived to be men and women--in course of the got rid of about ten thousand
 pounds, which had been left him by his father.  He began to get rid of it
 by farming.  Mary Wollstonecraft's first-remembered home was in a farm at
 Epping.  When she was five years old the family moved to another farm, by
 the Chelmsford Road.  When she was between six and seven years old they
 moved again, to the neighbourhood of Barking.  There they remained three
 years before the next move, which was to a farm near Beverley, in
 Yorkshire.  In Yorkshire they remained six years, and Mary Wollstonecraft
 had there what education fell to her lot between the ages of ten and
 sixteen.  Edward John Wollstonecraft then gave up farming to venture upon
 a commercial speculation.  This caused him to live for a year and a half
 at Queen's Row, Hoxton.  His daughter Mary was then sixteen; and while at
 Hoxton she had her education advanced by the friendly care of a deformed
 clergyman--a Mr. Clare--who lived next door, and stayed so much at home
 that his one pair of shoes had lasted him for fourteen years.
 
 But Mary Wollstonecraft's chief friend at this time was an accomplished
 girl only two years older than herself, who maintained her father,
 mother, and family by skill in drawing.  Her name was Frances Blood, and
 she especially, by her example and direct instruction, drew out her young
 friend's powers.  In 1776, Mary Wollstonecraft's father, a rolling stone,
 rolled into Wales.  Again he was a farmer.  Next year again he was a
 Londoner; and Mary had influence enough to persuade him to choose a house
 at Walworth, where she would be near to her friend Fanny.  Then, however,
 the conditions of her home life caused her to be often on the point of
 going away to earn a living for herself.  In 1778, when she was nineteen,
 Mary Wollstonecraft did leave home, to take a situation as companion with
 a rich tradesman's widow at Bath, of whom it was said that none of her
 companions could stay with her.  Mary Wollstonecraft, nevertheless,
 stayed two years with the difficult widow, and made herself respected.
 Her mother's failing health then caused Mary to return to her.  The
 father was then living at Enfield, and trying to save the small remainder
 of his means by not venturing upon any business at all.  The mother died
 after long suffering, wholly dependent on her daughter Mary's constant
 care.  The mother's last words were often quoted by Mary Wollstonecraft
 in her own last years of distress--"A little patience, and all will be
 over."
 
 After the mother's death, Mary Wollstonecraft left home again, to live
 with her friend, Fanny Blood, who was at Walham Green.  In 1782 she went
 to nurse a married sister through a dangerous illness.  The father's need
 of support next pressed upon her.  He had spent not only his own money,
 but also the little that had been specially reserved for his children.  It
 is said to be the privilege of a passionate man that he always gets what
 he wants; he gets to be avoided, and they never find a convenient corner
 of their own who shut themselves out from the kindly fellowship of life.
 
 In 1783 Mary Wollstonecraft--aged twenty-four--with two of her sisters,
 joined Fanny Blood in setting up a day school at Islington, which was
 removed in a few months to Newington Green.  Early in 1785 Fanny Blood,
 far gone in consumption, sailed for Lisbon to marry an Irish surgeon who
 was settled there.  After her marriage it was evident that she had but a
 few months to live; Mary Wollstonecraft, deaf to all opposing counsel,
 then left her school, and, with help of money from a friendly woman, she
 went out to nurse her, and was by her when she died.  Mary Wollstonecraft
 remembered her loss ten years afterwards in these "Letters from Sweden
 and Norway," when she wrote: "The grave has closed over a dear friend,
 the friend of my youth; still she is present with me, and I hear her soft
 voice warbling as I stray over the heath."
 
 Mary Wollstonecraft left Lisbon for England late in December, 1785.  When
 she came back she found Fanny's poor parents anxious to go back to
 Ireland; and as she had been often told that she could earn by writing,
 she wrote a pamphlet of 162 small pages--"Thoughts on the Education of
 Daughters"--and got ten pounds for it.  This she gave to her friend's
 parents to enable them to go back to their kindred.  In all she did there
 is clear evidence of an ardent, generous, impulsive nature.  One day her
 friend Fanny Blood had repined at the unhappy surroundings in the home
 she was maintaining for her father and mother, and longed for a little
 home of her own to do her work in.  Her friend quietly found rooms, got
 furniture together, and told her that her little home was ready; she had
 only to walk into it.  Then it seemed strange to Mary Wollstonecraft that
 Fanny Blood was withheld by thoughts that had not been uppermost in the
 mood of complaint.  She thought her friend irresolute, where she had
 herself been generously rash.  Her end would have been happier had she
 been helped, as many are, by that calm influence of home in which some
 knowledge of the world passes from father and mother to son and daughter,
 without visible teaching and preaching, in easiest companionship of young
 and old from day to day.
 
 The little payment for her pamphlet on the "Education of Daughters"
 caused Mary Wollstonecraft to think more seriously of earning by her pen.
 The pamphlet seems also to have advanced her credit as a teacher.  After
 giving up her day school, she spent some weeks at Eton with the Rev. Mr.
 Prior, one of the masters there, who recommended her as governess to the
 daughters of Lord Kingsborough, an Irish viscount, eldest son of the Earl
 of Kingston.  Her way of teaching was by winning love, and she obtained
 the warm affection of the eldest of her pupils, who became afterwards
 Countess Mount-Cashel.  In the summer of 1787, Lord Kingsborough's
 family, including Mary Wollstonecraft, was at Bristol Hot-wells, before
 going to the Continent.  While there, Mary Wollstonecraft wrote her
 little tale published as "Mary, a Fiction," wherein there was much based
 on the memory of her own friendship for Fanny Blood.
 
 The publisher of Mary Wollstonecraft's "Thoughts on the Education of
 Daughters" was the same Joseph Johnson who in 1785 was the publisher of
 Cowper's "Task."  With her little story written and a little money saved,
 the resolve to live by her pen could now be carried out.  Mary
 Wollstonecraft, therefore, parted from her friends at Bristol, went to
 London, saw her publisher, and frankly told him her determination.  He
 met her with fatherly kindness, and received her as a guest in his house
 while she was making her arrangements.  At Michaelmas, 1787, she settled
 in a house in George Street, on the Surrey side of Blackfriars Bridge.
 There she produced a little book for children, of "Original Stories from
 Real Life," and earned by drudgery for Joseph Johnson.  She translated,
 she abridged, she made a volume of Selections, and she wrote for an
 "Analytical Review," which Mr. Johnson founded in the middle of the year
 1788.  Among the books translated by her was Necker "On the Importance of
 Religious Opinions."  Among the books abridged by her was Salzmann's
 "Elements of Morality."  With all this hard work she lived as sparely as
 she could, that she might help her family.  She supported her father.
 That she might enable her sisters to earn their living as teachers, she
 sent one of them to Paris, and maintained her there for two years; the
 other she placed in a school near London as parlour-boarder until she was
 admitted into it as a paid teacher.  She placed one brother at Woolwich
 to qualify for the Navy, and he obtained a lieutenant's commission.  For
 another brother, articled to an attorney whom he did not like, she
 obtained a transfer of indentures; and when it became clear that his
 quarrel was more with law than with the lawyers, she placed him with a
 farmer before fitting him out for emigration to America.  She then sent
 him, so well prepared for his work there that he prospered well.  She
 tried even to disentangle her father's affairs; but the confusion in them
 was beyond her powers of arrangement.  Added to all this faithful work,
 she took upon herself the charge of an orphan child, seven years old,
 whose mother had been in the number of her friends.  That was the life of
 Mary Wollstonecraft, thirty years old, in 1789, the year of the Fall of
 the Bastille; the noble life now to be touched in its enthusiasms by the
 spirit of the Revolution, to be caught in the great storm, shattered, and
 lost among its wrecks.
 
 To Burke's attack on the French Revolution Mary Wollstonecraft wrote an
 Answer--one of many answers provoked by it--that attracted much
 attention.  This was followed by her "Vindication of the Rights of
 Woman," while the air was full of declamation on the "Rights of Man."  The
 claims made in this little book were in advance of the opinion of that
 day, but they are claims that have in our day been conceded.  They are
 certainly not revolutionary in the opinion of the world that has become a
 hundred years older since the book was written.
 
 At this the Mary Wollstonecraft had moved to rooms in Store Street,
 Bedford Square.  She was fascinated by Fuseli the painter, and he was a
 married man.  She felt herself to be too strongly drawn towards him, and
 she went to Paris at the close of the year 1792, to break the spell.  She
 felt lonely and sad, and was not the happier for being in a mansion lent
 to her, from which the owner was away, and in which she lived surrounded
 by his servants.  Strong womanly instincts were astir within her, and
 they were not all wise folk who had been drawn around her by her generous
 enthusiasm for the new hopes of the world, that made it then, as
 Wordsworth felt, a very heaven to the young.
 
 Four months after she had gone to Paris, Mary Wollstonecraft met at the
 house of a merchant, with whose wife she had become intimate, an American
 named Gilbert Imlay.  He won her affections.  That was in April, 1793.  He
 had no means, and she had home embarrassments, for which she was
 unwilling that he should become in any way responsible.  A part of the
 new dream in some minds then was of a love too pure to need or bear the
 bondage of authority.  The mere forced union of marriage ties implied, it
 was said, a distrust of fidelity.  When Gilbert Imlay would have married
 Mary Wollstonecraft, she herself refused to bind him; she would keep him
 legally exempt from her responsibilities towards the father, sisters,
 brothers, whom she was supporting.  She took his name and called herself
 his wife, when the French Convention, indignant at the conduct of the
 British Government, issue a decree from the effects of which she would
 escape as the wife of a citizen of the United States.  But she did not
 marry.  She witnessed many of the horrors that came of the loosened
 passions of an untaught populace.  A child was born to her--a girl whom
 she named after the dead friend of her own girlhood.  And then she found
 that she had leant upon a reed.  She was neglected; and was at last
 forsaken.  Having sent her to London, Imlay there visited her, to explain
 himself away.  She resolved on suicide, and in dissuading her from that
 he gave her hope again.  He needed somebody who had good judgment, and
 who cared for his interests, to represent him in some business affairs in
 Norway.  She undertook to act for him, and set out on the voyage only a
 week after she had determined to destroy herself.
 
 The interest of this book which describes her travel is quickened by a
 knowledge of the heart-sorrow that underlies it all.  Gilbert Imlay had
 promised to meet her upon her return, and go with her to Switzerland.  But
 the letters she had from him in Sweden and Norway were cold, and she came
 back to find that she was wholly forsaken for an actress from a strolling
 company of players.  Then she went up the river to drown herself.  She
 paced the road at Putney on an October night, in 1795, in heavy rain,
 until her clothes were drenched, that she might sink more surely, and
 then threw herself from the top of Putney Bridge.
 
 She was rescued, and lived on with deadened spirit.  In 1796 these
 "Letters from Sweden and Norway" were published.  Early in 1797 she was
 married to William Godwin.  On the 10th of September in the same year, at
 the age of thirty-eight, Mary Wollstonecraft Godwin died, after the birth
 of the daughter who lived to become the wife of Shelley.  The mother also
 would have lived, if a womanly feeling, in itself to be respected, had
 not led her also to unwise departure from the customs of the world.  Peace
 be to her memory.  None but kind thoughts can dwell upon the life of this
 too faithful disciple of Rousseau.
 
 H. M.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER I.
 
 
 Eleven days of weariness on board a vessel not intended for the
 accommodation of passengers have so exhausted my spirits, to say nothing
 of the other causes, with which you are already sufficiently acquainted,
 that it is with some difficulty I adhere to my determination of giving
 you my observations, as I travel through new scenes, whilst warmed with
 the impression they have made on me.
 
 The captain, as I mentioned to you, promised to put me on shore at
 Arendall or Gothenburg in his way to Elsineur, but contrary winds obliged
 us to pass both places during the night.  In the morning, however, after
 we had lost sight of the entrance of the latter bay, the vessel was
 becalmed; and the captain, to oblige me, hanging out a signal for a
 pilot, bore down towards the shore.
 
 My attention was particularly directed to the lighthouse, and you can
 scarcely imagine with what anxiety I watched two long hours for a boat to
 emancipate me; still no one appeared.  Every cloud that flitted on the
 horizon was hailed as a liberator, till approaching nearer, like most of
 the prospects sketched by hope, it dissolved under the eye into
 disappointment.
 
 Weary of expectation, I then began to converse with the captain on the
 subject, and from the tenor of the information my questions drew forth I
 soon concluded that if I waited for a boat I had little chance of getting
 on shore at this place.  Despotism, as is usually the case, I found had
 here cramped the industry of man.  The pilots being paid by the king, and
 scantily, they will not run into any danger, or even quit their hovels,
 if they can possibly avoid it, only to fulfil what is termed their duty.
 How different is it on the English coast, where, in the most stormy
 weather, boats immediately hail you, brought out by the expectation of
 extraordinary profit.
 
 Disliking to sail for Elsineur, and still more to lie at anchor or cruise
 about the coast for several days, I exerted all my rhetoric to prevail on
 the captain to let me have the ship's boat, and though I added the most
 forcible of arguments, I for a long the addressed him in vain.
 
 It is a kind of rule at sea not to send out a boat.  The captain was a
 good-natured man; but men with common minds seldom break through general
 rules.  Prudence is ever the resort of weakness, and they rarely go as
 far as they may in any undertaking who are determined not to go beyond it
 on any account.  If, however, I had some trouble with the captain, I did
 not lose much time with the sailors, for they, all alacrity, hoisted out
 the boat the moment I obtained permission, and promised to row me to the
 lighthouse.
 
 I did not once allow myself to doubt of obtaining a conveyance from
 thence round the rocks--and then away for Gothenburg--confinement is so
 unpleasant.
 
 The day was fine, and I enjoyed the water till, approaching the little
 island, poor Marguerite, whose timidity always acts as a feeler before
 her adventuring spirit, began to wonder at our not seeing any
 inhabitants.  I did not listen to her.  But when, on landing, the same
 silence prevailed, I caught the alarm, which was not lessened by the
 sight of two old men whom we forced out of their wretched hut.  Scarcely
 human in their appearance, we with difficulty obtained an intelligible
 reply to our questions, the result of which was that they had no boat,
 and were not allowed to quit their post on any pretence.  But they
 informed us that there was at the other side, eight or ten miles over, a
 pilot's dwelling.  Two guineas tempted the sailors to risk the captain's
 displeasure, and once more embark to row me over.
 
 The weather was pleasant, and the appearance of the shore so grand that I
 should have enjoyed the two hours it took to reach it, but for the
 fatigue which was too visible in the countenances of the sailors, who,
 instead of uttering a complaint, were, with the thoughtless hilarity
 peculiar to them, joking about the possibility of the captain's taking
 advantage of a slight westerly breeze, which was springing up, to sail
 without them.  Yet, in spite of their good humour, I could not help
 growing uneasy when the shore, receding, as it were, as we advanced,
 seemed to promise no end to their toil.  This anxiety increased when,
 turning into the most picturesque bay I ever saw, my eyes sought in vain
 for the vestige of a human habitation.  Before I could determine what
 step to take in such a dilemma (for I could not bear to think of
 returning to the ship), the sight of a barge relieved me, and we hastened
 towards it for information.  We were immediately directed to pass some
 jutting rocks, when we should see a pilot's hut.
 
 There was a solemn silence in this scene which made itself be felt.  The
 sunbeams that played on the ocean, scarcely ruffled by the lightest
 breeze, contrasted with the huge dark rocks, that looked like the rude
 materials of creation forming the barrier of unwrought space, forcibly
 struck me, but I should not have been sorry if the cottage had not
 appeared equally tranquil.  Approaching a retreat where strangers,
 especially women, so seldom appeared, I wondered that curiosity did not
 bring the beings who inhabited it to the windows or door.  I did not
 immediately recollect that men who remain so near the brute creation, as
 only to exert themselves to find the food necessary to sustain life, have
 little or no imagination to call forth the curiosity necessary to
 fructify the faint glimmerings of mind which entitle them to rank as
 lords of the creation.  Had they either they could not contentedly remain
 rooted in the clods they so indolently cultivate.
 
 Whilst the sailors went to seek for the sluggish inhabitants, these
 conclusions occurred to me; and, recollecting the extreme fondness which
 the Parisians ever testify for novelty, their very curiosity appeared to
 me a proof of the progress they had made in refinement.  Yes, in the art
 of living--in the art of escaping from the cares which embarrass the
 first steps towards the attainment of the pleasures of social life.
 
 The pilots informed the sailors that they were under the direction of a
 lieutenant retired from the service, who spoke English; adding that they
 could do nothing without his orders, and even the offer of money could
 hardly conquer their laziness and prevail on them to accompany us to his
 dwelling.  They would not go with me alone, which I wanted them to have
 done, because I wished to dismiss the sailors as soon as possible.  Once
 more we rowed off, they following tardily, till, turning round another
 bold protuberance of the rocks, we saw a boat making towards us, and soon
 learnt that it was the lieutenant himself, coming with some earnestness
 to see who we were.
 
 To save the sailors any further toil, I had my baggage instantly removed
 into his boat; for, as he could speak English, a previous parley was not
 necessary, though Marguerite's respect for me could hardly keep her from
 expressing the fear, strongly marked on her countenance, which my putting
 ourselves into the power of a strange man excited.  He pointed out his
 cottage; and, drawing near to it, I was not sorry to see a female figure,
 though I had not, like Marguerite, been thinking of robberies, murders,
 or the other evil which instantly, as the sailors would have said, runs
 foul of a woman's imagination.
 
 On entering I was still better pleased to find a clean house, with some
 degree of rural elegance.  The beds were of muslin, coarse it is true,
 but dazzlingly white; and the floor was strewed over with little sprigs
 of juniper (the custom, as I afterwards found, of the country), which
 formed a contrast with the curtains, and produced an agreeable sensation
 of freshness, to soften the ardour of noon.  Still nothing was so
 pleasing as the alacrity of hospitality--all that the house afforded was
 quickly spread on the whitest linen.  Remember, I had just left the
 vessel, where, without being fastidious, I had continually been
 disgusted.  Fish, milk, butter, and cheese, and, I am sorry to add,
 brandy, the bane of this country, were spread on the board.  After we had
 dined hospitality made them, with some degree of mystery, bring us some
 excellent coffee.  I did not then know that it was prohibited.
 
 The good man of the house apologised for coming in continually, but
 declared that he was so glad to speak English he could not stay out.  He
 need not have apologised; I was equally glad of his company.  With the
 wife I could only exchange smiles, and she was employed observing the
 make of our clothes.  My hands, I found, had first led her to discover
 that I was the lady.  I had, of course, my quantum of reverences; for the
 politeness of the north seems to partake of the coldness of the climate
 and the rigidity of its iron-sinewed rocks.  Amongst the peasantry there
 is, however, so much of the simplicity of the golden age in this land of
 flint--so much overflowing of heart and fellow-feeling, that only
 benevolence and the honest sympathy of nature diffused smiles over my
 countenance when they kept me standing, regardless of my fatigue, whilst
 they dropped courtesy after courtesy.
 
 The situation of this house was beautiful, though chosen for convenience.
 The master being the officer who commanded all the pilots on the coast,
 and the person appointed to guard wrecks, it was necessary for him to fix
 on a spot that would overlook the whole bay.  As he had seen some
 service, he wore, not without a pride I thought becoming, a badge to
 prove that he had merited well of his country.  It was happy, I thought,
 that he had been paid in honour, for the stipend he received was little
 more than twelve pounds a year.  I do not trouble myself or you with the
 calculation of Swedish ducats.  Thus, my friend, you perceive the
 necessity of perquisites.  This same narrow policy runs through
 everything.  I shall have occasion further to animadvert on it.
 
 Though my host amused me with an account of himself, which gave me aim
 idea of the manners of the people I was about to visit, I was eager to
 climb the rocks to view the country, and see whether the honest tars had
 regained their ship.  With the help of the lieutenant's telescope, I saw
 the vessel under way with a fair though gentle gale.  The sea was calm,
 playful even as the most shallow stream, and on the vast basin I did not
 see a dark speck to indicate the boat.  My conductors were consequently
 arrived.
 
 Straying further, my eye was attracted by the sight of some heartsease
 that peeped through the rocks.  I caught at it as a good omen, and going
 to preserve it in a letter that had not conveyed balm to my heart, a
 cruel remembrance suffused my eyes; but it passed away like an April
 shower.  If you are deep read in Shakespeare, you will recollect that
 this was the little western flower tinged by love's dart, which "maidens
 call love in idleness."  The gaiety of my babe was unmixed; regardless of
 omens or sentiments, she found a few wild strawberries more grateful than
 flowers or fancies.
 
 The lieutenant informed me that this was a commodious bay.  Of that I
 could not judge, though I felt its picturesque beauty.  Rocks were piled
 on rocks, forming a suitable bulwark to the ocean.  "Come no further,"
 they emphatically said, turning their dark sides to the waves to augment
 the idle roar.  The view was sterile; still little patches of earth of
 the most exquisite verdure, enamelled with the sweetest wild flowers,
 seemed to promise the goats and a few straggling cows luxurious herbage.
 How silent and peaceful was the scene!  I gazed around with rapture, and
 felt more of that spontaneous pleasure which gives credibility to our
 expectation of happiness than I had for a long, long time before.  I
 forgot the horrors I had witnessed in France, which had cast a gloom over
 all nature, and suffering the enthusiasm of my character--too often,
 gracious God! damped by the tears of disappointed affection--to be
 lighted up afresh, care took wing while simple fellow-feeling expanded my
 heart.
 
 To prolong this enjoyment, I readily assented to the proposal of our host
 to pay a visit to a family, the master of which spoke English, who was
 the drollest dog in the country, he added, repeating some of his stories
 with a hearty laugh.
 
 I walked on, still delighted with the rude beauties of the scene; for the
 sublime often gave place imperceptibly to the beautiful, dilating the
 emotions which were painfully concentrated.
 
 When we entered this abode, the largest I had yet seen, I was introduced
 to a numerous family; but the father, from whom I was led to expect so
 much entertainment, was absent.  The lieutenant consequently was obliged
 to be the interpreter of our reciprocal compliments.  The phrases were
 awkwardly transmitted, it is true; but looks and gestures were sufficient
 to make them intelligible and interesting.  The girls were all vivacity,
 and respect for me could scarcely keep them from romping with my host,
 who, asking for a pinch of snuff, was presented with a box, out of which
 an artificial mouse, fastened to the bottom, sprang.  Though this trick
 had doubtless been played the out of mind, yet the laughter it excited
 was not less genuine.
 
 They were overflowing with civility; but, to prevent their almost killing
 my babe with kindness, I was obliged to shorten my visit; and two or
 three of the girls accompanied us, bringing with them a part of whatever
 the house afforded to contribute towards rendering my supper more
 plentiful; and plentiful in fact it was, though I with difficulty did
 honour to some of the dishes, not relishing the quantity of sugar and
 spices put into everything.  At supper my host told me bluntly that I was
 a woman of observation, for I asked him _men's questions_.
 
 The arrangements for my journey were quickly made.  I could only have a
 car with post-horses, as I did not choose to wait till a carriage could
 be sent for to Gothenburg.  The expense of my journey (about one or two
 and twenty English miles) I found would not amount to more than eleven or
 twelve shillings, paying, he assured me, generously.  I gave him a guinea
 and a half.  But it was with the greatest difficulty that I could make
 him take so much--indeed anything--for my lodging and fare.  He declared
 that it was next to robbing me, explaining how much I ought to pay on the
 road.  However, as I was positive, he took the guinea for himself; but,
 as a condition, insisted on accompanying me, to prevent my meeting with
 any trouble or imposition on the way.
 
 I then retired to my apartment with regret.  The night was so fine that I
 would gladly have rambled about much longer, yet, recollecting that I
 must rise very early, I reluctantly went to bed; but my senses had been
 so awake, and my imagination still continued so busy, that I sought for
 rest in vain.  Rising before six, I scented the sweet morning air; I had
 long before heard the birds twittering to hail the dawning day, though it
 could scarcely have been allowed to have departed.
 
 Nothing, in fact, can equal the beauty of the northern summer's evening
 and night, if night it may be called that only wants the glare of day,
 the full light which frequently seems so impertinent, for I could write
 at midnight very well without a candle.  I contemplated all Nature at
 rest; the rocks, even grown darker in their appearance, looked as if they
 partook of the general repose, and reclined more heavily on their
 foundation.  "What," I exclaimed, "is this active principle which keeps
 me still awake?  Why fly my thoughts abroad, when everything around me
 appears at home?"  My child was sleeping with equal calmness--innocent
 and sweet as the closing flowers.  Some recollections, attached to the
 idea of home, mingled with reflections respecting the state of society I
 had been contemplating that evening, made a tear drop on the rosy cheek I
 had just kissed, and emotions that trembled on the brink of ecstasy and
 agony gave a poignancy to my sensations which made me feel more alive
 than usual.
 
 What are these imperious sympathies?  How frequently has melancholy and
 even misanthropy taken possession of me, when the world has disgusted me,
 and friends have proved unkind.  I have then considered myself as a
 particle broken off from the grand mass of mankind; I was alone, till
 some involuntary sympathetic emotion, like the attraction of adhesion,
 made me feel that I was still a part of a mighty whole, from which I
 could not sever myself--not, perhaps, for the reflection has been carried
 very far, by snapping the thread of an existence, which loses its charms
 in proportion as the cruel experience of life stops or poisons the
 current of the heart.  Futurity, what hast thou not to give to those who
 know that there is such a thing as happiness!  I speak not of
 philosophical contentment, though pain has afforded them the strongest
 conviction of it.
 
 After our coffee and milk--for the mistress of the house had been roused
 long before us by her hospitality--my baggage was taken forward in a boat
 by my host, because the car could not safely have been brought to the
 house.
 
 The road at first was very rocky and troublesome, but our driver was
 careful, and the horses accustomed to the frequent and sudden acclivities
 and descents; so that, not apprehending any danger, I played with my
 girl, whom I would not leave to Marguerite's care, on account of her
 timidity.
 
 Stopping at a little inn to bait the horses, I saw the first countenance
 in Sweden that displeased me, though the man was better dressed than any
 one who had as yet fallen in my way.  An altercation took place between
 him and my host, the purport of which I could not guess, excepting that I
 was the occasion of it, be it what it would.  The sequel was his leaving
 the house angrily; and I was immediately informed that he was the custom-
 house officer.  The professional had indeed effaced the national
 character, for, living as he did within these frank hospitable people,
 still only the exciseman appeared, the counterpart of some I had met with
 in England and France.  I was unprovided with a passport, not having
 entered any great town.  At Gothenburg I knew I could immediately obtain
 one, and only the trouble made me object to the searching my trunks.  He
 blustered for money; but the lieutenant was determined to guard me,
 according to promise, from imposition.
 
 To avoid being interrogated at the town-gate, and obliged to go in the
 rain to give an account of myself (merely a form) before we could get the
 refreshment we stood in need of, he requested us to descend--I might have
 said step--from our car, and walk into town.
 
 I expected to have found a tolerable inn, but was ushered into a most
 comfortless one; and, because it was about five o'clock, three or four
 hours after their dining hour, I could not prevail on them to give me
 anything warm to eat.
 
 The appearance of the accommodations obliged me to deliver one of my
 recommendatory letters, and the gentleman to whom it was addressed sent
 to look out for a lodging for me whilst I partook of his supper.  As
 nothing passed at this supper to characterise the country, I shall here
 close my letter.
 
 Yours truly.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER II.
 
 
 Gothenburg is a clean airy town, and, having been built by the Dutch, has
 canals running through each street; and in some of them there are rows of
 trees that would render it very pleasant were it not for the pavement,
 which is intolerably bad.
 
 There are several rich commercial houses--Scotch, French, and Swedish;
 but the Scotch, I believe, have been the most successful.  The commerce
 and commission business with France since the war has been very
 lucrative, and enriched the merchants I am afraid at the expense of the
 other inhabitants, by raising the price of the necessaries of life.
 
 As all the men of consequence--I mean men of the largest fortune--are
 merchants, their principal enjoyment is a relaxation from business at the
 table, which is spread at, I think, too early an hour (between one and
 two) for men who have letters to write and accounts to settle after
 paying due respect to the bottle.
 
 However, when numerous circles are to be brought together, and when
 neither literature nor public amusements furnish topics for conversation,
 a good dinner appears to be the only centre to rally round, especially as
 scandal, the zest of more select parties, can only be whispered.  As for
 politics, I have seldom found it a subject of continual discussion in a
 country town in any part of the world.  The politics of the place, being
 on a smaller scale, suits better with the size of their faculties; for,
 generally speaking, the sphere of observation determines the extent of
 the mind.
 
 The more I see of the world, the more I am convinced that civilisation is
 a blessing not sufficiently estimated by those who have not traced its
 progress; for it not only refines our enjoyments, but produces a variety
 which enables us to retain the primitive delicacy of our sensations.
 Without the aid of the imagination all the pleasures of the senses must
 sink into grossness, unless continual novelty serve as a substitute for
 the imagination, which, being impossible, it was to this weariness, I
 suppose, that Solomon alluded when he declared that there was nothing new
 under the sun!--nothing for the common sensations excited by the senses.
 Yet who will deny that the imagination and understanding have made many,
 very many discoveries since those days, which only seem harbingers of
 others still more noble and beneficial?  I never met with much
 imagination amongst people who had not acquired a habit of reflection;
 and in that state of society in which the judgment and taste are not
 called forth, and formed by the cultivation of the arts and sciences,
 little of that delicacy of feeling and thinking is to be found
 characterised by the word sentiment.  The want of scientific pursuits
 perhaps accounts for the hospitality, as well as for the cordial
 reception which strangers receive from the inhabitants of small towns.
 
 Hospitality has, I think, been too much praised by travellers as a proof
 of goodness of heart, when, in my opinion, indiscriminate hospitality is
 rather a criterion by which you may form a tolerable estimate of the
 indolence or vacancy of a head; or, in other words, a fondness for social
 pleasures in which the mind not having its proportion of exercise, the
 bottle must be pushed about.
 
 These remarks are equally applicable to Dublin, the most hospitable city
 I ever passed through.  But I will try to confine my observations more
 particularly to Sweden.
 
 It is true I have only had a glance over a small part of it; yet of its
 present state of manners and acquirements I think I have formed a
 distinct idea, without having visited the capital--where, in fact, less
 of a national character is to be found than in the remote parts of the
 country.
 
 The Swedes pique themselves on their politeness; but far from being the
 polish of a cultivated mind, it consists merely of tiresome forms and
 ceremonies.  So far, indeed, from entering immediately into your
 character, and making you feel instantly at your ease, like the well-bred
 French, their over-acted civility is a continual restraint on all your
 actions.  The sort of superiority which a fortune gives when there is no
 superiority of education, excepting what consists in the observance of
 senseless forms, has a contrary effect than what is intended; so that I
 could not help reckoning the peasantry the politest people of Sweden,
 who, only aiming at pleasing you, never think of being admired for their
 behaviour.
 
 Their tables, like their compliments, seem equally a caricature of the
 French.  The dishes are composed, as well as theirs, of a variety of
 mixtures to destroy the native taste of the food without being as
 relishing.  Spices and sugar are put into everything, even into the
 bread; and the only way I can account for their partiality to
 high-seasoned dishes is the constant use of salted provisions.  Necessity
 obliges them to lay up a store of dried fish and salted meat for the
 winter; and in summer, fresh meat and fish taste insipid after them.  To
 which may be added the constant use of spirits.  Every day, before dinner
 and supper, even whilst the dishes are cooling on the table, men and
 women repair to a side-table; and to obtain an appetite eat bread-and-
 butter, cheese, raw salmon, or anchovies, drinking a glass of brandy.
 Salt fish or meat then immediately follows, to give a further whet to the
 stomach.  As the dinner advances, pardon me for taking up a few minutes
 to describe what, alas! has detained me two or three hours on the stretch
 observing, dish after dish is changed, in endless rotation, and handed
 round with solemn pace to each guest; but should you happen not to like
 the first dishes, which was often my case, it is a gross breach of
 politeness to ask for part of any other till its turn comes.  But have
 patience, and there will be eating enough.  Allow me to run over the acts
 of a visiting day, not overlooking the interludes.
 
 Prelude a luncheon--then a succession of fish, flesh, and fowl for two
 hours, during which time the dessert--I was sorry for the strawberries
 and cream--rests on the table to be impregnated by the fumes of the
 viands.  Coffee immediately follows in the drawing-room, but does not
 preclude punch, ale, tea and cakes, raw salmon, &c.  A supper brings up
 the rear, not forgetting the introductory luncheon, almost equalling in
 removes the dinner.  A day of this kind you would imagine sufficient; but
 a to-morrow and a to-morrow--A never-ending, still-beginning feast may be
 bearable, perhaps, when stern winter frowns, shaking with chilling aspect
 his hoary locks; but during a summer, sweet as fleeting, let me, my kind
 strangers, escape sometimes into your fir groves, wander on the margin of
 your beautiful lakes, or climb your rocks, to view still others in
 endless perspective, which, piled by more than giant's hand, scale the
 heavens to intercept its rays, or to receive the parting tinge of
 lingering day--day that, scarcely softened unto twilight, allows the
 freshening breeze to wake, and the moon to burst forth in all her glory
 to glide with solemn elegance through the azure expanse.
 
 The cow's bell has ceased to tinkle the herd to rest; they have all paced
 across the heath.  Is not this the witching time of night?  The waters
 murmur, and fall with more than mortal music, and spirits of peace walk
 abroad to calm the agitated breast.  Eternity is in these moments.
 Worldly cares melt into the airy stuff that dreams are made of, and
 reveries, mild and enchanting as the first hopes of love or the
 recollection of lost enjoyment, carry the hapless wight into futurity,
 who in bustling life has vainly strove to throw off the grief which lies
 heavy at the heart.  Good night!  A crescent hangs out in the vault
 before, which woos me to stray abroad.  It is not a silvery reflection of
 the sun, but glows with all its golden splendour.  Who fears the fallen
 dew?  It only makes the mown grass smell more fragrant.  Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER III.
 
 
 The population of Sweden has been estimated from two millions and a half
 to three millions; a small number for such an immense tract of country,
 of which only so much is cultivated--and that in the simplest manner--as
 is absolutely requisite to supply the necessaries of life; and near the
 seashore, whence herrings are easily procured, there scarcely appears a
 vestige of cultivation.  The scattered huts that stand shivering on the
 naked rocks, braving the pitiless elements, are formed of logs of wood
 rudely hewn; and so little pains are taken with the craggy foundation
 that nothing hike a pathway points out the door.
 
 Gathered into himself by the cold, lowering his visage to avoid the
 cutting blast, is it surprising that the churlish pleasure of drinking
 drams takes place of social enjoyments amongst the poor, especially if we
 take into the account that they mostly live on high-seasoned provision
 and rye bread?  Hard enough, you may imagine, as it is baked only once a
 year.  The servants also, in most families, eat this kind of bread, and
 have a different kind of food from their masters, which, in spite of all
 the arguments I have heard to vindicate the custom, appears to me a
 remnant of barbarism.
 
 In fact, the situation of the servants in every respect, particularly
 that of the women, shows how far the Swedes are from having a just
 conception of rational equality.  They are not termed slaves; yet a man
 may strike a man with impunity because he pays him wages, though these
 wages are so low that necessity must teach them to pilfer, whilst
 servility renders them false and boorish.  Still the men stand up for the
 dignity of man by oppressing the women.  The most menial, and even
 laborious offices, are therefore left to these poor drudges.  Much of
 this I have seen.  In the winter, I am told, they take the linen down to
 the river to wash it in the cold water, and though their hands, cut by
 the ice, are cracked and bleeding, the men, their fellow-servants, will
 not disgrace their manhood by carrying a tub to lighten their burden.
 
 You will not be surprised to hear that they do not wear shoes or
 stockings, when I inform you that their wages are seldom more than twenty
 or thirty shillings per annum.  It is the custom, I know, to give them a
 new year's gift and a present at some other period, but can it all amount
 to a just indemnity for their labour?  The treatment of servants in most
 countries, I grant, is very unjust, and in England, that boasted land of
 freedom, it is often extremely tyrannical.  I have frequently, with
 indignation, heard gentlemen declare that they would never allow a
 servant to answer them; and ladies of the most exquisite sensibility, who
 were continually exclaiming against the cruelty of the vulgar to the
 brute creation, have in my presence forgot that their attendants had
 human feelings as well as forms.  I do not know a more agreeable sight
 than to see servants part of a family.  By taking an interest, generally
 speaking, in their concerns you inspire them with one for yours.  We must
 love our servants, or we shall never be sufficiently attentive to their
 happiness; and how can those masters be attentive to their happiness who,
 living above their fortunes, are more anxious to outshine their
 neighbours than to allow their household the innocent enjoyments they
 earn?
 
 It is, in fact, much more difficult for servants, who are tantalised by
 seeing and preparing the dainties of which they are not to partake, to
 remain honest, than the poor, whose thoughts are not led from their
 homely fare; so that, though the servants here are commonly thieves, you
 seldom hear of housebreaking, or robbery on the highway.  The country is,
 perhaps, too thinly inhabited to produce many of that description of
 thieves termed footpads, or highwaymen.  They are usually the spawn of
 great cities--the effect of the spurious desires generated by wealth,
 rather than the desperate struggles of poverty to escape from misery.
 
 The enjoyment of the peasantry was drinking brandy and coffee, before the
 latter was prohibited, and the former not allowed to be privately
 distilled, the wars carried on by the late king rendering it necessary to
 increase the revenue, and retain the specie in the country by every
 possible means.
 
 The taxes before the reign of Charles XII. were inconsiderable.  Since
 then the burden has continually been growing heavier, and the price of
 provisions has proportionately increased--nay, the advantage accruing
 from the exportation of corn to France and rye to Germany will probably
 produce a scarcity in both Sweden and Norway, should not a peace put a
 stop to it this autumn, for speculations of various kinds have already
 almost doubled the price.
 
 Such are the effects of war, that it saps the vitals even of the neutral
 countries, who, obtaining a sudden influx of wealth, appear to be
 rendered flourishing by the destruction which ravages the hapless nations
 who are sacrificed to the ambition of their governors.  I shall not,
 however, dwell on the vices, though they be of the most contemptible and
 embruting cast, to which a sudden accession of fortune gives birth,
 because I believe it may be delivered as an axiom, that it is only in
 proportion to the industry necessary to acquire wealth that a nation is
 really benefited by it.
 
 The prohibition of drinking coffee under a penalty, and the encouragement
 given to public distilleries, tend to impoverish the poor, who are not
 affected by the sumptuary laws; for the regent has lately laid very
 severe restraints on the articles of dress, which the middling class of
 people found grievous, because it obliged them to throw aside finery that
 might have lasted them for their lives.
 
 These may be termed vexatious; still the death of the king, by saving
 them from the consequences his ambition would naturally have entailed on
 them, may be reckoned a blessing.
 
 Besides, the French Revolution has not only rendered all the crowned
 heads more cautious, but has so decreased everywhere (excepting amongst
 themselves) a respect for nobility, that the peasantry have not only lost
 their blind reverence for their seigniors, but complain in a manly style
 of oppressions which before they did not think of denominating such,
 because they were taught to consider themselves as a different order of
 beings.  And, perhaps, the efforts which the aristocrats are making here,
 as well as in every other part of Europe, to secure their sway, will be
 the most effectual mode of undermining it, taking into the calculation
 that the King of Sweden, like most of the potentates of Europe, has
 continually been augmenting his power by encroaching on the privileges of
 the nobles.
 
 The well-bred Swedes of the capital are formed on the ancient French
 model, and they in general speak that language; for they have a knack at
 acquiring languages with tolerable fluency.  This may be reckoned an
 advantage in some respects; but it prevents the cultivation of their own,
 and any considerable advance in literary pursuits.
 
 A sensible writer has lately observed (I have not his work by me,
 therefore cannot quote his exact words), "That the Americans very wisely
 let the Europeans make their books and fashions for them."  But I cannot
 coincide with him in this opinion.  The reflection necessary to produce a
 certain number even of tolerable productions augments more than he is
 aware of the mass of knowledge in the community.  Desultory reading is
 commonly a mere pastime.  But we must have an object to refer our
 reflections to, or they will seldom go below the surface.  As in
 travelling, the keeping of a journal excites to many useful inquiries
 that would not have been thought of had the traveller only determined to
 see all he could see, without ever asking himself for what purpose.
 Besides, the very dabbling in literature furnishes harmless topics of
 conversation; for the not having such subjects at hand, though they are
 often insupportably fatiguing, renders the inhabitants of little towns
 prying and censorious.  Idleness, rather than ill-nature, gives birth to
 scandal, and to the observation of little incidents which narrows the
 mind.  It is frequently only the fear of being talked of which produces
 that puerile scrupulosity about trifles incompatible with an enlarged
 plan of usefulness, and with the basis of all moral principles--respect
 for the virtues which are not merely the virtues of convention.
 
 I am, my friend, more and more convinced that a metropolis, or an abode
 absolutely solitary, is the best calculated for the improvement of the
 heart, as well as the understanding; whether we desire to become
 acquainted with man, nature, or ourselves.  Mixing with mankind, we are
 obliged to examine our prejudices, and often imperceptibly lose, as we
 analyse them.  And in the country, growing intimate with nature, a
 thousand little circumstances, unseen by vulgar eyes, give birth to
 sentiments dear to the imagination, and inquiries which expand the soul,
 particularly when cultivation has not smoothed into insipidity all its
 originality of character.
 
 I love the country, yet whenever I see a picturesque situation chosen on
 which to erect a dwelling I am always afraid of the improvements.  It
 requires uncommon taste to form a whole, and to introduce accommodations
 and ornaments analogous with the surrounding-scene.
 
 It visited, near Gothenburg, a house with improved land about it, with
 which I was particularly delighted.  It was close to a lake embosomed in
 pine-clad rocks.  In one part of the meadows your eye was directed to the
 broad expanse, in another you were led into a shade, to see a part of it,
 in the form of a river, rush amongst the fragments of rocks and roots of
 trees; nothing seemed forced.  One recess, particularly grand and solemn
 amongst the towering cliffs, had a rude stone table and seat placed in
 it, that might have served for a Druid's haunt, whilst a placid stream
 below enlivened the flowers on its margin, where light-footed elves would
 gladly have danced their airy rounds.
 
 Here the hand of taste was conspicuous though not obtrusive, and formed a
 contrast with another abode in the same neighbourhood, on which much
 money had been lavished; where Italian colonnades were placed to excite
 the wonder of the rude crags, and a stone staircase, to threaten with
 destruction a wooden house.  Venuses and Apollos condemned to lie hid in
 snow three parts of the year seemed equally displaced, and called the
 attention off from the surrounding sublimity, without inspiring any
 voluptuous sensations.  Yet even these abortions of vanity have been
 useful.  Numberless workmen have been employed, and the superintending
 artist has improved the labourers, whose unskilfulness tormented him, by
 obliging them to submit to the discipline of rules.  Adieu!
 
 Yours affectionately.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER IV.
 
 
 The severity of the long Swedish winter tends to render the people
 sluggish, for though this season has its peculiar pleasures, too much
 time is employed to guard against its inclemency.  Still as warm clothing
 is absolutely necessary, the women spin and the men weave, and by these
 exertions get a fence to keep out the cold.  I have rarely passed a knot
 of cottages without seeing cloth laid out to bleach, and when I entered,
 always found the women spinning or knitting.
 
 A mistaken tenderness, however, for their children, makes them even in
 summer load them with flannels, and having a sort of natural antipathy to
 cold water, the squalid appearance of the poor babes, not to speak of the
 noxious smell which flannel and rugs retain, seems a reply to a question
 I had often asked--Why I did not see more children in the villages I
 passed through?  Indeed the children appear to be nipt in the bud, having
 neither the graces nor charms of their age.  And this, I am persuaded, is
 much more owing to the ignorance of the mothers than to the rudeness of
 the climate.  Rendered feeble by the continual perspiration they are kept
 in, whilst every pore is absorbing unwholesome moisture, they give them,
 even at the breast, brandy, salt fish, and every other crude substance
 which air and exercise enables the parent to digest.
 
 The women of fortune here, as well as everywhere else, have nurses to
 suckle their children; and the total want of chastity in the lower class
 of women frequently renders them very unfit for the trust.
 
 You have sometimes remarked to me the difference of the manners of the
 country girls in England and in America; attributing the reserve of the
 former to the climate--to the absence of genial suns.  But it must be
 their stars, not the zephyrs, gently stealing on their senses, which here
 lead frail women astray.  Who can look at these rocks, and allow the
 voluptuousness of nature to be an excuse for gratifying the desires it
 inspires?  We must therefore, find some other cause beside
 voluptuousness, I believe, to account for the conduct of the Swedish and
 American country girls; for I am led to conclude, from all the
 observations I have made, that there is always a mixture of sentiment and
 imagination in voluptuousness, to which neither of them have much
 pretension.
 
 The country girls of Ireland and Wales equally feel the first impulse of
 nature, which, restrained in England by fear or delicacy, proves that
 society is there in a more advanced state.  Besides, as the mind is
 cultivated, and taste gains ground, the passions become stronger, and
 rest on something more stable than the casual sympathies of the moment.
 Health and idleness will always account for promiscuous amours; and in
 some degree I term every person idle, the exercise of whose mind does not
 bear some proportion to that of the body.
 
 The Swedish ladies exercise neither sufficiently; of course, grow very
 fat at an early age; and when they have not this downy appearance, a
 comfortable idea, you will say, in a cold climate, they are not
 remarkable for fine forms.  They have, however, mostly fine complexions;
 but indolence makes the lily soon displace the rose.  The quantity of
 coffee, spices, and other things of that kind, with want of care, almost
 universally spoil their teeth, which contrast but ill with their ruby
 lips.
 
 The manners of Stockholm are refined, I hear, by the introduction of
 gallantry; but in the country, romping and coarse freedoms, with coarser
 allusions, keep the spirits awake.  In the article of cleanliness, the
 women of all descriptions seem very deficient; and their dress shows that
 vanity is more inherent in women than taste.
 
 The men appear to have paid still less court to the graces.  They are a
 robust, healthy race, distinguished for their common sense and turn for
 humour, rather than for wit or sentiment.  I include not, as you may
 suppose, in this general character, some of the nobility and officers,
 who having travelled, are polite and well informed.
 
 I must own to you that the lower class of people here amuse and interest
 me much more than the middling, with their apish good breeding and
 prejudices.  The sympathy and frankness of heart conspicuous in the
 peasantry produces even a simple gracefulness of deportment which has
 frequently struck me as very picturesque; I have often also been touched
 by their extreme desire to oblige me, when I could not explain my wants,
 and by their earnest manner of expressing that desire.  There is such a
 charm in tenderness!  It is so delightful to love our fellow-creatures,
 and meet the honest affections as they break forth.  Still, my good
 friend, I begin to think that I should not like to live continually in
 the country with people whose minds have such a narrow range.  My heart
 would frequently be interested; but my mind would languish for more
 companionable society.
 
 The beauties of nature appear to me now even more alluring than in my
 youth, because my intercourse with the world has formed without vitiating
 my taste.  But, with respect to the inhabitants of the country, my fancy
 has probably, when disgusted with artificial manners, solaced itself by
 joining the advantages of cultivation with the interesting sincerity of
 innocence, forgetting the lassitude that ignorance will naturally
 produce.  I like to see animals sporting, and sympathise in their pains
 and pleasures.  Still I love sometimes to view the human face divine, and
 trace the soul, as well as the heart, in its varying lineaments.
 
 A journey to the country, which I must shortly make, will enable me to
 extend my remarks.--Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER V.
 
 
 Had I determined to travel in Sweden merely for pleasure, I should
 probably have chosen the road to Stockholm, though convinced, by repeated
 observation, that the manners of a people are best discriminated in the
 country.  The inhabitants of the capital are all of the same genus; for
 the varieties in the species we must, therefore, search where the
 habitations of men are so separated as to allow the difference of climate
 to have its natural effect.  And with this difference we are, perhaps,
 most forcibly struck at the first view, just as we form an estimate of
 the leading traits of a character at the first glance, of which intimacy
 afterwards makes us almost lose sight.
 
 As my affairs called me to Stromstad (the frontier town of Sweden) in my
 way to Norway, I was to pass over, I heard, the most uncultivated part of
 the country.  Still I believe that the grand features of Sweden are the
 same everywhere, and it is only the grand features that admit of
 description.  There is an individuality in every prospect, which remains
 in the memory as forcibly depicted as the particular features that have
 arrested our attention; yet we cannot find words to discriminate that
 individuality so as to enable a stranger to say, this is the face, that
 the view.  We may amuse by setting the imagination to work; but we cannot
 store the memory with a fact.
 
 As I wish to give you a general idea of this country, I shall continue in
 my desultory manner to make such observations and reflections as the
 circumstances draw forth, without losing time, by endeavouring to arrange
 them.
 
 Travelling in Sweden is very cheap, and even commodious, if you make but
 the proper arrangements.  Here, as in other parts of the Continent, it is
 necessary to have your own carriage, and to have a servant who can speak
 the language, if you are unacquainted with it.  Sometimes a servant who
 can drive would be found very useful, which was our case, for I travelled
 in company with two gentlemen, one of whom had a German servant who drove
 very well.  This was all the party; for not intending to make a long
 stay, I left my little girl behind me.
 
 As the roads are not much frequented, to avoid waiting three or four
 hours for horses, we sent, as is the constant custom, an _avant courier_
 the night before, to order them at every post, and we constantly found
 them ready.  Our first set I jokingly termed requisition horses; but
 afterwards we had almost always little spirited animals that went on at a
 round pace.
 
 The roads, making allowance for the ups and downs, are uncommonly good
 and pleasant.  The expense, including the postillions and other
 incidental things, does not amount to more than a shilling the Swedish
 mile.
 
 The inns are tolerable; but not liking the rye bread, I found it
 necessary to furnish myself with some wheaten before I set out.  The
 beds, too, were particularly disagreeable to me.  It seemed to me that I
 was sinking into a grave when I entered them; for, immersed in down
 placed in a sort of box, I expected to be suffocated before morning.  The
 sleeping between two down beds--they do so even in summer--must be very
 unwholesome during any season; and I cannot conceive how the people can
 bear it, especially as the summers are very warm.  But warmth they seem
 not to feel; and, I should think, were afraid of the air, by always
 keeping their windows shut.  In the winter, I am persuaded, I could not
 exist in rooms thus closed up, with stoves heated in their manner, for
 they only put wood into them twice a day; and, when the stove is
 thoroughly heated, they shut the flue, not admitting any air to renew its
 elasticity, even when the rooms are crowded with company.  These stoves
 are made of earthenware, and often in a form that ornaments an apartment,
 which is never the case with the heavy iron ones I have seen elsewhere.
 Stoves may be economical, but I like a fire, a wood one, in preference;
 and I am convinced that the current of air which it attracts renders this
 the best mode of warming rooms.
 
 We arrived early the second evening at a little village called Quistram,
 where we had determined to pass the night, having been informed that we
 should not afterwards find a tolerable inn until we reached Stromstad.
 
 Advancing towards Quistram, as the sun was beginning to decline, I was
 particularly impressed by the beauty of the situation.  The road was on
 the declivity of a rocky mountain, slightly covered with a mossy herbage
 and vagrant firs.  At the bottom, a river, straggling amongst the
 recesses of stone, was hastening forward to the ocean and its grey rocks,
 of which we had a prospect on the left; whilst on the right it stole
 peacefully forward into the meadows, losing itself in a thickly-wooded
 rising ground.  As we drew near, the loveliest banks of wild flowers
 variegated the prospect, and promised to exhale odours to add to the
 sweetness of the air, the purity of which you could almost see, alas! not
 smell, for the putrefying herrings, which they use as manure, after the
 oil has been extracted, spread over the patches of earth, claimed by
 cultivation, destroyed every other.
 
 It was intolerable, and entered with us into the inn, which was in other
 respects a charming retreat.
 
 Whilst supper was preparing I crossed the bridge, and strolled by the
 river, listening to its murmurs.  Approaching the bank, the beauty of
 which had attracted my attention in the carriage, I recognised many of my
 old acquaintance growing with great luxuriance.
 
 Seated on it, I could not avoid noting an obvious remark.  Sweden
 appeared to me the country in the world most proper to form the botanist
 and natural historian; every object seemed to remind me of the creation
 of things, of the first efforts of sportive nature.  When a country
 arrives at a certain state of perfection, it looks as if it were made so;
 and curiosity is not excited.  Besides, in social life too many objects
 occur for any to be distinctly observed by the generality of mankind; yet
 a contemplative man, or poet, in the country--I do not mean the country
 adjacent to cities--feels and sees what would escape vulgar eyes, and
 draws suitable inferences.  This train of reflections might have led me
 further, in every sense of the word; but I could not escape from the
 detestable evaporation of the herrings, which poisoned all my pleasure.
 
 After making a tolerable supper--for it is not easy to get fresh
 provisions on the road--I retired, to be lulled to sleep by the murmuring
 of a stream, of which I with great difficulty obtained sufficient to
 perform my daily ablutions.
 
 The last battle between the Danes and Swedes, which gave new life to
 their ancient enmity, was fought at this place 1788; only seventeen or
 eighteen were killed, for the great superiority of the Danes and
 Norwegians obliged the Swedes to submit; but sickness, and a scarcity of
 provision, proved very fatal to their opponents on their return.
 
 It would be very easy to search for the particulars of this engagement in
 the publications of the day; but as this manner of filling my pages does
 not come within my plan, I probably should not have remarked that the
 battle was fought here, were it not to relate an anecdote which I had
 from good authority.
 
 I noticed, when I first mentioned this place to you, that we descended a
 steep before we came to the inn; an immense ridge of rocks stretching out
 on one side.  The inn was sheltered under them; and about a hundred yards
 from it was a bridge that crossed the river, the murmurs of which I have
 celebrated; it was not fordable.  The Swedish general received orders to
 stop at the bridge and dispute the passage--a most advantageous post for
 an army so much inferior in force; but the influence of beauty is not
 confined to courts.  The mistress of the inn was handsome; when I saw her
 there were still some remains of beauty; and, to preserve her house, the
 general gave up the only tenable station.  He was afterwards broke for
 contempt of orders.
 
 Approaching the frontiers, consequently the sea, nature resumed an aspect
 ruder and ruder, or rather seemed the bones of the world waiting to be
 clothed with everything necessary to give life and beauty.  Still it was
 sublime.
 
 The clouds caught their hue of the rocks that menaced them.  The sun
 appeared afraid to shine, the birds ceased to sing, and the flowers to
 bloom; but the eagle fixed his nest high amongst the rocks, and the
 vulture hovered over this abode of desolation.  The farm houses, in which
 only poverty resided, were formed of logs scarcely keeping off the cold
 and drifting snow: out of them the inhabitants seldom peeped, and the
 sports or prattling of children was neither seen or heard.  The current
 of life seemed congealed at the source: all were not frozen, for it was
 summer, you remember; but everything appeared so dull that I waited to
 see ice, in order to reconcile me to the absence of gaiety.
 
 The day before, my attention had frequently been attracted by the wild
 beauties of the country we passed through.
 
 The rocks which tossed their fantastic heads so high were often covered
 with pines and firs, varied in the most picturesque manner.  Little woods
 filled up the recesses when forests did not darken the scene, and valleys
 and glens, cleared of the trees, displayed a dazzling verdure which
 contrasted with the gloom of the shading pines.  The eye stole into many
 a covert where tranquillity seemed to have taken up her abode, and the
 number of little lakes that continually presented themselves added to the
 peaceful composure of the scenery.  The little cultivation which appeared
 did not break the enchantment, nor did castles rear their turrets aloft
 to crush the cottages, and prove that man is more savage than the natives
 of the woods.  I heard of the bears but never saw them stalk forth, which
 I was sorry for; I wished to have seen one in its wild state.  In the
 winter, I am told, they sometimes catch a stray cow, which is a heavy
 loss to the owner.
 
 The farms are small.  Indeed most of the houses we saw on the road
 indicated poverty, or rather that the people could just live.  Towards
 the frontiers they grew worse and worse in their appearance, as if not
 willing to put sterility itself out of countenance.  No gardens smiled
 round the habitations, not a potato or cabbage to eat with the fish
 drying on a stick near the door.  A little grain here and there appeared,
 the long stalks of which you might almost reckon.  The day was gloomy
 when we passed over this rejected spot, the wind bleak, and winter seemed
 to be contending with nature, faintly struggling to change the season.
 Surely, thought I, if the sun ever shines here it cannot warm these
 stones; moss only cleaves to them, partaking of their hardness, and
 nothing like vegetable life appears to cheer with hope the heart.
 
 So far from thinking that the primitive inhabitants of the world lived in
 a southern climate where Paradise spontaneously arose, I am led to infer,
 from various circumstances, that the first dwelling of man happened to be
 a spot like this which led him to adore a sun so seldom seen; for this
 worship, which probably preceded that of demons or demigods, certainly
 never began in a southern climate, where the continual presence of the
 sun prevented its being considered as a good; or rather the want of it
 never being felt, this glorious luminary would carelessly have diffused
 its blessings without being hailed as a benefactor.  Man must therefore
 have been placed in the north, to tempt him to run after the sun, in
 order that the different parts of the earth might be peopled.  Nor do I
 wonder that hordes of barbarians always poured out of these regions to
 seek for milder climes, when nothing like cultivation attached them to
 the soil, especially when we take into the view that the adventuring
 spirit, common to man, is naturally stronger and more general during the
 infancy of society.  The conduct of the followers of Mahomet, and the
 crusaders, will sufficiently corroborate my assertion.
 
 Approaching nearer to Stromstad, the appearance of the town proved to be
 quite in character with the country we had just passed through.  I
 hesitated to use the word country, yet could not find another; still it
 would sound absurd to talk of fields of rocks.
 
 The town was built on and under them.  Three or four weather-beaten trees
 were shrinking from the wind, and the grass grew so sparingly that I
 could not avoid thinking Dr. Johnson's hyperbolical assertion "that the
 man merited well of his country who made a few blades of grass grow where
 they never grew before," might here have been uttered with strict
 propriety.  The steeple likewise towered aloft, for what is a church,
 even amongst the Lutherans, without a steeple?  But to prevent mischief
 in such an exposed situation, it is wisely placed on a rock at some
 distance not to endanger the roof of the church.
 
 Rambling about, I saw the door open, and entered, when to my great
 surprise I found the clergyman reading prayers, with only the clerk
 attending.  I instantly thought of Swift's "Dearly beloved Roger," but on
 inquiry I learnt that some one had died that morning, and in Sweden it is
 customary to pray for the dead.
 
 The sun, who I suspected never dared to shine, began now to convince me
 that he came forth only to torment; for though the wind was still
 cutting, the rocks became intolerably warm under my feet, whilst the
 herring effluvia, which I before found so very offensive, once more
 assailed me.  I hastened back to the house of a merchant, the little
 sovereign of the place, because he was by far the richest, though not the
 mayor.
 
 Here we were most hospitably received, and introduced to a very fine and
 numerous family.  I have before mentioned to you the lilies of the north,
 I might have added, water lilies, for the complexion of many, even of the
 young women, seem to be bleached on the bosom of snow.  But in this
 youthful circle the roses bloomed with all their wonted freshness, and I
 wondered from whence the fire was stolen which sparkled in their fine
 blue eyes.
 
 Here we slept; and I rose early in the morning to prepare for my little
 voyage to Norway.  I had determined to go by water, and was to leave my
 companions behind; but not getting a boat immediately, and the wind being
 high and unfavourable, I was told that it was not safe to go to sea
 during such boisterous weather; I was, therefore, obliged to wait for the
 morrow, and had the present day on my hands, which I feared would be
 irksome, because the family, who possessed about a dozen French words
 amongst them and not an English phrase, were anxious to amuse me, and
 would not let me remain alone in my room.  The town we had already walked
 round and round, and if we advanced farther on the coast, it was still to
 view the same unvaried immensity of water surrounded by barrenness.
 
 The gentlemen, wishing to peep into Norway, proposed going to
 Fredericshall, the first town--the distance was only three Swedish miles.
 There and back again was but a day's journey, and would not, I thought,
 interfere with my voyage.  I agreed, and invited the eldest and prettiest
 of the girls to accompany us.  I invited her because I like to see a
 beautiful face animated by pleasure, and to have an opportunity of
 regarding the country, whilst the gentlemen were amusing themselves with
 her.
 
 I did not know, for I had not thought of it, that we were to scale some
 of the most mountainous cliffs of Sweden in our way to the ferry which
 separates the two countries.
 
 Entering amongst the cliffs, we were sheltered from the wind, warm
 sunbeams began to play, streams to flow, and groves of pines diversified
 the rocks.  Sometimes they became suddenly bare and sublime.  Once, in
 particular, after mounting the most terrific precipice, we had to pass
 through a tremendous defile, where the closing chasm seemed to threaten
 us with instant destruction, when, turning quickly, verdant meadows and a
 beautiful lake relieved and charmed my eyes.
 
 I had never travelled through Switzerland, but one of my companions
 assured me that I should not there find anything superior, if equal, to
 the wild grandeur of these views.
 
 As we had not taken this excursion into our plan, the horses had not been
 previously ordered, which obliged us to wait two hours at the first post.
 The day was wearing away.  The road was so bad that walking up the
 precipices consumed the time insensibly; but as we desired horses at each
 post ready at a certain hour, we reckoned on returning more speedily.
 
 We stopped to dine at a tolerable farm; they brought us out ham, butter,
 cheese, and milk, and the charge was so moderate that I scattered a
 little money amongst the children who were peeping at us, in order to pay
 them for their trouble.
 
 Arrived at the ferry, we were still detained, for the people who attend
 at the ferries have a stupid kind of sluggishness in their manner, which
 is very provoking when you are in haste.  At present I did not feel it,
 for, scrambling up the cliffs, my eye followed the river as it rolled
 between the grand rocky banks; and, to complete the scenery, they were
 covered with firs and pines, through which the wind rustled as if it were
 lulling itself to sleep with the declining sun.
 
 Behold us now in Norway; and I could not avoid feeling surprise at
 observing the difference in the manners of the inhabitants of the two
 sides of the river, for everything shows that the Norwegians are more
 industrious and more opulent.  The Swedes (for neighbours are seldom the
 best friends) accuse the Norwegians of knavery, and they retaliate by
 bringing a charge of hypocrisy against the Swedes.  Local circumstances
 probably render both unjust, speaking from their feelings rather than
 reason; and is this astonishing when we consider that most writers of
 travels have done the same, whose works have served as materials for the
 compilers of universal histories?  All are eager to give a national
 character, which is rarely just, because they do not discriminate the
 natural from the acquired difference.  The natural, I believe, on due
 consideration, will be found to consist merely in the degree of vivacity,
 or thoughtfulness, pleasures or pain, inspired by the climate, whilst the
 varieties which the forms of government, including religion, produce are
 much more numerous and unstable.
 
 A people have been characterised as stupid by nature; what a paradox!
 because they did not consider that slaves, having no object to stimulate
 industry; have not their faculties sharpened by the only thing that can
 exercise them, self-interest.  Others have been brought forward as
 brutes, having no aptitude for the arts and sciences, only because the
 progress of improvement had not reached that stage which produces them.
 
 Those writers who have considered the history of man, or of the human
 mind, on a more enlarged scale have fallen into similar errors, not
 reflecting that the passions are weak where the necessaries of life are
 too hardly or too easily obtained.
 
 Travellers who require that every nation should resemble their native
 country, had better stay at home.  It is, for example, absurd to blame a
 people for not having that degree of personal cleanliness and elegance of
 manners which only refinement of taste produces, and will produce
 everywhere in proportion as society attains a general polish.  The most
 essential service, I presume, that authors could render to society, would
 be to promote inquiry and discussion, instead of making those dogmatical
 assertions which only appear calculated to gird the human mind round with
 imaginary circles, like the paper globe which represents the one he
 inhabits.
 
 This spirit of inquiry is the characteristic of the present century, from
 which the succeeding will, I am persuaded, receive a great accumulation
 of knowledge; and doubtless its diffusion will in a great measure destroy
 the factitious national characters which have been supposed permanent,
 though only rendered so by the permanency of ignorance.
 
 Arriving at Fredericshall, at the siege of which Charles XII. lost his
 life, we had only time to take a transient view of it whilst they were
 preparing us some refreshment.
 
 Poor Charles!  I thought of him with respect.  I have always felt the
 same for Alexander, with whom he has been classed as a madman by several
 writers, who have reasoned superficially, confounding the morals of the
 day with the few grand principles on which unchangeable morality rests.
 Making no allowance for the ignorance and prejudices of the period, they
 do not perceive how much they themselves are indebted to general
 improvement for the acquirements, and even the virtues, which they would
 not have had the force of mind to attain by their individual exertions in
 a less advanced state of society.
 
 The evening was fine, as is usual at this season, and the refreshing
 odour of the pine woods became more perceptible, for it was nine o'clock
 when we left Fredericshall.  At the ferry we were detained by a dispute
 relative to our Swedish passport, which we did not think of getting
 countersigned in Norway.  Midnight was coming on, yet it might with such
 propriety have been termed the noon of night that, had Young ever
 travelled towards the north, I should not have wondered at his becoming
 enamoured of the moon.  But it is not the Queen of Night alone who reigns
 here in all her splendour, though the sun, loitering just below the
 horizon, decks her within a golden tinge from his car, illuminating the
 cliffs that hide him; the heavens also, of a clear softened blue, throw
 her forward, and the evening star appears a smaller moon to the naked
 eye.  The huge shadows of the rocks, fringed with firs, concentrating the
 views without darkening them, excited that tender melancholy which,
 sublimating the imagination, exalts rather than depresses the mind.
 
 My companions fell asleep--fortunately they did not snore; and I
 contemplated, fearless of idle questions, a night such as I had never
 before seen or felt, to charm the senses, and calm the heart.  The very
 air was balmy as it freshened into morn, producing the most voluptuous
 sensations.  A vague pleasurable sentiment absorbed me, as I opened my
 bosom to the embraces of nature; and my soul rose to its Author, with the
 chirping of the solitary birds, which began to feel, rather than see,
 advancing day.  I had leisure to mark its progress.  The grey morn,
 streaked with silvery rays, ushered in the orient beams (how beautifully
 varying into purple!), yet I was sorry to lose the soft watery clouds
 which preceded them, exciting a kind of expectation that made me almost
 afraid to breathe, lest I should break the charm.  I saw the sun--and
 sighed.
 
 One of my companions, now awake, perceiving that the postillion had
 mistaken the road, began to swear at him, and roused the other two, who
 reluctantly shook off sleep.
 
 We had immediately to measure back our steps, and did not reach Stromstad
 before five in the morning.
 
 The wind had changed in the night, and my boat was ready.
 
 A dish of coffee, and fresh linen, recruited my spirits, and I directly
 set out again for Norway, purposing to land much higher up the coast.
 
 Wrapping my great-coat round me, I lay down on some sails at the bottom
 of the boat, its motion rocking me to rest, till a discourteous wave
 interrupted my slumbers, and obliged me to rise and feel a solitariness
 which was not so soothing as that of the past night.
 
 Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER VI.
 
 
 The sea was boisterous, but, as I had an experienced pilot, I did not
 apprehend any danger.  Sometimes, I was told, boats are driven far out
 and lost.  However, I seldom calculate chances so nicely--sufficient for
 the day is the obvious evil!
 
 We had to steer amongst islands and huge rocks, rarely losing sight of
 the shore, though it now and then appeared only a mist that bordered the
 water's edge.  The pilot assured me that the numerous harbours on the
 Norway coast were very safe, and the pilot-boats were always on the
 watch.  The Swedish side is very dangerous, I am also informed; and the
 help of experience is not often at hand to enable strange vessels to
 steer clear of the rocks, which lurk below the water close to the shore.
 
 There are no tides here, nor in the Cattegate, and, what appeared to me a
 consequence, no sandy beach.  Perhaps this observation has been made
 before; but it did not occur to me till I saw the waves continually
 beating against the bare rocks, without ever receding to leave a sediment
 to harden.
 
 The wind was fair, till we had to tack about in order to enter Laurvig,
 where we arrived towards three o'clock in the afternoon.  It is a clean,
 pleasant town, with a considerable iron-work, which gives life to it.
 
 As the Norwegians do not frequently see travellers, they are very curious
 to know their business, and who they are--so curious, that I was half
 tempted to adopt Dr. Franklin's plan, when travelling in America, where
 they are equally prying, which was to write on a paper, for public
 inspection, my name, from whence I came, where I was going, and what was
 my business.  But if I were importuned by their curiosity, their friendly
 gestures gratified me.  A woman coming alone interested them.  And I know
 not whether my weariness gave me a look of peculiar delicacy, but they
 approached to assist me, and inquire after my wants, as if they were
 afraid to hurt, and wished to protect me.  The sympathy I inspired, thus
 dropping down from the clouds in a strange land, affected me more than it
 would have done had not my spirits been harassed by various causes--by
 much thinking--musing almost to madness--and even by a sort of weak
 melancholy that hung about my heart at parting with my daughter for the
 first time.
 
 You know that, as a female, I am particularly attached to her; I feel
 more than a mother's fondness and anxiety when I reflect on the dependent
 and oppressed state of her sex.  I dread lest she should be forced to
 sacrifice her heart to her principles, or principles to her heart.  With
 trembling hand I shall cultivate sensibility and cherish delicacy of
 sentiment, lest, whilst I lend fresh blushes to the rose, I sharpen the
 thorns that will wound the breast I would fain guard; I dread to unfold
 her mind, lest it should render her unfit for the world she is to
 inhabit.  Hapless woman! what a fate is thine!
 
 But whither am I wandering?  I only meant to tell you that the impression
 the kindness of the simple people made visible on my countenance
 increased my sensibility to a painful degree.  I wished to have had a
 room to myself, for their attention, and rather distressing observation,
 embarrassed me extremely.  Yet, as they would bring me eggs, and make my
 coffee, I found I could not leave them without hurting their feelings of
 hospitality.
 
 It is customary here for the host and hostess to welcome their guests as
 master and mistress of the house.
 
 My clothes, in their turn, attracted the attention of the females, and I
 could not help thinking of the foolish vanity which makes many women so
 proud of the observation of strangers as to take wonder very gratuitously
 for admiration.  This error they are very apt to fall into when, arrived
 in a foreign country, the populace stare at them as they pass.  Yet the
 make of a cap or the singularity of a gown is often the cause of the
 flattering attention which afterwards supports a fantastic superstructure
 of self-conceit.
 
 Not having brought a carriage over with me, expecting to have met a
 person where I landed, who was immediately to have procured me one, I was
 detained whilst the good people of the inn sent round to all their
 acquaintance to search for a vehicle.  A rude sort of cabriole was at
 last found, and a driver half drunk, who was not less eager to make a
 good bargain on that account.  I had a Danish captain of a ship and his
 mate with me; the former was to ride on horseback, at which he was not
 very expert, and the latter to partake of my seat.  The driver mounted
 behind to guide the horses and flourish the whip over our shoulders; he
 would not suffer the reins out of his own hands.  There was something so
 grotesque in our appearance that I could not avoid shrinking into myself
 when I saw a gentleman-like man in the group which crowded round the door
 to observe us.  I could have broken the driver's whip for cracking to
 call the women and children together, but seeing a significant smile on
 the face, I had before remarked, I burst into a laugh to allow him to do
 so too, and away we flew.  This is not a flourish of the pen, for we
 actually went on full gallop a long time, the horses being very good;
 indeed, I have never met with better, if so good, post-horses as in
 Norway.  They are of a stouter make than the English horses, appear to be
 well fed, and are not easily tired.
 
 I had to pass over, I was informed, the most fertile and best cultivated
 tract of country in Norway.  The distance was three Norwegian miles,
 which are longer than the Swedish.  The roads were very good; the farmers
 are obliged to repair them; and we scampered through a great extent of
 country in a more improved state than any I had viewed since I left
 England.  Still there was sufficient of hills, dales, and rocks to
 prevent the idea of a plain from entering the head, or even of such
 scenery as England and France afford.  The prospects were also
 embellished by water, rivers, and lakes before the sea proudly claimed my
 regard, and the road running frequently through lofty groves rendered the
 landscapes beautiful, though they were not so romantic as those I had
 lately seen with such delight.
 
 It was late when I reached Tonsberg, and I was glad to go to bed at a
 decent inn.  The next morning the 17th of July, conversing with the
 gentleman with whom I had business to transact, I found that I should be
 detained at Tonsberg three weeks, and I lamented that I had not brought
 my child with me.
 
 The inn was quiet, and my room so pleasant, commanding a view of the sea,
 confined by an amphitheatre of hanging woods, that I wished to remain
 there, though no one in the house could speak English or French.  The
 mayor, my friend, however, sent a young woman to me who spoke a little
 English, and she agreed to call on me twice a day to receive my orders
 and translate them to my hostess.
 
 My not understanding the language was an excellent pretext for dining
 alone, which I prevailed on them to let me do at a late hour, for the
 early dinners in Sweden had entirely deranged my day.  I could not alter
 it there without disturbing the economy of a family where I was as a
 visitor, necessity having forced me to accept of an invitation from a
 private family, the lodgings were so incommodious.
 
 Amongst the Norwegians I had the arrangement of my own time, and I
 determined to regulate it in such a manner that I might enjoy as much of
 their sweet summer as I possibly could; short, it is true, but "passing
 sweet."
 
 I never endured a winter in this rude clime, consequently it was not the
 contrast, but the real beauty of the season which made the present summer
 appear to me the finest I had ever seen.  Sheltered from the north and
 eastern winds, nothing can exceed the salubrity, the soft freshness of
 the western gales.  In the evening they also die away; the aspen leaves
 tremble into stillness, and reposing nature seems to be warmed by the
 moon, which here assumes a genial aspect.  And if a light shower has
 chanced to fall with the sun, the juniper, the underwood of the forest,
 exhales a wild perfume, mixed with a thousand nameless sweets that,
 soothing the heart, leave images in the memory which the imagination will
 ever hold dear.
 
 Nature is the nurse of sentiment, the true source of taste; yet what
 misery, as well as rapture, is produced by a quick perception of the
 beautiful and sublime when it is exercised in observing animated nature,
 when every beauteous feeling and emotion excites responsive sympathy, and
 the harmonised soul sinks into melancholy or rises to ecstasy, just as
 the chords are touched, like the AEolian harp agitated by the changing
 wind.  But how dangerous is it to foster these sentiments in such an
 imperfect state of existence, and how difficult to eradicate them when an
 affection for mankind, a passion for an individual, is but the unfolding
 of that love which embraces all that is great and beautiful!
 
 When a warm heart has received strong impressions, they are not to be
 effaced.  Emotions become sentiments, and the imagination renders even
 transient sensations permanent by fondly retracing them.  I cannot,
 without a thrill of delight, recollect views I have seen, which are not
 to be forgotten, nor looks I have felt in every nerve, which I shall
 never more meet.  The grave has closed over a dear friend, the friend of
 my youth.  Still she is present with me, and I hear her soft voice
 warbling as I stray over the heath.  Fate has separated me from another,
 the fire of whose eyes, tempered by infantine tenderness, still warms my
 breast; even when gazing on these tremendous cliffs sublime emotions
 absorb my soul.  And, smile not, if I add that the rosy tint of morning
 reminds me of a suffusion which will never more charm my senses, unless
 it reappears on the cheeks of my child.  Her sweet blushes I may yet hide
 in my bosom, and she is still too young to ask why starts the tear so
 near akin to pleasure and pain.
 
 I cannot write any more at present.  To-morrow we will talk of Tonsberg.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER VII.
 
 
 Though the king of Denmark be an absolute monarch, yet the Norwegians
 appear to enjoy all the blessings of freedom.  Norway may be termed a
 sister kingdom; but the people have no viceroy to lord it over them, and
 fatten his dependants with the fruit of their labour.
 
 There are only two counts in the whole country who have estates, and
 exact some feudal observances from their tenantry.  All the rest of the
 country is divided into small farms, which belong to the cultivator.  It
 is true some few, appertaining to the Church, are let, but always on a
 lease for life, generally renewed in favour of the eldest son, who has
 this advantage as well as a right to a double portion of the property.
 But the value of the farm is estimated, and after his portion is assigned
 to him he must be answerable for the residue to the remaining part of the
 family.
 
 Every farmer for ten years is obliged to attend annually about twelve
 days to learn the military exercise, but it is always at a small distance
 from his dwelling, and does not lead him into any new habits of life.
 
 There are about six thousand regulars also in garrison at Christiania and
 Fredericshall, who are equally reserved, with the militia, for the
 defence of their own country.  So that when the Prince Royal passed into
 Sweden in 1788, he was obliged to request, not command, them to accompany
 him on this expedition.
 
 These corps are mostly composed of the sons of the cottagers, who being
 labourers on the farms, are allowed a few acres to cultivate for
 themselves.  These men voluntarily enlist, but it is only for a limited
 period (six years), at the expiration of which they have the liberty of
 retiring.  The pay is only twopence a day and bread; still, considering
 the cheapness of the country, it is more than sixpence in England.
 
 The distribution of landed property into small farms produces a degree of
 equality which I have seldom seen elsewhere; and the rich being all
 merchants, who are obliged to divide their personal fortune amongst their
 children, the boys always receiving twice as much as the girls, property
 has met a chance of accumulating till overgrowing wealth destroys the
 balance of liberty.
 
 You will be surprised to hear me talk of liberty; yet the Norwegians
 appear to me to be the most free community I have ever observed.
 
 The mayor of each town or district, and the judges in the country,
 exercise an authority almost patriarchal.  They can do much good, but
 little harm,--as every individual can appeal from their judgment; and as
 they may always be forced to give a reason for their conduct, it is
 generally regulated by prudence.  "They have not time to learn to be
 tyrants," said a gentleman to me, with whom I discussed the subject.
 
 The farmers not fearing to be turned out of their farms, should they
 displease a man in power, and having no vote to be commanded at an
 election for a mock representative, are a manly race; for not being
 obliged to submit to any debasing tenure in order to live, or advance
 themselves in the world, they act with an independent spirit.  I never
 yet have heard of anything like domineering or oppression, excepting such
 as has arisen from natural causes.  The freedom the people enjoy may,
 perhaps, render them a little litigious, and subject them to the
 impositions of cunning practitioners of the law; but the authority of
 office is bounded, and the emoluments of it do not destroy its utility.
 
 Last year a man who had abused his power was cashiered, on the
 representation of the people to the bailiff of the district.
 
 There are four in Norway who might with propriety be termed sheriffs; and
 from their sentence an appeal, by either party, may be made to
 Copenhagen.
 
 Near most of the towns are commons, on which the cows of all the
 inhabitants, indiscriminately, are allowed to graze.  The poor, to whom a
 cow is necessary, are almost supported by it.  Besides, to render living
 more easy, they all go out to fish in their own boats, and fish is their
 principal food.
 
 The lower class of people in the towns are in general sailors; and the
 industrious have usually little ventures of their own that serve to
 render the winter comfortable.
 
 With respect to the country at large, the importation is considerably in
 favour of Norway.
 
 They are forbidden, at present, to export corn or rye on account of the
 advanced price.
 
 The restriction which most resembles the painful subordination of
 Ireland, is that vessels, trading to the West Indies, are obliged to pass
 by their own ports, and unload their cargoes at Copenhagen, which they
 afterwards reship.  The duty is indeed inconsiderable, but the navigation
 being dangerous, they run a double risk.
 
 There is an excise on all articles of consumption brought to the towns;
 but the officers are not strict, and it would be reckoned invidious to
 enter a house to search, as in England.
 
 The Norwegians appear to me a sensible, shrewd people, with little
 scientific knowledge, and still less taste for literature; but they are
 arriving at the epoch which precedes the introduction of the arts and
 sciences.
 
 Most of the towns are seaports, and seaports are not favourable to
 improvement.  The captains acquire a little superficial knowledge by
 travelling, which their indefatigable attention to the making of money
 prevents their digesting; and the fortune that they thus laboriously
 acquire is spent, as it usually is in towns of this description, in show
 and good living.  They love their country, but have not much public
 spirit.  Their exertions are, generally speaking, only for their
 families, which, I conceive, will always be the case, till politics,
 becoming a subject of discussion, enlarges the heart by opening the
 understanding.  The French Revolution will have this effect.  They sing,
 at present, with great glee, many Republican songs, and seem earnestly to
 wish that the republic may stand; yet they appear very much attached to
 their Prince Royal, and, as far as rumour can give an idea of a
 character, he appears to merit their attachment.  When I am at
 Copenhagen, I shall be able to ascertain on what foundation their good
 opinion is built; at present I am only the echo of it.
 
 In the year 1788 he travelled through Norway; and acts of mercy gave
 dignity to the parade, and interest to the joy his presence inspired.  At
 this town he pardoned a girl condemned to die for murdering an
 illegitimate child, a crime seldom committed in this country.  She is
 since married, and become the careful mother of a family.  This might be
 given as an instance, that a desperate act is not always a proof of an
 incorrigible depravity of character, the only plausible excuse that has
 been brought forward to justify the infliction of capital punishments.
 
 I will relate two or three other anecdotes to you, for the truth of which
 I will not vouch because the facts were not of sufficient consequence for
 me to take much pains to ascertain them; and, true or false, they evince
 that the people like to make a kind of mistress of their prince.
 
 An officer, mortally wounded at the ill-advised battle of Quistram,
 desired to speak with the prince; and with his dying breath, earnestly
 recommended to his care a young woman of Christiania, to whom he was
 engaged.  When the prince returned there, a ball was given by the chief
 inhabitants: he inquired whether this unfortunate girl was invited, and
 requested that she might, though of the second class.  The girl came; she
 was pretty; and finding herself among her superiors, bashfully sat down
 as near the door as possible, nobody taking notice of her.  Shortly
 after, the prince entering, immediately inquired for her, and asked her
 to dance, to the mortification of the rich dames.  After it was over he
 handed her to the top of the room, and placing himself by her, spoke of
 the loss she had sustained, with tenderness, promising to provide for
 anyone she should marry, as the story goes.  She is since married, and he
 has not forgotten his promise.
 
 A little girl, during the same expedition, in Sweden, who informed him
 that the logs of a bridge were out underneath, was taken by his orders to
 Christiania, and put to school at his expense.
 
 Before I retail other beneficial effects of his journey, it is necessary
 to inform you that the laws here are mild, and do not punish capitally
 for any crime but murder, which seldom occurs.  Every other offence
 merely subjects the delinquent to imprisonment and labour in the castle,
 or rather arsenal at Christiania, and the fortress at Fredericshall.  The
 first and second conviction produces a sentence for a limited number of
 years--two, three, five, or seven, proportioned to the atrocity of the
 crime.  After the third he is whipped, branded in the forehead, and
 condemned to perpetual slavery.  This is the ordinary course of justice.
 For some flagrant breaches of trust, or acts of wanton cruelty, criminals
 have been condemned to slavery for life time first the of conviction, but
 not frequently.  The number of these slaves do not, I am informed, amount
 to more than a hundred, which is not considerable, compared with the
 population, upwards of eight hundred thousand.  Should I pass through
 Christiania, on my return to Gothenburg, I shall probably have an
 opportunity of learning other particulars.
 
 There is also a House of Correction at Christiania for trifling
 misdemeanours, where the women are confined to labour and imprisonment
 even for life.  The state of the prisoners was represented to the prince,
 in consequence of which he visited the arsenal and House of Correction.
 The slaves at the arsenal were loaded with irons of a great weight; he
 ordered them to be lightened as much as possible.
 
 The people in the House of Correction were commanded not to speak to him;
 but four women, condemned to remain there for life, got into the passage,
 and fell at his feet.  He granted them a pardon; and inquiring respecting
 the treatment of the prisoners, he was informed that they were frequently
 whipped going in, and coming out, and for any fault, at the discretion of
 the inspectors.  This custom he humanely abolished, though some of the
 principal inhabitants, whose situation in life had raised them above the
 temptation of stealing, were of opinion that these chastisements were
 necessary and wholesome.
 
 In short, everything seems to announce that the prince really cherishes
 the laudable ambition of fulfilling the duties of his station.  This
 ambition is cherished and directed by the Count Bernstorff, the Prime
 Minister of Denmark, who is universally celebrated for his abilities and
 virtue.  The happiness of the people is a substantial eulogium; and, from
 all I can gather, the inhabitants of Denmark and Norway are the least
 oppressed people of Europe.  The press is free.  They translate any of
 the French publications of the day, deliver their opinion on the subject,
 and discuss those it leads to with great freedom, and without fearing to
 displease the Government.
 
 On the subject of religion they are likewise becoming tolerant, at least,
 and perhaps have advanced a step further in free-thinking.  One writer
 has ventured to deny the divinity of Jesus Christ, and to question the
 necessity or utility of the Christian system, without being considered
 universally as a monster, which would have been the case a few years ago.
 They have translated many German works on education; and though they have
 not adopted any of their plans, it has become a subject of discussion.
 There are some grammar and free schools; but, from what I hear, not very
 good ones.  All the children learn to read, write, and cast accounts, for
 the purposes of common life.  They have no university; and nothing that
 deserves the name of science is taught; nor do individuals, by pursuing
 any branch of knowledge, excite a degree of curiosity which is the
 forerunner of improvement.  Knowledge is not absolutely necessary to
 enable a considerable portion of the community to live; and, till it is,
 I fear it never becomes general.
 
 In this country, where minerals abound, there is not one collection; and,
 in all probability, I venture a conjecture, the want of mechanical and
 chemical knowledge renders the silver mines unproductive, for the
 quantity of silver obtained every year is not sufficient to defray the
 expenses.  It has been urged that the employment of such a number of
 hands is very beneficial.  But a positive loss is never to be done away;
 and the men, thus employed, would naturally find some other means of
 living, instead of being thus a dead weight on Government, or rather on
 the community from whom its revenue is drawn.
 
 About three English miles from Tonsberg there is a salt work, belonging,
 like all their establishments, to Government, in which they employ above
 a hundred and fifty men, and maintain nearly five hundred people, who
 earn their living.  The clear profit, an increasing one, amounts to two
 thousand pounds sterling.  And as the eldest son of the inspector, an
 ingenious young man, has been sent by the Government to travel, and
 acquire some mathematical and chemical knowledge in Germany, it has a
 chance of being improved.  He is the only person I have met with here who
 appears to have a scientific turn of mind.  I do not mean to assert that
 I have not met with others who have a spirit of inquiry.
 
 The salt-works at St. Ubes are basins in the sand, and the sun produces
 the evaporation, but here there is no beach.  Besides, the heat of summer
 is so short-lived that it would be idle to contrive machines for such an
 inconsiderable portion of the year.  They therefore always use fires; and
 the whole establishment appears to be regulated with judgment.
 
 The situation is well chosen and beautiful.  I do not find, from the
 observation of a person who has resided here for forty years, that the
 sea advances or recedes on this coast.
 
 I have already remarked that little attention is paid to education,
 excepting reading, writing, and the rudiments of arithmetic; I ought to
 have added that a catechism is carefully taught, and the children obliged
 to read in the churches, before the congregation, to prove that they are
 not neglected.
 
 Degrees, to enable any one to practise any profession, must be taken at
 Copenhagen; and the people of this country, having the good sense to
 perceive that men who are to live in a community should at least acquire
 the elements of their knowledge, and form their youthful attachments
 there, are seriously endeavouring to establish a university in Norway.
 And Tonsberg, as a central place in the best part of the country, had the
 most suffrages, for, experiencing the bad effects of a metropolis, they
 have determined not to have it in or near Christiania.  Should such an
 establishment take place, it will promote inquiry throughout the country,
 and give a new face to society.  Premiums have been offered, and prize
 questions written, which I am told have merit.  The building
 college-halls, and other appendages of the seat of science, might enable
 Tonsberg to recover its pristine consequence, for it is one of the most
 ancient towns of Norway, and once contained nine churches.  At present
 there are only two.  One is a very old structure, and has a Gothic
 respectability about it, which scarcely amounts to grandeur, because, to
 render a Gothic pile grand, it must have a huge unwieldiness of
 appearance.  The chapel of Windsor may be an exception to this rule; I
 mean before it was in its present nice, clean state.  When I first saw
 it, the pillars within had acquired, by time, a sombre hue, which
 accorded with the architecture; and the gloom increased its dimensions to
 the eye by hiding its parts; but now it all bursts on the view at once,
 and the sublimity has vanished before the brush and broom; for it has
 been white-washed and scraped till it has become as bright and neat as
 the pots and pans in a notable house-wife's kitchen--yes; the very spurs
 on the recumbent knights were deprived of their venerable rust, to give a
 striking proof that a love of order in trifles, and taste for proportion
 and arrangement, are very distinct.  The glare of light thus introduced
 entirely destroys the sentiment these piles are calculated to inspire; so
 that, when I heard something like a jig from the organ-loft, I thought it
 an excellent hall for dancing or feasting.  The measured pace of thought
 with which I had entered the cathedral changed into a trip; and I bounded
 on the terrace, to see the royal family, with a number of ridiculous
 images in my head that I shall not now recall.
 
 The Norwegians are fond of music, and every little church has an organ.
 In the church I have mentioned there is an inscription importing that a
 king James VI. of Scotland and I. of England, who came with more than
 princely gallantry to escort his bride home--stood there, and heard
 divine service.
 
 There is a little recess full of coffins, which contains bodies embalmed
 long since--so long, that there is not even a tradition to lead to a
 guess at their names.
 
 A desire of preserving the body seems to have prevailed in most countries
 of the world, futile as it is to term it a preservation, when the noblest
 parts are immediately sacrificed merely to save the muscles, skin, and
 bone from rottenness.  When I was shown these human petrifactions, I
 shrank back with disgust and horror.  "Ashes to ashes!" thought I--"Dust
 to dust!"  If this be not dissolution, it is something worse than natural
 decay--it is treason against humanity, thus to lift up the awful veil
 which would fain hide its weakness.  The grandeur of the active principle
 is never more strongly felt than at such a sight, for nothing is so ugly
 as the human form when deprived of life, and thus dried into stone,
 merely to preserve the most disgusting image of death.  The contemplation
 of noble ruins produces a melancholy that exalts the mind.  We take a
 retrospect of the exertions of man, the fate of empires and their rulers,
 and marking the grand destruction of ages, it seems the necessary change
 of the leading to improvement.  Our very soul expands, and we forget our
 littleness--how painfully brought to our recollection by such vain
 attempts to snatch from decay what is destined so soon to perish.  Life,
 what art thou?  Where goes this breath?--this _I_, so much alive?  In
 what element will it mix, giving or receiving fresh energy?  What will
 break the enchantment of animation?  For worlds I would not see a form I
 loved--embalmed in my heart--thus sacrilegiously handled?  Pugh! my
 stomach turns.  Is this all the distinction of the rich in the grave?
 They had better quietly allow the scythe of equality to mow them down
 with the common mass, than struggle to become a monument of the
 instability of human greatness.
 
 The teeth, nails, and skin were whole, without appearing black like the
 Egyptian mummies; and some silk, in which they had been wrapped, still
 preserved its colour--pink--with tolerable freshness.
 
 I could not learn how long the bodies had been in this state, in which
 they bid fair to remain till the Day of Judgment, if there is to be such
 a day; and before that time, it will require some trouble to make them
 fit to appear in company with angels without disgracing humanity.  God
 bless you!  I feel a conviction that we have some perfectible principle
 in our present vestment, which will not be destroyed just as we begin to
 be sensible of improvement; and I care not what habit it next puts on,
 sure that it will be wisely formed to suit a higher state of existence.
 Thinking of death makes us tenderly cling to our affections; with more
 than usual tenderness I therefore assure you that I am yours, wishing
 that the temporary death of absence may not endure longer than is
 absolutely necessary.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER VIII.
 
 
 Tonsberg was formerly the residence of one of the little sovereigns of
 Norway; and on an adjacent mountain the vestiges of a fort remain, which
 was battered down by the Swedes, the entrance of the bay lying close to
 it.
 
 Here I have frequently strayed, sovereign of the waste; I seldom met any
 human creature; and sometimes, reclining on the mossy down, under the
 shelter of a rock, the prattling of the sea amongst the pebbles has
 lulled me to sleep--no fear of any rude satyr's approaching to interrupt
 my repose.  Balmy were the slumbers, and soft the gales, that refreshed
 me, when I awoke to follow, with an eye vaguely curious, the white sails,
 as they turned the cliffs, or seemed to take shelter under the pines
 which covered the little islands that so gracefully rose to render the
 terrific ocean beautiful.  The fishermen were calmly casting their nets,
 whilst the sea-gulls hovered over the unruffled deep.  Everything seemed
 to harmonise into tranquillity; even the mournful call of the bittern was
 in cadence with the tinkling bells on the necks of the cows, that, pacing
 slowly one after the other, along an inviting path in the vale below,
 were repairing to the cottages to be milked.  With what ineffable
 pleasure have I not gazed--and gazed again, losing my breath through my
 eyes--my very soul diffused itself in the scene; and, seeming to become
 all senses, glided in the scarcely-agitated waves, melted in the
 freshening breeze, or, taking its flight with fairy wing, to the misty
 mountain which bounded the prospect, fancy tripped over new lawns, more
 beautiful even than the lovely slopes on the winding shore before me.  I
 pause, again breathless, to trace, with renewed delight, sentiments which
 entranced me, when, turning my humid eyes from the expanse below to the
 vault above, my sight pierced the fleecy clouds that softened the azure
 brightness; and imperceptibly recalling the reveries of childhood, I
 bowed before the awful throne of my Creator, whilst I rested on its
 footstool.
 
 You have sometimes wondered, my dear friend, at the extreme affection of
 my nature.  But such is the temperature of my soul.  It is not the
 vivacity of youth, the heyday of existence.  For years have I endeavoured
 to calm an impetuous tide, labouring to make my feelings take an orderly
 course.  It was striving against the stream.  I must love and admire with
 warmth, or I sink into sadness.  Tokens of love which I have received
 have wrapped me in Elysium, purifying the heart they enchanted.  My bosom
 still glows.  Do not saucily ask, repeating Sterne's question, "Maria, is
 it still so warm?"  Sufficiently, O my God!  Has it been chilled by
 sorrow and unkindness; still nature will prevail; and if I blush at
 recollecting past enjoyment, it is the rosy hue of pleasure heightened by
 modesty, for the blush of modesty and shame are as distinct as the
 emotions by which they are produced.
 
 I need scarcely inform you, after telling you of my walks, that my
 constitution has been renovated here, and that I have recovered my
 activity even whilst attaining a little _embonpoint_.  My imprudence last
 winter, and some untoward accidents just at the time I was weaning my
 child, had reduced me to a state of weakness which I never before
 experienced.  A slow fever preyed on me every night during my residence
 in Sweden, and after I arrived at Tonsberg.  By chance I found a fine
 rivulet filtered through the rocks, and confined in a basin for the
 cattle.  It tasted to me like a chalybeate; at any rate, it was pure; and
 the good effect of the various waters which invalids are sent to drink
 depends, I believe, more on the air, exercise, and change of scene, than
 on their medicinal qualities.  I therefore determined to turn my morning
 walks towards it, and seek for health from the nymph of the fountain,
 partaking of the beverage offered to the tenants of the shade.
 
 Chance likewise led me to discover a new pleasure equally beneficial to
 my health.  I wished to avail myself of my vicinity to the sea and bathe;
 but it was not possible near the town; there was no convenience.  The
 young woman whom I mentioned to you proposed rowing me across the water
 amongst the rocks; but as she was pregnant, I insisted on taking one of
 the oars, and learning to row.  It was not difficult, and I do not know a
 pleasanter exercise.  I soon became expert, and my train of thinking kept
 time, as it were, with the oars, or I suffered the boat to be carried
 along by the current, indulging a pleasing forgetfulness or fallacious
 hopes.  How fallacious! yet, without hope, what is to sustain life, but
 the fear of annihilation--the only thing of which I have ever felt a
 dread.  I cannot bear to think of being no more--of losing myself--though
 existence is often but a painful consciousness of misery; nay, it appears
 to me impossible that I should cease to exist, or that this active,
 restless spirit, equally alive to joy and sorrow, should only be
 organised dust--ready to fly abroad the moment the spring snaps, or the
 spark goes out which kept it together.  Surely something resides in this
 heart that is not perishable, and life is more than a dream.
 
 Sometimes, to take up my oar once more, when the sea was calm, I was
 amused by disturbing the innumerable young star fish which floated just
 below the surface; I had never observed them before, for they have not a
 hard shell like those which I have seen on the seashore.  They look like
 thickened water with a white edge, and four purple circles, of different
 forms, were in the middle, over an incredible number of fibres or white
 lines.  Touching them, the cloudy substance would turn or close, first on
 one side, then on the other, very gracefully, but when I took one of them
 up in the ladle, with which I heaved the water out of the boat, it
 appeared only a colourless jelly.
 
 I did not see any of the seals, numbers of which followed our boat when
 we landed in Sweden; but though I like to sport in the water I should
 have had no desire to join in their gambols.
 
 Enough, you will say, of inanimate nature and of brutes, to use the
 lordly phrase of man; let me hear something of the inhabitants.
 
 The gentleman with whom I had business is the Mayor of Tonsberg.  He
 speaks English intelligibly, and, having a sound understanding, I was
 sorry that his numerous occupations prevented my gaining as much
 information from him as I could have drawn forth had we frequently
 conversed.  The people of the town, as far as I had an opportunity of
 knowing their sentiments, are extremely well satisfied with his manner of
 discharging his office.  He has a degree of information and good sense
 which excites respect, whilst a cheerfulness, almost amounting to gaiety,
 enables him to reconcile differences and keep his neighbours in good
 humour.  "I lost my horse," said a woman to me, "but ever since, when I
 want to send to the mill, or go out, the Mayor lends me one.  He scolds
 if I do not come for it."
 
 A criminal was branded, during my stay here, for the third offence; but
 the relief he received made him declare that the judge was one of the
 best men in the world.
 
 I sent this wretch a trifle, at different times, to take with him into
 slavery.  As it was more than he expected, he wished very much to see me,
 and this wish brought to my remembrance an anecdote I heard when I was in
 Lisbon.
 
 A wretch who had been imprisoned several years, during which period lamps
 had been put up, was at last condemned to a cruel death, yet, in his way
 to execution, he only wished for one night's respite to see the city
 lighted.
 
 Having dined in company at the mayor's I was invited with his family to
 spend the day at one of the richest merchant's houses.  Though I could
 not speak Danish I knew that I could see a great deal; yes, I am
 persuaded that I have formed a very just opinion of the character of the
 Norwegians, without being able to hold converse with them.
 
 I had expected to meet some company, yet was a little disconcerted at
 being ushered into an apartment full of well dressed people, and glancing
 my eyes round they rested on several very pretty faces.  Rosy cheeks,
 sparkling eyes, and light brown or golden locks; for I never saw so much
 hair with a yellow cast, and, with their fine complexions, it looked very
 becoming.
 
 These women seem a mixture of indolence and vivacity; they scarcely ever
 walk out, and were astonished that I should for pleasure, yet they are
 immoderately fond of dancing.  Unaffected in their manners, if they have
 no pretensions to elegance, simplicity often produces a gracefulness of
 deportment, when they are animated by a particular desire to please,
 which was the case at present.  The solitariness of my situation, which
 they thought terrible, interested them very much in my favour.  They
 gathered round me, sung to me, and one of the prettiest, to whom I gave
 my hand with some degree of cordiality, to meet the glance of her eyes,
 kissed me very affectionately.
 
 At dinner, which was conducted with great hospitality, though we remained
 at table too long, they sung several songs, and, amongst the rest,
 translations of some patriotic French ones.  As the evening advanced they
 became playful, and we kept up a sort of conversation of gestures.  As
 their minds were totally uncultivated I did not lose much, perhaps
 gained, by not being able to understand them; for fancy probably filled
 up, more to their advantage, the void in the picture.  Be that as it may,
 they excited my sympathy, and I was very much flattered when I was told
 the next day that they said it was a pleasure to look at me, I appeared
 so good-natured.
 
 The men were generally captains of ships.  Several spoke English very
 tolerably, but they were merely matter-of-fact men, confined to a very
 narrow circle of observation.  I found it difficult to obtain from them
 any information respecting their own country, when the fumes of tobacco
 did not keep me at a distance.
 
 I was invited to partake of some other feasts, and always had to complain
 of the quantity of provision and the length of time taken to consume it;
 for it would not have been proper to have said devour, all went on so
 fair and softly.  The servants wait as slowly as their mistresses carve.
 
 The young women here, as well as in Sweden, have commonly bad teeth,
 which I attribute to the same causes.  They are fond of finery, but do
 not pay the necessary attention to their persons, to render beauty less
 transient than a flower, and that interesting expression which sentiment
 and accomplishments give seldom supplies its place.
 
 The servants have, likewise, an inferior sort of food here, but their
 masters are not allowed to strike them with impunity.  I might have added
 mistresses, for it was a complaint of this kind brought before the mayor
 which led me to a knowledge of the fact.
 
 The wages are low, which is particularly unjust, because the price of
 clothes is much higher than that of provision.  A young woman, who is wet
 nurse to the mistress of the inn where I lodge, receives only twelve
 dollars a year, and pays ten for the nursing of her own child.  The
 father had run away to get clear of the expense.  There was something in
 this most painful state of widowhood which excited my compassion and led
 me to reflections on the instability of the most flattering plans of
 happiness, that were painful in the extreme, till I was ready to ask
 whether this world was not created to exhibit every possible combination
 of wretchedness.  I asked these questions of a heart writhing with
 anguish, whilst I listened to a melancholy ditty sung by this poor girl.
 It was too early for thee to be abandoned, thought I, and I hastened out
 of the house to take my solitary evening's walk.  And here I am again to
 talk of anything but the pangs arising from the discovery of estranged
 affection and the lonely sadness of a deserted heart.
 
 The father and mother, if the father can be ascertained, are obliged to
 maintain an illegitimate child at their joint expense; but, should the
 father disappear, go up the country or to sea, the mother must maintain
 it herself.  However, accidents of this kind do not prevent their
 marrying, and then it is not unusual to take the child or children home,
 and they are brought up very amicably with the marriage progeny.
 
 I took some pains to learn what books were written originally in their
 language; but for any certain information respecting the state of Danish
 literature I must wait till I arrive at Copenhagen.
 
 The sound of the language is soft, a great proportion of the words ending
 in vowels; and there is a simplicity in the turn of some of the phrases
 which have been translated to me that pleased and interested me.  In the
 country the farmers use the _thou_ and _thee_; and they do not acquire
 the polite plurals of the towns by meeting at market.  The not having
 markets established in the large towns appears to me a great
 inconvenience.  When the farmers have anything to sell they bring it to
 the neighbouring town and take it from house to house.  I am surprised
 that the inhabitants do not feel how very incommodious this usage is to
 both parties, and redress it; they, indeed, perceive it, for when I have
 introduced the subject they acknowledged that they were often in want of
 necessaries, there being no butchers, and they were often obliged to buy
 what they did not want; yet it was the custom, and the changing of
 customs of a long standing requires more energy than they yet possess.  I
 received a similar reply when I attempted to persuade the women that they
 injured their children by keeping them too warm.  The only way of
 parrying off my reasoning was that they must do as other people did; in
 short, reason on any subject of change, and they stop you by saying that
 "the town would talk."  A person of sense, with a large fortune to ensure
 respect, might be very useful here, by inducing them to treat their
 children and manage their sick properly, and eat food dressed in a
 simpler manner--the example, for instance, of a count's lady.
 
 Reflecting on these prejudices made me revert to the wisdom of those
 legislators who established institutions for the good of the body under
 the pretext of serving heaven for the salvation of the soul.  These might
 with strict propriety be termed pious frauds; and I admire the Peruvian
 pair for asserting that they came from the sun, when their conduct proved
 that they meant to enlighten a benighted country, whose obedience, or
 even attention, could only be secured by awe.  Thus much for conquering
 the _inertia_ of reason; but, when it is once in motion, fables once held
 sacred may be ridiculed; and sacred they were when useful to mankind.
 Prometheus alone stole fire to animate the first man; his posterity needs
 not supernatural aid to preserve the species, though love is generally
 termed a flame; and it may not be necessary much longer to suppose men
 inspired by heaven to inculcate the duties which demand special grace
 when reason convinces them that they are the happiest who are the most
 nobly employed.
 
 In a few days I am to set out for the western part of Norway, and then
 shall return by land to Gothenburg.  I cannot think of leaving this place
 without regret.  I speak of the place before the inhabitants, though
 there is a tenderness in their artless kindness which attaches me to
 them; but it is an attachment that inspires a regret very different from
 that I felt at leaving Hull in my way to Sweden.  The domestic happiness
 and good-humoured gaiety of the amiable family where I and my Frances
 were so hospitably received would have been sufficient to ensure the
 tenderest remembrance, without the recollection of the social evening to
 stimulate it, when good breeding gave dignity to sympathy and wit zest to
 reason.
 
 Adieu!--I am just informed that my horse has been waiting this quarter of
 an hour.  I now venture to ride out alone.  The steeple serves as a
 landmark.  I once or twice lost my way, walking alone, without being able
 to inquire after a path; I was therefore obliged to make to the steeple,
 or windmill, over hedge and ditch.
 
 Yours truly.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER IX.
 
 
 I have already informed you that there are only two noblemen who have
 estates of any magnitude in Norway.  One of these has a house near
 Tonsberg, at which he has not resided for some years, having been at
 court, or on embassies.  He is now the Danish Ambassador in London.  The
 house is pleasantly situated, and the grounds about it fine; but their
 neglected appearance plainly tells that there is nobody at home.
 
 A stupid kind of sadness, to my eye, always reigns in a huge habitation
 where only servants live to put cases on the furniture and open the
 windows.  I enter as I would into the tomb of the Capulets, to look at
 the family pictures that here frown in armour, or smile in ermine.  The
 mildew respects not the lordly robe, and the worm riots unchecked on the
 cheek of beauty.
 
 There was nothing in the architecture of the building, or the form of the
 furniture, to detain me from the avenue where the aged pines stretched
 along majestically.  Time had given a greyish cast to their ever-green
 foliage; and they stood, like sires of the forest, sheltered on all sides
 by a rising progeny.  I had not ever seen so many oaks together in Norway
 as in these woods, nor such large aspens as here were agitated by the
 breeze, rendering the wind audible--nay musical; for melody seemed on the
 wing around me.  How different was the fresh odour that reanimated me in
 the avenue, from the damp chillness of the apartments; and as little did
 the gloomy thoughtfulness excited by the dusty hangings, and worm-eaten
 pictures, resemble the reveries inspired by the soothing melancholy of
 their shade.  In the winter, these august pines, towering above the snow,
 must relieve the eye beyond measure and give life to the white waste.
 
 The continual recurrence of pine and fir groves in the day sometimes
 wearies the sight, but in the evening, nothing can be more picturesque,
 or, more properly speaking, better calculated to produce poetical images.
 Passing through them, I have been struck with a mystic kind of reverence,
 and I did, as it were, homage to their venerable shadows.  Not nymphs,
 but philosophers, seemed to inhabit them--ever musing; I could scarcely
 conceive that they were without some consciousness of existence--without
 a calm enjoyment of the pleasure they diffused.
 
 How often do my feelings produce ideas that remind me of the origin of
 many poetical fictions.  In solitude, the imagination bodies forth its
 conceptions unrestrained, and stops enraptured to adore the beings of its
 own creation.  These are moments of bliss; and the memory recalls them
 with delight.
 
 But I have almost forgotten the matters of fact I meant to relate,
 respecting the counts.  They have the presentation of the livings on
 their estates, appoint the judges, and different civil officers, the
 Crown reserving to itself the privilege of sanctioning them.  But though
 they appoint, they cannot dismiss.  Their tenants also occupy their farms
 for life, and are obliged to obey any summons to work on the part he
 reserves for himself; but they are paid for their labour.  In short, I
 have seldom heard of any noblemen so innoxious.
 
 Observing that the gardens round the count's estate were better
 cultivated than any I had before seen, I was led to reflect on the
 advantages which naturally accrue from the feudal tenures.  The tenants
 of the count are obliged to work at a stated price, in his grounds and
 garden; and the instruction which they imperceptibly receive from the
 head gardener tends to render them useful, and makes them, in the common
 course of things, better husbandmen and gardeners on their own little
 farms.  Thus the great, who alone travel in this period of society, for
 the observation of manners and customs made by sailors is very confined,
 bring home improvement to promote their own comfort, which is gradually
 spread abroad amongst the people, till they are stimulated to think for
 themselves.
 
 The bishops have not large revenues, and the priests are appointed by the
 king before they come to them to be ordained.  There is commonly some
 little farm annexed to the parsonage, and the inhabitants subscribe
 voluntarily, three times a year, in addition to the church fees, for the
 support of the clergyman.  The church lands were seized when Lutheranism
 was introduced, the desire of obtaining them being probably the real
 stimulus of reformation.  The tithes, which are never required in kind,
 are divided into three parts--one to the king, another to the incumbent,
 and the third to repair the dilapidations of the parsonage.  They do not
 amount to much.  And the stipend allowed to the different civil officers
 is also too small, scarcely deserving to be termed an independence; that
 of the custom-house officers is not sufficient to procure the necessaries
 of life--no wonder, then, if necessity leads them to knavery.  Much
 public virtue cannot be expected till every employment, putting
 perquisites out of the question, has a salary sufficient to reward
 industry;--whilst none are so great as to permit the possessor to remain
 idle.  It is this want of proportion between profit and labour which
 debases men, producing the sycophantic appellations of patron and client,
 and that pernicious _esprit du corps_, proverbially vicious.
 
 The farmers are hospitable as well as independent.  Offering once to pay
 for some coffee I drank when taking shelter from the rain, I was asked,
 rather angrily, if a little coffee was worth paying for.  They smoke, and
 drink drams, but not so much as formerly.  Drunkenness, often the
 attendant disgrace of hospitality, will here, as well as everywhere else,
 give place to gallantry and refinement of manners; but the change will
 not be suddenly produced.
 
 The people of every class are constant in their attendance at church;
 they are very fond of dancing, and the Sunday evenings in Norway, as in
 Catholic countries, are spent in exercises which exhilarate the spirits
 without vitiating the heart.  The rest of labour ought to be gay; and the
 gladness I have felt in France on a Sunday, or Decadi, which I caught
 from the faces around me, was a sentiment more truly religious than all
 the stupid stillness which the streets of London ever inspired where the
 Sabbath is so decorously observed.  I recollect, in the country parts of
 England, the churchwardens used to go out during the service to see if
 they could catch any luckless wight playing at bowls or skittles; yet
 what could be more harmless?  It would even, I think, be a great
 advantage to the English, if feats of activity (I do not include boxing
 matches) were encouraged on a Sunday, as it might stop the progress of
 Methodism, and of that fanatical spirit which appears to be gaining
 ground.  I was surprised when I visited Yorkshire, on my way to Sweden,
 to find that sullen narrowness of thinking had made such a progress since
 I was an inhabitant of the country.  I could hardly have supposed that
 sixteen or seventeen years could have produced such an alteration for the
 worse in the morals of a place--yes, I say morals; for observance of
 forms, and avoiding of practices, indifferent in themselves, often supply
 the place of that regular attention to duties which are so natural, that
 they seldom are vauntingly exercised, though they are worth all the
 precepts of the law and the prophets.  Besides, many of these deluded
 people, with the best meaning, actually lose their reason, and become
 miserable, the dread of damnation throwing them into a state which merits
 the term; and still more, in running after their preachers, expecting to
 promote their salvation, they disregard their welfare in this world, and
 neglect the interest and comfort of their families; so that, in
 proportion as they attain a reputation for piety, they become idle.
 
 Aristocracy and fanaticism seem equally to be gaining ground in England,
 particularly in the place I have mentioned; I saw very little of either
 in Norway.  The people are regular in their attendance on public worship,
 but religion does not interfere with their employments.
 
 As the farmers cut away the wood they clear the ground.  Every year,
 therefore, the country is becoming fitter to support the inhabitants.
 Half a century ago the Dutch, I am told, only paid for the cutting down
 of the wood, and the farmers were glad to get rid of it without giving
 themselves any trouble.  At present they form a just estimate of its
 value; nay, I was surprised to find even firewood so dear when it appears
 to be in such plenty.  The destruction, or gradual reduction, of their
 forests will probably ameliorate the climate, and their manners will
 naturally improve in the same ratio as industry requires ingenuity.  It
 is very fortunate that men are a long time but just above the brute
 creation, or the greater part of the earth would never have been rendered
 habitable, because it is the patient labour of men, who are only seeking
 for a subsistence, which produces whatever embellishes existence,
 affording leisure for the cultivation of the arts and sciences that lift
 man so far above his first state.  I never, my friend, thought so deeply
 of the advantages obtained by human industry as since I have been in
 Norway.  The world requires, I see, the hand of man to perfect it, and as
 this task naturally unfolds the faculties he exercises, it is physically
 impossible that he should have remained in Rousseau's golden age of
 stupidity.  And, considering the question of human happiness, where, oh
 where does it reside?  Has it taken up its abode with unconscious
 ignorance or with the high-wrought mind?  Is it the offspring of
 thoughtless animal spirits or the dye of fancy continually flitting round
 the expected pleasure?
 
 The increasing population of the earth must necessarily tend to its
 improvement, as the means of existence are multiplied by invention.
 
 You have probably made similar reflections in America, where the face of
 the country, I suppose, resembles the wilds of Norway.  I am delighted
 with the romantic views I daily contemplate, animated by the purest air;
 and I am interested by the simplicity of manners which reigns around me.
 Still nothing so soon wearies out the feelings as unmarked simplicity.  I
 am therefore half convinced that I could not live very comfortably exiled
 from the countries where mankind are so much further advanced in
 knowledge, imperfect as it is, and unsatisfactory to the thinking mind.
 Even now I begin to long to hear what you are doing in England and
 France.  My thoughts fly from this wilderness to the polished circles of
 the world, till recollecting its vices and follies, I bury myself in the
 woods, but find it necessary to emerge again, that I may not lose sight
 of the wisdom and virtue which exalts my nature.
 
 What a long time it requires to know ourselves; and yet almost every one
 has more of this knowledge than he is willing to own, even to himself.  I
 cannot immediately determine whether I ought to rejoice at having turned
 over in this solitude a new page in the history of my own heart, though I
 may venture to assure you that a further acquaintance with mankind only
 tends to increase my respect for your judgment and esteem for your
 character.  Farewell!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER X.
 
 
 I have once more, my friend, taken flight, for I left Tonsberg yesterday,
 but with an intention of returning in my way back to Sweden.
 
 The road to Laurvig is very fine, and the country the best cultivated in
 Norway.  I never before admired the beech tree, and when I met stragglers
 here they pleased me still less.  Long and lank, they would have forced
 me to allow that the line of beauty requires some curves, if the stately
 pine, standing near, erect, throwing her vast arms around, had not looked
 beautiful in opposition to such narrow rules.
 
 In these respects my very reason obliges me to permit my feelings to be
 my criterion.  Whatever excites emotion has charms for me, though I
 insist that the cultivation of the mind by warming, nay, almost creating
 the imagination, produces taste and an immense variety of sensations and
 emotions, partaking of the exquisite pleasure inspired by beauty and
 sublimity.  As I know of no end to them, the word infinite, so often
 misapplied, might on this occasion be introduced with something like
 propriety.
 
 But I have rambled away again.  I intended to have remarked to you the
 effect produced by a grove of towering beech, the airy lightness of their
 foliage admitting a degree of sunshine, which, giving a transparency to
 the leaves, exhibited an appearance of freshness and elegance that I had
 never before remarked.  I thought of descriptions of Italian scenery.  But
 these evanescent graces seemed the effect of enchantment; and I
 imperceptibly breathed softly, lest I should destroy what was real, yet
 looked so like the creation of fancy.  Dryden's fable of the flower and
 the leaf was not a more poetical reverie.
 
 Adieu, however, to fancy, and to all the sentiments which ennoble our
 nature.  I arrived at Laurvig, and found myself in the midst of a group
 of lawyers of different descriptions.  My head turned round, my heart
 grew sick, as I regarded visages deformed by vice, and listened to
 accounts of chicanery that was continually embroiling the ignorant.  These
 locusts will probably diminish as the people become more enlightened.  In
 this period of social life the commonalty are always cunningly attentive
 to their own interest; but their faculties, confined to a few objects,
 are so narrowed, that they cannot discover it in the general good.  The
 profession of the law renders a set of men still shrewder and more
 selfish than the rest; and it is these men, whose wits have been
 sharpened by knavery, who here undermine morality, confounding right and
 wrong.
 
 The Count of Bernstorff, who really appears to me, from all I can gather,
 to have the good of the people at heart, aware of this, has lately sent
 to the mayor of each district to name, according to the size of the
 place, four or six of the best-informed inhabitants, not men of the law,
 out of which the citizens were to elect two, who are to be termed
 mediators.  Their office is to endeavour to prevent litigious suits, and
 conciliate differences.  And no suit is to be commenced before the
 parties have discussed the dispute at their weekly meeting.  If a
 reconciliation should, in consequence, take place, it is to be
 registered, and the parties are not allowed to retract.
 
 By these means ignorant people will be prevented from applying for advice
 to men who may justly be termed stirrers-up of strife.  They have for a
 long time, to use a significant vulgarism, set the people by the ears,
 and live by the spoil they caught up in the scramble.  There is some
 reason to hope that this regulation will diminish their number, and
 restrain their mischievous activity.  But till trials by jury are
 established, little justice can be expected in Norway.  Judges who cannot
 be bribed are often timid, and afraid of offending bold knaves, lest they
 should raise a set of hornets about themselves.  The fear of censure
 undermines all energy of character; and, labouring to be prudent, they
 lose sight of rectitude.  Besides, nothing is left to their conscience,
 or sagacity; they must be governed by evidence, though internally
 convinced that it is false.
 
 There is a considerable iron manufactory at Laurvig for coarse work, and
 a lake near the town supplies the water necessary for working several
 mills belonging to it.
 
 This establishment belongs to the Count of Laurvig.  Without a fortune
 and influence equal to his, such a work could not have been set afloat;
 personal fortunes are not yet sufficient to support such undertakings.
 Nevertheless the inhabitants of the town speak of the size of his estate
 as an evil, because it obstructs commerce.  The occupiers of small farms
 are obliged to bring their wood to the neighbouring seaports to be
 shipped; but he, wishing to increase the value of his, will not allow it
 to be thus gradually cut down, which turns the trade into another
 channel.  Added to this, nature is against them, the bay being open and
 insecure.  I could not help smiling when I was informed that in a hard
 gale a vessel had been wrecked in the main street.  When there are such a
 number of excellent harbours on the coast, it is a pity that accident has
 made one of the largest towns grow up on a bad one.
 
 The father of the present count was a distant relation of the family; he
 resided constantly in Denmark, and his son follows his example.  They
 have not been in possession of the estate many years; and their
 predecessor lived near the town, introducing a degree of profligacy of
 manners which has been ruinous to the inhabitants in every respect, their
 fortunes not being equal to the prevailing extravagance.
 
 What little I have seen of the manners of the people does not please me
 so well as those of Tonsberg.  I am forewarned that I shall find them
 still more cunning and fraudulent as I advance towards the westward, in
 proportion as traffic takes place of agriculture, for their towns are
 built on naked rocks, the streets are narrow bridges, and the inhabitants
 are all seafaring men, or owners of ships, who keep shops.
 
 The inn I was at in Laurvig this journey was not the same that I was at
 before.  It is a good one--the people civil, and the accommodations
 decent.  They seem to be better provided in Sweden; but in justice I
 ought to add that they charge more extravagantly.  My bill at Tonsberg
 was also much higher than I had paid in Sweden, and much higher than it
 ought to have been where provision is so cheap.  Indeed, they seem to
 consider foreigners as strangers whom they shall never see again, and may
 fairly pluck.  And the inhabitants of the western coast, isolated, as it
 were, regard those of the east almost as strangers.  Each town in that
 quarter seems to be a great family, suspicious of every other, allowing
 none to cheat them but themselves; and, right or wrong, they support one
 another in the face of justice.
 
 On this journey I was fortunate enough to have one companion with more
 enlarged views than the generality of his countrymen, who spoke English
 tolerably.
 
 I was informed that we might still advance a mile and a quarter in our
 cabrioles; afterwards there was no choice, but of a single horse and
 wretched path, or a boat, the usual mode of travelling.
 
 We therefore sent our baggage forward in the boat, and followed rather
 slowly, for the road was rocky and sandy.  We passed, however, through
 several beech groves, which still delighted me by the freshness of their
 light green foliage, and the elegance of their assemblage, forming
 retreats to veil without obscuring the sun.
 
 I was surprised, at approaching the water, to find a little cluster of
 houses pleasantly situated, and an excellent inn.  I could have wished to
 have remained there all night; but as the wind was fair, and the evening
 fine, I was afraid to trust to the wind--the uncertain wind of to-morrow.
 We therefore left Helgeraac immediately with the declining sun.
 
 Though we were in the open sea, we sailed more amongst the rocks and
 islands than in my passage from Stromstad; and they often forced very
 picturesque combinations.  Few of the high ridges were entirely bare; the
 seeds of some pines or firs had been wafted by the winds or waves, and
 they stood to brave the elements.
 
 Sitting, then, in a little boat on the ocean, amidst strangers, with
 sorrow and care pressing hard on me--buffeting me about from clime to
 clime--I felt
 
    "Like the lone shrub at random cast,
    That sighs and trembles at each blast!"
 
 On some of the largest rocks there were actually groves, the retreat of
 foxes and hares, which, I suppose, had tripped over the ice during the
 winter, without thinking to regain the main land before the thaw.
 
 Several of the islands were inhabited by pilots; and the Norwegian pilots
 are allowed to be the best in the world--perfectly acquainted with their
 coast, and ever at hand to observe the first signal or sail.  They pay a
 small tax to the king and to the regulating officer, and enjoy the fruit
 of their indefatigable industry.
 
 One of the islands, called Virgin Land, is a flat, with some depth of
 earth, extending for half a Norwegian mile, with three farms on it,
 tolerably well cultivated.
 
 On some of the bare rocks I saw straggling houses; they rose above the
 denomination of huts inhabited by fishermen.  My companions assured me
 that they were very comfortable dwellings, and that they have not only
 the necessaries, but even what might be reckoned the superfluities of
 life.  It was too late for me to go on shore, if you will allow me to
 give that name to shivering rocks, to ascertain the fact.
 
 But rain coming on, and the night growing dark, the pilot declared that
 it would be dangerous for us to attempt to go to the place of our
 destination--East Rusoer--a Norwegian mile and a half further; and we
 determined to stop for the night at a little haven, some half dozen
 houses scattered under the curve of a rock.  Though it became darker and
 darker, our pilot avoided the blind rocks with great dexterity.
 
 It was about ten o'clock when we arrived, and the old hostess quickly
 prepared me a comfortable bed--a little too soft or so, but I was weary;
 and opening the window to admit the sweetest of breezes to fan me to
 sleep, I sunk into the most luxurious rest: it was more than refreshing.
 The hospitable sprites of the grots surely hovered round my pillow; and,
 if I awoke, it was to listen to the melodious whispering of the wind
 amongst them, or to feel the mild breath of morn.  Light slumbers
 produced dreams, where Paradise was before me.  My little cherub was
 again hiding her face in my bosom.  I heard her sweet cooing beat on my
 heart from the cliffs, and saw her tiny footsteps on the sands.  New-born
 hopes seemed, like the rainbow, to appear in the clouds of sorrow, faint,
 yet sufficient to amuse away despair.
 
 Some refreshing but heavy showers have detained us; and here I am writing
 quite alone--something more than gay, for which I want a name.
 
 I could almost fancy myself in Nootka Sound, or on some of the islands on
 the north-west coast of America.  We entered by a narrow pass through the
 rocks, which from this abode appear more romantic than you can well
 imagine; and seal-skins hanging at the door to dry add to the illusion.
 
 It is indeed a corner of the world, but you would be surprised to see the
 cleanliness and comfort of the dwelling.  The shelves are not only
 shining with pewter and queen's ware, but some articles in silver, more
 ponderous, it is true, than elegant.  The linen is good, as well as
 white.  All the females spin, and there is a loom in the kitchen.  A sort
 of individual taste appeared in the arrangement of the furniture (this is
 not the place for imitation) and a kindness in their desire to oblige.
 How superior to the apish politeness of the towns! where the people,
 affecting to be well bred, fatigue with their endless ceremony.
 
 The mistress is a widow, her daughter is married to a pilot, and has
 three cows.  They have a little patch of land at about the distance of
 two English miles, where they make hay for the winter, which they bring
 home in a boat.  They live here very cheap, getting money from the
 vessels which stress of weather, or other causes, bring into their
 harbour.  I suspect, by their furniture, that they smuggle a little.  I
 can now credit the account of the other houses, which I last night
 thought exaggerated.
 
 I have been conversing with one of my companions respecting the laws and
 regulations of Norway.  He is a man within great portion of common sense
 and heart--yes, a warm heart.  This is not the first time I have remarked
 heart without sentiment; they are distinct.  The former depends on the
 rectitude of the feelings, on truth of sympathy; these characters have
 more tenderness than passion; the latter has a higher source--call it
 imagination, genius, or what you will, it is something very different.  I
 have been laughing with these simple worthy folk--to give you one of my
 half-score Danish words--and letting as much of my heart flow out in
 sympathy as they can take.  Adieu!  I must trip up the rocks.  The rain
 is ever.  Let me catch pleasure on the wing--I may be melancholy
 to-morrow.  Now all my nerves keep time with the melody of nature.  Ah!
 let me be happy whilst I can.  The tear starts as I think of it.  I must
 flee from thought, and find refuge from sorrow in a strong
 imagination--the only solace for a feeling heart.  Phantoms of bliss!
 ideal forms of excellence! again enclose me in your magic circle, and
 wipe clear from my remembrance the disappointments that reader the
 sympathy painful, which experience rather increases than damps, by giving
 the indulgence of feeling the sanction of reason.
 
 Once more farewell!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XI.
 
 
 I left Portoer, the little haven I mentioned, soon after I finished my
 last letter.  The sea was rough, and I perceived that our pilot was right
 not to venture farther during a hazy night.  We had agreed to pay four
 dollars for a boat from Helgeraac.  I mention the sum, because they would
 demand twice as much from a stranger.  I was obliged to pay fifteen for
 the one I hired at Stromstad.  When we were ready to set out, our boatman
 offered to return a dollar and let us go in one of the boats of the
 place, the pilot who lived there being better acquainted with the coast.
 He only demanded a dollar and a half, which was reasonable.  I found him
 a civil and rather intelligent man; he was in the American service
 several years, during the Revolution.
 
 I soon perceived that an experienced mariner was necessary to guide us,
 for we were continually obliged to tack about, to avoid the rocks, which,
 scarcely reaching to the surface of the water, could only be discovered
 by the breaking of the waves over them.
 
 The view of this wild coast, as we sailed along it, afforded me a
 continual subject for meditation.  I anticipated the future improvement
 of the world, and observed how much man has still to do to obtain of the
 earth all it could yield.  I even carried my speculations so far as to
 advance a million or two of years to the moment when the earth would
 perhaps be so perfectly cultivated, and so completely peopled, as to
 render it necessary to inhabit every spot--yes, these bleak shores.
 Imagination went still farther, and pictured the state of man when the
 earth could no longer support him.  Whither was he to flee from universal
 famine?  Do not smile; I really became distressed for these fellow
 creatures yet unborn.  The images fastened on me, and the world appeared
 a vast prison.  I was soon to be in a smaller one--for no other name can
 I give to Rusoer.  It would be difficult to form an idea of the place, if
 you have never seen one of these rocky coasts.
 
 We were a considerable time entering amongst the islands, before we saw
 about two hundred houses crowded together under a very high rock--still
 higher appearing above.  Talk not of Bastilles!  To be born here was to
 be bastilled by nature--shut out from all that opens the understanding,
 or enlarges the heart.  Huddled one behind another, not more than a
 quarter of the dwellings even had a prospect of the sea.  A few planks
 formed passages from house to house, which you must often scale, mounting
 steps like a ladder to enter.
 
 The only road across the rocks leads to a habitation sterile enough, you
 may suppose, when I tell you that the little earth on the adjacent ones
 was carried there by the late inhabitant.  A path, almost impracticable
 for a horse, goes on to Arendall, still further to the westward.
 
 I inquired for a walk, and, mounting near two hundred steps made round a
 rock, walked up and down for about a hundred yards viewing the sea, to
 which I quickly descended by steps that cheated the declivity.  The ocean
 and these tremendous bulwarks enclosed me on every side.  I felt the
 confinement, and wished for wings to reach still loftier cliffs, whose
 slippery sides no foot was so hardy as to tread.  Yet what was it to
 see?--only a boundless waste of water--not a glimpse of smiling
 nature--not a patch of lively green to relieve the aching sight, or vary
 the objects of meditation.
 
 I felt my breath oppressed, though nothing could be clearer than the
 atmosphere.  Wandering there alone, I found the solitude desirable; my
 mind was stored with ideas, which this new scene associated with
 astonishing rapidity.  But I shuddered at the thought of receiving
 existence, and remaining here, in the solitude of ignorance, till forced
 to leave a world of which I had seen so little, for the character of the
 inhabitants is as uncultivated, if not as picturesquely wild, as their
 abode.
 
 Having no employment but traffic, of which a contraband trade makes the
 basis of their profit, the coarsest feelings of honesty are quickly
 blunted.  You may suppose that I speak in general terms; and that, with
 all the disadvantages of nature and circumstances, there are still some
 respectable exceptions, the more praiseworthy, as tricking is a very
 contagious mental disease, that dries up all the generous juices of the
 heart.  Nothing genial, in fact, appears around this place, or within the
 circle of its rocks.  And, now I recollect, it seems to me that the most
 genial and humane characters I have met with in life were most alive to
 the sentiments inspired by tranquil country scenes.  What, indeed, is to
 humanise these beings, who rest shut up (for they seldom even open their
 windows), smoking, drinking brandy, and driving bargains?  I have been
 almost stifled by these smokers.  They begin in the morning, and are
 rarely without their pipe till they go to bed.  Nothing can be more
 disgusting than the rooms and men towards the evening--breath, teeth,
 clothes, and furniture, all are spoilt.  It is well that the women are
 not very delicate, or they would only love their husbands because they
 were their husbands.  Perhaps, you may add, that the remark need not be
 confined to so small a part of the world; and, _entre nous_, I am of the
 same opinion.  You must not term this innuendo saucy, for it does not
 come home.
 
 If I had not determined to write I should have found my confinement here,
 even for three or four days, tedious.  I have no books; and to pace up
 and down a small room, looking at tiles overhung by rocks, soon becomes
 wearisome.  I cannot mount two hundred steps to walk a hundred yards many
 times in the day.  Besides, the rocks, retaining the heat of the sun, are
 intolerably warm.  I am, nevertheless, very well; for though there is a
 shrewdness in the character of these people, depraved by a sordid love of
 money which repels me, still the comparisons they force me to make keep
 my heart calm by exercising my understanding.
 
 Everywhere wealth commands too much respect, but here almost exclusively;
 and it is the only object pursued, not through brake and briar, but over
 rocks and waves; yet of what use would riches be to me, I have sometimes
 asked myself, were I confined to live in such in a spot?  I could only
 relieve a few distressed objects, perhaps render them idle, and all the
 rest of life would be a blank.
 
 My present journey has given fresh force to my opinion that no place is
 so disagreeable and unimproving as a country town.  I should like to
 divide my time between the town and country; in a lone house, with the
 business of farming and planting, where my mind would gain strength by
 solitary musing, and in a metropolis to rub off the rust of thought, and
 polish the taste which the contemplation of nature had rendered just.
 Thus do we wish as we float down the stream of life, whilst chance does
 more to gratify a desire of knowledge than our best laid plans.  A degree
 of exertion, produced by some want, more or less painful, is probably the
 price we must all pay for knowledge.  How few authors or artists have
 arrived at eminence who have not lived by their employment?
 
 I was interrupted yesterday by business, and was prevailed upon to dine
 with the English vice-consul.  His house being open to the sea, I was
 more at large; and the hospitality of the table pleased me, though the
 bottle was rather too freely pushed about.  Their manner of entertaining
 was such as I have frequently remarked when I have been thrown in the way
 of people without education, who have more money than wit--that is, than
 they know what to do with.  The women were unaffected, but had not the
 natural grace which was often conspicuous at Tonsberg.  There was even a
 striking difference in their dress, these having loaded themselves with
 finery in the style of the sailors' girls of Hull or Portsmouth.  Taste
 has not yet taught them to make any but an ostentatious display of
 wealth.  Yet I could perceive even here the first steps of the
 improvement which I am persuaded will make a very obvious progress in the
 course of half a century, and it ought not to be sooner, to keep pace
 with the cultivation of the earth.  Improving manners will introduce
 finer moral feelings.  They begin to read translations of some of the
 most useful German productions lately published, and one of our party
 sung a song ridiculing the powers coalesced against France, and the
 company drank confusion to those who had dismembered Poland.
 
 The evening was extremely calm and beautiful.  Not being able to walk, I
 requested a boat as the only means of enjoying free air.
 
 The view of the town was now extremely fine.  A huge rocky mountain stood
 up behind it, and a vast cliff stretched on each side, forming a
 semicircle.  In a recess of the rocks was a clump of pines, amongst which
 a steeple rose picturesquely beautiful.
 
 The churchyard is almost the only verdant spot in the place.  Here,
 indeed, friendship extends beyond the grave, and to grant a sod of earth
 is to accord a favour.  I should rather choose, did it admit of a choice,
 to sleep in some of the caves of the rocks, for I am become better
 reconciled to them since I climbed their craggy sides last night,
 listening to the finest echoes I ever heard.  We had a French horn with
 us, and there was an enchanting wildness in the dying away of the
 reverberation that quickly transported me to Shakespeare's magic island.
 Spirits unseen seemed to walk abroad, and flit from cliff to cliff to
 soothe my soul to peace.
 
 I reluctantly returned to supper, to be shut up in a warm room, only to
 view the vast shadows of the rocks extending on the slumbering waves.  I
 stood at the window some time before a buzz filled the drawing-room, and
 now and then the dashing of a solitary oar rendered the scene still more
 solemn.
 
 Before I came here I could scarcely have imagined that a simple object
 (rocks) could have admitted of so many interesting combinations, always
 grand and often sublime.  Good night!  God bless you!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XII.
 
 
 I left East Rusoer the day before yesterday.  The weather was very fine;
 but so calm that we loitered on the water near fourteen hours, only to
 make about six and twenty miles.
 
 It seemed to me a sort of emancipation when we landed at Helgeraac.  The
 confinement which everywhere struck me whilst sojourning amongst the
 rocks, made me hail the earth as a land of promise; and the situation
 shone with fresh lustre from the contrast--from appearing to be a free
 abode.  Here it was possible to travel by land--I never thought this a
 comfort before--and my eyes, fatigued by the sparkling of the sun on the
 water, now contentedly reposed on the green expanse, half persuaded that
 such verdant meads had never till then regaled them.
 
 I rose early to pursue my journey to Tonsberg.  The country still wore a
 face of joy--and my soul was alive to its charms.  Leaving the most lofty
 and romantic of the cliffs behind us, we were almost continually
 descending to Tonsberg, through Elysian scenes; for not only the sea, but
 mountains, rivers, lakes, and groves, gave an almost endless variety to
 the prospect.  The cottagers were still carrying home the hay; and the
 cottages on this road looked very comfortable.  Peace and plenty--I mean
 not abundance--seemed to reign around--still I grew sad as I drew near my
 old abode.  I was sorry to see the sun so high; it was broad noon.
 Tonsberg was something like a home--yet I was to enter without lighting
 up pleasure in any eye.  I dreaded the solitariness of my apartment, and
 wished for night to hide the starting tears, or to shed them on my
 pillow, and close my eyes on a world where I was destined to wander
 alone.  Why has nature so many charms for me--calling forth and
 cherishing refined sentiments, only to wound the breast that fosters
 them?  How illusive, perhaps the most so, are the plans of happiness
 founded on virtue and principle; what inlets of misery do they not open
 in a half-civilised society?  The satisfaction arising from conscious
 rectitude, will not calm an injured heart, when tenderness is ever
 finding excuses; and self-applause is a cold solitary feeling, that
 cannot supply the place of disappointed affection, without throwing a
 gloom over every prospect, which, banishing pleasure, does not exclude
 pain.  I reasoned and reasoned; but my heart was too full to allow me to
 remain in the house, and I walked, till I was wearied out, to purchase
 rest--or rather forgetfulness.
 
 Employment has beguiled this day, and to-morrow I set out for Moss, on my
 way to Stromstad.  At Gothenburg I shall embrace my Fannikin; probably
 she will not know me again--and I shall be hurt if she do not.  How
 childish is this! still it is a natural feeling.  I would not permit
 myself to indulge the "thick coming fears" of fondness, whilst I was
 detained by business.  Yet I never saw a calf bounding in a meadow, that
 did not remind me of my little frolicker.  A calf, you say.  Yes; but a
 capital one I own.
 
 I cannot write composedly--I am every instant sinking into reveries--my
 heart flutters, I know not why.  Fool!  It is time thou wert at rest.
 
 Friendship and domestic happiness are continually praised; yet how little
 is there of either in the world, because it requires more cultivation of
 mind to keep awake affection, even in our own hearts, than the common run
 of people suppose.  Besides, few like to be seen as they really are; and
 a degree of simplicity, and of undisguised confidence, which, to
 uninterested observers, would almost border on weakness, is the charm,
 nay the essence of love or friendship, all the bewitching graces of
 childhood again appearing.  As objects merely to exercise my taste, I
 therefore like to see people together who have an affection for each
 other; every turn of their features touches me, and remains pictured on
 my imagination in indelible characters.  The zest of novelty is, however,
 necessary to rouse the languid sympathies which have been hackneyed in
 the world; as is the factitious behaviour, falsely termed good-breeding,
 to amuse those, who, defective in taste, continually rely for pleasure on
 their animal spirits, which not being maintained by the imagination, are
 unavoidably sooner exhausted than the sentiments of the heart.  Friendship
 is in general sincere at the commencement, and lasts whilst there is
 anything to support it; but as a mixture of novelty and vanity is the
 usual prop, no wonder if it fall with the slender stay.  The fop in the
 play paid a greater compliment than he was aware of when he said to a
 person, whom he meant to flatter, "I like you almost as well as a _new
 acquaintance_."  Why am I talking of friendship, after which I have had
 such a wild-goose chase.  I thought only of telling you that the crows,
 as well as wild-geese, are here birds of passage.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XIII.
 
 
 I left Tonsberg yesterday, the 22nd of August.  It is only twelve or
 thirteen English miles to Moss, through a country less wild than any
 tract I had hitherto passed over in Norway.  It was often beautiful, but
 seldom afforded those grand views which fill rather than soothe the mind.
 
 We glided along the meadows and through the woods, with sunbeams playing
 around us; and, though no castles adorned the prospects, a greater number
 of comfortable farms met my eyes during this ride than I have ever seen,
 in the same space, even in the most cultivated part of England; and the
 very appearance of the cottages of the labourers sprinkled amidst them
 excluded all those gloomy ideas inspired by the contemplation of poverty.
 
 The hay was still bringing in, for one harvest in Norway treads on the
 heels of the other.  The woods were more variegated, interspersed with
 shrubs.  We no longer passed through forests of vast pines stretching
 along with savage magnificence.  Forests that only exhibited the slow
 decay of time or the devastation produced by warring elements.  No; oaks,
 ashes, beech, and all the light and graceful tenants of our woods here
 sported luxuriantly.  I had not observed many oaks before, for the
 greater part of the oak-planks, I am informed, come from the westward.
 
 In France the farmers generally live in villages, which is a great
 disadvantage to the country; but the Norwegian farmers, always owning
 their farms or being tenants for life, reside in the midst of them,
 allowing some labourers a dwelling rent free, who have a little land
 appertaining to the cottage, not only for a garden, but for crops of
 different kinds, such as rye, oats, buck-wheat, hemp, flax, beans,
 potatoes, and hay, which are sown in strips about it, reminding a
 stranger of the first attempts at culture, when every family was obliged
 to be an independent community.
 
 These cottagers work at a certain price (tenpence per day) for the
 farmers on whose ground they live, and they have spare time enough to
 cultivate their own land and lay in a store of fish for the winter.  The
 wives and daughters spin and the husbands and sons weave, so that they
 may fairly be reckoned independent, having also a little money in hand to
 buy coffee, brandy and some other superfluities.
 
 The only thing I disliked was the military service, which trammels them
 more than I at first imagined.  It is true that the militia is only
 called out once a year, yet in case of war they have no alternative but
 must abandon their families.  Even the manufacturers are not exempted,
 though the miners are, in order to encourage undertakings which require a
 capital at the commencement.  And, what appears more tyrannical, the
 inhabitants of certain districts are appointed for the land, others for
 the sea service.  Consequently, a peasant, born a soldier, is not
 permitted to follow his inclination should it lead him to go to sea, a
 natural desire near so many seaports.
 
 In these regulations the arbitrary government--the King of Denmark being
 the most absolute monarch in Europe--appears, which in other respects
 seeks to hide itself in a lenity that almost renders the laws nullities.
 If any alteration of old customs is thought of, the opinion of the old
 country is required and maturely considered.  I have several times had
 occasion to observe that, fearing to appear tyrannical, laws are allowed
 to become obsolete which ought to be put in force or better substituted
 in their stead; for this mistaken moderation, which borders on timidity,
 favours the least respectable part of the people.
 
 I saw on my way not only good parsonage houses, but comfortable
 dwellings, with glebe land for the clerk, always a consequential man in
 every country, a being proud of a little smattering of learning, to use
 the appropriate epithet, and vain of the stiff good-breeding reflected
 from the vicar, though the servility practised in his company gives it a
 peculiar cast.
 
 The widow of the clergyman is allowed to receive the benefit of the
 living for a twelvemonth after the death of the incumbent.
 
 Arriving at the ferry (the passage over to Moss is about six or eight
 English miles) I saw the most level shore I had yet seen in Norway.  The
 appearance of the circumjacent country had been preparing me for the
 change of scene which was to greet me when I reached the coast.  For the
 grand features of nature had been dwindling into prettiness as I
 advanced; yet the rocks, on a smaller scale, were finely wooded to the
 water's edge.  Little art appeared, yet sublimity everywhere gave place
 to elegance.  The road had often assumed the appearance of a gravelled
 one, made in pleasure-grounds; whilst the trees excited only an idea of
 embellishment.  Meadows, like lawns, in an endless variety, displayed the
 careless graces of nature; and the ripening corn gave a richness to the
 landscape analogous with the other objects.
 
 Never was a southern sky more beautiful, nor more soft its gales.  Indeed,
 I am led to conclude that the sweetest summer in the world is the
 northern one, the vegetation being quick and luxuriant the moment the
 earth is loosened from its icy fetters and the bound streams regain their
 wonted activity.  The balance of happiness with respect to climate may be
 more equal than I at first imagined; for the inhabitants describe with
 warmth the pleasures of a winter at the thoughts of which I shudder.  Not
 only their parties of pleasure but of business are reserved for this
 season, when they travel with astonishing rapidity the most direct way,
 skimming over hedge and ditch.
 
 On entering Moss I was struck by the animation which seemed to result
 from industry.  The richest of the inhabitants keep shops, resembling in
 their manners and even the arrangement of their houses the tradespeople
 of Yorkshire; with an air of more independence, or rather consequence,
 from feeling themselves the first people in the place.  I had not time to
 see the iron-works, belonging to Mr. Anker, of Christiania, a man of
 fortune and enterprise; and I was not very anxious to see them after
 having viewed those at Laurvig.
 
 Here I met with an intelligent literary man, who was anxious to gather
 information from me relative to the past and present situation of France.
 The newspapers printed at Copenhagen, as well as those in England, give
 the most exaggerated accounts of their atrocities and distresses, but the
 former without any apparent comments or inferences.  Still the
 Norwegians, though more connected with the English, speaking their
 language and copying their manners, wish well to the Republican cause,
 and follow with the most lively interest the successes of the French
 arms.  So determined were they, in fact, to excuse everything, disgracing
 the struggle of freedom, by admitting the tyrant's plea, necessity, that
 I could hardly persuade them that Robespierre was a monster.
 
 The discussion of this subject is not so general as in England, being
 confined to the few, the clergy and physicians, with a small portion of
 people who have a literary turn and leisure; the greater part of the
 inhabitants having a variety of occupations, being owners of ships,
 shopkeepers, and farmers, have employment enough at home.  And their
 ambition to become rich may tend to cultivate the common sense which
 characterises and narrows both their hearts and views, confirming the
 former to their families, taking the handmaids of it into the circle of
 pleasure, if not of interest, and the latter to the inspection of their
 workmen, including the noble science of bargain-making--that is, getting
 everything at the cheapest, and selling it at the dearest rate.  I am now
 more than ever convinced that it is an intercourse with men of science
 and artists which not only diffuses taste, but gives that freedom to the
 understanding without which I have seldom met with much benevolence of
 character on a large scale.
 
 Besides, though you do not hear of much pilfering and stealing in Norway,
 yet they will, with a quiet conscience, buy things at a price which must
 convince them they were stolen.  I had an opportunity of knowing that two
 or three reputable people had purchased some articles of vagrants, who
 were detected.  How much of the virtue which appears in the world is put
 on for the world?  And how little dictated by self-respect?--so little,
 that I am ready to repeat the old question, and ask, Where is truth, or
 rather principle, to be found?  These are, perhaps, the vapourings of a
 heart ill at ease--the effusions of a sensibility wounded almost to
 madness.  But enough of this; we will discuss the subject in another
 state of existence, where truth and justice will reign.  How cruel are
 the injuries which make us quarrel with human nature!  At present black
 melancholy hovers round my footsteps; and sorrow sheds a mildew over all
 the future prospects, which hope no longer gilds.
 
 A rainy morning prevented my enjoying the pleasure the view of a
 picturesque country would have afforded me; for though this road passed
 through a country a greater extent of which was under cultivation than I
 had usually seen here, it nevertheless retained all the wild charms of
 Norway.  Rocks still enclosed the valleys, the great sides of which
 enlivened their verdure.  Lakes appeared like branches of the sea, and
 branches of the sea assumed the appearance of tranquil lakes; whilst
 streamlets prattled amongst the pebbles and the broken mass of stone
 which had rolled into them, giving fantastic turns to the trees, the
 roots of which they bared.
 
 It is not, in fact, surprising that the pine should be often undermined;
 it shoots its fibres in such a horizontal direction, merely on the
 surface of the earth, requiring only enough to cover those that cling to
 the crags.  Nothing proves to me so clearly that it is the air which
 principally nourishes trees and plants as the flourishing appearance of
 these pines.  The firs, demanding a deeper soil, are seldom seen in equal
 health, or so numerous on the barren cliffs.  They take shelter in the
 crevices, or where, after some revolving ages, the pines have prepared
 them a footing.
 
 Approaching, or rather descending, to Christiania, though the weather
 continued a little cloudy, my eyes were charmed with the view of an
 extensive undulated valley, stretching out under the shelter of a noble
 amphitheatre of pine-covered mountains.  Farm houses scattered about
 animated, nay, graced a scene which still retained so much of its native
 wildness, that the art which appeared seemed so necessary, it was
 scarcely perceived.  Cattle were grazing in the shaven meadows; and the
 lively green on their swelling sides contrasted with the ripening corn
 and rye.  The corn that grew on the slopes had not, indeed, the laughing
 luxuriance of plenty, which I have seen in more genial climes.  A fresh
 breeze swept across the grain, parting its slender stalks, but the wheat
 did not wave its head with its wonted careless dignity, as if nature had
 crowned it the king of plants.
 
 The view, immediately on the left, as we drove down the mountain, was
 almost spoilt by the depredations committed on the rocks to make alum.  I
 do not know the process.  I only saw that the rocks looked red after they
 had been burnt, and regretted that the operation should leave a quantity
 of rubbish to introduce an image of human industry in the shape of
 destruction.  The situation of Christiania is certainly uncommonly fine,
 and I never saw a bay that so forcibly gave me an idea of a place of
 safety from the storms of the ocean; all the surrounding objects were
 beautiful and even grand.  But neither the rocky mountains, nor the woods
 that graced them, could be compared with the sublime prospects I had seen
 to the westward; and as for the hills, "capped with _eternal_ snow," Mr.
 Coxe's description led me to look for them, but they had flown, for I
 looked vainly around for this noble background.
 
 A few months ago the people of Christiania rose, exasperated by the
 scarcity and consequent high price of grain.  The immediate cause was the
 shipping of some, said to be for Moss, but which they suspected was only
 a pretext to send it out of the country, and I am not sure that they were
 wrong in their conjecture.  Such are the tricks of trade.  They threw
 stones at Mr. Anker, the owner of it, as he rode out of town to escape
 from their fury; they assembled about his house, and the people demanded
 afterwards, with so much impetuosity, the liberty of those who were taken
 up in consequence of the tumult, that the Grand Bailiff thought it
 prudent to release them without further altercation.
 
 You may think me too severe on commerce, but from the manner it is at
 present carried on little can be advanced in favour of a pursuit that
 wears out the most sacred principles of humanity and rectitude.  What is
 speculation but a species of gambling, I might have said fraud, in which
 address generally gains the prize?  I was led into these reflections when
 I heard of some tricks practised by merchants, miscalled reputable, and
 certainly men of property, during the present war, in which common
 honesty was violated: damaged goods and provision having been shipped for
 the express purpose of falling into the hands of the English, who had
 pledged themselves to reimburse neutral nations for the cargoes they
 seized; cannon also, sent back as unfit for service, have been shipped as
 a good speculation, the captain receiving orders to cruise about till he
 fell in with an English frigate.  Many individuals I believe have
 suffered by the seizures of their vessels; still I am persuaded that the
 English Government has been very much imposed upon in the charges made by
 merchants who contrived to get their ships taken.  This censure is not
 confined to the Danes.  Adieu, for the present, I must take advantage of
 a moment of fine weather to walk out and see the town.
 
 At Christiania I met with that polite reception, which rather
 characterises the progress of manners in the world, than of any
 particular portion of it.  The first evening of my arrival I supped with
 some of the most fashionable people of the place, and almost imagined
 myself in a circle of English ladies, so much did they resemble them in
 manners, dress, and even in beauty; for the fairest of my countrywomen
 would not have been sorry to rank with the Grand Bailiff's lady.  There
 were several pretty girls present, but she outshone them all, and, what
 interested me still more, I could not avoid observing that in acquiring
 the easy politeness which distinguishes people of quality, she had
 preserved her Norwegian simplicity.  There was, in fact, a graceful
 timidity in her address, inexpressibly charming.  This surprised me a
 little, because her husband was quite a Frenchman of the _ancien regime_,
 or rather a courtier, the same kind of animal in every country.
 
 Here I saw the cloven foot of despotism.  I boasted to you that they had
 no viceroy in Norway, but these Grand Bailiffs, particularly the superior
 one, who resides at Christiania, are political monsters of the same
 species.  Needy sycophants are provided for by their relations and
 connections at Copenhagen as at other courts.  And though the Norwegians
 are not in the abject state of the Irish, yet this second-hand government
 is still felt by their being deprived of several natural advantages to
 benefit the domineering state.
 
 The Grand Bailiffs are mostly noblemen from Copenhagen, who act as men of
 common minds will always act in such situations--aping a degree of
 courtly parade which clashes with the independent character of a
 magistrate.  Besides, they have a degree of power over the country
 judges, which some of them, who exercise a jurisdiction truly patriarchal
 most painfully feel.  I can scarcely say why, my friend, but in this city
 thoughtfulness seemed to be sliding into melancholy or rather dulness.
 The fire of fancy, which had been kept alive in the country, was almost
 extinguished by reflections on the ills that harass such a large portion
 of mankind.  I felt like a bird fluttering on the ground unable to mount,
 yet unwilling to crawl tranquilly like a reptile, whilst still conscious
 it had wings.
 
 I walked out, for the open air is always my remedy when an aching head
 proceeds from an oppressed heart.  Chance directed my steps towards the
 fortress, and the sight of the slaves, working with chains on their legs,
 only served to embitter me still more against the regulations of society,
 which treated knaves in such a different manner, especially as there was
 a degree of energy in some of their countenances which unavoidably
 excited my attention, and almost created respect.
 
 I wished to have seen, through an iron grate, the face of a man who has
 been confined six years for having induced the farmers to revolt against
 some impositions of the Government.  I could not obtain a clear account
 of the affair, yet, as the complaint was against some farmers of taxes, I
 am inclined to believe that it was not totally without foundation.  He
 must have possessed some eloquence, or have had truth on his side; for
 the farmers rose by hundreds to support him, and were very much
 exasperated at his imprisonment, which will probably last for life,
 though he has sent several very spirited remonstrances to the upper
 court, which makes the judges so averse to giving a sentence which may be
 cavilled at, that they take advantage of the glorious uncertainty of the
 law, to protract a decision which is only to be regulated by reasons of
 state.
 
 The greater number of the slaves I saw here were not confined for life.
 Their labour is not hard; and they work in the open air, which prevents
 their constitutions from suffering by imprisonment.  Still, as they are
 allowed to associate together, and boast of their dexterity, not only to
 each other but to the soldiers around them, in the garrison; they
 commonly, it is natural to conclude, go out more confirmed and more
 expert knaves than when they entered.
 
 It is not necessary to trace the origin of the association of ideas which
 led me to think that the stars and gold keys, which surrounded me the
 evening before, disgraced the wearers as much as the fetters I was
 viewing--perhaps more.  I even began to investigate the reason, which led
 me to suspect that the former produced the latter.
 
 The Norwegians are extravagantly fond of courtly distinction, and of
 titles, though they have no immunities annexed to them, and are easily
 purchased.  The proprietors of mines have many privileges: they are
 almost exempt from taxes, and the peasantry born on their estates, as
 well as those on the counts', are not born soldiers or sailors.
 
 One distinction, or rather trophy of nobility, which I might have
 occurred to the Hottentots, amused me; it was a bunch of hog's bristles
 placed on the horses' heads, surmounting that part of the harness to
 which a round piece of brass often dangles, fatiguing the eye with its
 idle motion.
 
 From the fortress I returned to my lodging, and quickly was taken out of
 town to be shown a pretty villa, and English garden.  To a Norwegian both
 might have been objects of curiosity; and of use, by exciting to the
 comparison which leads to improvement.  But whilst I gazed, I was
 employed in restoring the place to nature, or taste, by giving it the
 character of the surrounding scene.  Serpentine walks, and
 flowering-shrubs, looked trifling in a grand recess of the rooks, shaded
 by towering pines.  Groves of smaller trees might have been sheltered
 under them, which would have melted into the landscape, displaying only
 the art which ought to point out the vicinity of a human abode, furnished
 with some elegance.  But few people have sufficient taste to discern,
 that the art of embellishing consists in interesting, not in astonishing.
 
 Christiania is certainly very pleasantly situated, and the environs I
 passed through, during this ride, afforded many fine and cultivated
 prospects; but, excepting the first view approaching to it, rarely
 present any combination of objects so strikingly new, or picturesque, as
 to command remembrance.  Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XIV.
 
 
 Christiania is a clean, neat city; but it has none of the graces of
 architecture, which ought to keep pace with the refining manners of a
 people--or the outside of the house will disgrace the inside, giving the
 beholder an idea of overgrown wealth devoid of taste.  Large square
 wooden houses offend the eye, displaying more than Gothic barbarism.  Huge
 Gothic piles, indeed, exhibit a characteristic sublimity, and a wildness
 of fancy peculiar to the period when they were erected; but size, without
 grandeur or elegance, has an emphatical stamp of meanness, of poverty of
 conception, which only a commercial spirit could give.
 
 The same thought has struck me, when I have entered the meeting-house of
 my respected friend, Dr. Price.  I am surprised that the dissenters, who
 have not laid aside all the pomps and vanities of life, should imagine a
 noble pillar, or arch, unhallowed.  Whilst men have senses, whatever
 soothes them lends wings to devotion; else why do the beauties of nature,
 where all that charm them are spread around with a lavish hand, force
 even the sorrowing heart to acknowledge that existence is a blessing? and
 this acknowledgment is the most sublime homage we can pay to the Deity.
 
 The argument of convenience is absurd.  Who would labour for wealth, if
 it were to procure nothing but conveniences.  If we wish to render
 mankind moral from principle, we must, I am persuaded, give a greater
 scope to the enjoyments of the senses by blending taste with them.  This
 has frequently occurred to me since I have been in the north, and
 observed that there sanguine characters always take refuge in drunkenness
 after the fire of youth is spent.
 
 But I have flown from Norway.  To go back to the wooden houses; farms
 constructed with logs, and even little villages, here erected in the same
 simple manner, have appeared to me very picturesque.  In the more remote
 parts I had been particularly pleased with many cottages situated close
 to a brook, or bordering on a lake, with the whole farm contiguous.  As
 the family increases, a little more land is cultivated; thus the country
 is obviously enriched by population.  Formerly the farmers might more
 justly have been termed woodcutters.  But now they find it necessary to
 spare the woods a little, and this change will be universally beneficial;
 for whilst they lived entirely by selling the trees they felled, they did
 not pay sufficient attention to husbandry; consequently, advanced very
 slowly in agricultural knowledge.  Necessity will in future more and more
 spur them on; for the ground, cleared of wood, must be cultivated, or the
 farm loses its value; there is no waiting for food till another
 generation of pines be grown to maturity.
 
 The people of property are very careful of their timber; and, rambling
 through a forest near Tonsberg, belonging to the Count, I have stopped to
 admire the appearance of some of the cottages inhabited by a woodman's
 family--a man employed to cut down the wood necessary for the household
 and the estate.  A little lawn was cleared, on which several lofty trees
 were left which nature had grouped, whilst the encircling firs sported
 with wild grace.  The dwelling was sheltered by the forest, noble pines
 spreading their branches over the roof; and before the door a cow, goat,
 nag, and children, seemed equally content with their lot; and if
 contentment be all we can attain, it is, perhaps, best secured by
 ignorance.
 
 As I have been most delighted with the country parts of Norway, I was
 sorry to leave Christiania without going farther to the north, though the
 advancing season admonished me to depart, as well as the calls of
 business and affection.
 
 June and July are the months to make a tour through Norway; for then the
 evenings and nights are the finest I have ever seen; but towards the
 middle or latter end of August the clouds begin to gather, and summer
 disappears almost before it has ripened the fruit of autumn--even, as it
 were, slips from your embraces, whilst the satisfied senses seem to rest
 in enjoyment.
 
 You will ask, perhaps, why I wished to go farther northward.  Why? not
 only because the country, from all I can gather, is most romantic,
 abounding in forests and lakes, and the air pure, but I have heard much
 of the intelligence of the inhabitants, substantial farmers, who have
 none of that cunning to contaminate their simplicity, which displeased me
 so much in the conduct of the people on the sea coast.  A man who has
 been detected in any dishonest act can no longer live among them.  He is
 universally shunned, and shame becomes the severest punishment.
 
 Such a contempt have they, in fact, for every species of fraud, that they
 will not allow the people on the western coast to be their countrymen; so
 much do they despise the arts for which those traders who live on the
 rocks are notorious.
 
 The description I received of them carried me back to the fables of the
 golden age: independence and virtue; affluence without vice; cultivation
 of mind, without depravity of heart; with "ever smiling Liberty;" the
 nymph of the mountain.  I want faith!
 
 My imagination hurries me forward to seek an asylum in such a retreat
 from all the disappointments I am threatened with; but reason drags me
 back, whispering that the world is still the world, and man the same
 compound of weakness and folly, who must occasionally excite love and
 disgust, admiration and contempt.  But this description, though it seems
 to have been sketched by a fairy pencil, was given me by a man of sound
 understanding, whose fancy seldom appears to run away with him.
 
 A law in Norway, termed the _odels right_, has lately been modified, and
 probably will be abolished as an impediment to commerce.  The heir of an
 estate had the power of re-purchasing it at the original purchase money,
 making allowance for such improvements as were absolutely necessary,
 during the space of twenty years.  At present ten is the term allowed for
 afterthought; and when the regulation was made, all the men of abilities
 were invited to give their opinion whether it were better to abrogate or
 modify it.  It is certainly a convenient and safe way of mortgaging land;
 yet the most rational men whom I conversed with on the subject seemed
 convinced that the right was more injurious than beneficial to society;
 still if it contribute to keep the farms in the farmers' own hands, I
 should be sorry to hear that it were abolished.
 
 The aristocracy in Norway, if we keep clear of Christiania, is far from
 being formidable; and it will require a long the to enable the merchants
 to attain a sufficient moneyed interest to induce them to reinforce the
 upper class at the expense of the yeomanry, with whom they are usually
 connected.
 
 England and America owe their liberty to commerce, which created new
 species of power to undermine the feudal system.  But let them beware of
 the consequence; the tyranny of wealth is still more galling and debasing
 than that of rank.
 
 Farewell!  I must prepare for my departure.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XV.
 
 
 I left Christiania yesterday.  The weather was not very fine, and having
 been a little delayed on the road, I found that it was too late to go
 round, a couple of miles, to see the cascade near Fredericstadt, which I
 had determined to visit.  Besides, as Fredericstadt is a fortress, it was
 necessary to arrive there before they shut the gate.
 
 The road along the river is very romantic, though the views are not
 grand; and the riches of Norway, its timber, floats silently down the
 stream, often impeded in its course by islands and little cataracts, the
 offspring, as it were, of the great one I had frequently heard described.
 
 I found an excellent inn at Fredericstadt, and was gratified by the kind
 attention of the hostess, who, perceiving that my clothes were wet, took
 great pains procure me, as a stranger, every comfort for the night.
 
 It had rained very hard, and we passed the ferry in the dark without
 getting out of our carriage, which I think wrong, as the horses are
 sometimes unruly.  Fatigue and melancholy, however, had made me
 regardless whether I went down or across the stream, and I did not know
 that I was wet before the hostess marked it.  My imagination has never
 yet severed me from my griefs, and my mind has seldom been so free as to
 allow my body to be delicate.
 
 How I am altered by disappointment!  When going to Lisbon, the elasticity
 of my mind was sufficient to ward off weariness, and my imagination still
 could dip her brush in the rainbow of fancy, and sketch futurity in
 glowing colours.  Now--but let me talk of something else--will you go
 with me to the cascade?
 
 The cross road to it was rugged and dreary; and though a considerable
 extent of land was cultivated on all sides, yet the rocks were entirely
 bare, which surprised me, as they were more on a level with the surface
 than any I had yet seen.  On inquiry, however, I learnt that some years
 since a forest had been burnt.  This appearance of desolation was beyond
 measure gloomy, inspiring emotions that sterility had never produced.
 Fires of this kind are occasioned by the wind suddenly rising when the
 farmers are burning roots of trees, stalks of beans, &c, with which they
 manure the ground.  The devastation must, indeed, be terrible, when this,
 literally speaking, wildfire, runs along the forest, flying from top to
 top, and crackling amongst the branches.  The soil, as well as the trees,
 is swept away by the destructive torrent; and the country, despoiled of
 beauty and riches, is left to mourn for ages.
 
 Admiring, as I do, these noble forests, which seem to bid defiance to
 time, I looked with pain on the ridge of rocks that stretched far beyond
 my eye, formerly crowned with the most beautiful verdure.
 
 I have often mentioned the grandeur, but I feel myself unequal to the
 task of conveying an idea of the beauty and elegance of the scene when
 the spiry tops of the pines are loaded with ripening seed, and the sun
 gives a glow to their light-green tinge, which is changing into purple,
 one tree more or less advanced contrasted with another.  The profusion
 with which Nature has decked them with pendant honours, prevents all
 surprise at seeing in every crevice some sapling struggling for
 existence.  Vast masses of stone are thus encircled, and roots torn up by
 the storms become a shelter for a young generation.  The pine and fir
 woods, left entirely to Nature, display an endless variety; and the paths
 in the woods are not entangled with fallen leaves, which are only
 interesting whilst they are fluttering between life and death.  The grey
 cobweb-like appearance of the aged pines is a much finer image of decay;
 the fibres whitening as they lose their moisture, imprisoned life seems
 to be stealing away.  I cannot tell why, but death, under every form,
 appears to me like something getting free to expand in I know not what
 element--nay, I feel that this conscious being must be as unfettered,
 have the wings of thought, before it can be happy.
 
 Reaching the cascade, or rather cataract, the roaring of which had a long
 time announced its vicinity, my soul was hurried by the falls into a new
 train of reflections.  The impetuous dashing of the rebounding torrent
 from the dark cavities which mocked the exploring eye produced an equal
 activity in my mind.  My thoughts darted from earth to heaven, and I
 asked myself why I was chained to life and its misery.  Still the
 tumultuous emotions this sublime object excited were pleasurable; and,
 viewing it, my soul rose with renewed dignity above its cares.  Grasping
 at immortality--it seemed as impossible to stop the current of my
 thoughts, as of the always varying, still the same, torrent before me; I
 stretched out my hand to eternity, bounding over the dark speck of life
 to come.
 
 We turned with regret from the cascade.  On a little hill, which commands
 the best view of it, several obelisks are erected to commemorate the
 visits of different kings.  The appearance of the river above and below
 the falls is very picturesque, the ruggedness of the scenery disappearing
 as the torrent subsides into a peaceful stream.  But I did not like to
 see a number of saw-mills crowded together close to the cataracts; they
 destroyed the harmony of the prospect.
 
 The sight of a bridge erected across a deep valley, at a little distance,
 inspired very dissimilar sensations.  It was most ingeniously supported
 by mast-like trunks, just stripped of their branches; and logs, placed
 one across the other, produced an appearance equally light and firm,
 seeming almost to be built in the air when we were below it, the height
 taking from the magnitude of the supporting trees give them a slender
 graceful look.
 
 There are two noble estates in this neighbourhood, the proprietors of
 which seem to have caught more than their portion of the enterprising
 spirit that is gone abroad.  Many agricultural experiments have been
 made, and the country appears better enclosed and cultivated, yet the
 cottages had not the comfortable aspect of those I had observed near Moss
 and to the westward.  Man is always debased by servitude of any
 description, and here the peasantry are not entirely free.  Adieu!
 
 I almost forgot to tell you that I did not leave Norway without making
 some inquiries after the monsters said to have been seen in the northern
 sea; but though I conversed with several captains, I could not meet with
 one who had ever heard any traditional description of them, much less had
 any ocular demonstration of their existence.  Till the fact is better
 ascertained, I should think the account of them ought to be torn out of
 our geographical grammars.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XVI.
 
 
 I set out from Fredericstadt about three o'clock in the afternoon, and
 expected to reach Stromstad before the night closed in; but the wind
 dying away, the weather became so calm that we scarcely made any
 perceptible advances towards the opposite coast, though the men were
 fatigued with rowing.
 
 Getting amongst the rocks and islands as the moon rose, and the stars
 darted forward out of the clear expanse, I forgot that the night stole on
 whilst indulging affectionate reveries, the poetical fictions of
 sensibility; I was not, therefore, aware of the length of time we had
 been toiling to reach Stromstad.  And when I began to look around, I did
 not perceive anything to indicate that we were in its neighbourhood.  So
 far from it, that when I inquired of the pilot, who spoke a little
 English, I found that he was only accustomed to coast along the Norwegian
 shore; and had been only once across to Stromstad.  But he had brought
 with him a fellow better acquainted, he assured me, with the rocks by
 which they were to steer our course, for we had not a compass on board;
 yet, as he was half a fool, I had little confidence in his skill.  There
 was then great reason to fear that we had lost our way, and were straying
 amidst a labyrinth of rocks without a clue.
 
 This was something like an adventure, but not of the most agreeable cast;
 besides, I was impatient to arrive at Stromstad, to be able to send
 forward that night a boy to order horses on the road to be ready, for I
 was unwilling to remain there a day without having anything to detain me
 from my little girl, and from the letters which I was impatient to get
 from you.
 
 I began to expostulate, and even to scold the pilot, for not having
 informed me of his ignorance previous to my departure.  This made him row
 with more force, and we turned round one rock only to see another,
 equally destitute of the tokens we were in search of to tell us where we
 were.  Entering also into creek after creek which promised to be the
 entrance of the bay we were seeking, we advanced merely to find ourselves
 running aground.
 
 The solitariness of the scene, as we glided under the dark shadows of the
 rocks, pleased me for a while; but the fear of passing the whole night
 thus wandering to and fro, and losing the next day, roused me.  I begged
 the pilot to return to one of the largest islands, at the side of which
 we had seen a boat moored.  As we drew nearer, a light through a window
 on the summit became our beacon; but we were farther off than I supposed.
 
 With some difficulty the pilot got on shore, not distinguishing the
 landing-place; and I remained in the boat, knowing that all the relief we
 could expect was a man to direct us.  After waiting some time, for there
 is an insensibility in the very movements of these people that would
 weary more than ordinary patience, he brought with him a man who,
 assisting them to row, we landed at Stromstad a little after one in the
 morning.
 
 It was too late to send off a boy, but I did not go to bed before I had
 made the arrangements necessary to enable me to set out as early as
 possible.
 
 The sun rose with splendour.  My mind was too active to allow me to
 loiter long in bed, though the horses did not arrive till between seven
 and eight.  However, as I wished to let the boy, who went forward to
 order the horses, get considerably the start of me, I bridled in my
 impatience.
 
 This precaution was unavailing, for after the three first posts I had to
 wait two hours, whilst the people at the post-house went, fair and
 softly, to the farm, to bid them bring up the horses which were carrying
 in the first-fruits of the harvest.  I discovered here that these
 sluggish peasants had their share of cunning.  Though they had made me
 pay for a horse, the boy had gone on foot, and only arrived half an hour
 before me.  This disconcerted the whole arrangement of the day; and being
 detained again three hours, I reluctantly determined to sleep at
 Quistram, two posts short of Uddervalla, where I had hoped to have
 arrived that night.
 
 But when I reached Quistram I found I could not approach the door of the
 inn for men, horses, and carts, cows, and pigs huddled together.  From
 the concourse of people I had met on the road I conjectured that there
 was a fair in the neighbourhood; this crowd convinced me that it was but
 too true.  The boisterous merriment that almost every instant produced a
 quarrel, or made me dread one, with the clouds of tobacco, and fumes of
 brandy, gave an infernal appearance to the scene.  There was everything
 to drive me back, nothing to excite sympathy in a rude tumult of the
 senses, which I foresaw would end in a gross debauch.  What was to be
 done?  No bed was to be had, or even a quiet corner to retire to for a
 moment; all was lost in noise, riot, and confusion.
 
 After some debating they promised me horses, which were to go on to
 Uddervalla, two stages.  I requested something to eat first, not having
 dined; and the hostess, whom I have mentioned to you before as knowing
 how to take care of herself, brought me a plate of fish, for which she
 charged a rix-dollar and a half.  This was making hay whilst the sun
 shone.  I was glad to get out of the uproar, though not disposed to
 travel in an incommodious open carriage all night, had I thought that
 there was any chance of getting horses.
 
 Quitting Quistram I met a number of joyous groups, and though the evening
 was fresh many were stretched on the grass like weary cattle; and drunken
 men had fallen by the road-side.  On a rock, under the shade of lofty
 trees, a large party of men and women had lighted a fire, cutting down
 fuel around to keep it alive all night.  They were drinking, smoking, and
 laughing with all their might and main.  I felt for the trees whose torn
 branches strewed the ground.  Hapless nymphs! your haunts, I fear, were
 polluted by many an unhallowed flame, the casual burst of the moment!
 
 The horses went on very well; but when we drew near the post-house the
 postillion stopped short and neither threats nor promises could prevail
 on him to go forward.  He even began to howl and weep when I insisted on
 his keeping his word.  Nothing, indeed, can equal the stupid obstinacy of
 some of these half-alive beings, who seem to have been made by Prometheus
 when the fire he stole from Heaven was so exhausted that he could only
 spare a spark to give life, not animation, to the inert clay.
 
 It was some time before we could rouse anybody; and, as I expected,
 horses, we were told, could not be had in less than four or five hours.  I
 again attempted to bribe the churlish brute who brought us there, but I
 discovered that, in spite of the courteous hostess's promises, he had
 received orders not to go any father.
 
 As there was no remedy I entered, and was almost driven back by the
 stench--a softer phrase would not have conveyed an idea of the hot vapour
 that issued from an apartment in which some eight or ten people were
 sleeping, not to reckon the cats and dogs stretched on the floor.  Two or
 three of the men or women were on the benches, others on old chests; and
 one figure started half out of a trunk to look at me, whom might have
 taken for a ghost, had the chemise been white, to contrast with the
 sallow visage.  But the costume of apparitions not being preserved I
 passed, nothing dreading, excepting the effluvia, warily amongst the
 pots, pans, milk-pails, and washing-tubs.  After scaling a ruinous
 staircase I was shown a bed-chamber.  The bed did not invite me to enter;
 opening, therefore, the window, and taking some clean towels out of my
 night-sack, I spread them over the coverlid, on which tired Nature found
 repose, in spite of the previous disgust.
 
 With the grey of the morn the birds awoke me; and descending to inquire
 for the horses, I hastened through the apartment I have already
 described, not wishing to associate the idea of a pigstye with that of a
 human dwelling.
 
 I do not now wonder that the girls lose their fine complexions at such an
 early age, or that love here is merely an appetite to fulfil the main
 design of Nature, never enlivened by either affection or sentiment.
 
 For a few posts we found the horses waiting; but afterwards I was
 retarded, as before, by the peasants, who, taking advantage of my
 ignorance of the language, made me pay for the fourth horse that ought to
 have gone forward to have the others in readiness, though it had never
 been sent.  I was particularly impatient at the last post, as I longed to
 assure myself that my child was well.
 
 My impatience, however, did not prevent my enjoying the journey.  I had
 six weeks before passed over the same ground; still it had sufficient
 novelty to attract my attention, and beguile, if not banish, the sorrow
 that had taken up its abode in my heart.  How interesting are the varied
 beauties of Nature, and what peculiar charms characterise each season!
 The purple hue which the heath now assumed gave it a degree of richness
 that almost exceeded the lustre of the young green of spring, and
 harmonised exquisitely with the rays of the ripening corn.  The weather
 was uninterruptedly fine, and the people busy in the fields cutting down
 the corn, or binding up the sheaves, continually varied the prospect.  The
 rocks, it is true, were unusually rugged and dreary; yet as the road runs
 for a considerable way by the side of a fine river, with extended
 pastures on the other side, the image of sterility was not the
 predominant object, though the cottages looked still more miserable,
 after having seen the Norwegian farms.  The trees likewise appeared of me
 growth of yesterday, compared with those Nestors of the forest I have
 frequently mentioned.  The women and children were cutting off branches
 from the beech, birch, oak, &c, and leaving them to dry.  This way of
 helping out their fodder injures the trees.  But the winters are so long
 that the poor cannot afford to lay in a sufficient stock of hay.  By such
 means they just keep life in the poor cows, for little milk can be
 expected when they are so miserably fed.
 
 It was Saturday, and the evening was uncommonly serene.  In the villages
 I everywhere saw preparations for Sunday; and I passed by a little car
 loaded with rye, that presented, for the pencil and heart, the sweetest
 picture of a harvest home I had ever beheld.  A little girl was mounted a-
 straddle on a shaggy horse, brandishing a stick over its head; the father
 was walking at the side of the car with a child in his arms, who must
 have come to meet him with tottering steps; the little creature was
 stretching out its arms to cling round his neck; and a boy, just above
 petticoats, was labouring hard with a fork behind to keep the sheaves
 from falling.
 
 My eyes followed them to the cottage, and an involuntary sigh whispered
 to my heart that I envied the mother, much as I dislike cooking, who was
 preparing their pottage.  I was returning to my babe, who may never
 experience a father's care or tenderness.  The bosom that nurtured her
 heaved with a pang at the thought which only an unhappy mother could
 feel.
 
 Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XVII.
 
 
 I was unwilling to leave Gothenburg without visiting Trolhaettae.  I
 wished not only to see the cascade, but to observe the progress of the
 stupendous attempt to form a canal through the rocks, to the extent of an
 English mile and a half.
 
 This work is carried on by a company, who employ daily nine hundred men;
 five years was the time mentioned in the proposals addressed to the
 public as necessary for the completion.  A much more considerable sum
 than the plan requires has been subscribed, for which there is every
 reason to suppose the promoters will receive ample interest.
 
 The Danes survey the progress of this work with a jealous eye, as it is
 principally undertaken to get clear of the Sound duty.
 
 Arrived at Trolhaettae, I must own that the first view of the cascade
 disappointed me; and the sight of the works, as they advanced, though a
 grand proof of human industry, was not calculated to warm the fancy.  I,
 however, wandered about; and at last coming to the conflux of the various
 cataracts rushing from different falls, struggling with the huge masses
 of rock, and rebounding from the profound cavities, I immediately
 retracted, acknowledging that it was indeed a grand object.  A little
 island stood in the midst, covered with firs, which, by dividing the
 torrent, rendered it more picturesque; one half appearing to issue from a
 dark cavern, that fancy might easily imagine a vast fountain throwing up
 its waters from the very centre of the earth.
 
 I gazed I know not how long, stunned with the noise, and growing giddy
 with only looking at the never-ceasing tumultuous motion, I listened,
 scarcely conscious where I was, when I observed a boy, half obscured by
 the sparkling foam, fishing under the impending rock on the other side.
 How he had descended I could not perceive; nothing like human footsteps
 appeared, and the horrific crags seemed to bid defiance even to the
 goat's activity.  It looked like an abode only fit for the eagle, though
 in its crevices some pines darted up their spiral heads; but they only
 grew near the cascade, everywhere else sterility itself reigned with
 dreary grandeur; for the huge grey massy rocks, which probably had been
 torn asunder by some dreadful convulsion of nature, had not even their
 first covering of a little cleaving moss.  There were so many appearances
 to excite the idea of chaos, that, instead of admiring the canal and the
 works, great as they are termed, and little as they appear, I could not
 help regretting that such a noble scene had not been left in all its
 solitary sublimity.  Amidst the awful roaring of the impetuous torrents,
 the noise of human instruments and the bustle of workmen, even the
 blowing up of the rocks when grand masses trembled in the darkened air,
 only resembled the insignificant sport of children.
 
 One fall of water, partly made by art, when they were attempting to
 construct sluices, had an uncommonly grand effect; the water precipitated
 itself with immense velocity down a perpendicular, at least fifty or
 sixty yards, into a gulf, so concealed by the foam as to give full play
 to the fancy.  There was a continual uproar.  I stood on a rock to
 observe it, a kind of bridge formed by nature, nearly on a level with the
 commencement of the fall.  After musing by it a long time I turned
 towards the other side, and saw a gentle stream stray calmly out.  I
 should have concluded that it had no communication with the torrent had I
 not seen a huge log that fell headlong down the cascade steal peacefully
 into the purling stream.
 
 I retired from these wild scenes with regret to a miserable inn, and next
 morning returned to Gothenburg, to prepare for my journey to Copenhagen.
 
 I was sorry to leave Gothenburg without travelling farther into Sweden,
 yet I imagine I should only have seen a romantic country thinly
 inhabited, and these inhabitants struggling with poverty.  The Norwegian
 peasantry, mostly independent, have a rough kind of frankness in their
 manner; but the Swedish, rendered more abject by misery, have a degree of
 politeness in their address which, though it may sometimes border on
 insincerity, is oftener the effect of a broken spirit, rather softened
 than degraded by wretchedness.
 
 In Norway there are no notes in circulation of less value than a Swedish
 rix-dollar.  A small silver coin, commonly not worth more than a penny,
 and never more than twopence, serves for change; but in Sweden they have
 notes as low as sixpence.  I never saw any silver pieces there, and could
 not without difficulty, and giving a premium, obtain the value of a rix-
 dollar in a large copper coin to give away on the road to the poor who
 open the gates.
 
 As another proof of the poverty of Sweden, I ought to mention that
 foreign merchants who have acquired a fortune there are obliged to
 deposit the sixth part when they leave the kingdom.  This law, you may
 suppose, is frequently evaded.
 
 In fact, the laws here, as well as in Norway, are so relaxed that they
 rather favour than restrain knavery.
 
 Whilst I was at Gothenburg, a man who had been confined for breaking open
 his master's desk and running away with five or six thousand rix-dollars,
 was only sentenced to forty days' confinement on bread and water; and
 this slight punishment his relations rendered nugatory by supplying him
 with more savoury food.
 
 The Swedes are in general attached to their families, yet a divorce may
 be obtained by either party on proving the infidelity of the other or
 acknowledging it themselves.  The women do not often recur to this equal
 privilege, for they either retaliate on their husbands by following their
 own devices or sink into the merest domestic drudges, worn down by
 tyranny to servile submission.  Do not term me severe if I add, that
 after youth is flown the husband becomes a sot, and the wife amuses
 herself by scolding her servants.  In fact, what is to be expected in any
 country where taste and cultivation of mind do not supply the place of
 youthful beauty and animal spirits?  Affection requires a firmer
 foundation than sympathy, and few people have a principle of action
 sufficiently stable to produce rectitude of feeling; for in spite of all
 the arguments I have heard to justify deviations from duty, I am
 persuaded that even the most spontaneous sensations are more under the
 direction of principle than weak people are willing to allow.
 
 But adieu to moralising.  I have been writing these last sheets at an inn
 in Elsineur, where I am waiting for horses; and as they are not yet
 ready, I will give you a short account of my journey from Gothenburg, for
 I set out the morning after I returned from Trolhaettae.
 
 The country during the first day's journey presented a most barren
 appearance, as rocky, yet not so picturesque as Norway, because on a
 diminutive scale.  We stopped to sleep at a tolerable inn in
 Falckersberg, a decent little town.
 
 The next day beeches and oaks began to grace the prospects, the sea every
 now and then appearing to give them dignity.  I could not avoid observing
 also, that even in this part of Sweden, one of the most sterile, as I was
 informed, there was more ground under cultivation than in Norway.  Plains
 of varied crops stretched out to a considerable extent, and sloped down
 to the shore, no longer terrific.  And, as far as I could judge, from
 glancing my eye over the country as we drove along, agriculture was in a
 more advanced state, though in the habitations a greater appearance of
 poverty still remained.  The cottages, indeed, often looked most
 uncomfortable, but never so miserable as those I had remarked on the road
 to Stromstad, and the towns were equal, if not superior, to many of the
 little towns in Wales, or some I have passed through in my way from
 Calais to Paris.
 
 The inns as we advanced were not to be complained of, unless I had always
 thought of England.  The people were civil, and much more moderate in
 their demands than the Norwegians, particularly to the westward, where
 they boldly charge for what you never had, and seem to consider you, as
 they do a wreck, if not as lawful prey, yet as a lucky chance, which they
 ought not to neglect to seize.
 
 The prospect of Elsineur, as we passed the Sound, was pleasant.  I gave
 three rix-dollars for my boat, including something to drink.  I mention
 the sum, because they impose on strangers.
 
 Adieu! till I arrive at Copenhagen.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XVIII.--COPENHAGEN.
 
 
 The distance from Elsineur to Copenhagen is twenty-two miles; the road is
 very good, over a flat country diversified with wood, mostly beech, and
 decent mansions.  There appeared to be a great quantity of corn land, and
 the soil looked much more fertile than it is in general so near the sea.
 The rising grounds, indeed, were very few, and around Copenhagen it is a
 perfect plain; of course has nothing to recommend it but cultivation, not
 decorations.  If I say that the houses did not disgust me, I tell you all
 I remember of them, for I cannot recollect any pleasurable sensations
 they excited, or that any object, produced by nature or art, took me out
 of myself.  The view of the city, as we drew near, was rather grand, but
 without any striking feature to interest the imagination, excepting the
 trees which shade the footpaths.
 
 Just before I reached Copenhagen I saw a number of tents on a wide plain,
 and supposed that the rage for encampments had reached this city; but I
 soon discovered that they were the asylum of many of the poor families
 who had been driven out of their habitations by the late fire.
 
 Entering soon after, I passed amongst the dust and rubbish it had left,
 affrighted by viewing the extent of the devastation, for at least a
 quarter of the city had been destroyed.  There was little in the
 appearance of fallen bricks and stacks of chimneys to allure the
 imagination into soothing melancholy reveries; nothing to attract the eye
 of taste, but much to afflict the benevolent heart.  The depredations of
 time have always something in them to employ the fancy, or lead to musing
 on subjects which, withdrawing the mind from objects of sense, seem to
 give it new dignity; but here I was treading on live ashes.  The
 sufferers were still under the pressure of the misery occasioned by this
 dreadful conflagration.  I could not take refuge in the thought: they
 suffered, but they are no more! a reflection I frequently summon to calm
 my mind when sympathy rises to anguish.  I therefore desired the driver
 to hasten to the hotel recommended to me, that I might avert my eyes and
 snap the train of thinking which had sent me into all the corners of the
 city in search of houseless heads.
 
 This morning I have been walking round the town, till I am weary of
 observing the ravages.  I had often heard the Danes, even those who had
 seen Paris and London, speak of Copenhagen with rapture.  Certainly I
 have seen it in a very disadvantageous light, some of the best streets
 having been burnt, and the whole place thrown into confusion.  Still the
 utmost that can, or could ever, I believe, have been said in its praise,
 might be comprised in a few words.  The streets are open, and many of the
 houses large; but I saw nothing to rouse the idea of elegance or
 grandeur, if I except the circus where the king and prince royal reside.
 
 The palace, which was consumed about two years ago, must have been a
 handsome, spacious building; the stone-work is still standing, and a
 great number of the poor, during the late fire, took refuge in its ruins
 till they could find some other abode.  Beds were thrown on the landing-
 places of the grand staircase, where whole families crept from the cold,
 and every little nook is boarded up as a retreat for some poor creatures
 deprived of their home.  At present a roof may be sufficient to shelter
 them from the night air; but as the season advances, the extent of the
 calamity will be more severely felt, I fear, though the exertions on the
 part of Government are very considerable.  Private charity has also, no
 doubt, done much to alleviate the misery which obtrudes itself at every
 turn; still, public spirit appears to me to be hardly alive here.  Had it
 existed, the conflagration might have been smothered in the beginning, as
 it was at last, by tearing down several houses before the flames had
 reached them.  To this the inhabitants would not consent; and the prince
 royal not having sufficient energy of character to know when he ought to
 be absolute, calmly let them pursue their own course, till the whole city
 seemed to be threatened with destruction.  Adhering, with puerile
 scrupulosity, to the law which he has imposed on himself, of acting
 exactly right, he did wrong by idly lamenting whilst he marked the
 progress of a mischief that one decided step would have stopped.  He was
 afterwards obliged to resort to violent measures; but then, who could
 blame him?  And, to avoid censure, what sacrifices are not made by weak
 minds?
 
 A gentleman who was a witness of the scene assured me, likewise, that if
 the people of property had taken half as much pains to extinguish the
 fire as to preserve their valuables and furniture, it would soon have
 been got under.  But they who were not immediately in danger did not
 exert themselves sufficiently, till fear, like an electrical shock,
 roused all the inhabitants to a sense of the general evil.  Even the fire-
 engines were out of order, though the burning of the palace ought to have
 admonished them of the necessity of keeping them in constant repair.  But
 this kind of indolence respecting what does not immediately concern them
 seems to characterise the Danes.  A sluggish concentration in themselves
 makes them so careful to preserve their property, that they will not
 venture on any enterprise to increase it in which there is a shadow of
 hazard.
 
 Considering Copenhagen as the capital of Denmark and Norway, I was
 surprised not to see so much industry or taste as in Christiania.  Indeed,
 from everything I have had an opportunity of observing, the Danes are the
 people who have made the fewest sacrifices to the graces.
 
 The men of business are domestic tyrants, coldly immersed in their own
 affairs, and so ignorant of the state of other countries, that they
 dogmatically assert that Denmark is the happiest country in the world;
 the Prince Royal the best of all possible princes; and Count Bernstorff
 the wisest of ministers.
 
 As for the women, they are simply notable housewives; without
 accomplishments or any of the charms that adorn more advanced social
 life.  This total ignorance may enable them to save something in their
 kitchens, but it is far from rendering them better parents.  On the
 contrary, the children are spoiled, as they usually are when left to the
 care of weak, indulgent mothers, who having no principle of action to
 regulate their feelings, become the slaves of infants, enfeebling both
 body and mind by false tenderness.
 
 I am, perhaps, a little prejudiced, as I write from the impression of the
 moment; for I have been tormented to-day by the presence of unruly
 children, and made angry by some invectives thrown out against the
 maternal character of the unfortunate Matilda.  She was censured, with
 the most cruel insinuation, for her management of her son, though, from
 what I could gather, she gave proofs of good sense as well as tenderness
 in her attention to him.  She used to bathe him herself every morning;
 insisted on his being loosely clad; and would not permit his attendants
 to injure his digestion by humouring his appetite.  She was equally
 careful to prevent his acquiring haughty airs, and playing the tyrant in
 leading-strings.  The Queen Dowager would not permit her to suckle him;
 but the next child being a daughter, and not the Heir-Apparent of the
 Crown, less opposition was made to her discharging the duty of a mother.
 
 Poor Matilda! thou hast haunted me ever since may arrival; and the view I
 have had of the manners of the country, exciting my sympathy, has
 increased my respect for thy memory.
 
 I am now fully convinced that she was the victim of the party she
 displaced, who would have overlooked or encouraged her attachment, had
 not her lover, aiming at being useful, attempted to overturn some
 established abuses before the people, ripe for the change, had sufficient
 spirit to support him when struggling in their behalf.  Such indeed was
 the asperity sharpened against her that I have heard her, even after so
 many years have elapsed, charged with licentiousness, not only for
 endeavouring to render the public amusements more elegant, but for her
 very charities, because she erected, amongst other institutions, a
 hospital to receive foundlings.  Disgusted with many customs which pass
 for virtues, though they are nothing more than observances of forms,
 often at the expense of truth, she probably ran into an error common to
 innovators, in wishing to do immediately what can only be done by time.
 
 Many very cogent reasons have been urged by her friends to prove that her
 affection for Struensee was never carried to the length alleged against
 her by those who feared her influence.  Be that as it may she certainly
 was no a woman of gallantry, and if she had an attachment for him it did
 not disgrace her heart or understanding, the king being a notorious
 debauchee and an idiot into the bargain.  As the king's conduct had
 always been directed by some favourite, they also endeavoured to govern
 him, from a principle of self-preservation as well as a laudable
 ambition; but, not aware of the prejudices they had to encounter, the
 system they adopted displayed more benevolence of heart than soundness of
 judgment.  As to the charge, still believed, of their giving the King
 drugs to injure his faculties, it is too absurd to be refuted.  Their
 oppressors had better have accused them of dabbling in the black art, for
 the potent spell still keeps his wits in bondage.
 
 I cannot describe to you the effect it had on me to see this puppet of a
 monarch moved by the strings which Count Bernstorff holds fast; sit, with
 vacant eye, erect, receiving the homage of courtiers who mock him with a
 show of respect.  He is, in fact, merely a machine of state, to subscribe
 the name of a king to the acts of the Government, which, to avoid danger,
 have no value unless countersigned by the Prince Royal; for he is allowed
 to be absolutely aim idiot, excepting that now and then an observation or
 trick escapes him, which looks more like madness than imbecility.
 
 What a farce is life.  This effigy of majesty is allowed to burn down to
 the socket, whilst the hapless Matilda was hurried into an untimely
 grave.
 
    "As flies to wanton boys, are we to the gods;
    They kill us for their sport."
 
 Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XIX.
 
 
 Business having obliged me to go a few miles out of town this morning I
 was surprised at meeting a crowd of people of every description, and
 inquiring the cause of a servant, who spoke French, I was informed that a
 man had been executed two hours before, and the body afterwards burnt.  I
 could not help looking with horror around--the fields lost their
 verdure--and I turned with disgust from the well-dressed women who were
 returning with their children from this sight.  What a spectacle for
 humanity!  The seeing such a flock of idle gazers plunged me into a train
 of reflections on the pernicious effects produced by false notions of
 justice.  And I am persuaded that till capital punishments are entirely
 abolished executions ought to have every appearance of horror given to
 them, instead of being, as they are now, a scene of amusement for the
 gaping crowd, where sympathy is quickly effaced by curiosity.
 
 I have always been of opinion that the allowing actors to die in the
 presence of the audience has an immoral tendency, but trifling when
 compared with the ferocity acquired by viewing the reality as a show; for
 it seems to me that in all countries the common people go to executions
 to see how the poor wretch plays his part, rather than to commiserate his
 fate, much less to think of the breach of morality which has brought him
 to such a deplorable end.  Consequently executions, far from being useful
 examples to the survivors, have, I am persuaded, a quite contrary effect,
 by hardening the heart they ought to terrify.  Besides the fear of an
 ignominious death, I believe, never deferred anyone from the commission
 of a crime, because, in committing it, the mind is roused to activity
 about present circumstances.  It is a game at hazard, at which all expect
 the turn of the die in their own favour, never reflecting on the chance
 of ruin till it comes.  In fact, from what I saw in the fortresses of
 Norway, I am more and more convinced that the same energy of character
 which renders a man a daring villain would have rendered him useful to
 society, had that society been well organised.  When a strong mind is not
 disciplined by cultivation it is a sense of injustice that renders it
 unjust.
 
 Executions, however, occur very rarely at Copenhagen; for timidity,
 rather than clemency, palsies all the operations of the present
 Government.  The malefactor who died this morning would not, probably,
 have been punished with death at any other period; but an incendiary
 excites universal execration; and as the greater part of the inhabitants
 are still distressed by the late conflagration, an example was thought
 absolutely necessary; though, from what I can gather, the fire was
 accidental.
 
 Not, but that I have very seriously been informed, that combustible
 materials were placed at proper distance, by the emissaries of Mr. Pitt;
 and, to corroborate the fact, many people insist that the flames burst
 out at once in different parts of the city; not allowing the wind to have
 any hand in it.  So much for the plot.  But the fabricators of plots in
 all countries build their conjectures on the "baseless fabric of a
 vision;" and it seems even a sort of poetical justice, that whilst this
 Minister is crushing at home plots of his own conjuring up, on the
 Continent, and in the north, he should, with as little foundation, be
 accused of wishing to set the world on fire.
 
 I forgot to mention to you, that I was informed, by a man of veracity,
 that two persons came to the stake to drink a glass of the criminal's
 blood, as an infallible remedy for the apoplexy.  And when I animadverted
 in the company, where it was mentioned, on such a horrible violation of
 nature, a Danish lady reproved me very severely, asking how I knew that
 it was not a cure for the disease? adding, that every attempt was
 justifiable in search of health.  I did not, you may imagine, enter into
 an argument with a person the slave of such a gross prejudice.  And I
 allude to it not only as a trait of the ignorance of the people, but to
 censure the Government for not preventing scenes that throw an odium on
 the human race.
 
 Empiricism is not peculiar to Denmark; and I know no way of rooting it
 out, though it be a remnant of exploded witchcraft, till the acquiring a
 general knowledge of the component parts of the human frame becomes a
 part of public education.
 
 Since the fire, the inhabitants have been very assiduously employed in
 searching for property secreted during the confusion; and it is
 astonishing how many people, formerly termed reputable, had availed
 themselves of the common calamity to purloin what the flames spared.
 Others, expert at making a distinction without a difference, concealed
 what they found, not troubling themselves to inquire for the owners,
 though they scrupled to search for plunder anywhere, but amongst the
 ruins.
 
 To be honester than the laws require is by most people thought a work of
 supererogation; and to slip through the grate of the law has ever
 exercised the abilities of adventurers, who wish to get rich the shortest
 way.  Knavery without personal danger is an art brought to great
 perfection by the statesman and swindler; and meaner knaves are not tardy
 in following their footsteps.
 
 It moves my gall to discover some of the commercial frauds practised
 during the present war.  In short, under whatever point of view I
 consider society, it appears to me that an adoration of property is the
 root of all evil.  Here it does not render the people enterprising, as in
 America, but thrifty and cautious.  I never, therefore, was in a capital
 where there was so little appearance of active industry; and as for
 gaiety, I looked in vain for the sprightly gait of the Norwegians, who in
 every respect appear to me to have got the start of them.  This
 difference I attribute to their having more liberty--a liberty which they
 think their right by inheritance, whilst the Danes, when they boast of
 their negative happiness, always mention it as the boon of the Prince
 Royal, under the superintending wisdom of Count Bernstorff.  Vassalage is
 nevertheless ceasing throughout the kingdom, and with it will pass away
 that sordid avarice which every modification of slavery is calculated to
 produce.
 
 If the chief use of property be power, in the shape of the respect it
 procures, is it not among the inconsistencies of human nature most
 incomprehensible, that men should find a pleasure in hoarding up property
 which they steal from their necessities, even when they are convinced
 that it would be dangerous to display such an enviable superiority?  Is
 not this the situation of serfs in every country.  Yet a rapacity to
 accumulate money seems to become stronger in proportion as it is allowed
 to be useless.
 
 Wealth does not appear to be sought for amongst the Danes, to obtain the
 excellent luxuries of life, for a want of taste is very conspicuous at
 Copenhagen; so much so that I am not surprised to hear that poor Matilda
 offended the rigid Lutherans by aiming to refine their pleasures.  The
 elegance which she wished to introduce was termed lasciviousness; yet I
 do not find that the absence of gallantry renders the wives more chaste,
 or the husbands more constant.  Love here seems to corrupt the morals
 without polishing the manners, by banishing confidence and truth, the
 charm as well as cement of domestic life.  A gentleman, who has resided
 in this city some time, assures me that he could not find language to
 give me an idea of the gross debaucheries into which the lower order of
 people fall; and the promiscuous amours of the men of the middling class
 with their female servants debase both beyond measure, weakening every
 species of family affection.
 
 I have everywhere been struck by one characteristic difference in the
 conduct of the two sexes; women, in general, are seduced by their
 superiors, and men jilted by their inferiors: rank and manners awe the
 one, and cunning and wantonness subjugate the other; ambition creeping
 into the woman's passion, and tyranny giving force to the man's, for most
 men treat their mistresses as kings do their favourites: _ergo_ is not
 man then the tyrant of the creation?
 
 Still harping on the same subject, you will exclaim--How can I avoid it,
 when most of the struggles of an eventful life have been occasioned by
 the oppressed state of my sex?  We reason deeply when we feel forcibly.
 
 But to return to the straight road of observation.  The sensuality so
 prevalent appears to me to arise rather from indolence of mind and dull
 senses, than from an exuberance of life, which often fructifies the whole
 character when the vivacity of youthful spirits begins to subside into
 strength of mind.
 
 I have before mentioned that the men are domestic tyrants, considering
 them as fathers, brothers, or husbands; but there is a kind of
 interregnum between the reign of the father and husband which is the only
 period of freedom and pleasure that the women enjoy.  Young people who
 are attached to each other, with the consent of their friends, exchange
 rings, and are permitted to enjoy a degree of liberty together which I
 have never noticed in any other country.  The days of courtship are,
 therefore, prolonged till it be perfectly convenient to marry: the
 intimacy often becomes very tender; and if the lover obtain the privilege
 of a husband, it can only be termed half by stealth, because the family
 is wilfully blind.  It happens very rarely that these honorary
 engagements are dissolved or disregarded, a stigma being attached to a
 breach of faith which is thought more disgraceful, if not so criminal, as
 the violation of the marriage-vow.
 
 Do not forget that, in my general observations, I do not pretend to
 sketch a national character, but merely to note the present state of
 morals and manners as I trace the progress of the world's improvement.
 Because, during my residence in different countries, my principal object
 has been to take such a dispassionate view of men as will lead me to form
 a just idea of the nature of man.  And, to deal ingenuously with you, I
 believe I should have been less severe in the remarks I have made on the
 vanity and depravity of the French, had I travelled towards the north
 before I visited France.
 
 The interesting picture frequently drawn of the virtues of a rising
 people has, I fear, been fallacious, excepting the accounts of the
 enthusiasm which various public struggles have produced.  We talk of the
 depravity of the French, and lay a stress on the old age of the nation;
 yet where has more virtuous enthusiasm been displayed than during the two
 last years by the common people of France, and in their armies?  I am
 obliged sometimes to recollect the numberless instances which I have
 either witnessed, or heard well authenticated, to balance the account of
 horrors, alas! but too true.  I am, therefore, inclined to believe that
 the gross vices which I have always seem allied with simplicity of
 manners, are the concomitants of ignorance.
 
 What, for example, has piety, under the heathen or Christian system,
 been, but a blind faith in things contrary to the principles of reason?
 And could poor reason make considerable advances when it was reckoned the
 highest degree of virtue to do violence to its dictates?  Lutherans,
 preaching reformation, have built a reputation for sanctity on the same
 foundation as the Catholics; yet I do not perceive that a regular
 attendance on public worship, and their other observances, make them a
 whit more true in their affections, or honest in their private
 transactions.  It seems, indeed, quite as easy to prevaricate with
 religious injunctions as human laws, when the exercise of their reason
 does not lead people to acquire principles for themselves to be the
 criterion of all those they receive from others.
 
 If travelling, as the completion of a liberal education, were to be
 adopted on rational grounds, the northern states ought to be visited
 before the more polished parts of Europe, to serve as the elements even
 of the knowledge of manners, only to be acquired by tracing the various
 shades in different countries.  But, when visiting distant climes, a
 momentary social sympathy should not be allowed to influence the
 conclusions of the understanding, for hospitality too frequently leads
 travellers, especially those who travel in search of pleasure, to make a
 false estimate of the virtues of a nation, which, I am now convinced,
 bear an exact proportion to their scientific improvements.
 
 Adieu.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XX.
 
 
 I have formerly censured the French for their extreme attachment to
 theatrical exhibitions, because I thought that they tended to render them
 vain and unnatural characters; but I must acknowledge, especially as
 women of the town never appear in the Parisian as at our theatres, that
 the little saving of the week is more usefully expended there every
 Sunday than in porter or brandy, to intoxicate or stupify the mind.  The
 common people of France have a great superiority over that class in every
 other country on this very score.  It is merely the sobriety of the
 Parisians which renders their fetes more interesting, their gaiety never
 becoming disgusting or dangerous, as is always the case when liquor
 circulates.  Intoxication is the pleasure of savages, and of all those
 whose employments rather exhaust their animal spirits than exercise their
 faculties.  Is not this, in fact, the vice, both in England and the
 northern states of Europe, which appears to be the greatest impediment to
 general improvement?  Drinking is here the principal relaxation of the
 men, including smoking, but the women are very abstemious, though they
 have no public amusements as a substitute.  I ought to except one
 theatre, which appears more than is necessary; for when I was there it
 was not half full, and neither the ladies nor actresses displayed much
 fancy in their dress.
 
 The play was founded on the story of the "Mock Doctor;" and, from the
 gestures of the servants, who were the best actors, I should imagine
 contained some humour.  The farce, termed ballet, was a kind of
 pantomime, the childish incidents of which were sufficient to show the
 state of the dramatic art in Denmark, and the gross taste of the
 audience.  A magician, in the disguise of a tinker, enters a cottage
 where the women are all busy ironing, and rubs a dirty frying-pan against
 the linen.  The women raise a hue-and-cry, and dance after him, rousing
 their husbands, who join in the dance, but get the start of them in the
 pursuit.  The tinker, with the frying-pan for a shield, renders them
 immovable, and blacks their cheeks.  Each laughs at the other,
 unconscious of his own appearance; meanwhile the women enter to enjoy the
 sport, "the rare fun," with other incidents of the same species.
 
 The singing was much on a par with the dancing, the one as destitute of
 grace as the other of expression; but the orchestra was well filled, the
 instrumental being far superior to the vocal music.
 
 I have likewise visited the public library and museum, as well as the
 palace of Rosembourg.  This palace, now deserted, displays a gloomy kind
 of grandeur throughout, for the silence of spacious apartments always
 makes itself to be felt; I at least feel it, and I listen for the sound
 of my footsteps as I have done at midnight to the ticking of the death-
 watch, encouraging a kind of fanciful superstition.  Every object carried
 me back to past times, and impressed the manners of the age forcibly on
 my mind.  In this point of view the preservation of old palaces and their
 tarnished furniture is useful, for they may be considered as historical
 documents.
 
 The vacuum left by departed greatness was everywhere observable, whilst
 the battles and processions portrayed on the walls told you who had here
 excited revelry after retiring from slaughter, or dismissed pageantry in
 search of pleasure.  It seemed a vast tomb full of the shadowy phantoms
 of those who had played or toiled their hour out and sunk behind the
 tapestry which celebrated the conquests of love or war.  Could they be no
 more--to whom my imagination thus gave life?  Could the thoughts, of
 which there remained so many vestiges, have vanished quite away?  And
 these beings, composed of such noble materials of thinking and feeling,
 have they only melted into the elements to keep in motion the grand mass
 of life?  It cannot be!--as easily could I believe that the large silver
 lions at the top of the banqueting room thought and reasoned.  But
 avaunt! ye waking dreams! yet I cannot describe the curiosities to you.
 
 There were cabinets full of baubles and gems, and swords which must have
 been wielded by giant's hand.  The coronation ornaments wait quietly here
 till wanted, and the wardrobe exhibits the vestments which formerly
 graced these shows.  It is a pity they do not lend them to the actors,
 instead of allowing them to perish ingloriously.
 
 I have not visited any other palace, excepting Hirsholm, the gardens of
 which are laid out with taste, and command the finest views the country
 affords.  As they are in the modern and English style, I thought I was
 following the footsteps of Matilda, who wished to multiply around her the
 images of her beloved country.  I was also gratified by the sight of a
 Norwegian landscape in miniature, which with great propriety makes a part
 of the Danish King's garden.  The cottage is well imitated, and the whole
 has a pleasing effect, particularly so to me who love Norway--its
 peaceful farms and spacious wilds.
 
 The public library consists of a collection much larger than I expected
 to see; and it is well arranged.  Of the value of the Icelandic
 manuscripts I could not form a judgment, though the alphabet of some of
 them amused me, by showing what immense labour men will submit to, in
 order to transmit their ideas to posterity.  I have sometimes thought it
 a great misfortune for individuals to acquire a certain delicacy of
 sentiment, which often makes them weary of the common occurrences of
 life; yet it is this very delicacy of feeling and thinking which probably
 has produced most of the performances that have benefited mankind.  It
 might with propriety, perhaps, be termed the malady of genius; the cause
 of that characteristic melancholy which "grows with its growth, and
 strengthens with its strength."
 
 There are some good pictures in the royal museum.  Do not start, I am not
 going to trouble you with a dull catalogue, or stupid criticisms on
 masters to whom time has assigned their just niche in the temple of fame;
 had there been any by living artists of this country, I should have
 noticed them, as making a part of the sketches I am drawing of the
 present state of the place.  The good pictures were mixed
 indiscriminately with the bad ones, in order to assort the frames.  The
 same fault is conspicuous in the new splendid gallery forming at Paris;
 though it seems an obvious thought that a school for artists ought to be
 arranged in such a manner, as to show the progressive discoveries and
 improvements in the art.
 
 A collection of the dresses, arms, and implements of the Laplanders
 attracted my attention, displaying that first species of ingenuity which
 is rather a proof of patient perseverance, than comprehension of mind.
 The specimens of natural history, and curiosities of art, were likewise
 huddled together without that scientific order which alone renders them
 useful; but this may partly have been occasioned by the hasty manner in
 which they were removed from the palace when in flames.
 
 There are some respectable men of science here, but few literary
 characters, and fewer artists.  They want encouragement, and will
 continue, I fear, from the present appearance of things, to languish
 unnoticed a long time; for neither the vanity of wealth, nor the
 enterprising spirit of commerce, has yet thrown a glance that way.
 
 Besides, the Prince Royal, determined to be economical, almost descends
 to parsimony; and perhaps depresses his subjects, by labouring not to
 oppress them; for his intentions always seem to be good--yet nothing can
 give a more forcible idea of the dulness which eats away all activity of
 mind, than the insipid routine of a court, without magnificence or
 elegance.
 
 The Prince, from what I can now collect, has very moderate abilities; yet
 is so well disposed, that Count Bernstorff finds him as tractable as he
 could wish; for I consider the Count as the real sovereign, scarcely
 behind the curtain; the Prince having none of that obstinate
 self-sufficiency of youth, so often the forerunner of decision of
 character.  He and the Princess his wife, dine every day with the King,
 to save the expense of two tables.  What a mummery it must be to treat as
 a king a being who has lost the majesty of man!  But even Count
 Bernstorff's morality submits to this standing imposition; and he avails
 himself of it sometimes, to soften a refusal of his own, by saying it is
 the _will_ of the King, my master, when everybody knows that he has
 neither will nor memory.  Much the same use is made of him as, I have
 observed, some termagant wives make of their husbands; they would dwell
 on the necessity of obeying their husbands, poor passive souls, who never
 were allowed _to will_, when they wanted to conceal their own tyranny.
 
 A story is told here of the King's formerly making a dog counsellor of
 state, because when the dog, accustomed to eat at the royal table,
 snatched a piece of meat off an old officer's plate, he reproved him
 jocosely, saying that he, _monsieur le chien_, had not the privilege of
 dining with his majesty, a privilege annexed to this distinction.
 
 The burning of the palace was, in fact, a fortunate circumstance, as it
 afforded a pretext for reducing the establishment of the household, which
 was far too great for the revenue of the Crown.  The Prince Royal, at
 present, runs into the opposite extreme; and the formality, if not the
 parsimony, of the court, seems to extend to all the other branches of
 society, which I had an opportunity of observing; though hospitality
 still characterises their intercourse with strangers.
 
 But let me now stop; I may be a little partial, and view everything with
 the jaundiced eye of melancholy--for I am sad--and have cause.
 
 God bless you!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXI.
 
 
 I have seen Count Bernstorff; and his conversation confirms me in the
 opinion I had previously formed of him; I mean, since my arrival at
 Copenhagen.  He is a worthy man, a little vain of his virtue _a la_
 Necker; and more anxious not to do wrong, that is to avoid blame, than
 desirous of doing good; especially if any particular good demands a
 change.  Prudence, in short, seems to be the basis of his character; and,
 from the tenor of the Government, I should think inclining to that
 cautious circumspection which treads on the heels of timidity.  He has
 considerable information, and some finesse; or he could not be a
 Minister.  Determined not to risk his popularity, for he is tenderly
 careful of his reputation, he will never gloriously fail like Struensee,
 or disturb, with the energy of genius, the stagnant state of the public
 mind.
 
 I suppose that Lavater, whom he invited to visit him two years ago--some
 say to fix the principles of the Christian religion firmly in the Prince
 Royal's mind, found lines in his face to prove him a statesman of the
 first order; because he has a knack at seeing a great character in the
 countenances of men in exalted stations, who have noticed him or his
 works.  Besides, the Count's sentiments relative to the French
 Revolution, agreeing with Lavater's, must have ensured his applause.
 
 The Danes, in general, seem extremely averse to innovation, and if
 happiness only consist in opinion, they are the happiest people in the
 world; for I never saw any so well satisfied with their own situation.
 Yet the climate appears to be very disagreeable, the weather being dry
 and sultry, or moist and cold; the atmosphere never having that sharp,
 bracing purity, which in Norway prepares you to brave its rigours.  I do
 not hear the inhabitants of this place talk with delight of the winter,
 which is the constant theme of the Norwegians; on the contrary, they seem
 to dread its comfortless inclemency.
 
 The ramparts are pleasant, and must have been much more so before the
 fire, the walkers not being annoyed by the clouds of dust which, at
 present, the slightest wind wafts from the ruins.  The windmills, and the
 comfortable houses contiguous, belonging to the millers, as well as the
 appearance of the spacious barracks for the soldiers and sailors, tend to
 render this walk more agreeable.  The view of the country has not much to
 recommend it to notice but its extent and cultivation: yet as the eye
 always delights to dwell on verdant plains, especially when we are
 resident in a great city, these shady walks should be reckoned amongst
 the advantages procured by the Government for the inhabitants.  I like
 them better than the Royal Gardens, also open to the public, because the
 latter seem sunk in the heart of the city, to concentrate its fogs.
 
 The canals which intersect the streets are equally convenient and
 wholesome; but the view of the sea commanded by the town had little to
 interest me whilst the remembrance of the various bold and picturesque
 shores I had seen was fresh in my memory.  Still the opulent inhabitants,
 who seldom go abroad, must find the spots were they fix their country
 seats much pleasanter on account of the vicinity of the ocean.
 
 One of the best streets in Copenhagen is almost filled with hospitals,
 erected by the Government, and, I am assured, as well regulated as
 institutions of this kind are in any country; but whether hospitals or
 workhouses are anywhere superintended with sufficient humanity I have
 frequently had reason to doubt.
 
 The autumn is so uncommonly fine that I am unwilling to put off my
 journey to Hamburg much longer, lest the weather should alter suddenly,
 and the chilly harbingers of winter catch me here, where I have nothing
 now to detain me but the hospitality of the families to whom I had
 recommendatory letters.  I lodged at an hotel situated in a large open
 square, where the troops exercise and the market is kept.  My apartments
 were very good; and on account of the fire I was told that I should be
 charged very high; yet, paying my bill just now, I find the demands much
 lower in proportion than in Norway, though my dinners were in every
 respect better.
 
 I have remained more at home since I arrived at Copenhagen than I ought
 to have done in a strange place, but the mind is not always equally
 active in search of information, and my oppressed heart too often sighs
 out--
 
    "How dull, flat, and unprofitable
    Are to me all the usages of this world:
    That it should come to this!"
 
 Farewell!  Fare thee well, I say; if thou canst, repeat the adieu in a
 different tone.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXII.
 
 
 I arrived at Corsoer the night after I quitted Copenhagen, purposing to
 take my passage across the Great Belt the next morning, though the
 weather was rather boisterous.  It is about four-and-twenty miles but as
 both I and my little girl are never attacked by sea-sickness--though who
 can avoid _ennui_?--I enter a boat with the same indifference as I change
 horses; and as for danger, come when it may, I dread it not sufficiently
 to have any anticipating fears.
 
 The road from Copenhagen was very good, through an open, flat country
 that had little to recommend it to notice excepting the cultivation,
 which gratified my heart more than my eye.
 
 I took a barge with a German baron who was hastening back from a tour
 into Denmark, alarmed by the intelligence of the French having passed the
 Rhine.  His conversation beguiled the time, and gave a sort of stimulus
 to my spirits, which had been growing more and more languid ever since my
 return to Gothenburg; you know why.  I had often endeavoured to rouse
 myself to observation by reflecting that I was passing through scenes
 which I should probably never see again, and consequently ought not to
 omit observing.  Still I fell into reveries, thinking, by way of excuse,
 that enlargement of mind and refined feelings are of little use but to
 barb the arrows of sorrow which waylay us everywhere, eluding the
 sagacity of wisdom and rendering principles unavailing, if considered as
 a breastwork to secure our own hearts.
 
 Though we had not a direct wind, we were not detained more than three
 hours and a half on the water, just long enough to give us an appetite
 for our dinner.
 
 We travelled the remainder of the day and the following night in company
 with the same party, the German gentleman whom I have mentioned, his
 friend, and servant.  The meetings at the post-houses were pleasant to
 me, who usually heard nothing but strange tongues around me.  Marguerite
 and the child often fell asleep, and when they were awake I might still
 reckon myself alone, as our train of thoughts had nothing in common.
 Marguerite, it is true, was much amused by the costume of the women,
 particularly by the pannier which adorned both their heads and tails, and
 with great glee recounted to me the stories she had treasured up for her
 family when once more within the barriers of dear Paris, not forgetting,
 with that arch, agreeable vanity peculiar to the French, which they
 exhibit whilst half ridiculing it, to remind me of the importance she
 should assume when she informed her friends of all her journeys by sea
 and land, showing the pieces of money she had collected, and stammering
 out a few foreign phrases, which she repeated in a true Parisian accent.
 Happy thoughtlessness! ay, and enviable harmless vanity, which thus
 produced a _gaite du coeur_ worth all my philosophy!
 
 The man I had hired at Copenhagen advised me to go round about twenty
 miles to avoid passing the Little Belt excepting by a ferry, as the wind
 was contrary.  But the gentlemen overruled his arguments, which we were
 all very sorry for afterwards, when we found ourselves becalmed on the
 Little Belt ten hours, tacking about without ceasing, to gain the shore.
 
 An oversight likewise made the passage appear much more tedious, nay,
 almost insupportable.  When I went on board at the Great Belt, I had
 provided refreshments in case of detention, which remaining untouched I
 thought not then any such precaution necessary for the second passage,
 misled by the epithet of "little," though I have since been informed that
 it is frequently the longest.  This mistake occasioned much vexation; for
 the child, at last, began to cry so bitterly for bread, that fancy
 conjured up before me the wretched Ugolino, with his famished children;
 and I, literally speaking, enveloped myself in sympathetic horrors,
 augmented by every fear my babe shed, from which I could not escape till
 we landed, and a luncheon of bread and basin of milk routed the spectres
 of fancy.
 
 I then supped with my companions, with whom I was soon after to part for
 ever--always a most melancholy death-like idea--a sort of separation of
 soul; for all the regret which follows those from whom fate separates us
 seems to be something torn from ourselves.  These were strangers I
 remember; yet when there is any originality in a countenance, it takes
 its place in our memory, and we are sorry to lose an acquaintance the
 moment he begins to interest us, through picked up on the highway.  There
 was, in fact, a degree of intelligence, and still more sensibility, in
 the features and conversation of one of the gentlemen, that made me
 regret the loss of his society during the rest of the journey; for he was
 compelled to travel post, by his desire to reach his estate before the
 arrival of the French.
 
 This was a comfortable inn, as were several others I stopped at; but the
 heavy sandy roads were very fatiguing, after the fine ones we had lately
 skimmed over both in Sweden and Denmark.  The country resembled the most
 open part of England--laid out for corn rather than grazing.  It was
 pleasant, yet there was little in the prospects to awaken curiosity, by
 displaying the peculiar characteristics of a new country, which had so
 frequently stole me from myself in Norway.  We often passed over large
 unenclosed tracts, not graced with trees, or at least very sparingly
 enlivened by them, and the half-formed roads seemed to demand the
 landmarks, set up in the waste, to prevent the traveller from straying
 far out of his way, and plodding through the wearisome sand.
 
 The heaths were dreary, and had none of the wild charms of those of
 Sweden and Norway to cheat time; neither the terrific rocks, nor smiling
 herbage grateful to the sight and scented from afar, made us forget their
 length.  Still the country appeared much more populous, and the towns, if
 not the farmhouses, were superior to those of Norway.  I even thought
 that the inhabitants of the former had more intelligence--at least, I am
 sure they had more vivacity in their countenances than I had seen during
 my northern tour: their senses seemed awake to business and pleasure.  I
 was therefore gratified by hearing once more the busy hum of industrious
 men in the day, and the exhilarating sounds of joy in the evening; for,
 as the weather was still fine, the women and children were amusing
 themselves at their doors, or walking under the trees, which in many
 places were planted in the streets; and as most of the towns of any note
 were situated on little bays or branches of the Baltic, their appearance
 as we approached was often very picturesque, and, when we entered,
 displayed the comfort and cleanliness of easy, if not the elegance of
 opulent, circumstances.  But the cheerfulness of the people in the
 streets was particularly grateful to me, after having been depressed by
 the deathlike silence of those of Denmark, where every house made me
 think of a tomb.  The dress of the peasantry is suited to the climate; in
 short, none of that poverty and dirt appeared, at the sight of which the
 heart sickens.
 
 As I only stopped to change horses, take refreshment, and sleep, I had
 not an opportunity of knowing more of the country than conclusions which
 the information gathered by my eyes enabled me to draw, and that was
 sufficient to convince me that I should much rather have lived in some of
 the towns I now pass through than in any I had seen in Sweden or Denmark.
 The people struck me as having arrived at that period when the faculties
 will unfold themselves; in short; they look alive to improvement, neither
 congealed by indolence, nor bent down by wretchedness to servility.
 
 From the previous impression--I scarcely can trace whence I received it--I
 was agreeably surprised to perceive such an appearance of comfort in this
 part of Germany.  I had formed a conception of the tyranny of the petty
 potentates that had thrown a gloomy veil over the face of the whole
 country in my imagination, that cleared away like the darkness of night
 before the sun as I saw the reality.  I should probably have discovered
 much lurking misery, the consequence of ignorant oppression, no doubt,
 had I had time to inquire into particulars; but it did not stalk abroad
 and infect the surface over which my eye glanced.  Yes, I am persuaded
 that a considerable degree of general knowledge pervades this country,
 for it is only from the exercise of the mind that the body acquires the
 activity from which I drew these inferences.  Indeed, the King of
 Denmark's German dominions--Holstein--appeared to me far superior to any
 other part of his kingdom which had fallen under my view; and the robust
 rustics to have their muscles braced, instead of the, as it were, lounge
 of the Danish peasantry.
 
 Arriving at Sleswick, the residence of Prince Charles of Hesse-Cassel,
 the sight of the soldiers recalled all the unpleasing ideas of German
 despotism, which imperceptibly vanished as I advanced into the country.  I
 viewed, with a mixture of pity and horror, these beings training to be
 sold to slaughter, or be slaughtered, and fell into reflections on an old
 opinion of mine, that it is the preservation of the species, not of
 individuals, which appears to be the design of the Deity throughout the
 whole of Nature.  Blossoms come forth only to be blighted; fish lay their
 spawn where it will be devoured; and what a large portion of the human
 race are born merely to be swept prematurely away!  Does not this waste
 of budding life emphatically assert that it is not men, but Man, whose
 preservation is so necessary to the completion of the grand plan of the
 universe?  Children peep into existence, suffer, and die; men play like
 moths about a candle, and sink into the flame; war, and "the thousand
 ills which flesh is heir to," mow them down in shoals; whilst the more
 cruel prejudices of society palsy existence, introducing not less sure
 though slower decay.
 
 The castle was heavy and gloomy, yet the grounds about it were laid out
 with some taste; a walk, winding under the shade of lofty trees, led to a
 regularly built and animated town.
 
 I crossed the drawbridge, and entered to see this shell of a court in
 miniature, mounting ponderous stairs--it would be a solecism to say a
 flight--up which a regiment of men might have marched, shouldering their
 firelocks to exercise in vast galleries, where all the generations of the
 Princes of Hesse-Cassel might have been mustered rank and file, though
 not the phantoms of all the wretched they had bartered to support their
 state, unless these airy substances could shrink and expand, like
 Milton's devils, to suit the occasion.
 
 The sight of the presence-chamber, and of the canopy to shade the
 fauteuil which aped a throne, made me smile.  All the world is a stage,
 thought I; and few are there in it who do not play the part they have
 learnt by rote; and those who do not, seem marks set up to be pelted at
 by fortune, or rather as sign-posts which point out the road to others,
 whilst forced to stand still themselves amidst the mud and dust.
 
 Waiting for our horses, we were amused by observing the dress of the
 women, which was very grotesque and unwieldy.  The false notion of beauty
 which prevails here as well as in Denmark, I should think very
 inconvenient in summer, as it consists in giving a rotundity to a certain
 part of the body, not the most slim, when Nature has done her part.  This
 Dutch prejudice often leads them to toil under the weight of some ten or
 a dozen petticoats, which, with an enormous basket, literally speaking,
 as a bonnet, or a straw hat of dimensions equally gigantic, almost
 completely conceal the human form as well as face divine, often worth
 showing; still they looked clean, and tripped along, as it were, before
 the wind, with a weight of tackle that I could scarcely have lifted.  Many
 of the country girls I met appeared to me pretty--that is, to have fine
 complexions, sparkling eyes, and a kind of arch, hoyden playfulness which
 distinguishes the village coquette.  The swains, in their Sunday trim,
 attended some of these fair ones in a more slouching pace, though their
 dress was not so cumbersome.  The women seem to take the lead in
 polishing the manners everywhere, this being the only way to better their
 condition.
 
 From what I have seen throughout my journey, I do not think the situation
 of the poor in England is much, if at all, superior to that of the same
 class in different parts of the world; and in Ireland I am sure it is
 much inferior.  I allude to the former state of England; for at present
 the accumulation of national wealth only increases the cares of the poor,
 and hardens the hearts of the rich, in spite of the highly extolled rage
 for almsgiving.
 
 You know that I have always been an enemy to what is termed charity,
 because timid bigots, endeavouring thus to cover their sins, do violence
 to justice, till, acting the demigod, they forget that they are men.  And
 there are others who do not even think of laying up a treasure in heaven,
 whose benevolence is merely tyranny in disguise; they assist the most
 worthless, because the most servile, and term them helpless only in
 proportion to their fawning.
 
 After leaving Sleswick, we passed through several pretty towns; Itzchol
 particularly pleased me; and the country, still wearing the same aspect,
 was improved by the appearance of more trees and enclosures.  But what
 gratified me most was the population.  I was weary of travelling four or
 five hours, never meeting a carriage, and scarcely a peasant; and then to
 stop at such wretched huts as I had seen in Sweden was surely sufficient
 to chill any heart awake to sympathy, and throw a gloom over my favourite
 subject of contemplation, the future improvement of the world.
 
 The farmhouses, likewise, with the huge stables, into which we drove
 whilst the horses were putting to or baiting, were very clean and
 commodious.  The rooms, with a door into this hall-like stable and
 storehouse in one, were decent; and there was a compactness in the
 appearance of the whole family lying thus snugly together under the same
 roof that carried my fancy back to the primitive times, which probably
 never existed with such a golden lustre as the animated imagination lends
 when only able to seize the prominent features.
 
 At one of them, a pretty young woman, with languishing eyes of celestial
 blue, conducted us into a very neat parlour, and observing how loosely
 and lightly my little girl was clad, began to pity her in the sweetest
 accents, regardless of the rosy down of health on her cheeks.  This same
 damsel was dressed--it was Sunday--with taste and even coquetry, in a
 cotton jacket, ornamented with knots of blue ribbon, fancifully disposed
 to give life to her fine complexion.  I loitered a little to admire her,
 for every gesture was graceful; and, amidst the other villagers, she
 looked like a garden lily suddenly rearing its head amongst grain and
 corn-flowers.  As the house was small, I gave her a piece of money rather
 larger than it was my custom to give to the female waiters--for I could
 not prevail on her to sit down--which she received with a smile; yet took
 care to give it, in my presence, to a girl who had brought the child a
 slice of bread; by which I perceived that she was the mistress or
 daughter of the house, and without doubt the belle of the village.  There
 was, in short, an appearance of cheerful industry, and of that degree of
 comfort which shut out misery, in all the little hamlets as I approached
 Hamburg, which agreeably surprised me.
 
 The short jackets which the women wear here, as well as in France, are
 not only more becoming to the person, but much better calculated for
 women who have rustic or household employments than the long gowns worn
 in England, dangling in the dirt.
 
 All the inns on the road were better than I expected, though the softness
 of the beds still harassed me, and prevented my finding the rest I was
 frequently in want of, to enable me to bear the fatigue of the next day.
 The charges were moderate, and the people very civil, with a certain
 honest hilarity and independent spirit in their manner, which almost made
 me forget that they were innkeepers, a set of men--waiters, hostesses,
 chambermaids, &c., down to the ostler, whose cunning servility in England
 I think particularly disgusting.
 
 The prospect of Hamburg at a distance, as well as the fine road shaded
 with trees, led me to expect to see a much pleasanter city than I found.
 
 I was aware of the difficulty of obtaining lodgings, even at the inns, on
 account of the concourse of strangers at present resorting to such a
 centrical situation, and determined to go to Altona the next day to seek
 for an abode, wanting now only rest.  But even for a single night we were
 sent from house to house, and found at last a vacant room to sleep in,
 which I should have turned from with disgust had there been a choice.
 
 I scarcely know anything that produces more disagreeable sensations, I
 mean to speak of the passing cares, the recollection of which afterwards
 enlivens our enjoyments, than those excited by little disasters of this
 kind.  After a long journey, with our eyes directed to some particular
 spot, to arrive and find nothing as it should be is vexatious, and sinks
 the agitated spirits.  But I, who received the cruellest of
 disappointments last spring in returning to my home, term such as these
 emphatically passing cares.  Know you of what materials some hearts are
 made?  I play the child, and weep at the recollection--for the grief is
 still fresh that stunned as well as wounded me--yet never did drops of
 anguish like these bedew the cheeks of infantine innocence--and why
 should they mine, that never was stained by a blush of guilt?  Innocent
 and credulous as a child, why have I not the same happy thoughtlessness?
 Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXIII.
 
 
 I might have spared myself the disagreeable feelings I experienced the
 first night of my arrival at Hamburg, leaving the open air to be shut up
 in noise and dirt, had I gone immediately to Altona, where a lodging had
 been prepared for me by a gentleman from whom I received many civilities
 during my journey.  I wished to have travelled in company with him from
 Copenhagen, because I found him intelligent and friendly, but business
 obliged him to hurry forward, and I wrote to him on the subject of
 accommodations as soon as I was informed of the difficulties I might have
 to encounter to house myself and brat.
 
 It is but a short and pleasant walk from Hamburg to Altona, under the
 shade of several rows of trees, and this walk is the more agreeable after
 quitting the rough pavement of either place.
 
 Hamburg is an ill, close-built town, swarming with inhabitants, and, from
 what I could learn, like all the other free towns, governed in a manner
 which bears hard on the poor, whilst narrowing the minds of the rich; the
 character of the man is lost in the Hamburger.  Always afraid of the
 encroachments of their Danish neighbours, that is, anxiously apprehensive
 of their sharing the golden harvest of commerce with them, or taking a
 little of the trade off their hands--though they have more than they know
 what to do with--they are ever on the watch, till their very eyes lose
 all expression, excepting the prying glance of suspicion.
 
 The gates of Hamburg are shut at seven in the winter and nine in the
 summer, lest some strangers, who come to traffic in Hamburg, should
 prefer living, and consequently--so exactly do they calculate--spend
 their money out of the walls of the Hamburger's world.  Immense fortunes
 have been acquired by the per-cents. arising from commissions nominally
 only two and a half, but mounted to eight or ten at least by the secret
 manoeuvres of trade, not to include the advantage of purchasing goods
 wholesale in common with contractors, and that of having so much money
 left in their hands, not to play with, I can assure you.  Mushroom
 fortunes have started up during the war; the men, indeed, seem of the
 species of the fungus, and the insolent vulgarity which a sudden influx
 of wealth usually produces in common minds is here very conspicuous,
 which contrasts with the distresses of many of the emigrants, "fallen,
 fallen from their high estate," such are the ups and downs of fortune's
 wheel.  Many emigrants have met, with fortitude, such a total change of
 circumstances as scarcely can be paralleled, retiring from a palace to an
 obscure lodging with dignity; but the greater number glide about, the
 ghosts of greatness, with the _Croix de St. Louis_ ostentatiously
 displayed, determined to hope, "though heaven and earth their wishes
 crossed."  Still good breeding points out the gentleman, and sentiments
 of honour and delicacy appear the offspring of greatness of soul when
 compared with the grovelling views of the sordid accumulators of cent.
 per cent.
 
 Situation seems to be the mould in which men's characters are formed: so
 much so, inferring from what I have lately seen, that I mean not to be
 severe when I add--previously asking why priests are in general cunning
 and statesmen false?--that men entirely devoted to commerce never acquire
 or lose all taste and greatness of mind.  An ostentatious display of
 wealth without elegance, and a greedy enjoyment of pleasure without
 sentiment, embrutes them till they term all virtue of an heroic cast,
 romantic attempts at something above our nature, and anxiety about the
 welfare of others, a search after misery in which we have no concern.  But
 you will say that I am growing bitter, perhaps personal.  Ah! shall I
 whisper to you, that you yourself are strangely altered since you have
 entered deeply into commerce--more than you are aware of; never allowing
 yourself to reflect, and keeping your mind, or rather passions, in a
 continual state of agitation?  Nature has given you talents which lie
 dormant, or are wasted in ignoble pursuits.  You will rouse yourself and
 shake off the vile dust that obscures you, or my understanding, as well
 as my heart, deceives me egregiously--only tell me when.  But to go
 farther afield.
 
 Madame la Fayette left Altona the day I arrived, to endeavour, at Vienna,
 to obtain the enlargement of her husband, or permission to share his
 prison.  She lived in a lodging up two pairs of stairs, without a
 servant, her two daughters cheerfully assisting; choosing, as well as
 herself, to descend to anything before unnecessary obligations.  During
 her prosperity, and consequent idleness, she did not, I am told, enjoy a
 good state of health, having a train of nervous complaints, which, though
 they have not a name, unless the significant word _ennui_ be borrowed,
 had an existence in the higher French circles; but adversity and virtuous
 exertions put these ills to flight, and dispossessed her of a devil who
 deserves the appellation of legion.
 
 Madame Genus also resided at Altona some time, under an assumed name,
 with many other sufferers of less note though higher rank.  It is, in
 fact, scarcely possible to stir out without meeting interesting
 countenances, every lineament of which tells you that they have seen
 better days.
 
 At Hamburg, I was informed, a duke had entered into partnership with his
 cook, who becoming a _traiteur_, they were both comfortably supported by
 the profit arising from his industry.  Many noble instances of the
 attachment of servants to their unfortunate masters have come to my
 knowledge, both here and in France, and touched my heart, the greatest
 delight of which is to discover human virtue.
 
 At Altona, a president of one of the _ci-devant_ parliaments keeps an
 ordinary, in the French style; and his wife with cheerful dignity submits
 to her fate, though she is arrived at an age when people seldom
 relinquish their prejudices.  A girl who waits there brought a dozen
 _double louis d'or_ concealed in her clothes, at the risk of her life,
 from France, which she preserves lest sickness or any other distress
 should overtake her mistress, "who," she observed, "was not accustomed to
 hardships."  This house was particularly recommended to me by an
 acquaintance of yours, the author of the "American Farmer's Letters."  I
 generally dine in company with him: and the gentleman whom I have already
 mentioned is often diverted by our declamations against commerce, when we
 compare notes respecting the characteristics of the Hamburgers.  "Why,
 madam," said he to me one day, "you will not meet with a man who has any
 calf to his leg; body and soul, muscles and heart, are equally shrivelled
 up by a thirst of gain.  There is nothing generous even in their youthful
 passions; profit is their only stimulus, and calculations the sole
 employment of their faculties, unless we except some gross animal
 gratifications which, snatched at spare moments, tend still more to
 debase the character, because, though touched by his tricking wand, they
 have all the arts, without the wit, of the wing-footed god."
 
 Perhaps you may also think us too severe; but I must add that the more I
 saw of the manners of Hamburg, the more was I confirmed in my opinion
 relative to the baleful effect of extensive speculations on the moral
 character.  Men are strange machines; and their whole system of morality
 is in general held together by one grand principle which loses its force
 the moment they allow themselves to break with impunity over the bounds
 which secured their self-respect.  A man ceases to love humanity, and
 then individuals, as he advances in the chase after wealth; as one
 clashes with his interest, the other with his pleasures: to business, as
 it is termed, everything must give way; nay, is sacrificed, and all the
 endearing charities of citizen, husband, father, brother, become empty
 names.  But--but what?  Why, to snap the chain of thought, I must say
 farewell.  Cassandra was not the only prophetess whose warning voice has
 been disregarded.  How much easier it is to meet with love in the world
 than affection!
 
 Yours sincerely.
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXIV.
 
 
 My lodgings at Altona are tolerably comfortable, though not in any
 proportion to the price I pay; but, owing to the present circumstances,
 all the necessaries of life are here extravagantly dear.  Considering it
 as a temporary residence, the chief inconvenience of which I am inclined
 to complain is the rough streets that must be passed before Marguerite
 and the child can reach a level road.
 
 The views of the Elbe in the vicinity of the town are pleasant,
 particularly as the prospects here afford so little variety.  I attempted
 to descend, and walk close to the water's edge; but there was no path;
 and the smell of glue, hanging to dry, an extensive manufactory of which
 is carried on close to the beach, I found extremely disagreeable.  But to
 commerce everything must give way; profit and profit are the only
 speculations--"double--double, toil and trouble."  I have seldom entered
 a shady walk without being soon obliged to turn aside to make room for
 the rope-makers; and the only tree I have seen, that appeared to be
 planted by the hand of taste, is in the churchyard, to shade the tomb of
 the poet Klopstock's wife.
 
 Most of the merchants have country houses to retire to during the summer;
 and many of them are situated on the banks of the Elbe, where they have
 the pleasure of seeing the packet-boats arrive--the periods of most
 consequence to divide their week.
 
 The moving picture, consisting of large vessels and small craft, which
 are continually changing their position with the tide, renders this noble
 river, the vital stream of Hamburg, very interesting; and the windings
 have sometimes a very fine effect, two or three turns being visible at
 once, intersecting the flat meadows; a sudden bend often increasing the
 magnitude of the river; and the silvery expanse, scarcely gliding, though
 bearing on its bosom so much treasure, looks for a moment like a tranquil
 lake.
 
 Nothing can be stronger than the contrast which this flat country and
 strand afford, compared with the mountains and rocky coast I have lately
 dwelt so much among.  In fancy I return to a favourite spot, where I
 seemed to have retired from man and wretchedness; but the din of trade
 drags me back to all the care I left behind, when lost in sublime
 emotions.  Rocks aspiring towards the heavens, and, as it were, shutting
 out sorrow, surrounded me, whilst peace appeared to steal along the lake
 to calm my bosom, modulating the wind that agitated the neighbouring
 poplars.  Now I hear only an account of the tricks of trade, or listen to
 the distressful tale of some victim of ambition.
 
 The hospitality of Hamburg is confined to Sunday invitations to the
 country houses I have mentioned, when dish after dish smokes upon the
 board, and the conversation ever flowing in the muddy channel of
 business, it is not easy to obtain any appropriate information.  Had I
 intended to remain here some time, or had my mind been more alive to
 general inquiries, I should have endeavoured to have been introduced to
 some characters not so entirely immersed in commercial affairs, though in
 this whirlpool of gain it is not very easy to find any but the wretched
 or supercilious emigrants, who are not engaged in pursuits which, in my
 eyes, appear as dishonourable as gambling.  The interests of nations are
 bartered by speculating merchants.  My God! with what _sang froid_ artful
 trains of corruption bring lucrative commissions into particular hands,
 disregarding the relative situation of different countries, and can much
 common honesty be expected in the discharge of trusts obtained by fraud?
 But this _entre nous_.
 
 During my present journey, and whilst residing in France, I have had an
 opportunity of peeping behind the scenes of what are vulgarly termed
 great affairs, only to discover the mean machinery which has directed
 many transactions of moment.  The sword has been merciful, compared with
 the depredations made on human life by contractors and by the swarm of
 locusts who have battened on the pestilence they spread abroad.  These
 men, like the owners of negro ships, never smell on their money the blood
 by which it has been gained, but sleep quietly in their beds, terming
 such occupations lawful callings; yet the lightning marks not their roofs
 to thunder conviction on them "and to justify the ways of God to man."
 
 Why should I weep for myself?  "Take, O world! thy much indebted tear!"
 Adieu!
 
 
 
 
 LETTER XXV.
 
 
 There is a pretty little French theatre at Altona, and the actors are
 much superior to those I saw at Copenhagen.  The theatres at Hamburg are
 not open yet, but will very shortly, when the shutting of the gates at
 seven o'clock forces the citizens to quit their country houses.  But,
 respecting Hamburg, I shall not be able to obtain much more information,
 as I have determined to sail with the first fair wind for England.
 
 The presence of the French army would have rendered my intended tour
 through Germany, in my way to Switzerland, almost impracticable, had not
 the advancing season obliged me to alter my plan.  Besides, though
 Switzerland is the country which for several years I have been
 particularly desirous to visit, I do not feel inclined to ramble any
 farther this year; nay, I am weary of changing the scene, and quitting
 people and places the moment they begin to interest me.  This also is
 vanity!
 
 
 
 DOVER.
 
 
 I left this letter unfinished, as I was hurried on board, and now I have
 only to tell you that, at the sight of Dover cliffs, I wondered how
 anybody could term them grand; they appear so insignificant to me, after
 those I had seen in Sweden and Norway.
 
 Adieu!  My spirit of observation seems to be fled, and I have been
 wandering round this dirty place, literally speaking, to kill time,
 though the thoughts I would fain fly from lie too close to my heart to be
 easily shook off, or even beguiled, by any employment, except that of
 preparing for my journey to London.
 
 God bless you!
 
 MARY ----.
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX.
 
 
 Private business and cares have frequently so absorbed me as to prevent
 my obtaining all the information during this journey which the novelty of
 the scenes would have afforded, had my attention been continually awake
 to inquiry.  This insensibility to present objects I have often had
 occasion to lament since I have been preparing these letters for the
 press; but, as a person of any thought naturally considers the history of
 a strange country to contrast the former with the present state of its
 manners, a conviction of the increasing knowledge and happiness of the
 kingdoms I passed through was perpetually the result of my comparative
 reflections.
 
 The poverty of the poor in Sweden renders the civilisation very partial,
 and slavery has retarded the improvement of every class in Denmark, yet
 both are advancing; and the gigantic evils of despotism and anarchy have
 in a great measure vanished before the meliorating manners of Europe.
 Innumerable evils still remain, it is true, to afflict the humane
 investigator, and hurry the benevolent reformer into a labyrinth of
 error, who aims at destroying prejudices quickly which only time can root
 out, as the public opinion becomes subject to reason.
 
 An ardent affection for the human race makes enthusiastic characters
 eager to produce alteration in laws and governments prematurely.  To
 render them useful and permanent, they must be the growth of each
 particular soil, and the gradual fruit of the ripening understanding of
 the nation, matured by time, not forced by an unnatural fermentation.
 And, to convince me that such a change is gaining ground with
 accelerating pace, the view I have had of society during my northern
 journey would have been sufficient had I not previously considered the
 grand causes which combine to carry mankind forward and diminish the sum
 of human misery.
 
STORIES***
 
 
 This ebook was transcribed by Les Bowler.
 
 [Picture: Look what a fine morning it is . . . Insects, Birds, & Animals,
                        are all enjoying existence]
 
 
 
 
 
                                    MARY
                              WOLLSTONECRAFTS
                                  ORIGINAL
                                  STORIES
 
 
                          WITH FIVE ILLUSTRATIONS
                                     BY
                               WILLIAM BLAKE
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                            WITH AN INTRODUCTION
                                     BY
                                E. V. LUCAS
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                   LONDON
                                HENRY FROWDE
                                    1906
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                            OXFORD: HORACE HART
                         PRINTER TO THE UNIVERSITY
 
 
 
 
 EDITORS INTRODUCTION
 
 
 The germ of the _Original Stories_ was, I imagine, a suggestion (in the
 manner of publishers) from Mary Wollstonecrafts employer, Johnson of St.
 Pauls Churchyard, that something more or less in the manner of Mrs.
 Trimmers _History of the Robins_, the great nursery success of 1786,
 might be a profitable speculation.  For I doubt if the production of a
 book for children would ever have occurred spontaneously to an author so
 much more interested in the status of women and other adult matters.
 However, the idea being given her, she quickly wrote the bookin 1787 or
 1788carrying out in it to a far higher power, in Mrs. Mason, the
 self-confidence and rectitude of Mrs. Trimmers leading lady, Mrs.
 Benson, who in her turn had been preceded by that other flawless
 instructor of youth, Mr. Barlow.  None of these exemplars could do wrong;
 but the Mrs. Mason whom we meet in the following pages far transcends the
 others in conscious merit.  Mrs. Benson in the _History of the Robins_
 (with the author of which Mary Wollstonecraft was on friendly terms) was
 sufficiently like the Protagonist of the Old Testament to be, when among
 Mrs. Wilsons bees, excessively pleased with the ingenuity and industry
 with which these insects collect their honey and wax, form their cells,
 and deposit their store; but Mrs. Mason, as we shall see, went still
 farther.
 
 It has to be remembered that the _Original Stories_ were written when the
 author was twenty-nine, five years before she met Gilbert Imlay and six
 years before her daughter Fanny Imlay was born.  I mention this fact
 because it seems to me to be very significant.  I feel that had the book
 been written after Fannys birth, or even after the Imlay infatuation, it
 would have been somewhat different: not perhaps more entertaining,
 because its author had none of that imaginative sympathy with the young
 which would direct her pen in the direction of pure pleasure for them;
 but more human, more kindly, better.  One can have indeed little doubt as
 to this after reading those curious first lessons for an infant which
 came from Mary Wollstonecrafts pen in or about 1795, (printed in volume
 two of the _Posthumous Works_, 1798), and which give evidence of so much
 more tenderness and reasonableness (and at the same time want of Reason,
 which may have been Godwins God but will never stand in that relation
 either to English men or English children) than the monitress of the
 _Original Stories_, the impeccable Mrs. Mason, ever suggests.  I know of
 no early instance where a mother talks down to an infant more prettily:
 continually descending herself to its level, yet never with any of Mrs.
 Masons arrogance and superiority.  Not indeed that this poor mother,
 with her impulsive warm heart wounded, and most of her illusions gone,
 and few kindly eyes resting upon her, could ever have compassed much of
 Mrs. Masons prosperous self-satisfaction and authority had she wished
 to; for in the seven years between the composition of the _Original
 Stories_ and the lessons for the minute Fanny Imlay, she had lived an
 emotional lifetime, and suffering much, pitied much.
 
 In Lesson X, which I quote, although it says nothing of charity or
 kindness, a vastly more human spirit is found than in any of Mrs. Masons
 homilies on our duty to the afflicted:
 
     See how much taller you are than William.  In four years you have
     learned to eat, to walk, to talk.  Why do you smile?  You can do much
     more, you think: you can wash your hands and face.  Very well.  I
     should never kiss a dirty face.  And you can comb your head with the
     pretty comb you always put by in your own drawer.  To be sure, you do
     all this to be ready to take a walk with me.  You would be obliged to
     stay at home, if you could not comb your own hair.  Betty is busy
     getting the dinner ready, and only brushes Williams hair, because he
     cannot do it for himself.
 
     Betty is making an apple-pye.  You love an apple-pye; but I do not
     bid you make one.  Your hands are not strong enough to mix the butter
     and flour together; and you must not try to pare the apples, because
     you cannot manage a great knife.
 
     Never touch the large knives: they are very sharp, and you might cut
     your finger to the bone.  You are a little girl, and ought to have a
     little knife.  When you are as tall as I am, you shall have a knife
     as large as mine; and when you are as strong as I am, and have
     learned to manage it, you will not hurt yourself.
 
     You can trundle a hoop, you say; and jump over a stick.  O, I
     forgot!and march like men in the red coats, when papa plays a pretty
     tune on the fiddle.
 
 Even a very little of the tender spirit that this lesson breathes, even a
 very little of its sense of play, would have leavened the _Original
 Stories_ into a more wholesome consistency.  As it stands, that book is
 one of the most perfect examples of the success with which, a century or
 more ago, any ingratiating quality could be kept out of a work for the
 young.  According to William Godwin, his unhappy wife had always a pretty
 and endearing way with children.  Yet of pretty and endearing ways, as of
 humour, I take him to have been a bad judge; for I do not think that any
 woman possessing enough sympathy to attach children to her as he, in one
 of the most curious biographies in the language, assures us that she had,
 could have suppressed the gift so completely in her first book for young
 minds.  And the Mrs. Masonic character of her own Preface supports my
 view.
 
 I do not wish to suggest that previous to 1787 Mary Wollstonecraft had
 been a stranger to suffering.  Far from it.  Her life had known little
 joy.  Her fathers excesses, her mothers grief and poverty, her sisters
 misfortunes, her own homelessness, and, to crown all, the death of her
 close friend Frances Blood, must have dimmed if not obliterated most of
 her happy impulses.  But it is one thing to suffer bereavement and to be
 anxious about the troubles of others near and dear; and it is quite
 another to suffer oneself by loving, even to a point of personal
 disaster, and then losing both that love and the friendliness (such as it
 was) of the world.  Imlays desertion and the birth of Fanny were real
 things beside which a drunken father, unhappy sisters, and a dead friend
 were mere trifles.
 
 This little book is to my mind chiefly interesting for two reasons apart
 from its original purposefor the light it throws on the attitude of the
 nursery authors of that day towards children, and for the character of
 Mrs. Mason, a type of the dominant British character, in petticoats, here
 for the first time (so far as my reading goes) set on paper.
 
 I have no information regarding the success of the _Original Stories_ in
 their day, and such spirited efforts as are now made to obtain them by
 collectors are, we know, due rather to Blake than to Mary Wollstonecraft;
 but any measure of popularity that they may have enjoyed illustrates the
 awful state of slavery in which the children of the seventeen-nineties
 must have subsisted.  It is indeed wonderful to me to think that only a
 poor hundred years ago such hard and arid presentations of adult
 perfection and infantile incapacity should have been considered, even by
 capable writers, all that the intelligence of children needed or their
 tender inexperience deserved.  I do not deny that children are not to-day
 too much considered: indeed, I think that they are: I think there is now
 an unfortunate tendency to provide them with literature in such variety
 as to anticipate, and possibly supplant, the most valuable natural
 workings of their minds in almost every direction; but such activity at
 any rate indicates a desire on the part of the writers of these books to
 understand their readers, whereas I can detect none in the _Original
 Stories_ or in hundreds of kindred works of that day.  _Sandford and
 Merton_ and Mrs. Trimmers book stand apart: there is much humanity and
 imaginative sympathy in both; but with the majority of nursery authors,
 to fling down a collection of homilies was sufficient.
 
 The odd thing is that every one was equally thoughtless: it is not merely
 that Mary Wollstonecraft should consider such an intellectual stone as
 Chapter XV worth preparing for poor little fellow creatures that needed
 bread; but that her publisher Johnson should consider it the kind of
 thing to send forth, and that, with artists capable of dramatic interest
 available, he should hand the commission to illustrate it to William
 Blake, who, exquisitely charming as were his drawings for his own
 _Songs_, was as yet in no sense of the word an ingratiating illustrator
 of narratives of real life for young eyes.  And there still remains the
 parent or friend who, picking up the book in a shop, considered it the
 kind of thing to strike a bliss into the soul of Master Henry or Miss
 Susan as a birthday present.  It is all, at this date, so incredible, so
 shortsighted, so cruel, one could almost say.  No one seems to have tried
 at all: the idea of wooing a child was not in the aircertainly Mary
 Wollstonecraft had none of it.
 
 Who it was that first discerned the child to be a thing of joy, a
 character apart worth coming to without patronage, a flower, a fairy, I
 cannot say.  But Blake, in his writings, had much to do with the
 discovery, and Wordsworth perhaps more.  Certain, however, is it that
 Mary Wollstonecraft, even if she had glimmerings of this truth, had no
 more; and those she suppressed when the pen was in her hand.
 
 I might remark here that the circumstance that Blakes drawings for
 Salzmanns _Elements of Morality_, which Mary Wollstonecraft translated
 in 1791, also for Johnson, are more interesting and dramatic, is due to
 the fact that he merely adapted the work of the German artist.  Blake was
 uniformly below himself in this kind of employment.  Only in the rapt
 freedoms of the angelic harper in his hut, in the picture opposite page
 56 of the present work, does he approach his true genius; while in his
 conception of Mrs. Mason I have no confidence.  Not slim and willowy and
 pensive was she in my mental picture of her: I figure a matron of sterner
 stuff and solider build.
 
 But having said this against the _Original Stories_, I have said all, for
 as the casket enshrining Mrs. Mason its value remains unassailable.
 
 It was well for Mrs. Mason that Mary Wollstonecraft set her on paper in
 1788.  Had she waited until the _Vindication of the Rights of Women_ was
 written in 1792 (and dedicated to Talleyrand), had she waited until
 little Fanny Imlay was born into a stony world, Mrs. Mason would never
 have been.  Because it is the likes of Mrs. Mason that keep the rights of
 women, as Mary Wollstonecraft saw them, in the background, and demand the
 production of marriage lines.  Mrs. Mason would have been the first to
 regret the unwomanliness of the publication both of the book and of the
 baby.  The Preface to this book suggests that Mary Wollstonecraft was at
 that time, before she had loved and lost and suffered, something of a
 Mrs. Mason herself; but Mrs. Mason remained Masonic to the end, whereas
 poor Marys heart and mind were always in conflict.  She may have loved
 pure Reason, but she loved Gilbert Imlay too.  And this Mrs. Mason never
 did.
 
 Mrs. Mason never nods.  Her tact, her mental reaction, her confidence,
 her sense of duty and knowledge of duty, are alike marvellous.  When the
 higher mercy compels her to end a wounded larks misery by putting her
 foot on its head, she turns her own the other way.  At the close of a
 walk during which her charges have been rational, she shakes hands with
 them.  Her highest praise to Mary, after the fruit-picking incident on
 page 40, is to call her my friend; and she deserved the name, adds
 the lady, for she was no longer a child.  No child could be her friend.
 One wonders what she made of the beautiful words Suffer the little
 children to come unto Me . . . for of such is the kingdom of Heaven; but
 of course she did not know them: her Testament was obviously the Old.
 
 Yet we have, as it happens, a comment on Christs remark, in her
 statement on page 8, made in one of her recurring monologues on
 superiority and inferiority, that it is only to animals that children
 _can_ do good.  Mrs. Masons expression of alarm and dismay on hearing
 the words A little child shall lead them could be drawn adequately, one
 feels, only by Mary Wollstonecrafts friend Fuseli.
 
 I govern my servants and you, said Mrs. Mason, by attending strictly
 to truth, and this observance keeping my head clear and my heart pure, I
 am ever ready to pray to the Author of Good, the Fountain of truth.  She
 never paid unmeaning compliments, (and here it is interesting to compare
 the second paragraph of Mary Wollstonecrafts Preface, where she plays at
 being a Mrs. Mason too), or permitted any word to drop from her tongue
 that her heart did not dictate.  Hence she allowed Mrs. Trimmers
 _History of the Robins_ to be lent to a little girl, only on condition
 that the little girl should be made to understand that birds cannot
 really talk.  She had in her garden, although large, only one bed of
 tulips, because the tulip flaunts, whereas the rose, of which she had a
 profusion, is modest.  That God made both does not seem to have troubled
 her.  She thought that the poor who were willing to work had a right to
 the comforts of life.  During a thunderstorm she walked with the same
 security as when the sun enlivened the prospect, since her love of virtue
 had overcome her fear of death.  She was weaned from the world, but not
 disgusted.  When she visited those who have been reduced from their
 original place in society by misfortunes, she made such alterations in
 her dress as would suggest ceremony, lest too much familiarity should
 appear like disrespect.  She forbade Caroline to cry when in pain,
 because the Most High was educating her for eternity.  She thought that
 all diseases were sent to children by the Almighty to teach them patience
 and fortitude.  She never sought bargains, wishing every one to receive
 the just value for their goods; and when her two charges at last left
 her, to return to their father, she dismissed them with the words, You
 are now candidates for my friendship, and on your advancement in virtue
 my regard will in future depend.
 
 The great fault of Mrs. Mason is that she had none.  One seems to
 understand why her own children and husband died so quickly.
 
 Since I have read this little book a new kind of nightmare has come into
 my slumbers: I dream that I am walking with Mrs. Mason.  The greatness
 and goodness of Mrs. Mason surround me, dominate me, suffocate me.  With
 head erect, vigilant eye, and a smile of assurance and tolerance on her
 massive features, she sails on and on, holding my neatly-gloved hand,
 discoursing ever of the infinite mercy of God, the infinite paltriness of
 myself, and the infinite success of Mrs. Mason.  I think that Mrs.
 Masons most terrible characteristic to me (who have never been quite
 sure of anything) is the readiness with which her decisions spring
 fully-armed from her brain.  She knows not only everything, but herself
 too: she has no doubts.  Here she joins hands with so much that is most
 triumphant in the British character.  The Briton also is without doubts.
 He marches forward.  He is right.  It is when I contemplate him in this
 moodand Mrs. Mason toothat I most wonder who my ancestors can have
 been.
 
 The awful reality of Mrs. Mason proves that Mary Wollstonecraft, had she
 known her own power and kept her mental serenity, might have been a great
 novelist.  Mrs. Mason was the first and strongest British Matron.  She
 came before Mrs. Proudie, and also, it is interesting to note, before Sir
 Willoughby Patterne.  But she was, I fear, an accident; for there is
 nothing like her in our authors one experiment in adult fiction, _The
 Wrongs of Woman_.
 
                                                               E. V. LUCAS.
 
 
 
 
 ILLUSTRATIONS
 
 Look what a fine morning it is.Insects, Birds,         _Frontispiece_
 and Animals, are all enjoying existence.
 Indeed we are very happy!                            _to face page_ 36
 Be calm, my child, remember that you must do all     _to face page_ 46
 the good you can the present day
 Trying to trace the sound, I discovered a little     _to face page_ 56
 hut, rudely built
 Economy and Self-denial are necessary, in every      _to face page_ 86
 station, to enable us to be generous
 
 
 
         [Picture: Facsimile of the title page of the 1791 edition]
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 These conversations and tales are accommodated to the present state of
 society; which obliges the author to attempt to cure those faults by
 reason, which might never to have taken root in the infant mind.  Good
 habits, imperceptibly fixed, are far preferable to the precepts of
 reason; but, as this task requires more judgment than generally falls to
 the lot of parents, substitutes must be sought for, and medicines given,
 when regimen would have answered the purpose much better.  I believe
 those who examine their own minds, will readily agree with me, that
 reason, with difficulty, conquers settled habits, even when it is arrived
 at some degree of maturity: why then do we suffer children to be bound
 with fetters, which their half-formed faculties cannot break.
 
 In writing the following work, I aim at perspicuity and simplicity of
 style; and try to avoid those unmeaning compliments, which slip from the
 tongue, but have not the least connexion with the affections that should
 warm the heart, and animate the conduct.  By this false politeness,
 sincerity is sacrificed, and truth violated; and thus artificial manners
 are necessarily taught.  For true politeness is a polish, not a varnish;
 and should rather be acquired by observation than admonition.  And we may
 remark, by way of illustration, that men do not attempt to polish
 precious stones, till age and air have given them that degree of
 solidity, which will enable them to bear the necessary friction, without
 destroying the main substance.
 
 The way to render instruction most useful cannot always be adopted;
 knowledge should be gradually imparted, and flow more from example than
 teaching: example directly addresses the senses, the first inlets to the
 heart; and the improvement of those instruments of the understanding is
 the object education should have constantly in view, and over which we
 have most power.  But to wish that parents would, themselves, mould the
 ductile passions, is a chimerical wish, for the present generation have
 their own passions to combat with, and fastidious pleasures to pursue,
 neglecting those pointed out by nature: we must therefore pour premature
 knowledge into the succeeding one; and, teaching virtue, explain the
 nature of vice.  Cruel necessity!
 
 The Conversations are intended to assist the teacher as well as the
 pupil; and this will obviate an objection which some may start, that the
 sentiments are not quite on a level with the capacity of a child.  Every
 child requires a different mode of treatment; but a writer can only
 choose one, and that must be modified by those who are actually engaged
 with young people in their studies.
 
 The tendency of the reasoning obviously tends to fix principles of truth
 and humanity on a solid and simple foundation; and to make religion an
 active, invigorating director of the affections, and not a mere attention
 to forms.  Systems of Theology may be complicated, but when the character
 of the Supreme Being is displayed, and He is recognised as the Universal
 Father, the Author and Centre of Good, a child may be led to comprehend
 that dignity and happiness must arise from imitating Him; and this
 conviction should be twisted intoand be the foundation of every
 inculcated duty.
 
 At any rate, the Tales, which were written to illustrate the moral, may
 recall it, when the mind has gained sufficient strength to discuss the
 argument from which it was deduced.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 Mary and Caroline, though the children of wealthy parents were, in their
 infancy, left entirely to the management of servants, or people equally
 ignorant.  Their mother died suddenly, and their father, who found them
 very troublesome at home, placed them under the tuition of a woman of
 tenderness and discernment, a near relation, who was induced to take on
 herself the important charge through motives of compassion.
 
 They were shamefully ignorant, considering that Mary had been fourteen,
 and Caroline twelve years in the world.  If they had been merely
 ignorant, the task would not have appeared so arduous; but they had
 caught every prejudice that the vulgar casually instill.  In order to
 eradicate these prejudices, and substitute good habits instead of those
 they had carelessly contracted, Mrs. Mason never suffered them to be out
 of her sight.  They were allowed to ask questions on all occasions, a
 method she would not have adopted, had she educated them from the first,
 according to the suggestions of her own reason, to which experience had
 given its sanction.
 
 They had tolerable capacities; but Mary had a turn for ridicule, and
 Caroline was vain of her person.  She was, indeed, very handsome, and the
 inconsiderate encomiums that had, in her presence, been lavished on her
 beauty made her, even at that early age, affected.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
                                                                   PAGE
                               CHAPTER I
 _The Treatment of Animals.The Ant.The Bee.Goodness.The           1
 Larks Nest.The Asses_
                               CHAPTER II
 _The Treatment of Animals.The Difference between them and           6
 Man.The Parental Affection of a Dog.Brutality punished_
                              CHAPTER III
 _The Treatment of Animals.The Story of crazy Robin.The            10
 Man confined in the Bastille_
                               CHAPTER IV
 _Anger.History of Jane Fretful_                                    14
                               CHAPTER V
 _Lying.Honour.Truth.Small Duties.History of Lady Sly            18
 and Mrs. Trueman_
                               CHAPTER VI
 _Anger.Folly produces Self-contempt_, _and the Neglect of          25
 others_
                              CHAPTER VII
 _Virtue the Soul of Beauty.The Tulip and the Rose.The             27
 Nightingale.External Ornaments.Characters_
                              CHAPTER VIII
 _Summer Evenings Amusement.The Arrival of a Family of             31
 Haymakers.Ridicule of personal Defects censured.A
 Storm.The Fear of Death.The Cottage of Honest Jack_,
 _the shipwrecked Sailor.The History of Jack_, _and his
 faithful Dog Pompey_
                               CHAPTER IX
 _The Inconveniences of immoderate Indulgence_                       37
                               CHAPTER X
 _The Danger of Delay.Description of a Mansion-house in             40
 Ruins.History of Charles Townley_
                               CHAPTER XI
 _Dress.A Character.Remarks on Mrs. Truemans Manner of            47
 Dressing.Trifling Omissions undermine Affection_
                              CHAPTER XII
 _Behaviour to Servants.True Dignity of Character_                  50
                              CHAPTER XIII
 _Employment.Idleness produces Misery.The Cultivation of           53
 the Fancy raises us above the Vulgar_, _extends our
 Happiness_, _and leads to Virtue_
                              CHAPTER XIV
 _Innocent Amusements.Description of a Welch                        55
 Castle.History of a Welch Harper.A tyrannical
 Landlord.Family Pride_
                               CHAPTER XV
 _Prayer.A Moon-light Scene.Resignation_                           60
                              CHAPTER XVI
 _The Benefits arising from Devotion.The History of the             64
 Village School-mistress.Fatal Effects of Inattention to
 Expense_, _in the History of Mr. Lofty_
                              CHAPTER XVII
 _The Benefits arising from Devotion.The History of the             67
 Village School-mistress concluded_
                             CHAPTER XVIII
 _A Visit to the School-mistress.True and False Pride_              69
                              CHAPTER XIX
 _Charity.The History of Peggy and her Family.The                  71
 Sailors Widow_
                               CHAPTER XX
 _Visit to Mrs. Trueman.The Use of Accomplishments.Virtue          74
 the Soul of all_
                              CHAPTER XXI
 _The Benefit of bodily Pain.Fortitude the Basis of                 77
 Virtue.The Folly of Irresolution_
                              CHAPTER XXII
 _Journey to London_                                                 79
                             CHAPTER XXIII
 _Charity.Shopping.The distressed Stationer.Mischievous           81
 Consequences of delaying Payment_
                              CHAPTER XXIV
 _Visit to a Poor Family in London.Idleness the Parent of           84
 Vice.Prodigality and Generosity incompatible.The
 Pleasures of Benevolence.True and false Motives for
 Saving_
                              CHAPTER XXV
 _Mrs. Masons farewell Advice to her Pupils.Observations           86
 on Letter-writing_
 
 
 
 
 
 
 MORAL CONVERSATIONS AND STORIES
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 The treatment of animals.The ant.The bee.Goodness.The larks
 nest.The asses.
 
 One fine morning in spring, some time after Mary and Caroline were
 settled in their new abode, Mrs. Mason proposed a walk before breakfast,
 a custom she wished to teach imperceptibly, by rendering it amusing.
 
 The sun had scarcely dispelled the dew that hung on every blade of grass,
 and filled the half-shut flowers; every prospect smiled, and the
 freshness of the air conveyed the most pleasing sensations to Mrs.
 Masons mind; but the children were regardless of the surrounding
 beauties, and ran eagerly after some insects to destroy them.  Mrs. Mason
 silently observed their cruel sports, without appearing to do it; but
 stepping suddenly out of the foot-path into the long grass, her buckle
 was caught in it, and striving to disentangle herself, she wet her feet;
 which the children knew she wished to avoid, as she had been lately sick.
 This circumstance roused their attention; and they forgot their amusement
 to enquire why she had left the path; and Mary could hardly restrain a
 laugh, when she was informed that it was to avoid treading on some snails
 that were creeping across the narrow footway.  Surely, said Mary, you do
 not think there is any harm in killing a snail, or any of those nasty
 creatures that crawl on the ground?  I hate them, and should scream if
 one was to find its way from my clothes to my neck!  With great gravity,
 Mrs. Mason asked how she dared to kill any thing, unless it were to
 prevent its hurting her?  Then, resuming a smiling face, she said, Your
 education has been neglected, my child; as we walk along attend to what I
 say, and make the best answers you can; and do you, Caroline, join in the
 conversation.
 
 You have already heard that God created the world, and every inhabitant
 of it.  He is then called the Father of all creatures; and all are made
 to be happy, whom a good and wise God has created.  He made those snails
 you despise, and caterpillars, and spiders; and when He made them, did
 not leave them to perish, but placed them where the food that is most
 proper to nourish them is easily found.  They do not live long, but He
 who is their Father, as well as yours, directs them to deposit their
 eggs on the plants that are fit to support their young, when they are not
 able to get food for themselves.And when such a great and wise Being has
 taken care to provide every thing necessary for the meanest creature,
 would you dare to kill it, merely because it appears to you ugly?  Mary
 began to be attentive, and quickly followed Mrs. Masons example, who
 allowed a caterpillar and a spider to creep on her hand.  You find them,
 she rejoined, very harmless; but a great number would destroy our
 vegetables and fruit; so birds are permitted to eat them, as we feed on
 animals; and in spring there are always more than at any other season of
 the year, to furnish food for the young broods.Half convinced, Mary
 said, but worms are of little consequence in the world.  Yet, replied
 Mrs. Mason, God cares for them, and gives them every thing that is
 necessary to render their existence comfortable.  You are often
 troublesomeI am stronger than youyet I do not kill you.
 
 Observe those ants; they have a little habitation in yonder hillock; they
 carry food to it for their young, and sleep very snug in it during the
 cold weather.  The bees also have comfortable towns, and lay up a store
 of honey to support them when the flowers die, and snow covers the
 ground: and this forecast is as much the gift of God, as any quality you
 possess.
 
 Do you know the meaning of the word Goodness?  I see you are unwilling to
 answer.  I will tell you.  It is, first, to avoid hurting any thing; and
 then, to contrive to give as much pleasure as you can.  If some insects
 are to be destroyed, to preserve my garden from desolation, I have it
 done in the quickest way.  The domestic animals that I keep, I provide
 the best food for, and never suffer them to be tormented; and this
 caution arises from two motives:I wish to make them happy; and, as I
 love my fellow-creatures still better than the brute creation, I would
 not allow those that I have any influence over, to grow habitually
 thoughtless and cruel, till they were unable to relish the greatest
 pleasure life affords,that of resembling God, by doing good.
 
 A lark now began to sing, as it soared aloft.  The children watched its
 motions, listening to the artless melody.  They wondered what it was
 thinking ofof its young family, they soon concluded; for it flew over
 the hedge, and drawing near, they heard the young ones chirp.  Very soon
 both the old birds took their flight together, to look for food to
 satisfy the craving of the almost fledged young.  An idle boy, who had
 borrowed a gun, fired at themthey fell; and before he could take up the
 wounded pair, he perceived Mrs. Mason; and expecting a very severe
 reprimand, ran away.  She and the little girls drew near, and found that
 one was not much hurt; but that the other, the cock, had one leg broken,
 and both its wings shattered; and its little eyes seemed starting out of
 their sockets, it was in such exquisite pain.  The children turned away
 their eyes.  Look at it, said Mrs. Mason; do you not see that it suffers
 as much, and more than you did when you had the small-pox, when you were
 so tenderly nursed.  Take up the hen; I will bind her wing together;
 perhaps it may heal.  As to the cock, though I hate to kill any thing, I
 must put him out of pain; to leave him in his present state would be
 cruel; and avoiding an unpleasant sensation myself, I should allow the
 poor bird to die by inches, and call this treatment tenderness, when it
 would be selfishness or weakness.  Saying so, she put her foot on the
 birds head, turning her own another way.
 
 They walked on; when Caroline remarked, that the nestlings, deprived of
 their parents, would now perish; and the mother began to flutter in her
 hand as they drew near the hedge, though the poor creature could not fly,
 yet she tried to do it.  The girls, with one voice, begged Mrs. Mason to
 let them take the nest, and provide food in a cage, and see if the mother
 could not contrive to hop about to feed them.  The nest and the old
 mother were instantly in Marys handkerchief.  A little opening was left
 to admit the air; and Caroline peeped into it every moment to see how
 they looked.  I give you leave, said Mrs. Mason, to take those birds,
 because an accident has rendered them helpless; if that had not been the
 case, they should not have been confined.
 
 They had scarcely reached the next field, when they met another boy with
 a nest in his hand, and on a tree near him saw the mother, who,
 forgetting her natural timidity, followed the spoiler; and her
 intelligible tones of anguish reached the ears of the children, whose
 hearts now first felt the emotions of humanity.  Caroline called him, and
 taking sixpence out of her little purse, offered to give it to him for
 the nest, if he would shew her where he had taken it from.  The boy
 consented, and away ran Caroline to replace it,crying all the way, how
 delighted the old bird will be to find her brood again.  The pleasure
 that the parent-bird would feel was talked of till they came to a large
 common, and heard some young asses, at the door of an hovel, making a
 most dreadful noise.  Mrs. Mason had ordered the old ones to be confined,
 lest the young should suck before the necessary quantity had been saved
 for some sick people in her neighbourhood.  But after they had given the
 usual quantity of milk, the thoughtless boy had left them still in
 confinement, and the young in vain implored the food nature designed for
 their particular support.  Open the hatch, said Mrs. Mason, the mothers
 have still enough left to satisfy their young.  It was opened, and they
 saw them suck.
 
 Now, said she, we will return to breakfast; give me your hands, my little
 girls, you have done good this morning, you have acted like rational
 creatures.  Look, what a fine morning it is.  Insects, birds, and
 animals, are all enjoying this sweet day.  Thank God for permitting you
 to see it, and for giving you an understanding which teaches you that you
 ought, by doing good, to imitate Him.  Other creatures only think of
 supporting themselves; but man is allowed to ennoble his nature, by
 cultivating his mind and enlarging his heart.  He feels disinterested
 love; every part of the creation affords an exercise for virtue, and
 virtue is ever the truest source of pleasure.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 The treatment of animals.The difference between them and man.Parental
 affection of a dog.Brutality punished.
 
 After breakfast, Mrs. Mason gave the children _Mrs. Trimmers Fabulous
 Histories_; and the subject still turned on animals, and the wanton
 cruelty of those who treated them improperly.  The little girls were
 eager to express their detestation, and requested that in future they
 might be allowed to feed the chickens.  Mrs. Mason complied with their
 request; only one condition was annexed to the permission, that they did
 it regularly.  When you wait for your food, you learn patience, she
 added, and you can mention your wants; but those helpless creatures
 cannot complain.  The country people frequently say,How can you treat a
 poor dumb beast ill; and a stress is very properly laid on the word
 dumb;for dumb they appear to those who do not observe their looks and
 gestures; but God, who takes care of every thing, understands their
 language; and so did Caroline this morning, when she ran with such
 eagerness to re-place the nest which the thoughtless boy had stolen,
 heedless of the mothers agonizing cries!
 
 Mary interrupted her, to ask, if insects and animals were not inferior to
 men; Certainly, answered Mrs. Mason; and men are inferior to angels; yet
 we have reason to believe, that those exalted beings delight to do us
 good.  You have heard in a book, which I seldom permit you to read,
 because you are not of an age to understand it, that angels, when they
 sang glory to God on high, wished for peace on earth, as a proof of the
 good will they felt towards men.  And all the glad tidings that have been
 sent to men, angels have proclaimed: indeed, the word angel signifies a
 messenger.  In order to please God, and our happiness depends upon
 pleasing him, we must do good.  What we call virtue, may be thus
 explained:we exercise every benevolent affection to enjoy comfort here,
 and to fit ourselves to be angels hereafter.  And when we have acquired
 human virtues, we shall have a nobler employment in our Fathers kingdom.
 But between angels and men a much greater resemblance subsists, than
 between men and the brute creation; because the two former seem capable
 of improvement.
 
 The birds you saw to-day do not improveor their improvement only tends
 to self-preservation; the first nest they make and the last are exactly
 the same; though in their flights they must see many others more
 beautiful if not more convenient, and, had they reason, they would
 probably shew something like individual taste in the form of their
 dwellings; but this is not the case.  You saw the hen tear the down from
 her breast to make a nest for her eggs; you saw her beat the grain with
 her bill, and not swallow a bit, till the young were satisfied; and
 afterwards she covered them with her wings, and seemed perfectly happy,
 while she watched over her charge; if any one approached, she was ready
 to defend them, at the hazard of her life: yet, a fortnight hence, you
 will see the same hen drive the fledged chickens from the corn, and
 forget the fondness that seemed to be stronger than the first impulse of
 nature.
 
 Animals have not the affections which arise from reason, nor can they do
 good, or acquire virtue.  Every affection, and impulse, which I have
 observed in them, are like our inferior emotions, which do not depend
 entirely on our will, but are involuntary; they seem to have been
 implanted to preserve the species, and make the individual grateful for
 actual kindness.  If you caress and feed them, they will love you, as
 children do, without knowing why; but we neither see imagination nor
 wisdom in them; and, what principally exalts man, friendship and
 devotion, they seem incapable of forming the least idea of.  Friendship
 is founded on knowledge and virtue, and these are human acquirements; and
 devotion is a preparation for eternity; because when we pray to God, we
 offer an affront to him, if we do not strive to imitate the perfections
 He displays every where for our imitation, that we may grow better and
 happier.
 
 The children eagerly enquired in what manner they were to behave, to
 prove that they were superior to animals?  The answer was short,be
 tender-hearted; and let your superior endowments ward off the evils which
 they cannot foresee.  It is only to animals that children _can_ do good,
 men are their superiors.  When I was a child, added their tender friend,
 I always made it my study and delight, to feed all the dumb family that
 surrounded our house; and when I could be of use to any one of them I was
 happy.  This employment humanized my heart, while, like wax, it took
 every impression; and Providence has since made me an instrument of
 goodI have been useful to my fellow-creatures.  I, who never wantonly
 trod on an insect, or disregarded the plaint of the speechless beast, can
 now give bread to the hungry, physic to the sick, comfort to the
 afflicted, and, above all, am preparing you, who are to live for ever, to
 be fit for the society of angels, and good men made perfect.  This world,
 I told you, was a road to a bettera preparation for it; if we suffer, we
 grow humbler and wiser: but animals have not this advantage, and man
 should not prevent their enjoying all the happiness of which they are
 capable.
 
 A she-cat or dog have such strong parental affection, that if you take
 away their young, it almost kills them; some have actually died of grief
 when all have been taken away; though they do not seem to miss the
 greatest part.
 
 A bitch had once all her litter stolen from her, and drowned in a
 neighbouring brook: she sought them out, and brought them one by one,
 laid them at the feet of her cruel master;and looking wistfully at them
 for some time, in dumb anguish, turning her eyes on the destroyer, she
 expired!
 
 I myself knew a man who had hardened his heart to such a degree, that he
 found pleasure in tormenting every creature whom he had any power over.
 I saw him let two guinea-pigs roll down sloping tiles, to see if the fall
 would kill them.  And were they killed? cried Caroline.  Certainly; and
 it is well they were, or he would have found some other mode of torment.
 When he became a father, he not only neglected to educate his children,
 and set them a good example, but he taught them to be cruel while he
 tormented them: the consequence was, that they neglected him when he was
 old and feeble; and he died in a ditch.
 
 You may now go and feed your birds, and tie some of the straggling
 flowers round the garden sticks.  After dinner, if the weather continues
 fine, we will walk to the wood, and I will shew you the hole in the
 lime-stone mountain (a mountain whose bowels, as we call them, are
 lime-stones) in which poor crazy Robin and his dog lived.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 The treatment of animals.The story of crazy Robin.The man confined in
 the Bastille.
 
 In the afternoon the children bounded over the short grass of the common,
 and walked under the shadow of the mountain till they came to a craggy
 part; where a stream broke out, and ran down the declivity, struggling
 with the huge stones which impeded its progress, and occasioned a noise
 that did not unpleasantly interrupt the solemn silence of the place.  The
 brook was soon lost in a neighbouring wood, and the children turned their
 eyes to the broken side of the mountain, over which ivy grew in great
 profusion.  Mrs. Mason pointed out a little cave, and desired them to sit
 down on some stumps of trees, whilst she related the promised story.
 
 In yonder cave once lived a poor man, who generally went by the name of
 crazy Robin.  In his youth he was very industrious, and married my
 fathers dairy-maid; a girl deserving of such a good husband.  For some
 time they continued to live very comfortably; their daily labour procured
 their daily bread; but Robin, finding it was likely he should have a
 large family, borrowed a trifle, to add to the small pittance which they
 had saved in service, and took a little farm in a neighbouring county.  I
 was then a child.
 
 Ten or twelve years after, I heard that a crazy man, who appeared very
 harmless, had piled by the side of the brook a great number of stones; he
 would wade into the river for them, followed by a cur dog, whom he would
 frequently call his Jacky, and even his Nancy; and then mumble to
 himself,thou wilt not leave mewe will dwell with the owls in the ivy.A
 number of owls had taken shelter in it.  The stones which he waded for he
 carried to the mouth of the hole, and only just left room enough to creep
 in.  Some of the neighbours at last recollected his face; and I sent to
 enquire what misfortune had reduced him to such a deplorable state.
 
 The information I received from different persons, I will communicate to
 you in as few words as I can.
 
 Several of his children died in their infancy; and, two years before he
 came to his native place, one misfortune had followed another till he had
 sunk under their accumulated weight.  Through various accidents he was
 long in arrears to his landlord; who, seeing that he was an honest man,
 who endeavoured to bring up his family, did not distress him; but when
 his wife was lying-in of her last child, the landlord dying, his heir
 sent and seized the stock for the rent; and the person from whom he had
 borrowed some money, exasperated to see all gone, arresting him
 immediately, he was hurried to gaol, without being able to leave any
 money for his family.  The poor woman could not see them starve, and
 trying to support her children before she had gained sufficient strength,
 she caught cold; and through neglect, and her want of proper nourishment,
 her illness turned to a putrid fever; which two of the children caught
 from her, and died with her.  The two who were left, Jacky and Nancy,
 went to their father, and took with them a cur dog, that had long shared
 their frugal meals.
 
 The children begged in the day, and at night slept with their wretched
 father.  Poverty and dirt soon robbed their cheeks of the roses which the
 country air made bloom with a peculiar freshness; so that they soon
 caught a jail fever,and died.  The poor father, who was now bereft of
 all his children, hung over their bed in speechless anguish; not a groan
 or a tear escaped from him, whilst he stood, two or three hours, in the
 same attitude, looking at the dead bodies of his little darlings.  The
 dog licked his hands, and strove to attract his attention; but for awhile
 he seemed not to observe his caresses; when he did, he said, mournfully,
 thou wilt not leave meand then he began to laugh.  The bodies were
 removed; and he remained in an unsettled state, often frantic; at length
 the phrenzy subsided, and he grew melancholy and harmless.  He was not
 then so closely watched; and one day he contrived to make his escape, the
 dog followed him, and came directly to his native village.
 
 After I had received this account, I determined he should live in the
 place he had chosen, undisturbed.  I sent some conveniences, all of which
 he rejected, except a mat; on which he sometimes sleptthe dog always
 did.  I tried to induce him to eat, but he constantly gave the dog
 whatever I sent him, and lived on haws and blackberries, and every kind
 of trash.  I used to call frequently on him; and he sometimes followed me
 to the house I now live in, and in winter he would come of his own
 accord, and take a crust of bread.  He gathered water-cresses out of the
 pool, and would bring them to me, with nosegays of wild thyme, which he
 plucked from the sides of the mountain.  I mentioned before, that the dog
 was a cur.  It had, indeed, the bad trick of a cur, and would run barking
 after horses heels.  One day, when his master was gathering
 water-cresses, the dog running after a young gentlemans horse, made it
 start, and almost threw the rider; who grew so angry, that though he knew
 it was the poor madmans dog, he levelled his gun at his headshot
 him,and instantly rode off.  Robin ran to his dog,he looked at his
 wounds, and not sensible that he was dead, called to him to follow him;
 but when he found that he could not, he took him to the pool, and washed
 off the blood before it began to clot, and then brought him home, and
 laid him on the mat.
 
 I observed that I had not seen him pacing up the hills as usual, and sent
 to enquire about him.  He was found sitting by the dog, and no entreaties
 could prevail on him to quit the body, or receive any refreshment.  I
 instantly set off for this place, hoping, as I had always been a
 favourite, that I should be able to persuade him to eat something.  But
 when I came to him, I found the hand of death was upon him.  He was still
 melancholy; yet there was not such a mixture of wildness in it as
 formerly.  I pressed him to take some food; but, instead of answering me,
 or turning away, he burst into tears,a thing I had never seen him do
 before, and, sobbing, he said, Will any one be kind to me!you will kill
 me!I saw not my wife dieNo!they dragged me from herbut I saw Jacky
 and Nancy dieand who pitied me?but my dog!  He turned his eyes to the
 bodyI wept with him.  He would then have taken some nourishment, but
 nature was exhaustedand he expired.
 
 Was that the cave? said Mary.  They ran to it.  Poor Robin!  Did you ever
 hear of any thing so cruel?  Yes, answered Mrs. Mason; and as we walk
 home I will relate an instance of still greater barbarity.
 
 I told you, that Robin was confined in a jail.  In France they have a
 dreadful one, called the Bastille.  The poor wretches who are confined in
 it live entirely alone; have not the pleasure of seeing men or animals;
 nor are they allowed books.They live in comfortless solitude.  Some have
 amused themselves by making figures on the wall; and others have laid
 straws in rows.  One miserable captive found a spider; he nourished it
 for two or three years; it grew tame, and partook of his lonely meal.
 The keeper observed it, and mentioned the circumstance to a superiour,
 who ordered him to crush it.  In vain did the man beg to have his spider
 spared.  You find, Mary, that the nasty creature which you despised was a
 comfort in solitude.  The keeper obeyed the cruel command; and the
 unhappy wretch felt more pain when he heard the crush, than he had ever
 experienced during his long confinement.  He looked round a dreary
 apartment, and the small portion of light which the grated bars admitted,
 only served to shew him, that he breathed where nothing else drew breath.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 Anger.History of Jane Fretful.
 
 A few days after these walks and conversations, Mrs. Mason heard a great
 noise in the play-room.  She ran hastily to enquire the cause, and found
 the children crying, and near them, one of the young birds lying on the
 floor dead.  With great eagerness each of them tried, the moment she
 entered, to exculpate herself, and prove that the other had killed the
 bird.  Mrs. Mason commanded them to be silent; and, at the same time,
 called an orphan whom she had educated, and desired her to take care of
 the nest.
 
 The cause of the dispute was easily gathered from what they both let
 fall.  They had contested which had the best right to feed the birds.
 Mary insisted that she had a right, because she was the eldest; and
 Caroline, because she took the nest.  Snatching it from one side of the
 room to the other, the bird fell, and was trodden on before they were
 aware.
 
 When they were a little composed, Mrs. Mason calmly thus addressed
 them:I perceive that you are ashamed of your behaviour, and sorry for
 the consequence; I will not therefore severely reprove you, nor add
 bitterness to the self-reproach you must both feel,because I pity you.
 You are now inferiour to the animals that graze on the common; reason
 only serves to render your folly more conspicuous and inexcusable.
 Anger, is a little despicable vice: its selfish emotions banish
 compassion, and undermine every virtue.  It is easy to conquer another;
 but noble to subdue oneself.  Had you, Mary, given way to your sisters
 humour, you would have proved that you were not only older, but wiser
 than her.  And you, Caroline, would have saved your charge, if you had,
 for the time, waved your right.
 
 It is always a proof of superiour sense to bear with slight
 inconveniences, and even trifling injuries, without complaining or
 contesting about them.  The soul reserves its firmness for great
 occasions, and then it acts a decided part.  It is just the contrary mode
 of thinking, and the conduct produced by it, which occasions all those
 trivial disputes that slowly corrode domestic peace, and insensibly
 destroy what great misfortunes could not sweep away.
 
 I will tell you a story, that will take stronger hold on your memory than
 mere remarks.
 
 Jane Fretful was an only child.  Her fond weak mother would not allow her
 to be contradicted on any occasion.  The child had some tenderness of
 heart; but so accustomed was she to see every thing give way to her
 humour, that she imagined the world was only made for her.  If any of her
 playfellows had toys, that struck her capricious sickly fancy, she would
 cry for them; and substitutes were in vain offered to quiet her, she must
 have the identical ones, or fly into the most violent passion.  When she
 was an infant, if she fell down, her nurse made her beat the floor.  She
 continued the practice afterwards, and when she was angry would kick the
 chairs and tables, or any senseless piece of furniture, if they came in
 her way.  I have seen her throw her cap into the fire, because some of
 her acquaintance had a prettier.
 
 Continual passions weakened her constitution; beside, she would not eat
 the common wholesome food that children, who are subject to the small-pox
 and worms, ought to eat, and which is necessary when they grow so fast,
 to make them strong and handsome.  Instead of being a comfort to her
 tender, though mistaken, mother, she was her greatest torment.  The
 servants all disliked her; she loved no one but herself; and the
 consequence was, she never inspired love; even the pity good-natured
 people felt, was nearly allied to contempt.
 
 A lady, who visited her mother, brought with her one day a pretty little
 dog.  Jane was delighted with it; and the lady, with great reluctance,
 parted with it to oblige her friend.  For some time she fondled, and
 really felt something like an affection for it: but, one day, it happened
 to snatch a cake she was going to eat, and though there were twenty
 within reach, she flew into a violent passion, and threw a stool at the
 poor creature, who was big with pup.  It fell down; I can scarcely tell
 the rest; it received so severe a blow, that all the young were killed,
 and the poor wretch languished two days, suffering the most excruciating
 torture.
 
 Jane Fretful, who was now angry with herself, sat all the time holding
 it, and every look the miserable animal gave her, stung her to the heart.
 After its death she was very unhappy; but did not try to conquer her
 temper.  All the blessings of life were thrown away on her; and, without
 any real misfortune, she was continually miserable.
 
 If she had planned a party of pleasure, and the weather proved
 unfavourable, the whole day was spent in fruitless repining, or venting
 her ill-humour on those who depended on her.  If no disappointment of
 that kind occurred, she could not enjoy the promised pleasure; something
 always disconcerted her; the horses went too fast, or, too slow; the
 dinner was ill-dressed, or, some of the company contradicted her.
 
 She was, when a child, very beautiful; but anger soon distorted her
 regular features, and gave a forbidding fierceness to her eyes.  But if
 for a moment she looked pleased, she still resembled a heap of
 combustible matter, to which an accidental spark might set fire; of
 course quiet people were afraid to converse with her.  And if she ever
 did a good, or a humane action, her ridiculous anger soon rendered it an
 intolerable burden, if it did not entirely cancel it.
 
 At last she broke her mothers heart, or hastened her death, by her want
 of duty, and her many other faults: all proceeding from violent,
 unrestrained anger.
 
 The death of her mother, which affected her very much, left her without a
 friend.  She would sometimes say, Ah! my poor mother, if you were now
 alive, I would not teaze youI would give the world to let you know that
 I am sorry for what I have done: you died, thinking me ungrateful; and
 lamenting that I did not die when you gave me suck.  I shall neveroh!
 never see you more.
 
 This thought, and her peevish temper, preyed on her impaired
 constitution.  She had not, by doing good, prepared her soul for another
 state, or cherished any hopes that could disarm death of its terrors, or
 render that last sleep sweetits approach was dreadful!and she hastened
 her end, scolding the physician for not curing her.  Her lifeless
 countenance displayed the marks of convulsive anger; and she left an
 ample fortune behind her to those who did not regret her loss.  They
 followed her to the grave, on which no one shed a tear.  She was soon
 forgotten; and I only remember her, to warn you to shun her errors.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 Lying.Honour.Truth.Small Duties.History of Lady Sly, and Mrs.
 Trueman.
 
 The little girls were very assiduous to gain Mrs. Masons good opinion;
 and, by the mildness of their behaviour, to prove to her that they were
 ashamed of themselves.  It was one of Mrs. Masons rules, when they
 offended her, that is, behaved improperly, to treat them civilly; but to
 avoid giving them those marks of affection which they were particularly
 delighted to receive.
 
 Yesterday, said she to them, I only mentioned to you one fault, though I
 observed two.  You very readily guess I mean the lie that you both told.
 Nay, look up, for I wish to see you blush; and the confusion which I
 perceive in your faces gives me pleasure; because it convinces me that it
 is not a confirmed habit: and, indeed, my children, I should be sorry
 that such a mean one had taken deep root in your infant minds.
 
 When I speak of falsehood, I mean every kind; whatever tends to deceive,
 though not said in direct terms.  Tones of voice, motions of the hand or
 head, if they make another believe what they ought not to believe, are
 lies, and of the worst kind; because the contrivance aggravates the
 guilt.  I would much sooner forgive a lie told directly, when perhaps
 fear entirely occupied the thoughts, and the presence of God was not
 felt: for it is His sacred Majesty that you affront by telling an
 untruth.
 
 How so? enquired Mary.
 
 Because you hope to conceal your falsehood from every human creature:
 but, if you consider a moment, you must recollect, that the Searcher of
 hearts reads your very thoughts; that nothing is hid from him.
 
 You would blush if I were to discover that you told a lie; yet wantonly
 forfeit the favour of Him, from whom you have received life and all its
 blessings, to screen yourselves from correction or reproof, or, what is
 still worse, to purchase some trifling gratification, the pleasure of
 which would last but a moment.
 
 You heard the gentleman who visited me this morning, very frequently use
 the word Honour.  Honour consists in respecting yourself; in doing as you
 would be done by; and the foundation of honour is Truth.
 
 When I can depend on the veracity of people, that is to say, am convinced
 that they adhere to truth, I rely on them; am certain they have courage,
 because I know they will bear any inconvenience rather than despise
 themselves, for telling a lie.  Besides, it is not necessary to consider
 what you intend to say, when you have done right.  Always determine, on
 every occasion, to speak the truth, and you will never be at a loss for
 words.  If your character for this scrupulous attention is once fixed,
 your acquaintance will be courted; and those who are not particularly
 pleased with you, will, at least, respect your honourable principles.  It
 is impossible to form a friendship without making truth the basis; it is
 indeed the essence of devotion, the employment of the understanding, and
 the support of every duty.
 
 I govern my servants, and you, by attending strictly to truth, and this
 observance keeping my head clear and my heart pure, I am ever ready to
 pray to the Author of good, the Fountain of truth.
 
 While I am discussing the subject, let me point out to you another branch
 of this virtue; Sincerity.And remember that I every day set you an
 example; for I never, to please for the moment, pay unmeaning
 compliments, or permit any words to drop from my tongue, that my heart
 does not dictate.  And when I relate any matter of fact, I carefully
 avoid embellishing it, in order to render it a more entertaining story;
 not that I think such a practice absolutely criminal; but as it
 contributes insensibly to wear away a respect for truth, I guard against
 the vain impulse, lest I should lose the chief strength, and even
 ornament, of my mind, and become like a wave of the sea, drifted about by
 every gust of passion.
 
 You must in life observe the most apparently insignificant dutiesthe
 great ones are the pillars of virtue; but the constant concurrence of
 trifling things, makes it necessary that reason and conscience should
 always preside, to keep the heart steady.  Many people make promises, and
 appointments, which they scruple not to break, if a more inviting
 pleasure occurs, not remembering that the slightest duty should be
 performed before a mere amusement is pursuedfor any neglect of this kind
 embitters play.  Nothing, believe me, can long be pleasant, that is not
 innocent.
 
 As I usually endeavour to recollect some persons of my acquaintance, who
 have suffered by the faults, or follies, I wish you to avoid; I will
 describe two characters, that will, if I mistake not, very strongly
 enforce what I have been saying.
 
 Last week you saw Lady Sly, who came to pay me a morning visit.  Did you
 ever see such a fine carriage, or such beautiful horses?  How they pawed
 the ground, and displayed their rich harnesses!  Her servants wore
 elegant liveries, and her own clothes suited the equipage.  Her house is
 equal to her carriage; the rooms are lofty, and hung with silk; noble
 glasses and pictures adorn them: and the pleasure-grounds are large and
 well laid out; beside the trees and shrubs, they contain a variety of
 summer-houses and temples, as they are called.Yet my young friends, this
 is _state_, not _dignity_.
 
 This woman has a little soul, she never attended to truth, and obtaining
 great part of her fortune by falsehood, it has blighted all her
 enjoyments.  She inhabits that superb house, wears the gayest clothes,
 and rides in that beautiful carriage, without feeling pleasure.
 Suspicion, and the cares it has given birth to, have wrinkled her
 countenance, and banished every trace of beauty, which paint in vain
 endeavours to repair.  Her suspicious temper arises from a knowledge of
 her own heart, and the want of rational employments.
 
 She imagines that every person she converses with means to deceive her;
 and when she leaves a company, supposes all the ill they may say of her,
 because she recollects her own practice.  She listens about her house,
 expecting to discover the designs of her servants, none of whom she can
 trust; and in consequence of this anxiety her sleep is unsound, and her
 food tasteless.  She walks in her paradise of a garden, and smells not
 the flowers, nor do the birds inspire her with cheerfulness.These
 pleasures are true and simple, they lead to the love of God, and all the
 creatures whom He hath madeand cannot warm a heart which a malicious
 story can please.
 
 She cannot pray to God;He hates a liar!  She is neglected by her
 husband, whose only motive for marrying her was to clear an incumbered
 estate.  Her son, her only child, is undutiful; the poor never have cause
 to bless her; nor does she contribute to the happiness of any human
 being.
 
 To kill time, and drive away the pangs of remorse, she goes from one
 house to another, collecting and propagating scandalous tales, to bring
 others on a level with herself.  Even those who resemble her are afraid
 of her; she lives alone in the world, its good things are poisoned by her
 vices, and neither inspire joy nor gratitude.
 
 Before I tell you how she acquired these vicious habits, and enlarged her
 fortune by disregarding truth, I must desire you to think of Mrs.
 Trueman, the curates wife, who lives in yonder white house, close to the
 church; it is a small one, yet the woodbines and jessamins that twine
 about the windows give it a pretty appearance.  Her voice is sweet, her
 manners not only easy, but elegant; and her simple dress makes her person
 appear to the greatest advantage.
 
 She walks to visit me, and her little ones hang on her hands, and cling
 to her clothes, they are so fond of her.  If any thing terrifies them,
 they run under her apron, and she looks like the hen taking care of her
 young brood.  The domestic animals play with the children, finding her a
 mild attentive mistress; and out of her scanty fortune she contrives to
 feed and clothe many a hungry shivering wretch; who bless her as she
 passes along.
 
 Though she has not any outward decorations, she appears superior to her
 neighbours, who call her the _Gentlewoman_; indeed every gesture shews an
 accomplished and dignified mind, that relies on itself; when deprived of
 the fortune which contributed to polish and give it consequence.
 
 Drawings, the amusement of her youth, ornament her neat parlour; some
 musical instruments stand in one corner; for she plays with taste, and
 sings sweetly.
 
 All the furniture, not forgetting a book-case, full of well-chosen books,
 speak the refinement of the owner, and the pleasures a cultivated mind
 has within its own grasp, independent of prosperity.
 
 Her husband, a man of taste and learning, reads to her, while she makes
 clothes for her children, whom she teaches in the tenderest, and most
 persuasive manner, important truths and elegant accomplishments.
 
 When you have behaved well for some time you shall visit her, and ramble
 in her little garden; there are several pretty seats in it, and the
 nightingales warble their sweetest songs, undisturbed, in the shade.
 
 I have now given you an account of the present situation of both, and of
 their characters; listen to me whilst I relate in what manner these
 characters were formed, and the consequence of each adhering to a
 different mode of conduct.
 
 Lady Sly, when she was a child, used to say pert things, which the
 injudicious people about her laughed at, and called very witty.  Finding
 that her prattle pleased, she talked incessantly, and invented stories,
 when adding to those that had some foundation, was not sufficient to
 entertain the company.  If she stole sweetmeats, or broke any thing, the
 cat, or the dog, was blamed, and the poor animals were corrected for her
 faults; nay, sometimes the servants lost their places in consequence of
 her assertions.  Her parents died and left her a large fortune, and an
 aunt, who had a still larger, adopted her.
 
 Mrs. Trueman, her cousin, was, some years after, adopted by the same
 lady; but her parents could not leave their estate to her, as it
 descended to the male heir.  She had received the most liberal education,
 and was in every respect the reverse of her cousin; who envied her merit,
 and could not bear to think of her dividing the fortune which she had
 long expected to inherit entirely herself.  She therefore practised every
 mean art to prejudice her aunt against her, and succeeded.
 
 A faithful old servant endeavoured to open her mistresss eyes; but the
 cunning niece contrived to invent the most infamous story of the old
 domestic, who was in consequence of it dismissed.  Mrs. Trueman supported
 her, when she could not succeed in vindicating her, and suffered for her
 generosity; for her aunt dying soon after, left only five hundred pounds
 to this amiable woman, and fifty thousand to Lady Sly.
 
 They both of them married shortly after.  One, the profligate Lord Sly,
 and the other a respectable clergyman, who had been disappointed in his
 hopes of preferment.  This last couple, in spite of their mutual
 disappointments, are contented with their lot; and are preparing
 themselves and children for another world, where truth, virtue and
 happiness dwell together.
 
 For believe me, whatever happiness we attain in this life, must faintly
 resemble what God Himself enjoys, whose truth and goodness produce a
 sublime degree, such as we cannot conceive, it is so far above our
 limited capacities.
 
 I did not intend to detain you so long, said Mrs. Mason; have you
 finished _Mrs. Trimmers Fabulous Histories_?  Indeed we have, answered
 Caroline, mournfully, and I was very sorry to come to the end.  I never
 read such a pretty book; may I read it over again to Mrs. Truemans
 little Fanny?  Certainly, said Mrs. Mason, if you can make her understand
 that birds never talk.  Go and run about the garden, and remember the
 next lie I detect, I shall punish; because lying is a vice;and I ought
 to punish you if you are guilty of it, to prevent your feeling Lady Slys
 misery.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 Anger.Folly produces Self-contempt, and the Neglect of others.
 
 Mrs. Mason had a number of visitors one afternoon, who conversed in the
 usual thoughtless manner which people often fall into who do not consider
 before they speak; they talked of Carolines beauty, and she gave herself
 many affected airs to make it appear to the best advantage.  But Mary,
 who had not a face to be proud of, was observing some peculiarities in
 the dress or manners of the guests; and one very respectable old lady,
 who had lost her teeth, afforded her more diversion than any of the rest.
 
 The children went to bed without being reproved, though Mrs. Mason, when
 she dismissed them, said gravely, I give you to-night a kiss of peace, an
 affectionate one you have not deserved.  They therefore discovered by her
 behaviour that they had done wrong, and waited for an explanation to
 regain her favour.
 
 She was never in a passion, but her quiet steady displeasure made them
 feel so little in their own eyes, they wished her to smile that they
 might be something; for all their consequence seemed to arise from her
 approbation.  I declare, said Caroline, I do not know what I have done,
 and yet I am sure I never knew Mrs. Mason find fault without convincing
 me that I had done wrong.  Did you, Mary, ever see her in a passion?  No,
 said Mary, I do believe that she was never angry in her life; when John
 threw down all the china, and stood trembling, she was the first to say
 that the carpet made him stumble.  Yes, now I do remember, when we first
 came to her house, John forgot to bring the cow and her young calf into
 the cow-house; I heard her bid him do it directly, and the poor calf was
 almost frozen to deathshe spoke then in a hurry, and seemed angry.  Now
 you mention it, I do recollect, replied Caroline, that she was angry,
 when Betty did not carry the poor sick woman the broth she ordered her to
 take to her.  But this is not like the passion I used to see nurse in,
 when any thing vexed her.  She would scold us, and beat the girl who
 waited on her.  Poor little Jenny, many a time was she beaten, when we
 vexed nurse; I would tell her she was <not> to blame now if I saw herand
 I would not tease her any more.
 
 I declare I cannot go to sleep, said Mary, I am afraid of Mrs. Masons
 eyeswould you think, Caroline, that she who looks so very good-natured
 sometimes, could frighten one so?  I wish I were as wise and as good as
 she is.  The poor woman with the six children, whom we met on the common,
 said she was an angel, and that she had saved hers and her childrens
 lives.  My heart is in my mouth, indeed, replied Caroline, when I think
 of to-morrow morning, and yet I am much happier than I was when we were
 at home.  I cried, I cannot now tell for what, all day; I never wished to
 be goodnobody told me what it was to be good.  I wish to be a woman,
 said Mary, and to be like Mrs. Mason, or Mrs. Trueman,we are to go to
 see her if we behave well.
 
 Sleep soon over-powered them, and they forgot their apprehensions.  In
 the morning they awoke refreshed, and took care to learn their lessons,
 and feed the chickens, before Mrs. Mason left her chamber.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 Virtue the Soul of Beauty.The Tulip and the Rose.The
 Nightingale.External Ornaments.Characters.
 
 The next morning Mrs. Mason met them first in the garden; and she desired
 Caroline to look at a bed of tulips, that were then in their highest
 state of perfection.  I, added she, choose to have every kind of flower
 in my garden, as the succession enables me to vary my daily prospect, and
 gives it the charm of variety; yet these tulips afford me less pleasure
 than most of the other sort which I cultivateand I will tell you
 whythey are only beautiful.  Listen to my distinction;good features,
 and a fine complexion, I term _bodily_ beauty.  Like the streaks in the
 tulip, they please the eye for a moment; but this uniformity soon tires,
 and the active mind flies off to something else.  The soul of beauty, my
 dear children, consists in the body gracefully exhibiting the emotions
 and variations of the informing mind.  If truth, humanity, and knowledge
 inhabit the breast, the eyes will beam with a mild lustre, modesty will
 suffuse the cheeks, and smiles of innocent joy play over all the
 features.  At first sight, regularity and colour will attract, and have
 the advantage, because the hidden springs are not directly set in motion;
 but when internal goodness is reflected, every other kind of beauty, the
 shadow of it, withers away before itas the sun obscures a lamp.
 
 You are certainly handsome, Caroline; I mean, have good features; but you
 must improve your mind to give them a pleasing expression, or they will
 only serve to lead your understanding astray.  I have seen some foolish
 people take great pains to decorate the outside of their houses, to
 attract the notice of strangers, who gazed, and passed on; whilst the
 inside, where they received their friends, was dark and inconvenient.
 Apply this observation to mere personal attractions.  They may, it is
 true, for a few years, charm the superficial part of your acquaintance,
 whose notions of beauty are not built on any principle of utility.  Such
 persons might look at you, as they would glance their eye over these
 tulips, and feel for a moment the same pleasure that a view of the
 variegated rays of light would convey to an uninformed mind.  The lower
 class of mankind, and children, are fond of finery; gaudy, dazzling
 appearances catch their attention; but the discriminating judgment of a
 person of sense requires, besides colour, order, proportion, grace and
 usefulness, to render the idea of beauty complete.
 
 Observe that rose, it has all the perfections I speak of; colour, grace,
 and sweetnessand even when the fine tints fade, the smell is grateful to
 those who have before contemplated its beauties.  I have only one bed of
 tulips, though my garden is large, but, in every part of it, roses
 attract the eye.
 
 You have seen Mrs. Trueman, and think her a very fine woman; yet her skin
 and complexion have only the clearness that temperance gives; and her
 features, strictly speaking, are not regular: Betty, the housemaid, has,
 in both these respects, much the superiority over her.  But, though it is
 not easy to define in what her beauty consists, the eye follows her
 whenever she moves; and every person of taste listens for the modulated
 sounds which proceed out of her mouth, to be improved and pleased.  It is
 conscious worth, _truth_, that gives dignity to her walk, and simple
 elegance to her conversation.  She has, indeed, a most excellent
 understanding, and a feeling heart; sagacity and tenderness, the result
 of both, are happily blended in her countenance; and taste is the polish,
 which makes them appear to the best advantage.  She is more than
 beautiful; and you see her varied excellencies again and again, with
 increasing pleasure.  They are not obtruded on you, for knowledge has
 taught her true humility: she is not like the flaunting tulip, that
 forces itself forward into notice; but resembles the modest rose, you see
 yonder, retiring under its elegant foliage.
 
 I have mentioned flowersthe same order is observed in the higher
 departments of nature.  Think of the birds; those that sing best have not
 the finest plumage; indeed just the contrary; God divides His gifts, and
 amongst the feathered race the nightingale (sweetest of warblers, who
 pours forth her varied strain when sober eve comes on) you would seek in
 vain in the morning, if you expected that beautiful feathers should point
 out the songstress: many who incessantly twitter, and are only tolerable
 in the general concert, would surpass her, and attract your attention.
 
 I knew, some time before you were born, a very fine, a very handsome
 girl; I saw she had abilities, and I saw with pain that she attended to
 the most obvious, but least valuable gift of heaven.  Her ingenuity
 slept, whilst she tried to render her person more alluring.  At last she
 caught the small-poxher beauty vanished, and she was for a time
 miserable; but the natural vivacity of youth overcame her unpleasant
 feelings.  In consequence of the disorder, her eyes became so weak that
 she was obliged to sit in a dark room.  To beguile the tedious day she
 applied to music, and made a surprising proficiency.  She even began to
 think, in her retirement, and when she recovered her sight grew fond of
 reading.
 
 Large companies did not now amuse her, she was no longer the object of
 admiration, or if she was taken notice of, it was to be pitied, to hear
 her former self praised, and to hear them lament the depredation that
 dreadful disease had made in a fine face.  Not expecting or wishing to be
 observed, she lost her affected airs, and attended to the conversation,
 in which she was soon able to bear a part.  In short, the desire of
 pleasing took a different turn, and as she improved her mind, she
 discovered that virtue, internal beauty, was valuable on its own account,
 and not like that of the person, which resembles a toy, that pleases the
 observer, but does not render the possessor happy.
 
 She found, that in acquiring knowledge, her mind grew tranquil, and the
 noble desire of acting conformably to the will of God succeeded, and
 drove out the immoderate vanity which before actuated her, when her
 equals were the objects she thought most of, and whose approbation she
 sought with such eagerness.  And what had she sought?  To be stared at
 and called handsome.  Her beauty, the mere sight of it, did not make
 others good, or comfort the afflicted; but after she had lost it, she was
 comfortable herself, and set her friends the most useful example.
 
 The money that she had formerly appropriated to ornament her person, now
 clothed the naked; yet she really appeared better dressed, as she had
 acquired the habit of employing her time to the best advantage, and could
 make many things herself.  Besides, she did not implicitly follow the
 reigning fashion, for she had learned to distinguish, and in the most
 trivial matters acted according to the dictates of good sense.
 
 The children made some comments on this story, but the entrance of a
 visitor interrupted the conversation, and they ran about the garden,
 comparing the roses and tulips.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 Summer Evenings Amusement.The Arrival of a Family of
 Haymakers.Ridicule of personal Defects censured.A Storm.The Fear of
 Death.The Cottage of honest Jack, the shipwrecked Sailor.The History of
 Jack, and his faithful Dog Pompey.
 
 The evening was pleasant; Mrs. Mason and the children walked out; and
 many rustic noises struck their ears.  Some bells in a neighbouring
 village, softened by the distance, sounded pleasingly; the beetles
 hummed, and the children pursued them, not to destroy them; but to
 observe their form, and ask questions concerning their mode of living.
 Sheep were bleating and cattle lowing, the rivulet near them babbled
 along, while the sound of the distant ocean died away on the earor they
 forgot it, listening to the whistling of the hay-makers, who were
 returning from the field.  They met a whole family who came every year
 from another county where they could not find constant employment, and
 Mrs. Mason allowed them to sleep in her barn.  The little ones knew their
 benefactress, and tried to catch a smile; and she was ever ready to smile
 on those whom she obliged; for she loved all her fellow creatures, and
 love lightens obligations.  Besides, she thought that the poor who are
 willing to work, had a right to the comforts of life.
 
 A few moments after, they met a deformed woman; the children stared her
 almost out of countenance; but Mrs. Mason turned her head another way,
 and when the poor object was out of hearing, said to Mary, I intended to
 reprove you this morning for a fault which I have frequently seen you
 commit; and this moment and the other evening it was particularly
 conspicuous.  When that deformed woman passed us, I involuntarily looked
 at something else, and would not let her perceive that she was a
 disgusting figure, and attracted notice on that account.  I say I did it
 involuntarily, for I have accustomed myself to think of others, and what
 they will suffer on all occasions: and this lothness to offend, or even
 to hurt the feelings of another, is an instantaneous spring which
 actuates my conduct, and makes me kindly affected to every thing that
 breathes.  If I then am so careful not to wound a stranger, what shall I
 think of your behaviour, Mary? when you laughed at a respectable old
 woman, who beside her virtues and her age, had been particularly civil to
 you.  I have always seen persons of the weakest understandings, and whose
 hearts benevolence seldom touched, ridicule bodily infirmities, and
 accidental defects.  They could only relish the inferiour kind of beauty,
 which I described this morning, and a silly joy has elated their empty
 souls, on finding, by comparison, that they were superiour to others in
 that respect, though the conclusion was erroneous, for merit, mental
 acquirements, can only give a just claim to superiority.  Had you
 possessed the smallest portion of discernment, you would soon have
 forgotten the tones, loss of teeth made drawling, in listening to the
 chearful good sense which that worthy womans words conveyed.  You
 laughed, because you were ignorant, and I now excuse you; but some years
 hence, if I were to see you in company, with such a propensity, I should
 still think you a child, an overgrown one, whose mind did not expand as
 the body grew.
 
 The sky began to thicken, and the lowing of the cattle to have a
 melancholy cadence; the nightingale forgot her song, and fled to her
 nest; and the sea roared and lashed the rocks.  During the calm which
 portended an approaching storm, every creature was running for
 shelter.We must, if possible, said Mrs. Mason, reach yon cottage on the
 cliff, for we shall soon have a violent thunder-storm.  They quickened
 their pace, but the hurricane overtook them.  The hail-stones fell, the
 clouds seemed to open and disclose the lightning, while loud peals of
 thunder shook the ground; the wind also in violent gusts rushed among the
 trees, tore off the slender branches and loosened the roots.
 
 The children were terrified; but Mrs. Mason gave them each a hand, and
 chatted with them to dispel their fears.  She informed them that storms
 were necessary to dissipate noxious vapours, and to answer many other
 purposes, which were not, perhaps, obvious to our weak understandings.
 But are you not afraid? cried the trembling Caroline.  No, certainly, I
 am not afraid.I walk with the same security as when the sun enlivened
 the prospectGod is still present, and we are safe.  Should the flash
 that passes by us, strike me dead, it cannot hurt me, I fear not death!I
 only fear that Being who can render death terrible, on whose providence I
 calmly rest; and my confidence earthly sorrows cannot destroy.  A mind is
 never truly great, till the love of virtue overcomes the fear of death.
 
 By this time they had mounted the cliff, and saw the tumultuous deep.
 The angry billows rose, and dashed against the shore; and the loud noise
 of the raging sea resounded from rock to rock.
 
 They ran into the cottage; the poor woman who lived in it, sent her
 children for wood, and soon made a good fire to dry them.
 
 The father of the family soon after came in, leaning on crutches; and
 over one eye there was a large patch.  I am glad to see you honest Jack,
 said Mrs. Mason, come and take your seat by the fire, and tell the
 children the story of your shipwreck.
 
 He instantly complied.  I was very young, my dear ladies, said Jack, when
 I went to sea, and endured many hardships,however I made a shift to
 weather them all; and whether the wind was fair or foul, I ran up the
 shrouds and sung at the helm.  I had always a good heart, no lad fore or
 aft had a better; when we were at sea, I never was the first to flinch;
 and on shore I was as merry as the best of them.  I married she you see
 yonder, (lifting his crutch to point to his wife) and her work and my
 wages did together, till I was shipwrecked on these rocks.  Oh! it was a
 dreadful night; this is nothing to it; but I am getting to the end of my
 story before I begin it.
 
 During the war, I went once or twice to New York.  The last was a good
 voyage, and we were all returning with joy to dear England, when the
 storm rose; the vessel was like a bird, it flew up and down, and several
 of our best hands were washed clean overboardMy poor captain! a better
 never plowed the ocean, he fell overboard too, and it was some time
 before we missed him; for it was quite dark, except that flashes of
 lightning, now and then, gave us light.  I was at the helm, lashing it to
 the side of the shipa dreadful flash came across me, and I lost one of
 my precious eyes.But thank God I have one left.
 
 The weather cleared up next day, and, though we had been finely mauled, I
 began to hope, for I hate to be faint-hearted, and certainly we should
 have got into the channel very soon, if we had not fell in with a French
 man of war, which took us; for we could not make any resistance.
 
 I had a dog, poor Pompey! with me.  Pompey would not leave me, he was as
 fond of me as if he had been a christian.  I had lost one eye by the
 lightning, the other had been sore, so that I could hardly call it a
 peep-hole.  Somehow I fell down the hatchway, and bruised one of my legs;
 but I did not mind it, do ye see, till we arrived at Brest and were
 thrown into a French Prison.
 
 There I was worse off than ever; the room we were all stowed in, was full
 of vermin, and our food very bad; mouldy biscuits, and salt fish.  The
 prison was choke full, and many a morning did we find some honest fellow
 with his chops fallenhe was not to be waked any more!he was gone to the
 other country, do ye see.
 
 Yet the French have not such hard hearts as people say they have!
 Several women brought us broth, and wine; and one gave me some rags to
 wrap round my leg, it was very painful, I could not clean it, nor had I
 any plaister.  One day I was looking sorrowfully at it, thinking for
 certain I should lose my precious limb; when, would you believe it?
 Pompey saw what I was thinking about, and began to lick it.And, I never
 knew such a surprizing thing, it grew better and better every day, and at
 last was healed without any plaister.
 
                    [Picture: Indeed we are very happy!]
 
 After that I was very sick, and the same tender-hearted creature who gave
 me the rags, took me to her house; and fresh air soon recovered me.  I
 for certain ought to speak well of the French; but for their kindness I
 should have been in another port by this time.  Mayhap I might have gone
 with a fair wind, yet I should have been sorry to have left my poor wife
 and her children.  But I am letting all my line run out!  Well,
 by-and-by, there was an exchange of prisoners, and we were once more in
 an English vessel, and I made sure of seeing my family again; but the
 weather was still foul.  Three days and nights we were in the greatest
 distress; and the fourth the ship was dashed against these rocks.  Oh! if
 you had heard the crash!  The water rushed inthe men screamed, Lord have
 mercy on us!  There was a woman in the ship, and, as I could swim, I
 tried to save her, and Pompey followed me; but I lost himpoor fellow!  I
 declare I cried like a child when I saw his dead body.  However I brought
 the woman to shore; and assisted some more of my mess-mates; but,
 standing in the water so long, I lost the use of my limbsyet Heaven was
 good to me; Madam, there, sent a cart for us all, and took care of us;
 but I never recovered the use of my limbs.  So she asked me all about my
 misfortunes, and sent for wife, who came directly, and we have lived here
 ever since.  We catch fish for Madam, and watch for a storm, hoping some
 time or other to be as kind to a poor perishing soul as she has been to
 me.  Indeed we are very happyI might now have been begging about the
 streets, but for Madam, God bless her.
 
 A tear strayed down Mrs. Masons cheek, while a smile of benevolence
 lighted up her countenancethe little girls caught each handThey were
 all silent a few minutes when she, willing to turn the discourse,
 enquired whether they had any fish in the house?  Some were produced,
 they were quickly dressed, and they all eat together.  They had a
 chearful meal, and honest Jack sung some of his seafaring songs, and did
 all he could to divert them and express his gratitude.  Getting up to
 reach the brown loaf, he limped very awkwardly, Mary was just beginning
 to laugh, when she restrained herself; for she recollected that his
 awkwardness made him truly respectable, because he had lost the use of
 his limbs when he was doing good, saving the lives of his
 fellow-creatures.
 
 The weather cleared up, and they returned home.  The children conversed
 gaily with each other all the way home, talking of the poor sailor, and
 his faithful dog.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX
 
 
 The Inconveniences of immoderate Indulgence.
 
 The children were allowed to help themselves to fruit, when it made a
 part of their meal; and Caroline always took care to pick out the best,
 or swallow what she took in a hurry, lest she should not get as much as
 she wished for.  Indeed she generally eat more than her share.  She had
 several times eaten more than a person ought to eat at one time, without
 feeling any ill effects; but one afternoon she complained of a pain in
 her stomach in consequence of it, and her pale face, and languid eyes,
 plainly shewed her indisposition.  Mrs. Mason gave her an emetic, and
 after the operation she was obliged to go to bed, though she had promised
 herself a pleasant walk that evening.  She was left alone, for Mary was
 not permitted to stay at home with her, as she offered to do.  Had her
 sickness been accidental, we would both have tried to amuse her, said
 Mrs. Mason; but her greediness now receiving its natural and just
 punishment, she must endure it without the alleviation which pity
 affords; only tell her from me, that the pleasure was but momentary,
 while the pain and confinement it produced, has already lasted some
 hours.
 
 The next morning, though scarcely recovered, she got up, as usual, to
 have a walk before breakfast.  During these walks, Mrs. Mason told them
 stories, pointed out the wisdom of God in the creation, and took them to
 visit her poor tenants.  These visits not only enabled her to form a
 judgment of their wants, but made them very industrious; for they were
 all anxious that she might find their houses and persons clean.  And
 returning through the farmyard, Mrs. Mason stopped according to custom,
 to see whether the poor animals were taken care ofthis she called
 earning her breakfast.  The servant was just feeding the pigs, and though
 she poured a great quantity into the trough, the greedy creatures tried
 to gobble it up from one another.  Caroline blushed, she saw this sight
 was meant for her, and she felt ashamed of her gluttony.  But Mrs. Mason,
 willing to impress her still more strongly, thus addressed her.
 
 Providence, my child, has given us passions and appetites for various
 purposestwo are generally obvious, I will point them out to you.  First
 to render our present life more comfortable, and then to prepare us for
 another, by making us sociable beings; as in society virtue is acquired,
 and self-denial practised.  A moderate quantity of proper food recruits
 our exhausted spirits, and invigorates the animal functions; but, if we
 exceed moderation, the mind will be oppressed, and soon become the slave
 of the body, or both grow listless and inactive.  Employed various ways,
 families meet at meals, and there giving up to each other, learn in the
 most easy, pleasant way to govern their appetites.  Pigs, you see, devour
 what they can get; but men, if they have any affections, love their
 fellow-creatures, and wish for a return; nor will they, for the sake of a
 brutish gratification, lose the esteem of those they value.  Besides, no
 one can be reckoned virtuous who has not learned to bear poverty: yet
 those who think much of gratifying their appetites, will at last act
 meanly in order to indulge them.  But when any employment of the
 understanding, or strong affection occupies the mind, eating is seldom
 thought a matter of greater importance than it ought to be.  Let the idle
 _think_ of their meals; but do you employ the intermediate time in a
 different manner, and only enjoy them when you join the social circle.  I
 like to see children, and even men, eat chearfully, and gratefully
 receive the blessings sent by Heaven; yet I would not have them abuse
 those blessings, or ever let the care necessary to support the body,
 injure the immortal spirit: many think of the sustenance the former
 craves, and entirely neglect the latter.
 
 I remarked to you before, that in the most apparently trivial concerns,
 we are to do as we would be done by.  This duty must be practised
 constantly; at meals there are frequent opportunities, and I hope,
 Caroline, I shall never again see you eager to secure dainties for
 yourself.  If such a disposition were to grow up with you, you ought to
 live alone, for no one should enjoy the advantages and pleasures which
 arise from social intercourse, who is unwilling to give way to the
 inclinations of others, and allow each their share of the good things of
 this life.
 
 You experienced yesterday, that pain follows immoderate indulgence; it is
 always the case, though sometimes not felt so immediately; but the
 constitution is insensibly destroyed, and old age will come on, loaded
 with infirmities.  You also lost a very pleasant walk, and some fine
 fruit.  We visited Mrs. Goodwins garden, and as Mary had before
 convinced me that she could regulate her appetites, I gave her leave to
 pluck as much fruit as she wished; and she did not abuse my indulgence.
 On the contrary, she spent most part of the time in gathering some for
 me, and her attention made it taste sweeter.
 
 Coming home I called her my friend, and she deserved the name, for she
 was no longer a child; a reasonable affection had conquered an appetite;
 her understanding took the lead, and she had practised a virtue.
 
 The subject was now dropped; but, Caroline determined to copy in future
 her sisters temperance and self-denial.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 
 The Danger of Delay.Description of a Mansion-house in Ruins.The History
 of Charles Townley.
 
 Mrs. Mason who always regulated her own time, and never loitered her
 hours irresolutely away, had very frequently to wait for the children,
 when she wished to walk, though she had desired them to be ready at a
 precise time.  Mary in particular had a trick of putting everything off
 till the last moment, and then she did but half do it, or left it undone.
 This indolent way of delaying made her miss many opportunities of
 obliging and doing good; and whole hours were lost in thoughtless
 idleness, which she afterwards wished had been better employed.
 
 This was the case one day, when she had a letter to write to her father;
 and though it was mentioned to her early in the morning, the finest part
 of the evening slipped away whilst she was finishing it; and her haste
 made her forget the principal thing which she intended to have said.
 
 Out of breath she joined them; and after they had crossed several fields,
 Mrs. Mason turning down a long avenue, bade them look at a large old
 mansion-house.  It was now in ruins.  Ivy grew over the substantial
 walls, that still resisted the depredations of time, and almost concealed
 a noble arch, on which maimed lions couched; and vultures and eagles, who
 had lost their wings, seemed to rest for ever there.  Near it was a
 rookery, and the rooks lived safe in the high trees, whose trunks were
 all covered with ivy or moss, and a number of fungusses grew about their
 large roots.  The grass was long, and remaining undisturbed, save when
 the wind swept across it, was of course pathless.  Here the mower never
 whet his scythe, nor did the haymakers mix their songs with the hoarse
 croaking of the rooks.  A spacious basin, on the margin of which water
 plants grew with wild luxuriance, was overspread with slime; and afforded
 a shelter for toads and adders.  In many places were heaped the ruins of
 ornamental buildings, whilst sun-dials rested in the shade;and pedestals
 that had crushed the figures they before supported.  Making their way
 through the grass, they would frequently stumble over a headless statue,
 or the head would impede their progress.  When they spoke, the sound
 seemed to return again, as if unable to penetrate the thick stagnated
 air.  The sun could not dart its purifying rays through the thick gloom,
 and the fallen leaves contributed to choke up the way, and render the air
 more noxious.
 
 I brought you to this place on purpose this evening, said Mrs. Mason to
 the children, who clung about her, to tell you the history of the last
 inhabitant; but, as this part is unwholesome, we will sit on the broken
 stones of the drawbridge.
 
 Charles Townley was a boy of uncommon abilities, and strong feelings; but
 he ever permitted those feelings to direct his conduct, without
 submitting to the direction of reason; I mean, the present emotion
 governed him.He had not any strength or consistency of character; one
 moment he enjoyed a pleasure, and the next felt the pangs of remorse, on
 account of some duty which he had neglected.  He always indeed intended
 to act right in every particular _to-morrow_; but _to-day_ he followed
 the prevailing whim.
 
 He heard by chance of a man in great distress, he determined to relieve
 him, and left his house in order to follow the humane impulse; but
 meeting an acquaintance, he was persuaded to go to the play, and
 _to-morrow_, he thought, he would do the act of charity.  The next
 morning some company came to breakfast with him, and took him with them
 to view some fine pictures.  In the evening he went to a concert; the day
 following he was tired, and laid in bed till noon; then read a pathetic
 story, well wrought up, _wept_ over itfell asleepand forgot to _act_
 humanely.  An accident reminded him of his intention, he sent to the man,
 and found that he had too long delayedthe relief was useless.
 
 In this thoughtless manner he spent his time and fortune; never applying
 to any profession, though formed to shine in any one he should have
 chosen.  His friends were offended, and at last allowed him to languish
 in a gaol; and as there appeared no probability of reforming or fixing
 him, they left him to struggle with adversity.
 
 Severely did he reproach himselfHe was almost lost in despair, when a
 friend visited him.  This friend loved the latent sparks of virtue which
 he imagined would some time or other light up, and animate his conduct.
 He paid his debts, and gave him a sum of money sufficient to enable him
 to prepare for a voyage to the East Indies, where Charles wished to go,
 to try to regain his lost fortune.  Through the intercession of this
 kind, considerate friend, his relations were reconciled to him, and his
 spirits raised.
 
 He sailed with a fair wind, and fortune favouring his most romantic
 wishes, in the space of fifteen years, he acquired a much larger fortune
 than he had even hoped for, and thought of visiting, nay, settling in his
 native country for the remainder of his life.
 
 Though impressed by the most lively sense of gratitude, he had dropped
 his friends correspondence; yet, as he knew that he had a daughter, his
 first determination was to reserve for her the greater part of his
 property, as the most substantial proof which he could give of his
 gratitude.The thought pleased him, and that was sufficient to divert him
 for some months; but accidentally hearing that his friend had been very
 unsuccessful in trade, this information made him wish to hasten his
 return to his native country.  Still a procrastinating spirit possessed
 him, and he delayed from time to time the arduous task of settling his
 affairs, previous to his departure: he wrote, however, to England, and
 transmitted a considerable sum to a correspondent, desiring that this
 house might be prepared for him, and the mortgage cleared.
 
 I can scarcely enumerate the various delays that prevented his embarking;
 and when he arrived in England, he came here, and was so childishly eager
 to have his house fitted up with taste, that he actually trifled away a
 month, before he went to seek for his friend.
 
 But his negligence was now severely punished.  He learned that he had
 been reduced to great distress, and thrown into the very gaol, out of
 which he took Townley, who, hastening to it, only found his dead body
 there; for he died the day before.  On the table was lying, amidst some
 other scraps of paper, a letter, directed in an unsteady hand to Charles
 Townley.  He tore it open.  Few were the scarcely legible lines; but they
 smote his heart.  He read as follows:
 
 I have been reduced by unforeseen misfortunes; yet when I heard of your
 arrival, a gleam of joy cheered my heart_I thought I knew yours_, and
 that my latter days might still have been made comfortable in your
 society, for I loved you; I even expected pleasure; but I was mistaken;
 death is my only friend.
 
 He read it over and over again; and cried out, Gracious God, had I
 arrived but one day sooner I should have seen him, and he would not have
 died thinking me the most ungrateful wretch that ever burdened the earth!
 He then knocked his clinched fist against his forehead, looked wildly
 round the dreary apartment, and exclaimed in a choked, though impatient
 tone, You sat here yesterday, thinking of my ingratitudeWhere are you
 now!  Oh! that I had seen you!  Oh! that my repenting sighs could reach
 you!
 
 He ordered the body to be interred, and returned home a prey to grief and
 despondency.  Indulging it to excess, he neglected to enquire after his
 friends daughter; he intended to provide amply for her, but now he could
 only grieve.
 
 Some time elapsed, then he sent, and the intelligence which he procured
 aggravated his distress, and gave it a severe additional sting.
 
 The poor gentle girl had, during her fathers life, been engaged to a
 worthy young man; but, some time after his death, the relations of her
 lover had sent him to sea to prevent the match taking place.  She was
 helpless, and had not sufficient courage to combat with poverty; to
 escape from it, she married an old rake whom she detested.  He was
 ill-humoured, and his vicious habits rendered him a most dreadful
 companion.  She tried in vain to please him, and banish the sorrow that
 bent her down, and made wealth and all the pleasures it could procure
 tasteless.  Her tender father was deadshe had lost her loverwithout a
 friend or confident, silent grief consumed her.  I have told you
 friendship is only to be found amongst the virtuous; her husband was
 vicious.
 
 Ah! why did she marry, said Mary?
 
 Because she was timid; but I have not told you all; the grief that did
 not break her heart, disturbed her reason; and her husband confined her
 in a madhouse.
 
 Charles heard of this last circumstance; he visited her.  Fanny, said he,
 do you recollect your old friend?  Fanny looked at him, and reason for a
 moment resumed her seat, and informed her countenance to trace anguish on
 itthe trembling light soon disappearedwild fancy flushed in her eyes,
 and animated her incessant rant.  She sung several verses of different
 songs, talked of her husbands ill-usageenquired if he had lately been
 to sea?  And frequently addressed her father as if he were behind her
 chair, or sitting by her.
 
 Charles could not bear this sceneIf I could lose like her a sense of
 woe, he cried, this intolerable anguish would not tear my heart!  The
 fortune which he had intended for her could not restore her reason; but,
 had he sent for her soon after her fathers death, he might have saved
 her and comforted himself.
 
 The last stroke was worse than the first; he retired to this abode;
 melancholy creeping on him, he let his beard grow, and the garden run
 wild.  One room in the house the poor lunatic inhabited; and he had a
 proper person to attend her, and guard her from the dangers she wished to
 encounter.  Every day he visited her, the sight of her would almost have
 unhinged a sound mindHow could he bear it, when his conscience
 reproached him, and whispered that he had neglected to do good, to live
 to any rational purposeThe sweets of friendship were denied, and he
 every day contemplated the saddest of all sightsthe wreck of a human
 understanding.
 
 He died without a will.  The estate was litigated, and as the title to
 this part could not be proved, the house was let fall into its present
 state.
 
                        [Picture: Be calm, my child]
 
 But the night will overtake us, we must make haste homeGive me your
 hand, Mary, you tremble; surely I need not desire you to remember this
 storyBe calm, my child, and remember that you must attend to trifles; do
 all the good you can the present day, nay hour, if you would keep your
 conscience clear.  This circumspection may not produce dazzling actions,
 nor will your silent virtue be supported by human applause; but your
 Father, who seeth in secret, will reward you.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI
 
 
 Dress.A Character.Remarks on Mrs. Truemans Manner of
 dressing.Trifling Omissions undermine Affection.
 
 Marys procrastinating temper produced many other ill consequences; she
 would lie in bed till the last moment, and then appear without washing
 her face or cleaning her teeth.  Mrs. Mason had often observed it, and
 hinted her dislike; but, unwilling to burden her with precepts, she
 waited for a glaring example.  One was soon accidentally thrown in her
 way, and she determined that it should not pass unobserved.
 
 A lady, who was remarkable for her negligence in this respect, spent a
 week with them; and, during that time, very frequently disconcerted the
 economy of the family.  She was seldom fit to be seen, and if any company
 came by chance to dinner, she would make them wait till it was quite
 cold, whilst she huddled on some ill-chosen finery.  In the same style,
 if a little party of pleasure was proposed, she had to dress herself, and
 the hurry discomposed her, and tired those, who did not like to lose time
 in anticipating a trifling amusement.
 
 A few hours after she had left them, Mrs. Mason enquired of Mary, what
 effect this weeks experience had had on her mind?  You are fond of
 ridicule, child, but seldom in the right place; real cause for it you let
 slip, and heed not the silent reproof that points at your own faults: do
 not mistake me, I would not have you laugh atyet I wish you to feel,
 what is ridiculous, and learn to distinguish folly.  Mrs. Dowdys
 negligence arises from indolence; her mind is not employed about matters
 of importance; and, if it were, it would not be a sufficient excuse for
 her habitually neglecting an essential part of a mans as well as a
 womans duty.  I said habitually; grief will often make those careless,
 who, at other times, pay a proper attention to their person; and this
 neglect is a sure indication that the canker-worm is at work; and we
 ought to pity, rather than blame the unfortunate.  Indeed when painful
 activity of mind occasions this inattention, it will not last long; the
 soul struggles to free itself, and return to its usual tone and old
 habits.  The lady we have been speaking of, ever appears a sloven, though
 she is sometimes a disgusting figure, and, at others, a very taudry
 flirt.
 
 I continually caution Caroline not to spend much time in adorning her
 person; but I never desired you to neglect yours.  Wisdom consists in
 avoiding extremesimmoderate fondness for dress, I term vanity; but a
 proper attention to avoid singularity does not deserve that name.  Never
 waste much time about trifles; but the time that is necessary, employ
 properly.  Exercise your understanding, taste flows from it, and will in
 a moment direct you, if you are not too solicitous to conform to the
 changing fashions; and loiter away in laborious idleness the precious
 moments when the imagination is most lively, and should be allowed to fix
 virtuous affections in the tender youthful heart.
 
 Of all the women whom I have ever met with, Mrs. Trueman seems the freest
 from vanity, and those frivolous views which degrade the female
 character.  Her virtues claim respect, and the practice of them engrosses
 her thoughts; yet her clothes are apparently well chosen, and you always
 see her in the same attire.  Not like many women who are eager to set off
 their persons to the best advantage, when they are only going to take a
 walk, and are careless, nay slovenly, when forced to stay at home.  Mrs.
 Truemans conduct is just the reverse, she tries to avoid singularity,
 for she does not wish to disgust the generality; but it is her family,
 her friends, whom she studies to please.
 
 In dress it is not little minute things, but the whole that should be
 attended to, and that every day; and this attention gives an ease to the
 person because the clothes appear unstudily graceful.  Never, continued
 Mrs. Mason, desire to excel in trifles, if you dothere is an end to
 virtuous emulation, the mind cannot attend to both; for when the main
 pursuit is trivial, the character will of course become insignificant.
 Habitual neatness is laudable; but, if you wish to be reckoned a well, an
 elegantly dressed girl; and feel that praise on account of it gives you
 pleasure, you are vain; and a laudable ambition cannot dwell with vanity.
 
 Servants, and those women whose minds have had a very limited range,
 place all their happiness in ornaments, and frequently neglect the only
 essential part in dress,neatness.
 
 I have not the least objection to your dressing according to your age; I
 rather encourage it, by allowing you to wear the gayest colours; yet I
 insist on some degree of uniformity: and think you treat me
 disrespectfully when you appear before me, and have forgotten to do, what
 should never be neglected, and what you could have done in less than a
 quarter of an hour.
 
 I always dress myself before breakfast, and expect you to follow my
 example, if there is not a sufficient, and obvious excuse.  You, Mary,
 missed a pleasant airing yesterday; for if you had not forgotten the
 respect which is due to me, and hurried down to breakfast in a slovenly
 manner, I should have taken you out with me; but I did not choose to wait
 till you were ready, as your not being so was entirely your own fault.
 
 Fathers, and men in general, complain of this inattention; they have
 always to wait for females.  Learn to avoid this fault, however
 insignificant it may appear in your eyes, for that habit cannot be of
 little consequence that sometimes weakens esteem.  When we frequently
 make allowance for another in trifling matters, notions of inferiority
 take root in the mind, and too often produce contempt.  Respect for the
 understanding must be the basis of constancy; the tenderness which flows
 from pity is liable to perish insensibly, to consume itselfeven the
 virtues of the heart, when they degenerate into weakness, sink a
 character in our estimation.  Besides, a kind of gross familiarity, takes
 place of decent affection; and the respect which alone can render
 domestic intimacy a lasting comfort is lost before we are aware of it.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 Behaviour to Servants.True Dignity of Character.
 
 The children not coming down to breakfast one morning at the usual time,
 Mrs. Mason went herself to enquire the reason; and as she entered the
 apartment, heard Mary say to the maid who assisted her, I wonder at your
 impertinence, to talk thus to medo you know who you are speaking to?she
 was going on; but Mrs. Mason interrupted her, and answered the
 questionto a little girl, who is only assisted because she is weak.
 Mary shrunk back abashed, and Mrs. Mason continued, as you have treated
 Betty, who is ten years older than yourself, improperly, you must now do
 every thing for yourself; and, as you will be some time about it,
 Caroline and I will eat our breakfast, and visit Mrs. Trueman.  By the
 time we return, you may perhaps have recollected that children are
 inferior to servantswho act from the dictates of reason, and whose
 understandings are arrived at some degree of maturity, while children
 must be governed and directed till _theirs_ gains strength to work by
 itself: for it is the proper exercise of our reason that makes us in any
 degree independent.
 
 When Mrs. Mason returned, she mildly addressed Mary.  I have often told
 you that every dispensation of Providence tended to our improvement, if
 we do not perversely act contrary to our interest.  One being is made
 dependent on another, that love and forbearance may soften the human
 heart, and that linked together by necessity, and the exercise of the
 social affections, the whole family on earth might have a fellow feeling
 for each other.  By these means we improve one another; but there is no
 real inferiority.
 
 You have read the fable of the head supposing itself superior to the rest
 of the members, though all are equally necessary to the support of life.
 If I behave improperly to servants, I am really their inferior, as I
 abuse a trust, and imitate not the Being, whose servant I am, without a
 shadow of equality.  Children are helpless.  I order my servants to wait
 on you, because you are so; but I have not as much respect for you as for
 them; you may possibly become a virtuous character.Many of my servants
 are really so already; they have done their duty, filled an humble
 station, as they ought to fill it, conscientiously.  And do you dare to
 despise those whom your Creator approves?
 
 Before the greatest earthly beings I should not be awed, they are my
 fellow servants; and, though superior in rank, which, like personal
 beauty, only dazzles the vulgar; yet I may possess more knowledge and
 virtue.  The same feeling actuates me when I am in company with the poor;
 we are creatures of the same nature, and I may be their inferiour in
 those graces which should adorn my soul, and render me truly great.
 
 How often must I repeat to you, that a child is inferiour to a man;
 because reason is in its infancy, and it is reason which exalts a man
 above a brute; and the cultivation of it raises the wise man above the
 ignorant; for wisdom is only another name for virtue.
 
 This morning, when I entered your apartment, I heard you insult a worthy
 servant.  You had just said your prayers; but they must have been only
 the gabble of the tongue; your heart was not engaged in the sacred
 employment, or you could not so soon have forgotten that you were a weak,
 dependent being, and that you were to receive mercy and kindness only on
 the condition of your practising the same.
 
 I advise you to ask Betty to pardon your impertinence; till you do so,
 she shall not assist you; you would find yourself very helpless without
 the assistance of men and womenunable to cook your meat, bake your
 bread, wash your clothes, or even put them onsuch a helpless creature is
 a childI know what you are, you perceive.
 
 Mary submittedand in future after she said her prayers, remembered that
 she was to endeavour to curb her temper.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII
 
 
 Employment.Idleness produces Misery.The Cultivation of the Fancy raises
 us above the Vulgar, extends our Happiness, and leads to Virtue.
 
 One afternoon, Mrs. Mason gave the children leave to amuse themselves;
 but a kind of listlessness hung over them, and at a loss what to do, they
 seemed fatigued with doing nothing.  They eat cakes though they had just
 dined, and did many foolish things merely because they were idle.  Their
 friend seeing that they were irresolute, and could not fix on any
 employment, requested Caroline to assist her to make some clothes, that a
 poor woman was in want of, and while we are at work, she added, Mary will
 read us an entertaining tale, which I will point out.
 
 The tale interested the children, who chearfully attended, and after it
 was finished, Mrs. Mason told them, that as she had some letters to
 write, she could not take her accustomed walk; but that she would allow
 them to represent her, and act for once like women.  They received their
 commission, it was to take the clothes to the poor woman, whom they were
 intended for; learn her present wants; exercise their own judgment with
 respect to the immediate relief she stood in need of, and act
 accordingly.
 
 They returned home delighted, eager to tell what they had done, and how
 thankful, and happy they had left the poor woman.
 
 Observe now, said Mrs. Mason, the advantages arising from employment;
 three hours ago, you were uncomfortable, without being sensible of the
 cause, and knew not what to do with yourselves.  Nay, you actually
 committed a sin; for you devoured cakes without feeling hunger, merely to
 kill time, whilst many poor people have not the means of satisfying their
 natural wants.  When I desired you to read to me you were amused; and now
 you have been useful you are delighted.  Recollect this in future when
 you are at a loss what to do with yourselvesand remember that idleness
 must always be intolerable, because it is only an irksome consciousness
 of existence.
 
 Every gift of Heaven is lent to us for our improvement; fancy is one of
 the first of the inferiour ones; in cultivating it, we acquire what is
 called taste, or a relish for particular employments, which occupy our
 leisure hours, and raise us above the vulgar in our conversation.  Those
 who have not any taste talk always of their own affairs or of their
 neighbours; every trivial matter that occurs within their knowledge they
 convass and conjecture aboutnot so much out of ill-nature as idleness:
 just as you eat the cakes without the impulse of hunger.  In the same
 style people talk of eating and dress, and long for their meals merely to
 divide the day, because the intermediate time is not employed in a more
 interesting manner.  Every new branch of taste that we cultivate, affords
 us a refuge from idleness, a fortress in which we may resist the assaults
 of vice; and the more noble our employments, the more exalted will our
 minds become.
 
 Music, drawing, works of usefulness and fancy, all amuse and refine the
 mind, sharpen the ingenuity; and form, insensibly, the dawning
 judgment.As the judgment gains strength, so do the passions also; we
 have actions to weigh, and need that taste in conduct, that delicate
 sense of propriety, which gives grace to virtue.  The highest branch of
 solitary amusement is reading; but even in the choice of books the fancy
 is first employed; for in reading, the heart is touched, till its
 feelings are examined by the understanding, and the ripenings of reason
 regulate the imagination.  This is the work of years, and the most
 important of all employments.  When life advances, if the heart has been
 capable of receiving early impressions, and the head of reasoning and
 retaining the conclusions which were drawn from them; we have acquired a
 stock of knowledge, a gold mine which we can occasionally recur to,
 independent of outward circumstances.
 
 The supreme Being has every thing in Himself; we proceed from Him, and
 our knowledge and affections must return to Him for employment suited to
 them.  And those who most resemble Him ought, next to Him, to be the
 objects of our love; and the beings whom we should try to associate with,
 that we may receive an inferiour degree of satisfaction from their
 society.But be assured our chief comfort must ever arise from the minds
 reviewing its own operationsand the whispers of an approving conscience,
 to convince us that life has not slipped away unemployed.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV
 
 
 Innocent Amusements.Description of a Welsh Castle.History of a Welsh
 Harper.A tyrannical Landlord.Family Pride.
 
 As it was now harvest time, the new scene, and the fine weather delighted
 the children, who ran continually out to view the reapers.  Indeed every
 thing seemed to wear a face of festivity, and the ripe corn bent under
 its own weight, or, more erect, shewed the laughing appearance of plenty.
 
 Mrs. Mason always allowing the gleaners to have a sufficient quantity, a
 great number of poor came to gather a little harvest; and she was pleased
 to see the feeble hands of childhood and age, collecting the scattered
 ears.
 
 Honest Jack came with his family; and when the labours of the day were
 over, would play on a fiddle, that frequently had but three strings.  But
 it served to set the feet in motion, and the lads and lasses dancing on
 the green sod, suffered every care to sleep.
 
 An old Welsh harper generally came to the house about this time of the
 year, and staid a month or more; for Mrs. Mason was particularly fond of
 this instrument, and interested in the fate of the player; as is almost
 always the case, when we have rescued a person out of any distress.
 
 She informed the children, that once travelling through Wales, her
 carriage was overturned near the ruins of an old castle.  And as she had
 escaped unhurt, she determined to wander amongst them, whilst the driver
 took care of his horses, and her servant hastened to the neighbouring
 village for assistance.
 
                    [Picture: Trying to trace the sound]
 
 It was almost dark, and the lights began to twinkle in the scattered
 cottages.  The scene pleased me, continued Mrs. Mason, I thought of the
 various customs which the lapse of time unfolds; and dwelt on the state
 of the Welsh, when this castle, now so desolate, was the hospitable abode
 of the chief of a noble family.  These reflections entirely engrossed my
 mind, when the sound of a harp reached my ears.  Never was any thing more
 opportune, the national music seemed to give reality to the pictures
 which my imagination had been drawing.  I listened awhile, and then
 trying to trace the pleasing sound, discovered, after a short search, a
 little hut, rudely built.  The walls of an old tower supported part of
 the thatch, which scarcely kept out the rain, and the two other sides
 were stones cemented, or rather plaistered together, by mud and clay.
 
 I entered, and beheld an old man, sitting by a few loose sticks, which
 blazed on the hearth; and a young woman, with one child at her breast,
 sucking, and another on her knee: near them stood a cow and her calf.
 The man had been playing on the harp, he rose when he saw me, and offered
 his chair, the only one in the room, and sat down on a large chest in the
 chimney-corner.  When the door was shut, all the light that was admitted
 came through the hole, called a chimney, and did not much enliven the
 dwelling.  I mentioned my accident to account for my intrusion, and
 requested the harper again to touch the instrument that had attracted me.
 A partition of twigs and dried leaves divided this apartment from
 another, in which I perceived a light; I enquired about it, and the
 woman, in an artless manner, informed me, that she had let it to a young
 gentlewoman lately married, who was related to a very good family, and
 would not lodge any where, or with any body.  This intelligence made me
 smile, to think that family pride should be a solace in such extreme
 poverty.
 
 I sat there some time, and then the harper accompanied me to see whether
 the carriage was repaired; I found it waiting for me; and as the inn I
 was to sleep at was only about two miles further, the harper offered to
 come and play to me whilst I was eating my supper.  This was just what I
 wished for, his appearance had roused my compassion as well as my
 curiosity, and I took him and his harp in the chaise.  After supper he
 informed me, that he had once a very good farm; but he had been so
 unfortunate as to displease the justice, who never forgave him, nor
 rested till he had ruined him.  This tyrant always expected his tenants
 to assist him to bring in his harvest before they had got in their own.
 The poor harper was once in the midst of his, when an order was sent to
 him to bring his carts and servants, the next day, to the fields of this
 petty king.  He foolishly refused; and this refusal was the foundation of
 that settled hatred which produced such fatal consequences.  Ah, Madam,
 said the sufferer, your heart would ache, if you heard of all his
 cruelties to me, and the rest of his poor tenants.  He employs many
 labourers, and will not give them as much wages as they could get from
 the common farmers, yet they dare not go any-where else to work when he
 sends for them.  The fish that they catch they must bring first to him,
 or they would not be allowed to walk over his grounds to catch them; and
 he will give just what he pleases for the most valuable part of their
 pannier.
 
 But there would be no end to my story were I to tell you of all his
 oppressions.  I was obliged to leave my farm; and my daughter, whom you
 saw this evening, having married an industrious young man, I came to live
 with them.  When,would you believe it? this same man threw my son into
 jail, on account of his killing a hare, which all the country folks do
 when they can catch them in their grounds.  We were again in great
 distress, and my daughter and I built the hut you saw in the waste, that
 the poor babes might have a shelter.  I maintain them by playing on the
 harp,the master of this inn allows me to play to the gentry who travel
 this way; so that I pick up a few pence, just enough to keep life and
 soul together, and to enable me to send a little bread to my poor son
 John Thomas.
 
 He then began one of the most dismal of his Welsh ditties, and, in the
 midst of it cried out, he is an upstart, a mere mushroom!His grandfather
 was cow-boy to mine!So I told him once, and he never forgot it.
 
 The old man then informed me that the castle in which he now was
 sheltered formerly belonged to his familysuch are the changes and
 chances of this mortal lifesaid he, and hastily struck up a lively
 tune.
 
 While he was striking the strings, I thought too of the changes in life
 which an age had produced.  The descendant of those who had made the hall
 ring with social mirth now mourned in its ruins, and hung his harp on the
 mouldering battlements.  Such is the fate of buildings and of families!
 
 After I had dismissed my guest, I sent for the landlord, to make some
 further enquiries; and found that I had not been deceived; I then
 determined to assist him, and thought my accident providential.  I knew a
 man of consequence in the neighbourhood, I visited him, and exerted
 myself to procure the enlargement of the young man.  I succeeded; and not
 only restored him to his family; but prevailed on my friend to let him
 rent a small farm on his estate, and I gave him money to buy stock for
 it, and the implements of husbandry.
 
 The old harpers gratitude was unbounded; the summer after he walked to
 visit me; and ever since he has contrived to come every year to enliven
 our harvest-home.This evening it is to be celebrated.
 
 The evening came; the joyous party footed it away merrily, and the sound
 of their shoes was heard on the barn-floor.  It was not the light
 fantastic toe, that fashion taught to move, but honest heart-felt mirth,
 and the loud laugh, if it spoke the vacant head, said audibly that the
 heart was guileless.
 
 Mrs. Mason always gave them some trifling presents at this time, to
 render the approach of winter more comfortable.  To the men, she
 generally presented warm clothing, and to the women flax and worsted for
 knitting and spinning; and those who were the most industrious received a
 reward when the new year commenced.  The children had books given to
 them, and little ornaments.All were anxious for the day; and received
 their old acquaintance, the harper, with the most cordial smiles.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV
 
 
 Prayer.A Moon-light Scene.Resignation.
 
 The harper would frequently sit under a large elm, a few paces from the
 house, and play some of the most plaintive Welsh tunes.  While the people
 were eating their supper, Mrs. Mason desired him to play her some
 favourite airs; and she and the children walked round the tree under
 which he sat, on the stump of another.
 
 The moon rose in cloudless majesty, and a number of stars twinkled near
 her.  The softened landscape inspired tranquillity, while the strain of
 rustic melody gave a pleasing melancholy to the wholeand made the tear
 start, whose source could scarcely be traced.  The pleasure the sight of
 harmless mirth gave rise to in Mrs. Masons bosom, roused every tender
 feelingset in motion her spirits.She laughed with the poor whom she had
 made happy, and wept when she recollected her own sorrows; the illusions
 of youththe gay expectations that had formerly clipped the wings of
 time.She turned to the girlsI have been very unfortunate, my young
 friends; but my griefs are now of a placid kind.  Heavy misfortunes have
 obscured the sun I gazed at when first I entered lifeearly attachments
 have been brokenthe death of friends I loved has so clouded my days;
 that neither the beams of prosperity, nor even those of benevolence, can
 dissipate the gloom; but I am not lost in a thick fog.My state of mind
 rather resembles the scene before you, it is quietI am weaned from the
 world, but not disgustedfor I can still do goodand in futurity a sun
 will rise to cheer my heart.Beyond the night of death, I hail the dawn
 of an eternal day!  I mention my state of mind to you, that I may tell
 you what supports me.
 
 The festivity within, and the placidity without, led my thoughts
 naturally to the source from whence my comfort springsto the Great
 Bestower of every blessing.  Prayer, my children, is the dearest
 privilege of man, and the support of a feeling heart.  Mine has too often
 been wounded by ingratitude; my fellow-creatures, whom I have fondly
 loved, have neglected meI have heard their last sigh, and thrown my eyes
 round an empty world; but then more particularly feeling the presence of
 my Creator, I poured out my soul before Himand was no longer alone!I
 now daily contemplate His wonderful goodness; and, though at an awful
 distance, try to imitate Him.  This view of things is a spur to activity,
 and a consolation in disappointment.
 
 There is in fact a constant intercourse kept up with the Creator, when we
 learn to consider Him, as the fountain of truth, which our understanding
 naturally thirsts after.  But His goodness brings Him still more on a
 level with our bounded capacitiesfor we trace it in every work of mercy,
 and feel, in sorrow particularly, His fatherly care.  Every blessing is
 doubled when we suppose it comes from Him, and afflictions almost lose
 their name when we believe they are sent to correct, not crush us.Whilst
 we are alive to gratitude and admiration, we must adore God.
 
 The human soul is so framed, that goodness and truth must fill it with
 ineffable pleasure, and the nearer it approaches to perfection, the more
 earnestly will it pursue those virtues, discerning more clearly their
 beauty.
 
 The Supreme Being dwells in the universe.  He is as essentially present
 to the wicked as to the good; but the latter delight in His presence, and
 try to please Him, whilst the former shrink from a Judge, who is of too
 pure a nature to behold iniquity.The wicked wish for the rocks to cover
 them, mountains, or the angry sea, which we the other day surveyed, to
 hide them from the presence of that Beingin whose presence only they
 could find joy.  You feel emotions that incite you to do good; and
 painful ones disturb you, when you have resisted the faithful internal
 monitor.  The wiser, and the better you grow, the more visible, if I may
 use the expression, will God becomeFor wisdom consists in searching Him
 outand goodness in endeavouring to copy His attributes.
 
 To attain any thing great, a model must be held up to exercise our
 understanding, and engage our affections.  A view of the disinterested
 goodness of God is therefore calculated to touch us more than can be
 conceived by a depraved mind.  When the love of God is shed abroad in our
 hearts; true courage will animate our conduct, for nothing can hurt those
 who trust in Him.  If the desire of acting right is ever present with us,
 if admiration of goodness fills our souls; we may be said to pray
 constantly.  And if we try to do justice to all our fellow-creatures, and
 even to the brute creation; and assist them as far as we can, we prove
 whose servants we are, and whose laws we transcribe in our lives.
 
 Never be very anxious, when you pray, what _words_ to use; regulate your
 _thoughts_; and recollect that virtue calms the passions, gives clearness
 to the understanding, and opens it to pleasures that the thoughtless and
 vicious have not a glimpse of.  You must, believe me, be acquainted with
 God to find peace, to rise superior to worldly temptations.  Habitual
 devotion is of the utmost consequence to our happiness, as what oftenest
 occupies the thoughts will influence our actions.  But, observe what I
 say,_that_ devotion is mockery and selfishness, which does not improve
 our moral character.
 
 Men, of old, prayed to the devil, sacrificed their children to him; and
 committed every kind of barbarity and impurity.  But we who serve a
 long-suffering God should pity the weakness of our fellow-creatures; we
 must not beg for mercy and not shew it;we must not acknowledge that we
 have offended, without trying to avoid doing so in future.  We are to
 deal with our fellow-creatures as we expect to be dealt with.  This is
 practical prayer!Those who practise it feel frequently sublime
 pleasures, and lively hopes animate them in this vale of tears; that seem
 a foretaste of the felicity they will enjoy, when the understanding is
 more enlightened, and the affections properly regulated.
 
 To-morrow I will take you to visit the school-mistress of the village,
 and relate her story, to enforce what I have been saying.
 
 Now you may go and dance one or two dances; and I will join you after I
 have taken a walk, which I wish to enjoy alone.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI
 
 
 The Benefits arising from Devotion.The History of the Village
 School-mistress.Fatal Effects of Inattention to Expences, in the History
 of Mr. Lofty.
 
 The next morning Mrs. Mason desired the children to get their work, and
 draw near the table whilst she related the promised history; and in the
 afternoon, if the weather be fine, they were to visit the village
 school-mistress.
 
 Her father, the honourable Mr. Lofty, was the youngest son of a noble
 family; his education had been liberal, though his fortune was small.
 His relations, however, seemed determined to push him forward in life,
 before he disobliged them by marrying the daughter of a country
 clergyman, an accomplished, sensible woman.
 
 Some time after the birth of his daughter Anna, his elder brother, the
 Earl of Caermarthen, was reconciled to him; but this reconciliation only
 led him into expences, which his limited fortune could not bear.  Mr.
 Lofty had a high sense of honour, and rather a profuse turn; he was,
 beside, a very humane man, and gave away much more than he could afford
 to give, when his compassion was excited.  He never did a mean action;
 but sometimes an ostentatious pride tarnished the lustre of very splendid
 ones, made them appear to judicious eyes, more like tinsel, than gold.  I
 will account for it.  His first impulse arose from sensibility, and the
 second from an immoderate desire of human applause: for he seemed not to
 be alive to devotional feelings, or to have that rock to rest on, which
 will support a frail being, and give true dignity to a character, though
 all nature combined to crush it.
 
 Mrs. Lofty was not a shining characterbut I will read you a part of a
 letter, which her daughter, the lady we are to visit, wrote to me.
 
 This being the anniversary of the day on which an ever loved, and much
 revered parent was released from the bondage of mortality, I observe it
 with particular seriousness, and with gratitude; for her sorrows were
 great, her trials severebut her conduct was blameless: yet the world
 admired her not; her silent, modest virtues, were not formed to attract
 the notice of the injudicious crowd, and her understanding was not
 brilliant enough to excite admiration.  But she was regardless of the
 opinion of the world; she sought her reward in the source from whence her
 virtue was derivedand she found it.He, who, for wise and merciful
 purposes, suffered her to be afflicted, supported her under her trials;
 thereby calling forth the exercise of those virtues with which He had
 adorned her gentle soul; and imparting to her a degree of heart-felt
 comfort, which no earthly blessing could afford.
 
 This amiable parent died when Anna was near eighteen, and left her to the
 care of her father, whose high spirit she had imbibed.  However, the
 religious principles which her mother had instilled regulated her notions
 of honour, and so elevated her character, that her heart was regulated by
 her understanding.
 
 Her father who had insensibly involved himself in debt, after her
 mothers death, tried many different schemes of life, all of which, at
 first wore a promising aspect; but wanting that suppleness of temper,
 that enables people to rise in the world, his struggles, instead of
 extricating, sunk him still deeper.  Wanting also the support of
 religion, he became sour, easily irritated, and almost hated a world
 whose applause he had once eagerly courted.  His affairs were at last in
 such a desperate state, that he was obliged, reluctantly, to accept of an
 invitation from his brother, who with his wife, a weak fine lady,
 intended to spend some time on the continent; his daughter was, of
 course, to be of the party.
 
 The restraint of obligations did not suit his temper, and feeling himself
 dependent, he imagined every one meant to insult him.
 
 Some sarcasms were thrown out one day by a gentleman, in a large company;
 they were not personal, yet he took fire.  His sore mind was easily hurt,
 he resented them; and heated by wine, they both said more than their cool
 reason would have suggested.  Mr. Lofty imagined his honour was wounded,
 and the next morning sent him a challengeThey metand he killed his
 antagonist, who, dying, pardoned him, and declared that the sentiments
 which had given him so much offence, fell from him by accident, and were
 not levelled at any person.
 
 The dying man lamented, that the thread of a thoughtless life had been so
 suddenly snappedthe name of his wife and children he could not
 articulate, when something like a prayer for them escaped his livid lips,
 and shook his exhausted frameThe blood flowed in a copious streamvainly
 did Mr. Lofty endeavour to staunch itthe heart lost its vital
 nourishmentand the soul escaped as he pressed the hand of his
 destroyer.Who, when he found him breathless, ran home, and rushed in a
 hurry into his own chamber.  The dead mans image haunted his
 imaginationhe startedimagined that he was at his elbowand shook the
 hand that had received the dying graspyet still it was pressed, and the
 pressure entered into his very soulOn the table lay two pistols, he
 caught up one,and shot himself.The report alarmed the familythe
 servants and his daughter, for his brother was not at home, broke open
 the door,and she saw the dreadful sight!  As there was still some
 appearance of life, a trembling rayshe supported the body, and sent for
 assistance.  But he soon died in her arms without speaking, before the
 servant returned with a surgeon.
 
 Horror seized her, another pistol lay charged on the table, she caught it
 up, but religion held her handshe knelt down by a dead father, and
 prayed to a superior one.  Her mind grew calmeryet still she
 passionately wished she had but heard him speak, or that she had conveyed
 comfort to his departing spiritwhere, where would it find comfort? again
 she was obliged to have recourse to prayer.
 
 After the death of her father, her aunt treated her as if she were a mere
 dependent on her bounty; and expected her to be an humble companion in
 every sense of the word.  The visitors took the tone from her ladyship,
 and numberless were the mortifications she had to bear.
 
 The entrance of a person about business interrupted the narration; but
 Mrs. Mason promised to resume it after dinner.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII
 
 
 The Benefits arising from Devotion.The History of the Village
 School-mistress concluded.
 
 As soon as the cloth was removed, Mrs. Mason concluded the narration; and
 the girls forgot their fruit whilst they were listening to the sequel.
 
 Anna endured this treatment some years, and had an opportunity of
 acquiring a knowledge of the world and her own heart.  She visited her
 mothers father, and would have remained with him; but she determined not
 to lessen the small pittance which he had anxiously saved out of a scanty
 income for two other grand-children.  She thought continually of her
 situation, and found, on examining her understanding, that the
 fashionable circle in which she moved, could not at any rate have
 afforded her much satisfaction, or even amusement; though the neglect and
 contempt that she met with rendered her very uncomfortable.  She had her
 fathers spirit of independence, and determined to shake off the galling
 yoke which she had long struggled with, and try to earn her own
 subsistence.  Her acquaintance expostulated with her, and represented the
 miseries of poverty, and the mortifications and difficulties that she
 would have to encounter.  Let it be so, she replied, it is much
 preferable to swelling the train of the proud or vicious great, and
 despising myself for bearing their impertinence, for eating their bitter
 bread;better, indeed, is a dinner of herbs with contentment.  My wants
 are few.  When I am my own mistress, the crust I earn will be sweet, and
 the water that moistens it will not be mingled with tears of sorrow or
 indignation.
 
 To shorten my story; she came to me, after she had attempted several
 plans, and requested my advice.  She would not accept of any considerable
 favour, and declared that the greatest would be, to put her in a way of
 supporting herself, without forfeiting her highly valued independence.  I
 knew not what to advise; but whilst I was debating the matter with
 myself, I happened to mention, that we were in want of a school-mistress.
 She eagerly adopted the plan, and persevering in it these last ten years,
 I find her a most valuable acquisition to our society.
 
 She was formed to shine in the most brilliant circleyet she relinquished
 it, and patiently labours to improve the children consigned to her
 management, and tranquillize her own mind.  She succeeds in both.
 
 She lives indeed alone, and has all day only the society of children; yet
 she enjoys many true pleasures; dependence on God is her support, and
 devotion her comfort.  Her lively affections are therefore changed into a
 love of virtue and truth: and these exalted speculations have given an
 uncommon dignity to her manners; for she seems above the world, and its
 trifling commotions.  At her meals, gratitude to Heaven supplies the
 place of society.  She has a tender, social heart, and, as she cannot
 sweeten her solitary draught, by expressing her good wishes to her
 fellow-creatures, an ejaculation to Heaven for the welfare of her friends
 is the substitute.  This circumstance I heard her mention to her
 grandfather, who sometimes visits her.
 
 I will now make some alteration in my dress, for when I visit those who
 have been reduced from their original place in society by misfortunes, I
 always attend a little to ceremony; lest too much familiarity should
 appear like disrespect.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII
 
 
 Visit to the School-mistress.True and false Pride.
 
 Their dress was soon adjusted, and the girls plucked flowers to adorn
 themselves, and a nosegay to present to the school-mistress, whose garden
 was but small.
 
 They met the children just released from confinement; the swarm came
 humming round Mrs. Mason, endeavouring to catch her eye, and obtain the
 notice they were so proud of.  The girls made their best courtesies,
 blushing; and the boys hung down their heads, and kicked up the dust, in
 scraping a bow of respect.
 
 They found their mistress preparing to drink tea, to refresh herself
 after the toils of the day; and, with the ease peculiar to well-bred
 people, she quickly enabled them to partake of it, by giving the
 tea-board a more sociable appearance.
 
 The harvest-home was soon the subject of conversation, and the harper was
 mentioned.  The family pride of the Welsh, said Anna, has often diverted
 me; I have frequently heard the inhabitants of a little hut, that could
 scarcely be distinguished from the pig-sty, which stood in the front of
 it, boast of their ancestors and despise trade.  They have informed me,
 that one branch of their family built the middle aisle of the church;
 that another beautified the chancel, and gave the ten commandments, which
 blaze there in letters of gold.  Some rejoice that their forefathers
 sleep in the most conspicuous tombsand that their ashes have an
 inscription to point out where they are returning to their mother earth.
 And those graves, which only a little stone at the head gives consequence
 to, are adorned every Sunday with flowers, or ever-greens.  We perceive,
 in all the various customs of men, a desire to live in the past and in
 the future, if I may be allowed the expression.
 
 Mrs. Mason then observed, that of all the species of pride which carry a
 man out of himself, family pride was the most beneficial to society.
 Pride of wealth produces vanity and ostentation; but that of blood seems
 to inspire high notions of honour, and to banish meanness.  Yet it is
 productive of many ill consequences, the most obvious is, that it renders
 individuals respectable to the generality, whose merit is only reflected:
 and sometimes the want of this accidental advantage throws the most
 shining personal virtues and abilities into obscurity.  In weak minds
 this pride degenerates into the most despicable folly; and the wise will
 not condescend to accept of fame at second-hand, replied Anna.  We ought
 to be proud of our original, but we should trace it to our Heavenly
 Father, who breathed into us the breath of life.We are His children when
 we try to resemble Him, when we are convinced that truth and goodness
 must constitute the very essence of the soul; and that the pursuit of
 them will produce happiness, when the vain distinctions of mortals will
 fade away, and their pompous escutcheons moulder with more vulgar dust!
 But remember, my young friends, virtue is immortal; and goodness arises
 from a quick perception of truth, and actions conformable to the
 conviction.
 
 Different subjects beguiled the time, till the closing evening admonished
 them to return home; and they departed reluctantly, filled with respect.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIX
 
 
 Charity.The History of Peggy and her Family.The Sailors Widow.
 
 I have often remarked to you, said Mrs. Mason, one morning, to her
 pupils, that we are all dependent on each other; and this dependence is
 wisely ordered by our Heavenly Father, to call forth many virtues, to
 exercise the best affections of the human heart, and fix them into
 habits.  While we impart pleasure we receive it, and feel the grandeur of
 our immortal soul, as it is constantly struggling to spread itself into
 futurity.
 
 Perhaps the greatest pleasure I have ever received, has arisen from the
 habitual exercise of charity, in its various branches: the view of a
 distressed object has made me now think of conversing about one branch of
 it, that of giving alms.
 
 You know Peggy, the young girl whom I wish to have most about my person;
 I mean, I wish it for her own sake, that I may have an opportunity of
 improving her mind, and cultivating a good capacity.  As to attendance, I
 never give much trouble to any fellow-creature; for I choose to be
 independent of caprice and artificial wants; unless indeed, when I am
 sick; then, I thankfully receive the assistance I would willingly give to
 others in the same situation.  I believe I have not in the world a more
 faithful friend than Peggy; and her earnest desire to please me gratifies
 my benevolence, for I always observe with delight the workings of a
 grateful heart.
 
 I lost a darling child, said Mrs. Mason, smothering a sigh, in the depth
 of winterdeath had before deprived me of her father, and when I lost my
 childhe died again.
 
 The wintery prospects suiting the temper of my soul, I have sat looking
 at a wide waste of trackless snow for hours; and the heavy sullen fog,
 that the feeble rays of the sun could not pierce, gave me back an image
 of my mind.  I was unhappy, and the sight of dead nature accorded with my
 feelingsfor all was dead to me.
 
 As the snow began to melt, I took a walk, and observed the birds hopping
 about with drooping wings, or mute on the leafless boughs.  The mountain,
 whose sides had lost the snow, looked black; yet still some remained on
 the summit, and formed a contrast to diversify the dreary prospect.
 
 I walked thoughtfully along, when the appearance of a poor man, who did
 not beg, struck me very forcibly.  His shivering limbs were scarcely
 sheltered from the cold by the tattered garments that covered him; and he
 had a sharp, famished look.  I stretched out my hand with some relief in
 it, I would not enquire into the particulars of such obvious distress.
 The poor wretch caught my hand, and hastily dropping on his knees,
 thanked me in an extacy, as if he had almost lost sight of hope, and was
 overcome by the sudden relief.  His attitude, for I cannot bear to see a
 fellow-creature kneel, and eager thanks, oppressed my weak spirits, so
 that I could not for a moment ask him any more questions; but as soon as
 I recollected myself, I learned from him the misfortunes that had reduced
 him to such extreme distress, and he hinted, that I could not easily
 guess the good I had done.  I imagined from this hint that he was
 meditating his own destruction when I saw him, to spare himself the
 misery of seeing his infant perish,starved to death, in every sense of
 the word.
 
 I will now hasten to the sequel of the account.  His wife had lately had
 a child, she was very ill at the time, and want of proper food, and a
 defence against the inclemency of the weather, hurried her out of the
 world.  The poor child, Peggy, had sucked in disease and nourishment
 together, and now even that wretched source had failedthe breast was
 cold that had afforded the scanty support; and the little innocent
 smiled, unconscious of its misery.  I sent for her, added Mrs. Mason, and
 her father dying a few years after, she has ever been a favourite charge
 of mine, and nursing of her, in some measure, dispelled the gloom in
 which I had been almost lost.Ah! my children, you know not how many,
 houseless heads bide the pitiless storm!
 
 I received soon after a lesson of resignation from a poor woman, who was
 a practical philosopher.
 
 She had lost her husband, a sailor, and lost his wages also, as she could
 not prove his death.  She came to me to beg some pieces of silk, to make
 some pin-cushions for the boarders of a neighbouring school.  Her lower
 weeds were patched with different coloured rags; but they spoke not
 variety of wretchedness, on the contrary, they shewed a mind so content,
 that want, and bodily pain, did not prevent her thinking of the opinion
 of casual observers.  This woman lost a husband and a child suddenly, and
 her daily bread was precarious.I cheered the widows heart, and my own
 was not quite solitary.
 
 But I am growing melancholy, whilst I am only desirous of pointing out to
 you how very beneficial charity isbecause it enables us to find comfort
 when all our worldly comforts are blighted: besides, when our bowels
 yearn to our fellow-creatures, we feel that the love of God dwelleth in
 usand then we cannot always go on our way sorrowing.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX
 
 
 Visit to Mrs. Trueman.The Use of Accomplishments.Virtue the Soul of
 all.
 
 In the afternoon they visited Mrs. Trueman unexpectedly, and found her
 sitting in the garden playing to her children, who danced on the green
 sod.  She approached to receive them, and laid aside her guitar; but,
 after some conversation, Mrs. Mason desired her to take it up again, and
 the girls joined in the request.  While she was singing Mary whispered
 Mrs. Mason, that she would give the world to be able to sing as well.
 The whisper was not so low but a part of it reached Mrs. Truemans ears,
 who said to her, smiling, my young friend, you value accomplishments much
 too highlythey may give grace to virtuebut are nothing without solid
 worth.Indeed, I may say more, for any thing like perfection in the arts
 cannot be attained, where a relish; nay, a delight in what is true and
 noble is wanting.  A superficial observer may be pleased with a picture
 in which fine colours predominate; and quick movements in music may
 tickle the ear, though they never reach the heart: but it is the simple
 strain which affection animates, that we listen to with interest and
 delight.  Mr. Trueman has a taste for the fine arts; and I wish in every
 thing to be his companion.  His conversation has improved my judgment,
 and the affection an intimate knowledge of his virtues has inspired,
 increases the love which I feel for the whole human race.  He lives
 retired from the world; to amuse him after the business of the day is
 over, and my babes asleep, I sing to him.  A desire to please, and the
 pleasure I read in his eyes, give to my music energy and tenderness.
 When he is ruffled by worldly cares, I try to smooth his wrinkled brow,
 and think mine a voice of melody, when it has had that effect.
 
 Very true, replied Mrs. Mason, accomplishments should be cultivated to
 render us pleasing to our domestic friends; virtue is necessary; it must
 ever be the foundation of our peace and usefulness; but when we are
 capable of affection, we wish to have something peculiar to ourselves.
 We study the taste of our friends, and endeavour to conform to it; but,
 in doing so, we ought rather to improve our own abilities than servilely
 to copy theirs.  Observe, my dear girls, Mrs. Truemans distinction, her
 accomplishments are for her friends, her virtues for the world in
 general.
 
 I should think myself vain, and my soul little, answered Mrs. Trueman, if
 the applause of the whole world, on the score of abilities, which did not
 add any real lustre to my character, could afford me matter of
 exultation.  The approbation of my own heart, the humble hope of pleasing
 the Most High, elevates my soul; and I feel, that in a future state, I
 may enjoy an unspeakable degree of happiness, though I now only
 experience a faint foretaste.  Next to these sublime emotions, which I
 cannot describe, and the joy resulting from doing good; I am happy when I
 can amuse those I love; it is not then vanity, but tenderness, that spurs
 me on, and my songs, my drawings, my every action, has something of my
 heart in it.  When I can add to the innocent enjoyments of my children,
 and improve them at the same time, are not my accomplishments of use?  In
 the same style, when I vary the pleasures of my fire-side, I make my
 husband forget that it is a lonely one; and he returns to look for
 elegance at home, elegance that he himself gave the polish to; and which
 is only affected, when it does not flow from virtuous affections.
 
 I beg your pardon, I expatiate too long on my favourite topic; my desire
 to rectify your notions must plead my excuse.
 
 Mr. Trueman now joined them, and brought with him some of his finest
 fruit.  After tea Mrs. Trueman shewed them some of her drawings; and, to
 comply with their repeated request, played on the harpsichord, and Mr.
 Trueman took his violin to accompany her.  Then the children were
 indulged with a dance, each had her favourite tune played in turn.
 
 As they returned home, the girls were eagerly lavishing praises on Mrs.
 Trueman; and Mary said, I cannot tell why, but I feel so glad when she
 takes notice of me.  I never saw any one look so good-natured, cried
 Caroline.  Mrs. Mason joined in the conversation.  You justly remarked
 that she is good-natured; you remember her history, she loves truth, and
 she is ever exercising benevolence and lovefrom the insect, that she
 avoids treading on, her affection may be traced to that Being who lives
 for ever.And it is from her goodness her agreeable qualities spring.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI
 
 
 The Benefit of bodily Pain.Fortitude the Basis of Virtue.The Folly of
 Irresolution.
 
 The children had been playing in the garden for some time, whilst Mrs.
 Mason was reading alone.  But she was suddenly alarmed by the cries of
 Caroline, who ran into the room in great distress.  Mary quickly
 followed, and explaining the matter said, that her sister had
 accidentally disturbed some wasps, who were terrified, and of course
 stung her.  Remedies were applied to assuage the pain; yet all the time
 she uttered the loudest and most silly complaints, regardless of the
 uneasiness she gave those who were exerting themselves to relieve her.
 
 In a short time the smart abated, and then her friend thus addressed her,
 with more than usual gravity.  I am sorry to see a girl of your age weep
 on account of bodily pain; it is a proof of a weak minda proof that you
 cannot employ yourself about things of consequence.  How often must I
 tell you that the Most High is educating us for eternity?
 
 The term virtue, comes from a word signifying strength.  Fortitude of
 mind is, therefore, the basis of every virtue, and virtue belongs to a
 being, that is weak in its nature, and strong only in will and
 resolution.
 
 Children early feel bodily pain, to habituate them to bear the conflicts
 of the soul, when they become reasonable creatures.  This, I say, is the
 first trial, and I like to see that proper pride which strives to conceal
 its sufferings.  Those who, when young, weep if the least trifle annoys
 them, will never, I fear, have sufficient strength of mind, to encounter
 all the miseries that can afflict the body, rather than act meanly to
 avoid them.  Indeed, this seems to be the essential difference between a
 great and a little mind: the former knows how to endurewhilst the latter
 suffers an immortal soul to be depressed, lost in its abode; suffers the
 inconveniences which attack the one to overwhelm the other.  The soul
 would always support the body, if its superiority was felt, and
 invigorated by exercise.  The Almighty, who never afflicts but to produce
 some good end, first sends diseases to children to teach them patience
 and fortitude; and when by degrees they have learned to bear them, they
 have acquired some virtue.
 
 In the same manner, cold or hunger, when accidentally encountered, are
 not evils; they make _us feel what wretches feel_, and teach us to be
 tender-hearted.  Many of your fellow-creatures daily bear what you cannot
 for a moment endure without complaint.  Besides, another advantage arises
 from it, after you have felt hunger, you will not be very anxious to
 choose the particular kind of food that is to satisfy it.  You will then
 be freed from a frivolous care.
 
 When it is necessary to take a nauseous draught, swallow it at once, and
 do not make others sick whilst you are hesitating, though you know that
 you ought to take it.  If a tooth is to be drawn, or any other
 disagreeable operation to be performed, determine resolutely that it
 shall be done immediately; and debate not, when you clearly see the step
 that you ought to take.  If I see a child act in this way, I am ready to
 embrace it, my soul yearns for itI perceive the dawning of a character
 that will be useful to society, as it prepares its soul for a nobler
 field of action.
 
 Believe me, it is the patient endurance of pain, that will enable you to
 resist your passions; after you have borne bodily pain, you will have
 firmness enough to sustain the still more excruciating agonies of the
 mind.  You will not, to banish momentary cares, plunge into dissipation,
 nor to escape a present inconvenience, forget that you should hold fast
 virtue as the only substantial good.
 
 I should not value the affection of a person who would not bear pain and
 hunger to serve me; nor is that benevolence warm, which shrinks from
 encountering difficulties, when it is necessary, in order to be useful to
 any fellow-creature.
 
 There is a just pride, a noble ambition in some minds, that I greatly
 admire.  I have seen a little of it in Mary! for whilst she pities
 others, she imagines that she could bear their inconveniences herself;
 and she seems to feel more uneasiness, when she observes the sufferings
 of others, than I could ever trace on her countenance under the immediate
 pressure of pain.
 
 Remember you are to bear patiently the infirmities of the weakest of your
 fellow-creatures; but to yourselves you are not to be equally indulgent.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII
 
 
 Journey to London.
 
 The girls were visibly improved; an air of intelligence began to animate
 Carolines fine features; and benevolence gave her eyes the humid sparkle
 which is so beautiful and engaging.  The interest that we take in the
 fate of others, attaches them to ourselves;thus Carolines goodness
 inspired more affection than her beauty.
 
 Marys judgment grew every day clearer; or, more properly speaking, she
 acquired experience; and her lively feelings fixed the conclusions of
 reason in her mind.  Whilst Mrs. Mason was rejoicing in their apparent
 improvement, she received a letter from their father, requesting her to
 allow his daughters to spend the winter in town, as he wished to procure
 them the best masters, an advantage that the country did not afford.
 With reluctance she consented, determining to remain with them a short
 time; and preparations were quickly made for the journey.
 
 The wished for morning arrived, and they set off in a tumult of spirits;
 sorry to leave the country, yet delighted with the prospect of visiting
 the metropolis.  This hope soon dried the tears which had bedewed their
 cheeks; for the parting with Mrs. Mason was not anticipated.  The
 autumnal views were new to them; they saw the hedges exhibit various
 colours, and the trees stripped of their leaves; but they were not
 disposed to moralize.
 
 For some time after their arrival, every thing they saw excited wonder
 and admiration; and not till they were a little familiarized with the new
 objects, did they ask reasonable questions.
 
 Several presents recruited their purses; and they requested Mrs. Mason to
 allow them to buy some trifles they were in want of.  The request was
 modest, and she complied.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII
 
 
 Charity.Shopping.The distressed Stationer.Mischievous Consequences of
 delaying Payment.
 
 As they walked in search of a shop, they both determined to purchase
 pocket-books; but their friend desired them not to spend all their money
 at once, as they would meet many objects of charity in the numerous
 streets of the metropolis.  I do not wish you, she continued, to relieve
 every beggar that you casually meet; yet should any one attract your
 attention, obey the impulse of your heart, which will lead you to pay
 them for exercising your compassion, and do not suffer the whispers of
 selfishness, that they may be impostors, to deter you.  However, I would
 have you give but a trifle when you are not certain the distress is real,
 and reckon it given for pleasure.  I for my part would rather be deceived
 five hundred times, than doubt once without reason.
 
 They stopped at a small shop, Mrs. Mason always sought out such; for,
 said she, I may help those who perhaps want assistance; bargains I never
 seek, for I wish every one to receive the just value for their goods.
 
 In the shop which they chanced to enter, they did not find the kind of
 pocket-book that they had previously fixed on, and therefore wished
 precipitately to leave it; but were detained by their more considerate
 friend.  While they had been turning over the trinkets, the countenance
 of the woman, who served them, caught her eye, and she observed her eager
 manner of recommending the books.  You have given much unnecessary
 trouble, said she, to the mistress of the shop; the books are better, and
 more expensive than you intended to purchase, but I will make up the
 deficiency.  A beam of pleasure enlivened the womans swollen eyes; and
 Mrs. Mason, in the mild accents of compassion, said, if it is not an
 impertinent question, will you tell me from what cause your visible
 distress arises? perhaps I may have it in my power to relieve you.The
 woman burst into tears.Indeed, Madam, you have already relieved me; for
 the money you have laid out will enable me to procure some food for my
 poor little grandchildren, and to send a meal to their poor father, who
 is now confined for debt, though a more honest man never breathed.  Ah!
 Madam, I little thought I should come to thisYesterday his wife died,
 poor soul!  I really believe things going so cross broke her heart.  He
 has been in jail these five months; I could not manage the shop, or buy
 what was proper to keep up the credit of it, so business has been
 continually falling off; yet, if his debts were paid, he would now be
 here, and we should have money in our pockets.  And what renders it more
 provoking, the people who owe us most are very rich.  It is true, they
 live in such a very high style, and keep such a number of horses and
 servants, that they are often in want of money, and when they have it,
 they mostly have some freak in their heads, and do not think of paying
 poor trades-people.  At first we were afraid to ask for payment lest we
 should lose their custom, and so it proved; when we did venture, forced
 by necessity, they sent to other shops, without discharging our demand.
 
 And, my dear Madam, this is not all my grief; my son, before his
 misfortunes, was one of the most sober, industrious young men in London;
 but now he is not like the same man.  He had nothing to do in the jail,
 and to drive away care he learned to drink; he said it was a comfort to
 forget himself, and he would add an oathI never heard him swear till
 then.  I took pains when he was a child to teach him his prayers, and he
 rewarded me by being a dutiful son.  The case is quite altered nowhe
 seems to have lost all natural affectionhe heeds not his mothers
 tears.Her sobs almost suffocated her, as she strove to go onHe will
 bring my grey hairs with sorrow to the graveand yet I pity my poor boy,
 he is shut up with such a number of profligate wretches, who laugh at
 what is right.  Every farthing I send him he spends in liquor, and used
 to make his poor wife pawn her clothes to buy him drinkshe was happy to
 die, it was well for her not to live to hear the babe she gave suck to
 despise her!
 
 A passion of tears relieved the sufferer, and she called her
 grandchildren; these innocent babes, said she, I shall not be able to
 keep them, they must go to the workhouse.  If the quality did but know
 what they make us poor industrious people suffersurely they would be
 more considerate.
 
 Mrs. Mason gave her something to supply her present wants, and promised
 to call on her again before she left town.
 
 They walked silently down two or three streets; I hope you have learned
 to think, my dear girls, said Mrs. Mason, and that your hearts have felt
 the emotions of compassion; need I make any comments on the situation of
 the poor woman we have just left.  You perceive that those who neglect to
 pay their debts, do more harm than they imagine; perhaps, indeed, some of
 these very people do, what is called, a noble action, give away a large
 sum, and are termed generous; nay, very probably, weep at a tragedy, or
 when reading an affecting tale.  They then boast of their
 sensibilitywhen, alas! neglecting the foundation of all virtue,
 _justice_, they have occasioned exquisite distress;led a poor wretch
 into vice; heaped misery on helpless infancy, and drawn tears from the
 aged widow.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV
 
 
 Visit to a poor Family in London.Idleness the Parent of
 Vice.Prodigality and Generosity incompatible.The Pleasures of
 Benevolence.True and false Motives for saving.
 
 After the impression which the story, and the sight of the family had
 made, was a little worn off; Caroline begged leave to buy one toy, and
 then another, till her money was quite gone.  When Mrs. Mason found it
 was all expended, she looked round for an object in distress; a poor
 woman soon presented herself, and her meagre countenance gave weight to
 her tale.A babe, as meagre, hung at her breast, which did not seem to
 contain sufficient moisture to wet its parched lips.
 
 On enquiry they found that she lodged in a neighbouring garret.  Her
 husband had been out of employment a long time, and was now sick.  The
 master who had formerly given him work, lost gradually great part of his
 business; for his best customers were grown so fond of foreign articles,
 that his goods grew old in the warehouse.  Consequently a number of hands
 were dismissed, who not immediately finding employment elsewhere, were
 reduced to the most extreme distress.  The truth of this account a
 reputable shopkeeper attested; and he added that many of the unhappy
 creatures, who die unpitied at the gallows, were first led into vice by
 accidental idleness.
 
 They ascended the dark stairs, scarcely able to bear the bad smells that
 flew from every part of a small house, that contained in each room a
 family, occupied in such an anxious manner to obtain the necessaries of
 life, that its comforts never engaged their thoughts.  The precarious
 meal was snatched, and the stomach did not turn, though the cloth, on
 which it was laid, was died in dirt.  When to-morrows bread is
 uncertain, who thinks of cleanliness?  Thus does despair increase the
 misery, and consequent disease aggravate the horrors of poverty!
 
 They followed the woman into a low garret, that was never visited by the
 chearful rays of the sun.A man, with a sallow complexion, and long
 beard, sat shivering over a few cinders in the bottom of a broken grate,
 and two more children were on the ground, half naked, near him, breathing
 the same noxious air.  The gaiety natural to their age, did not animate
 their eyes, half sunk in their sockets; and, instead of smiles, premature
 wrinkles had found a place in their lengthened visages.  Life was nipped
 in the bud; shut up just as it began to unfold itself.  A frost, a
 killing frost, had destroyed the parents hopes; they seemed to come
 into the world only to crawl half formed,to suffer, and to die.
 
 Mrs. Mason desired the girls to relieve the family; Caroline hung down
 her head abashedwishing the paltry ornaments which she had thoughtlessly
 bought, in the bottom of the sea.  Mary, meanwhile, proud of the new
 privilege, emptied her purse; and Caroline, in a supplicating tone,
 entreated Mrs. Mason to allow her to give her neck-handkerchief to the
 little infant.
 
 Mrs. Mason desired the woman to call on her the next day; and they left
 the family cheered by their bounty.
 
 Caroline expected the reproof that soon proceeded from the mouth of her
 true friend.  I am glad that this accident has occurred, to prove to you
 that prodigality and generosity are incompatible.  Economy and
 self-denial are necessary in every station, to enable us to be generous,
 and to act conformably to the rules of justice.
 
 Mary may this night enjoy peaceful slumbers; idle Fancies, foolishly
 indulged, will not float in her brain; she may, before she closes her
 eyes, thank God, for allowing her to be His instrument of mercy.  Will
 the trifles that you have purchased, afford you such heartfelt delight,
 Caroline?
 
 Selfish people save to gratify their own caprices and appetites; the
 benevolent curb both, to give scope to the nobler feelings of the human
 heart.  When we squander money idly, we defraud the poor, and deprive our
 own souls of their most exalted food.  If you wish to be useful, govern
 your desires, and wait not till distress obtrudes itselfsearch it out.
 In the country it is not always attended with such shocking circumstances
 as at present; but in large cities, many garrets contain families,
 similar to those we have seen this afternoon.  The money spent in
 indulging the vain wishes of idleness, and a childish fondness for pretty
 things not regulated by reason, would relieve the misery that my soul
 shrinks back from contemplating.
 
     [Picture: Economy and self-denial are necessary in every station]
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV
 
 
 Mrs. Masons farewell Advice to her young Friends.
 
 The day before Mrs. Mason was to leave her pupils, she took a hand of
 each, and pressing them tenderly in her own, tears started into her
 eyesI tremble for you, my dear girls, for you must now practise by
 yourselves some of the virtues which I have been endeavouring to
 inculcate; and I shall anxiously wait for the summer, to see what
 progress you have made by yourselves.
 
 We have conversed on several very important subjects; pray do not forget
 the conclusions I have drawn.  I now, as my last present, give you a
 book, in which I have written the subjects that we have discussed.  Recur
 frequently to it, for the stories illustrating the instruction it
 contains, you will not feel in such a great degree the want of my
 personal advice.  Some of the reasoning you may not thoroughly
 comprehend, but, as your understandings ripen, you will feel its full
 force.
 
 Avoid anger; exercise compassion; and love truth.  Recollect, that from
 religion your chief comfort must spring, and never neglect the duty of
 prayer.  Learn from experience the comfort that arises from making known
 your wants and sorrows to the wisest and best of Beings, in whose hands
 are the issues, not only of this life, but of that which is to come.
 
 Your father will allow you a certain stipend; you have already _felt_ the
 pleasure of doing good; ever recollect that the wild pursuits of fancy
 must be conquered, to enable you to gratify benevolent wishes, and that
 you must practise economy in trifles to have it in your power to be
 generous on great occasions.  And the good you intend to do, do
 quickly;for know that a trifling duty neglected, is a great fault, and
 the present time only is at your command.
 
 You are now candidates for my friendship, and on your advancement in
 virtue my regard will in future depend.  Write often to me, I will
 punctually answer your letters; but let me have the genuine sentiments of
 your hearts.  In expressions of affection and respect, do not deviate
 from truth to gain what you wish for, or to turn a period prettily.
 
 Adieu! when you think of your friend, observe her precepts; and let the
 recollection of my affection, give additional weight to the truths which
 I have endeavoured to instill; and, to reward my care, let me hear that
 you love and practice virtue.
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                   FINIS.
 
 
